Character Limit: How Elon Musk Destroyed Twitter

By Kate Conger and Ryan Mac

PENGUIN PRESS
An imprint of Penguin Random House LLC

Copyright © 2024 by Kate Conger and Ryan Mac


CONTENTS
Dedication
Epigraph
Introduction
Act I >
1 \ back at twttr
2 \ #StayWoke
3 \ “This is actually me”
4 \ OneTeam
5 \ An Invasion
6 \ A Polynesian Vacation
7 \ Resource Plan
8 \ Parag
9 \ Bluesky
10 \ Twitter in Trouble
11 \ Musk’s Shopping Spree
12 \ An Offer
13 \ Poison Pill
Act II > >
14 \ “Bring the cattle”
15 \ Parag’s Last Stand
16 \ Just Say Yes
17 \ Golden, Golden
18 \
19 \ Bots and Horses
20 \ Sun Valley
21 \ Court of Chancery
22 \ “Sorry I didn’t get your special”
23 \ Mudge
24 \ An Accelerant to X
25 \ “Not owned by a fucking moron”
26 \ Let That Sink In
27 \ Trick or Tweet
28 \ “The bird is freed”
Act III > > >
29 \ Code Reviews
30 \ Lords and Peasants
31 \ “Educate me”
32 \ A Blue Heart
33 \ The Snap
34 \ The Aftermath
35 \ Verified or Not
36 \ Elections
37 \ Zombie Attack
38 \ Fired for Shitposting
39 \ Zero-Based Budgeting
40 \ “I’m Rich, Bitch!”
41 \ Self-Doubt
42 \ Red Pilled
43 \ Endorsements
44 \ Linda
45 \ Tell It to Earth
Epilogue
Photographs
Acknowledgments
Note on Reporting
Notes
Image Credits
Index
About the Authors
for Kim Mac and Marie Aro
The Golden Sir
@screaminbutcalm
Me sowing: Haha fuck yeah!!! Yes!!
Me reaping: Well this fucking sucks. What the fuck.

2:14 PM Mar 12, 2019
220K 48K 139K
A
Introduction > November 11, 2022
fter waiting for nearly four hours, the senior data scientist was
growing restless. He hadn’t planned to be in the Twitter office. It was
Veterans Day and most of his colleagues were logging out, but he was
loitering outside a tenth-floor conference room at the company’s San
Francisco headquarters, waiting to be summoned by Twitter’s new owner.

Elon Musk was in his element. The fifty-one-year-old billionaire thrived
on tests of his endurance, thrilled by his own strength when he slept on a
conference room couch at Tesla’s factory, or stayed up all night putting
together the final flourishes for a rocket launch at SpaceX. Now he was
pitting himself against Twitter. In the aftermath of his $44 billion takeover,
he was straining the bounds of the social network. How quickly could he
bend it to his will?
The data scientist, a lanky man with tousled reddish-brown hair and
cutting blue eyes, had started working at Twitter only a year earlier. His
colleagues had quickly come to see him as a deep thinker who was
fascinated by the good—and bad—that came from connecting communities
of humans online. He had honed his talent for distilling the vast landscape
of social media into digestible sound bites during his five years at
Facebook, where he had delved into reams of user data to explore thorny
topics like hate speech and misinformation that contributed to people
rioting at the U.S. Capitol on January 6, 2021. An academic at heart, the
data scientist often critiqued his employer’s faults with a level of candor
that executives rarely heard from other employees.

When Musk had offered to buy Twitter that April, the data scientist was
optimistic. Musk was a man who had revolutionized two industries,
mainstreaming electric cars and privatizing space exploration. Perhaps he
was the visionary who could give the social media company a much-needed
shot in the arm.

But over the past two weeks, Musk had fired half of the data scientist’s
colleagues with no plan and little explanation of his vision. He had
alienated advertisers, undermining the foundation of Twitter’s business.

And he had fallen for a blatant conspiracy theory, tweeting out a fake story
about the husband of Nancy Pelosi, the Speaker of the U.S. House of
Representatives, suggesting he was enmeshed in a tryst with a disturbed
man who had attacked him in his home. It was the kind of absurd fiction
that only someone with a warped mind—radicalized by hours spent online
every day in their own filter bubble—would believe. The data scientist was
horrified. Musk, apparently, was one of the easily misled conspiracists he
had studied in his work.

Despite all the changes Musk had already made to Twitter, the
billionaire had signaled he wouldn’t be resting that Friday. Early that
morning, he sent out an email to his employees extending “a note of
appreciation to those who were there with me.”
“I will be in the office again today,” Musk wrote. “Stop by the 10th
floor if you’d like to talk about taking Twitter to the next level. The priority
is near-term actions.”
The data scientist decided to take the plunge. He trekked through the
fog and gloom of the San Francisco winter, making his way up Market
Street to Twitter’s looming Art Deco headquarters. Just after 10:00 a.m., he
set up camp at a bank of desks outside Caracara, a conference room with
sweeping views of downtown and the gleaming dome of city hall. Its glass
walls allowed people passing by to gaze in at executives as though they
were lions at the zoo. Musk was the main attraction, and the workers
waiting outside to meet with him whispered quietly about what they hoped
to tell their new boss. As the data scientist clacked away on his laptop,
working on a pair of memos he planned to share with Musk, he
eavesdropped. Some employees murmured concerns about how few people
had signed up for Twitter’s new subscription product. Others were trading
tips on how to best communicate with their new leader.

Behnam Rezaei, a warm man who wore round, tortoiseshell glasses and
had led engineering teams at Twitter for more than five years, approached
the data scientist to offer advice. Rezaei had climbed the ladder into Musk’s
good graces, avoiding the firings that took out his fellow managers and
rising to a vice president role. Rezaei thought highly of the data scientist
and had cashed in some of his newfound political capital to get him face
time with Musk.

“Elon only wants to hear positive things,” Rezaei instructed him. “Don’t
tell him about what we can’t do or try to justify the status quo.”
“Elon just wants to do what benefits humanity.”
Rezaei wasn’t aware, however, that the data scientist had already
decided to quit. When he saw Musk’s email early Friday morning, he
delayed his departure by one day so that he could speak directly to the new
owner. He still believed in Twitter and the power of large social networks,
and he hoped Musk would listen. Maybe Musk’s cohort of yes-men, who
had arrived at the company following his takeover, hadn’t dared to tell him
how badly he was screwing up.

As he waited, the data scientist finalized two documents he had
prepared for his encounter. The first was a list of ideas for running Twitter
more effectively. The second, a bolder statement, outlined why Musk’s
plans to earn significant revenue from subscriptions and alter contentmoderation policies wouldn’t work, and how his paranoia and instability
were damaging the company.

As the hours ticked by, he scrounged for whatever snacks remained in
one of the nearby kitchens. His heart beat heavily as he rehearsed in his
head what he would say to Musk. Finally, just after 2:00 p.m., Musk’s
assistant approached him. Musk was busy, she said. He would have only
five minutes.

The data scientist strode into the conference room. Musk sat on one side
of a large oak table, his sagging, six-foot-two frame scrunched into a
Herman Miller office chair. The data scientist quickly introduced himself
before launching into his presentation. Musk listened intently as he
explained his ideas for growth, verification of users, and motivating
employees. He then sketched out a vision for content moderation that
placed decision-making power in the hands of an organization outside of its
owner’s direct control.

“Newspapers and magazines have editorial independence, meaning
owners don’t get to make final judgments about what stays and what goes,”
the data scientist explained. “Social media companies should have the same
structure.”
Musk wasn’t impressed. “Or not,” he muttered.

Musk’s assistant peeked back into the room and said he had another
meeting. “Do you have any final thoughts?” she asked.

“Yes, I want to say one thing,” the data scientist said. He took a deep
breath and turned to Musk.

“I’m resigning today. I was feeling excited about the takeover, but I was
really disappointed by your Paul Pelosi tweet. It’s really such obvious
partisan misinformation and it makes me worry about you and what kind of
friends you’re getting information from. It’s only really like the tenth
percentile of the adult population who’d be gullible enough to fall for this.”
The color drained from Musk’s already pale face. He leaned forward in
his chair. No one spoke to him like this. And no one, least of all someone
who worked for him, would dare to question his intellect or his tweets. His
darting eyes focused for a second directly on the data scientist.

“Fuck you!” Musk growled.

The data scientist grew bolder. He was not prone to conflict or insults,
but Musk’s reaction reinforced his belief that the billionaire was nowhere
near fit to run a company crucial to the world’s online discourse. He
remained collected, but uttered something he had not planned to say.

“I hope you’ll declare bankruptcy and let someone else run the
company.”
“Well, resignation accepted,” Musk snapped.

The data scientist made his way for the exit.

“I’ll take your laptop,” Musk’s assistant said meekly. He handed the
device to her and left.

As the data scientist walked back to the desk where he had left his
belongings, he could hear the patter of two of Musk’s security guards
jogging to catch up with him. He wondered if they would try to hassle him
or perhaps even rough him up, but they simply watched over him as he
packed his things before escorting him to the elevator bank. As they all got
into the elevator car and rode down to the first floor, one of the guards
turned to smile at him.

“What did you say to him?” he asked.

“I told him some things he didn’t like,” the data scientist responded.

“It must have felt good.”
“Yep,” he said, before stepping out of the elevator shaft, handing over
his ID badge, and leaving Twitter’s headquarters for the last time. “To be
honest, what I said is what everyone is saying behind his back. But
nobody’s saying it to his face.”
>>> ELON MUSK ARRIVED AT TWITTER a conquering hero in the eyes of many
—not least of all his own. Surrounded by a cadre of loyalists who enabled
him to make many reckless maneuvers—like buying the company in the
first place—he was cheered on by millions of online supporters who liked
and retweeted his every move. He dragged friendly investors along for the
ride as he seized control of one of the world’s preeminent online spaces for
political and cultural discourse and attempted to transform it to suit his
whims. With his successful and eye-wateringly expensive takeover, Musk
had seemingly surpassed all other tech executives in wealth, influence, and
fame. He was untouchable.

But incidents like the data scientist’s confrontational exit scarred him.

Whether he fully realized it at the time or not, Musk had gambled his
reputation and billions of dollars on the haphazard acquisition of his
favorite toy.

His takeover had not been welcomed by the company’s leaders nor
many of its users, but Twitter had placed itself on the auction block through
years of mismanagement. Its embittered founder, Jack Dorsey, had
neglected the service in the twilight of his tenure as chief executive. Over
time, Dorsey came to believe the company he once prized shouldn’t be a
business at all—but as he ignored Twitter’s profit margins, investors
swooped in to squeeze it for cash. When he stepped down in 2021, the
company embarked on a hasty cleanup job to assuage Wall Street.

But no one was prepared for Musk’s hyper-aggressive campaign, and no
one could stop him. He saw Twitter not only as a business but as an
ideological tool, a weapon, that was being wielded by San Francisco
liberals who suppressed views he enjoyed. Policies at Twitter set the tone
for other social media companies as they debated sensible online speech,
and Musk wanted to drive a new set of mores into the conversation.

That he had enough money at his disposal was truly extraordinary, an
aberrant feature of twenty-first-century capitalism. By the start of April
2022, Musk had a net worth nearing $270 billion. With the main source of
his wealth, Tesla’s shares, reaching new heights and giving him
unfathomable purchasing power, he set his sights on his one true passion.

While most tech billionaires might have spent the money on mega yachts,
sports teams, media publications, or faraway islands, Musk coveted a
megaphone, a website where his voice could be broadcast directly to
hundreds of millions of people. He wanted Twitter.

Musk’s blitzkrieg takeover had no cultural or social precedent. This
simply wasn’t the type of transaction a single human pulled off.

Corporations or private equity firms were supposed to buy companies that
size, not individuals. But Musk had reached a pinnacle of wealth that only a
handful of titans had ever come close to, and the rules of traditional
business no longer applied.

Musk’s love for Twitter was simple, relatable, and even humanizing. He
had spent hours every day scrolling the site—reading posts, laughing at
memes, and firing off stream-of-consciousness thoughts—like any regular
user. He became intoxicated by the engagement offered to him, and like
with so many other hardcore tweeters, the platform became his addiction.

The difference between him and the other diehards chasing the constant
dopamine rush of Twitter, however, was that he had the means to capture
his addiction and the desire to remake it in his own image.

>>> ON THE MORNING OF APRIL 14, 2022, we—Kate Conger and Ryan Mac,
reporters at The New York Times—woke up to a four-word tweet, the
unbelievable but inevitable culmination of two storylines we had pursued
for a decade as journalists in Silicon Valley: “I made an offer.”
We threw ourselves into reporting a monumental story. Silicon Valley’s
most consequential entrepreneur was buying one of its most iconic
companies. How would this end?
We had written extensively about social media’s content moderation
wars, Twitter’s shortcomings as a business, and Dorsey. We had also
covered Musk’s enterprises and his constant boundary pushing. Suddenly,
those stories became one—and the whole was much, much greater than the
sum of its parts.

Musk’s decision to buy Twitter seemed to have been a snap judgment.

He had assumed Twitter was a knot of technical issues that a great
engineering mind like himself could easily untangle, enabling the growth of
free speech in the digital town square. But at its core, Twitter was plagued
by social and political dilemmas, not merely technological ones. Its leaders
constantly grappled with questions about what people should be allowed to
say, and they made enemies of governments, activists, celebrities, and even
their own employees. The questions confronting Twitter were not simple.

They have been debated across the internet since its advent. They may not
have static answers at all. It is not for nothing that Twitter’s most loyal users
referred to it as a “hellsite,” a corner of the internet where something—or
someone—was always burning. People walked away from a session
scrolling through their timelines feeling angry, frustrated, disgusted—and
yet they couldn’t wait to log back on. The company needed a leader who
deeply understood psychology, politics, and history, and the messy ways
people connect instantaneously and constantly online. Instead, it got
someone whose offer for the company—$54.20 a share—included a weed
joke.

Musk found his quixotic ambitions for the platform thwarted as he
attempted to govern Twitter, and he became increasingly convinced that
employees were rebelling against him. They should be thanking him, he
thought. The way he saw it, he alone was brave enough to gamble $44
billion on saving the social media platform he loved. Didn’t they realize he
was saving humanity? He tasked some of his lackeys with ferreting out
other dissenting voices so he could fire them. He instituted code freezes that
prevented anyone from making changes to Twitter’s apps or website, in
case an employee sabotaged them. His personal bodyguards began
following him to the office restrooms, ensuring that few employees could
encroach upon him during his sacred time.

As his takeover unfolded, Musk’s paranoia intensified while those close
to him worried about his increasingly fragile state of mind. The chaotic
nature of the platform and the repercussions of his actions would expose his
limits. The more he tried to impose his will on Twitter, the further it seemed
to spin out of his control, and the deeper his obsession became. Holes began
to show in the capabilities of an entrepreneur considered by many to be one
of mankind’s most successful business leaders.

>>> AT THE TIME OF WRITING, the story of Musk’s conquest is not over. It
may yet end with a bang or a whimper—or an improbable success. But
what is clear already is that Musk has destroyed the platform. What he owns
is no longer Twitter—not in name, but also neither in substance nor in
spirit. Gone are the people who built it idealistically, at a time when Silicon
Valley’s utopian promises seemed much easier to believe, and gone is its
company culture of debate, equality, and idealism. What that means for a
world in which the news media is in a state of constant existential peril, and
democracy itself is in danger, remains to be seen. But the early signs are not
good.

Out of Twitter’s rubble, Musk is building X, a harsher and much more
cynical social media company. With it, he is ushering in a new era of
anything-goes online speech that is governed by his own whims. There have
been plenty of promises. Musk has said that X can be the world-dominating
“everything app,” where people will not only be able to post their thoughts
but also pay for goods, make phone calls, or watch movies. X will have it
all, he asserts, and deep-pocketed investors have bet billions of dollars that
he will be right.

But those lofty promises are so far just that. To those users who have
hung around, one of the most important modes of global communication
has become practically unrecognizable and now serves the interests of one
man. What was once called the digital town square is becoming Musk’s
mirror.

ACT I >
J
1 > back at twttr
ack Dorsey’s time had finally come. Standing in the cafeteria of
Twitter’s headquarters on San Francisco’s Market Street on June 11,
2015, he watched eagerly as Dick Costolo, a former entrepreneur who had
been hired four years earlier to lead Twitter out of turmoil, delivered an
unexpected message to hundreds of Twitter’s workers during their regular
all-hands meeting. Costolo was resigning as CEO. He had been quietly
confiding in friends since the start of the year that he had grown anguished
with his role at Twitter and was ready to leave. The person to replace him,
at least on an interim basis, was the man standing next to him who had
helped start it all: @Jack.

Dorsey had strategized for years to complete his Steve Jobs character
arc. He was unceremoniously fired as Twitter’s chief executive in 2008 and
had plotted a route back to the top job ever since, allying with board
members and engineering a narrative in the media that framed him as the
sole visionary behind the social media service. His comeback would be
triumphant—the driving creative force behind Twitter’s previous successes,
back at last—just as it had been when Jobs returned to Apple.

To Twitter employees, Dorsey was a man returning from a winter in the
wilderness. He stood in front of them with a new executive title and a thick
brown beard that descended past the collar of his shirt and framed his lean,
angular face and icy eyes. Although he had served as the chairman of the
company for years and was renowned as a cofounder, few employees had
ever seen him in person. They sized up the former model and meditation
enthusiast before them and couldn’t help but view him with trepidation as
he spoke in his distinctive monotone about changing the company.

Twitter needed that change fast, because it was in the dumps. There was
little product innovation, no user growth—the key metric by which any
meaningful social internet company is judged on—and a snowballing sense
that the company couldn’t succeed. The history of dysfunction and
backstabbing among the company’s founders, and the game of musical
chairs in leadership, contributed to the feeling that Twitter was going
nowhere. Dorsey had instigated some of the early missteps, and chaos was
becoming an accepted part of Twitter’s culture. With good reason, the
workers wondered: Was Jack the solution? Could he turn this company
around? Or would he flame out once again?
>>> BORN IN 1976, Dorsey grew up in St. Louis, raised by a liberal mother
and a conservative father, alongside two younger brothers. As a teenager, he
became interested in the inner workings of dispatch services—an early sign
that he would gravitate to building complex systems for transporting
information. He attended college in Missouri and New York, but dropped
out before finishing his degree. Dorsey moved to the Bay Area in 1999, on
the eve of the dot-com bust.

It was a heady time to be in tech. The visionaries and pioneers of the
internet and personal computer had governed themselves with an open,
collaborative ethos that relied on loose anarchic consensus combined with
unfettered technical expertise. That democratic culture appealed to Dorsey,
a punk aficionado who once had blue hair. Upon arriving in the Bay Area,
he moved into the Sunshine Biscuit Factory, a warehouse buried deep in the
gritty eastern side of Oakland known for housing artists and hosting
underground music shows. He tinkered with online programs to dispatch
taxis, bike messengers, or even first responders.

Unlike a lot of the scraggly coders who flocked to Silicon Valley in
pursuit of million-dollar paychecks, Dorsey was interested in aesthetics—
his own and that of the products around him. He toyed with the idea of
abandoning tech altogether in favor of becoming a fashion designer. He
liked to change his appearance, piercing his nose or using castile soap to
turn his hair into dreadlocks. His shape-shifting presentation and interests
would stick throughout his life, leaving some of the people around him
wondering if he was just looking for a place to fit in.

“I actually got the nose ring because there was just an impulse thing—I
thought that might look really cool,” Dorsey later said on 60 Minutes.

“There was no real statement that I was trying to make.”
Having taken a few freelance coding gigs around the Bay Area,
including one building a dispatch service for the ferries to San Francisco’s
Alcatraz Island, Dorsey came across Odeo, a podcasting start-up that web
entrepreneur Ev Williams was building in San Francisco, in 2005. Williams
had made a fortune two years earlier by selling his publishing platform
Blogger to Google, and Odeo was his next act. With Blogger, Williams had
taken pride in delivering publishing to the masses, allowing anyone to post
their own content online with a single click. He eschewed content
moderation, viewing it as an impossible task, and let most posts remain on
his platform.

The twenty-eight-year-old Dorsey sent Williams his résumé and was
offered a freelance coding gig at Odeo, where he quickly fell in with the
other cyberpunks on staff. But even among that oddball crew, Dorsey stood
out. He was exceptionally quiet, preferring online chats to talking in person.

He faded into the background when the group worked on projects or went
out for drinks. And even though he was working for the renowned Blogger
founder, Dorsey did his own journaling on a competing blogging platform,
LiveJournal.

For the early days of the social web, Dorsey was a prolific poster. And
while his personality came out more in his LiveJournal posts, he felt like he
needed something more. On both platforms, a user needed so much
intention to post—drafting sentences and paragraphs of a blog or uploading
and editing images from their digital cameras—before publishing. There
needed to be something quicker, more stream-of-consciousness, where
someone could post and share effortlessly and instantly without much
thought.

“Real-time, up-to-date, from the road,” Dorsey said. His vision would
mimic status updates on AOL’s instant messaging service, where users
posted notes about what they were up to, what they were thinking about, or
cryptic song lyrics that revealed their mood.

In July 2000, he had sketched the idea in a legal pad with a blue
ballpoint, calling it My.Stat.Us, surrounding the product name with
curlicued doodles. In the sketch, Dorsey’s status was “reading,” but other
options included “in bed” and “going to park.” At the time, Dorsey
frequented South Park in San Francisco, a small oval of green space in the
city’s South of Market district, nestled among tech offices and apartment
buildings.

The idea stayed rooted in the back of his mind as Odeo sputtered along.

The start-up was struggling to get users, and when Apple added podcasts to
iTunes in 2005, Odeo was dead on arrival. Dorsey saw an opportunity and
started pitching his status update concept to Williams and other leaders at
Odeo. One of them, Noah Glass, thought the pinging of a status update felt
like a twitch. He thumbed through tw- words in the dictionary until he
landed on twitter, the excited chirp of a bird. Twitter had a breathless,
intriguing air about it. The Odeo leaders shortened it to Twttr, in keeping
with the trend of vowel-less start-up names that launched in the early 2000s
and making it compatible with text message short codes so that its users
could send status updates from their cell phones. (The word tweet would
come in 2007 from enthusiastic third-party developers who were looking to
coin a verb for what they were actually doing when they posted.)
In March 2006, an early version of the service was ready to go. “just
setting up my twttr,” Dorsey wrote. It was the world’s first official tweet.

The service had plenty of skeptics. But Dorsey led by example, posting
short missives about his travels, the champagne he drank, and the meals he
ate. His quiet manner inspired loyalty, and he seemed to listen to and trust
his coworkers, rather than seeking to overrule them or order them around.

“I’m happy this idea has taken root; I hope it thrives,” Dorsey wrote
later, reflecting on Twitter’s beginnings sketched in his notebook. “Some
things are worth the wait.”
Twitter did thrive. In keeping with his terse way of speaking, Twitter
users were limited to 140 characters per tweet—a format that also made it
possible to send tweets via text message, a necessity in the pre-smartphone
era. Dorsey lost the nose ring and was named the company’s chief
executive, while Williams, who was its largest shareholder after supplying
much of the early financing, served as chairman. Williams retained a 70
percent ownership stake and gave 20 percent to Dorsey. They eventually
shuttered Odeo and began focusing on Twitter full time, which exploded
after being named best start-up at the 2007 South by Southwest conference
in Austin, Texas.

It grew so fast that it often overworked the infrastructure Dorsey,
Williams, and a small team of their former Odeo coworkers had pulled
together with the digital equivalent of duct tape and prayers. Outages
became a regular occurrence, and during downtime, Twitter users were
greeted with an illustration of a whale being airlifted by a flock of birds
known as the “fail whale.” But most of the time, when it was working as
intended, the site was governed by a simple principle: the tweets must flow.

Some of them were outright pornographic. Some were threats against
other users. Twitter stuck with the philosophy that had worked at Williams’s
Blogger—there wasn’t time for content moderation, and even if there was,
no one on the team had the patience to sift through questionable tweets.

Dorsey was supportive of this laissez-faire approach but ducked the
obligation of conveying Twitter’s stance to the public. He left that job to
one of his cofounders, Biz Stone, and other early employees who had
worked together at Blogger and believed they could replicate its approach.

Besides, Dorsey was overwhelmed with the onslaught of responsibilities he
faced as a first-time chief executive, floundering as he struggled to manage
employees, balance budgets, and oversee Twitter’s brittle infrastructure. He
was more than willing to let others tackle the thorny issues of content
moderation, as he preferred to work on Twitter’s interfaces and technology.

He liked convincing people that his pet project could transform their
conversations—and, eventually, their lives.

By 2008, the site’s constant outages and mounting expenses were
unsustainable. Twitter had more than a million users, but it often crashed
when people tried to sign up or publish tweets. The problems needed to be
fixed—in fact, fixing them was long overdue—and Dorsey wasn’t moving
fast enough. In a coup that October, Williams and the Twitter board, which
consisted of two venture capital investors, fired Dorsey. He was given a
consolation seat on the board but none of the voting rights that normally
would have come with it. Williams took over as CEO.

With Dorsey on the sidelines, the site he had helped create continued to
explode in popularity. In 2009, Iranians flocked to Twitter to protest their
country’s presidential election, cementing the company’s reputation as an
online haven for free speech. Twitter became the fastest-growing website
that year, skyrocketing from 1.2 million visitors in May 2008 to 18.2
million in May 2009.

Williams, Stone, and Twitter’s other leaders took a permissive approach,
and the service became fundamental in the Arab Spring as protesters across
the Middle East used Twitter and Facebook to protest their governments
and organize themselves politically, toppling dictatorships across the region.

The company occasionally took down illegal content, like child
exploitation material. But in most cases, Twitter stuck to its maximalist
approach to speech. Executives nicknamed their start-up “the free speech
wing of the free speech party,” a clear and unapologetic middle finger to
anyone who criticized the company for refusing to take down tweets.

On the fringes of the company, Dorsey began plotting a comeback.

When he wasn’t staring frostily at Williams in board meetings, he tinkered
with solutions to a problem that small merchants faced when trying to
accept credit card payments. Dorsey began work on a digital payments
processor, tapping some of his old interests in relaying and dispatching
information, and developed an elegant credit card reader, reminiscent of
Apple products in its design, that could be plugged into an iPhone’s
headphone jack. He gave the project a simple name: Square.

After its founding in 2009, Square was quickly adopted by small
businesses. But despite his success at Square, Dorsey couldn’t take his eye
off Twitter. He still was bitter toward Williams and dreamed of going back.

While he was able to apply his artistry to Square, it didn’t hold the cultural
sway of Twitter. Its logo wasn’t splashed across the chyrons of national
news outlets. Presidential candidates, world-famous actors, and Dorsey’s
favorite musicians didn’t rely on Square. And even though creating Twitter
had been a group effort, it was his idea, his notebook sketch, his vision.

The first step to return to the throne was to get rid of Williams. Dorsey
waged a whisper campaign, telling board members and senior Twitter
employees that Williams wasn’t up to the task of running the company.

Indeed, Williams was struggling. “We were just hanging on by our
fingernails to a rocket ship,” he later said.

By 2010, Dorsey’s story had taken hold. The board removed Williams
as chief executive and replaced him with Dick Costolo. It was payback
from Dorsey, who had been ousted by Williams two years earlier. Dorsey
eventually succeeded Williams as the board’s executive chairman, giving
him back some control over the company, while Williams was shunted into
a new role overseeing product.

From there, it was just a matter of Dorsey getting himself from the
boardroom to the corner office. In 2013, the company went public, valued
at more than $18 billion. By then, Dorsey’s stake had been diluted to less
than 5 percent as the company had taken on additional investors over the
years. Williams’s ownership had been whittled down to 12 percent.

Twitter had yet to earn a profit. The company boasted 218 million
monthly active users and, in the six months leading up to its 2013 public
offering, it had run up a loss of almost $70 million.

But Costolo had figured out how to weave some ads into the timeline
and analysts thought Twitter showed promise in taking on Facebook.

Dorsey, clean-shaven in a crisp white shirt and black suit jacket, beamed as
Twitter celebrities including the actor Sir Patrick Stewart rang the bell at the
New York Stock Exchange, launching his company onto the public market.

O
2 > #StayWoke
n the muggy afternoon of August 9, 2014, in Ferguson, Missouri, two
teenagers strolled down a winding road that ran through the center of
a low-slung Midwest development. Tan apartments with wooden balconies
stood on either side, offering little shade. A patrol car rolled up alongside
them, and the officer inside told the boys to get out of the road and walk on
the sidewalk instead.

Within minutes, one of the boys, Michael Brown, Jr., was dead, shot in
the middle of the street by the police officer. Videos and photos of Brown’s
body began circulating on Twitter. By the next day, protesters were
streaming onto the streets in Ferguson just miles from where Dorsey grew
up in St. Louis.

A week later, on August 16, 2014, an aggrieved ex-boyfriend posted a
lengthy online screed about a video game developer named Zoë Quinn. He
falsely accused her of sleeping with a journalist in exchange for positive
reviews of a video game she had created. Even though the accusation came
from a jilted ex, it spread rapidly through online communities of gamers,
who seized on it as an excuse to threaten Quinn with rape or death. When
other women stood up for her, they, too, became fair game.

Each event wrought major change and became the subject of significant
political debate, and each came with its own hashtag: #Ferguson and
#Gamergate.

Dorsey closely followed the protests near his hometown, which began
the day Brown was killed and continued throughout the sweltering days of
August 2014. Within days of Brown’s death, Dorsey was back in Missouri,
charging up his cell phone before joining the demonstrators and live-
tweeting what he saw. He ditched his business casual attire, dressing in a
simple white T-shirt and a St. Louis Cardinals cap, and handed out
blooming red roses to demonstrators as they marched down Florissant
Road, a thoroughfare within walking distance of where Brown had been
shot.

He chafed at the unfairness of the police and the media. “Heartbreaking:
witnessed the St. Louis County police run up to a woman, throw her to the
ground, & arrest her. For standing still,” Dorsey tweeted the night of August
19.

Ferguson became a foundation for the larger Black Lives Matter
movement that grew in the following years. But it was also pivotal for
Twitter, and for Dorsey himself. His live tweets of the protests spotlighted
the demonstrators and emerging citizen journalists who were also tweeting
from the ground, and news outlets flocked to write about the white
billionaire tech founder who had come back to his home state to engage
with issues of Black racial justice.

When he returned to San Francisco, Dorsey kept his protest apparel,
wearing casual T-shirts, hoodies, and jeans, and growing out his beard. He
stayed in touch with some prominent tweeters from the protests, inviting
them to visit the company’s headquarters in late 2014. He spoke up about
racial justice issues on his personal Twitter account, and had company
merch made branded with the hashtag #StayWoke and the Twitter bird logo.

Almost simultaneously, the Gamergate campaign spread like brushfire.

If Ferguson highlighted the power of placing the tools of communication
directly in the hands of participants, Gamergate illustrated how that power
could be abused. Thousands of Twitter users—often using anonymous
accounts—launched frenzied attacks against prominent women, posting
their private information to contribute to further abuse and death threats.

Within a month of the blog post about Quinn, #Gamergate had been shared
on Twitter more than a million times.

The protests in Ferguson captured Dorsey’s attention. The complaints of
men’s rights activists fell to Twitter’s general counsel—a former corporate
deals lawyer named Vijaya Gadde.

Gadde’s life in corporate law molded her into a tough, risk-averse
thinker with a muted, court-appropriate wardrobe and a polished coif of
perfectly wavy hair. She stood out from Twitter’s hoodied rank and file, and
she didn’t think that “the tweets must flow” was a practical policy for
online conversation. If everyone on the service screamed at each other,
some people would throw up their hands and leave the conversation
altogether—and in all likelihood, the people who would leave would be the
most vulnerable.

Gadde found a kindred spirit in Del Harvey, a child-safety expert who
had been Twitter’s twenty-fifth hire and knew the platform’s dark side
firsthand. The company had recruited Harvey, a woman with a slight stature
and malleable voice that had served her well in her previous job:
impersonating teens in chat rooms to reel in men for an organization called
the Perverted Justice Foundation, which rose to prominence through a
partnership with To Catch a Predator. At Twitter, Harvey had become the
de facto garbage collector, policing the sexual exploitation of children on
the platform and battling spammers. She also studied harassment and found
that vitriolic threats from a handful of accounts were enough to drive users
off the platform, even if their overall experiences were positive—powerful
data that she used to convince Twitter executives that good speech wouldn’t
naturally drown out the bad.

While Harvey could be strident, Gadde was a lawyerly voice of reason.

The pair balanced each other and together they crafted a new approach to
make sure the loudest voices didn’t dominate the conversation on Twitter.

They hired dozens of content moderators, added new tools for blocking
users and muting conversations, and began building tools that would help
them detect abuse before it trended on the platform.

“Freedom of expression means little as our underlying philosophy if we
continue to allow voices to be silenced because they are afraid to speak up,”
Gadde wrote in a 2015 op-ed for The Washington Post.

But Gadde would be careful to preserve Twitter’s passive stance, she
promised. “It is not our role to be any sort of arbiter of global speech.

However, we will take a more active role in ensuring that differences of
opinion do not cross the line into harassment,” she said. Costolo would also
acknowledge the company’s shifting views on speech. “We suck at dealing
with abuse and trolls on the platform and we’ve sucked at it for years,” he
wrote in an internal email to Twitter employees following Gamergate.

Ultimately, Costolo would be overwhelmed by the dilemma. At the end
of 2014, the social network had stagnated at about 300 million monthly
active users and, despite crossing $1 billion in revenue for the first time,
lost about $578 million. (For comparison, Facebook in that same period had
1.39 billion monthly active users, generating $12.5 billion in revenue for a
$2.94 billion profit.) Stuck in amber with its 140-character limit, Twitter
also failed to develop exciting new features. Its early acquisition of
Periscope, a live-streaming start-up that hadn’t even launched, in 2015,
failed to excite. By that summer, he was out, stressed by the hatred and
coordinated abuse on Twitter and worn down by its negative impact on user
growth.

In July, as Dorsey officially took over for Costolo, uncertainty reigned.

Dorsey lost the facial hair—perhaps after pressure from his own mom, who
had once tweeted: “Not a fan of the beard. @jack has a great face. Like to
see it.”—and switched to a uniform that included a gray #StayWoke T-shirt.

He was a stabilizing force. After Dorsey pushed a small round of layoffs
that October, Twitter began slowly trudging toward its first full year of
profit. Still, it finished 2015 with a loss of $521 million, as its valuation
fluttered around the $15 billion mark. Dorsey had talked about making
Twitter universal, and as easy to use as “looking out your window,” but, in
reality, it was an addictive app for a subset of influential people and
organizations, and hard to use and intimidating for the average person.

Issues with toxic content and misinformation continued. The company
had never truly known how to harness its influence over politics nor the
ways its platform could be manipulated. Russian intelligence agents set up
sock puppet accounts that tweeted divisively about hot-button political
issues, including Black Lives Matter, during the 2016 U.S. presidential
election. The platform had also been essential to Donald Trump’s political
career—he leveraged his bombastic Twitter personality to secure constant
media attention and outrage, rising from reality TV star to Republican
nominee to president.

“Such a beautiful and important evening!” Trump tweeted triumphantly
on November 9, 2016, after winning the Oval Office. “The forgotten man
and woman will never be forgotten again. We will all come together as
never before.”
The backlash against Twitter was immediate. Democrats blamed the
company for enabling Trump and profiting from his inflammatory
statements, while Trump credited Twitter for carrying him into the White
House.

As the company dealt with constant controversy, Dorsey became
preoccupied with his health, adopting fad diets, yoga, and meditation,
seeking balance while juggling the demands of running Twitter and Square.

He started each day with what Twitter employees teasingly referred to as
“salt juice,” a blend of water, lemon, and pink Himalayan salt. In a nod to
its kooky founder, the company began serving salt juice in some of its
cafeterias around the globe and Dorsey’s well-being obsessions began to
bleed into his work at Twitter. In the wake of Gamergate and the foreign
interference in the 2016 elections, he made it his mission to steer tweeters
toward “healthy conversations.”
“We’re committing Twitter to help increase the collective health,
openness, and civility of public conversation, and to hold ourselves publicly
accountable towards progress,” he wrote in March 2018. “We aren’t proud
of how people have taken advantage of our service, or our inability to
address it fast enough.”
Dorsey’s personal feelings were an enigma. Sometimes, he could be
completely in tune with the problems the company and its employees faced.

Other times, he appeared tone-deaf, as when he embarked on a ten-day
meditation trip in Myanmar, the site of a recent social media–fueled
genocide in November 2018.

When he arrived back in San Francisco that December, his assistant
arranged for a birthday surprise. As they traveled around India months
earlier, Dorsey had become enamored with the country’s monkeys, like the
pink-faced rhesus macaques that were common on the grounds of Twitter’s
Delhi home base. To relive that memory, his assistant had an animal trainer
bring a pair of simians into the office.

It provided a brief laugh, before Twitter’s chief moved on to meetings,
leaving the primates in a conference room for passersby to gawk at. Later,
someone filed a complaint with human resources.

Dorsey had gotten control of Twitter, but it was a zoo and he was no
zookeeper.

O
3 > “This is actually me”
n July 15, 2018, Elon Reeve Musk awoke at home in Los Angeles,
forty-seven years old and jet-lagged from a trip to Thailand and
Shanghai. His thirty-year-old girlfriend, Claire Elise Boucher, an ethereal
pop singer who performed as Grimes, was still asleep beside him.

It was early that Sunday morning and, instinctively, Musk did what he
always did in a quiet moment—he took out his phone. He would sometimes
play mobile strategy games, or check his email, which overflowed with
updates from his employees and Google Alerts for his own name, set up
tactically to track news about himself. Despite having encouraged coverage
of his own antics as an entrepreneur and executive, Musk had thin skin and
wanted to know everything about how the public perceived himself and his
companies—Tesla Motors, SpaceX, Neuralink, and the Boring Company.

That morning, however, he focused on his primary addiction: Twitter.

Musk had amassed more than 22 million followers on the social media
service and posted more than 5,000 tweets, opining about his companies’
milestones, cracking jokes, and attacking his critics.

After some scrolling, Musk came across a link to a CNN video. He
clicked and was confronted with an unfamiliar face. Sitting in a verdant
Thai jungle, Vernon Unsworth, a serious-looking Brit in a white tee,
wrinkled his forehead as questions were put to him. This man is talking
about me, Musk realized.

“What are your thoughts on what Elon Musk’s idea was?” asked a faint
voice off-screen.

Unsworth smiled thinly, as if unsure whether to share his thoughts or
not. “He can stick his submarine where it hurts. It just had absolutely no
chance of working,” he replied.

“Just a PR stunt.”
Musk grew furious. He watched the interview again. Then he watched it
again. His whirlwind trip to Thailand had revolved around the very thing
Unsworth was criticizing. After a made-for-retweets story about a youth
soccer team trapped in a cave went viral, he had hustled a coterie of SpaceX
engineers and a custom-built mini submarine to the Southeast Asian nation
to attempt an emergency rescue. The twelve boys and their adult chaperone
had been lost in a partly submerged cave in the northern part of the country
for eighteen days. But as Unsworth had pointed out in his interview, there
were so many twists and turns in the cave, the metal tube of the submarine
would have never made it past the first fifty meters of the dive.

Musk would not let the insult stand. He googled Vernon Unsworth and
found news articles about the British expat who apparently lived around
Chiang Rai, Thailand. Unsworth, who began caving as a teenager and had
assisted in rescues in the United Kingdom, had moved to Thailand to
explore its network of caves and had been brought into the effort because of
his knowledge of the caverns where the boys were trapped. He lived in the
country with his partner, a forty-year-old nail salon owner.

“This guy is creepy,” Musk thought to himself as he burrowed further
into his do-your-own-research rabbit hole. He googled “Chiang Rai” and
found an article that said the northernmost major city in Thailand was the
child sex trafficking capital of the world.

After less than an hour of googling, Musk reopened Twitter. Two days
earlier, Bloomberg Businessweek had published an interview with the
billionaire in which he had acknowledged his lack of impulse control on the
platform. “I have made the mistaken assumption—and I will attempt to be
better at this—of thinking that because somebody is on Twitter and is
attacking me that it is open season,” he told the magazine. “That is my
mistake. I will correct it.” But not yet. First, he had to respond to Unsworth.

Starting at 6:56 a.m. in Los Angeles, he began an online barrage of false
accusations. “Never saw this British expat guy who lives in Thailand (sus)
at any point when we were in the caves,” he tweeted, before asserting in a
second tweet that his team would make a video showing the submarine
making it all the way to the cave system where the boys had been trapped.

Never mind that Musk’s submarine had not arrived in Thailand until the
rescue was well underway, and eight of the twelve boys had already been
freed.

“Sorry pedo guy, you really did ask for it,” he tweeted.

The insult instantly ricocheted around the internet. The notion of
pedophilia fueled bizarre online conspiracies. In 2016, internet rumors
about a DC pizzeria that hosted a child sex trafficking ring, which later
became known as Pizzagate, led to a gunman firing shots at the restaurant.

The following year a crazed political movement known as QAnon began to
foment around the idea that a cabal of child-molesting government officials
were conspiring against President Donald Trump.

Musk was summoning a deluge of online conspiracists to harass an
otherwise anonymous civilian whose expertise had just aided the successful
rescue of children. But Musk’s supporters had blind faith in him—after all,
he had a sterling reputation as a businessman pushing humanity toward a
future of a cleaner Earth and space travel. Musk’s reputation was that of the
smartest people on the planet. Surely he must know something about
Unsworth that the average person did not?
“Bet ya a signed dollar it’s true,” he tweeted later that day, continuing
his tirade against Unsworth.

Three days later, Musk tweeted an apology: “My words were spoken in
anger.” But he couldn’t let it go, and continued to seed rumors about
Unsworth months after his initial tweets. In September 2018, Musk doubled
down on his accusation that Unsworth was a pedophile with more tweets
and emails to a BuzzFeed News reporter[*] in which he wrote the Brit was a
“child rapist” who took a “child bride who was about 12 years old.”
A few weeks later, Unsworth sued Musk for defamation.

>>> ON DECEMBER 3, 2019, Musk was once again looking at his tweets about
Unsworth. But this time, he sat on a raised stand above the gallery of the
federal courtroom in downtown Los Angeles. Musk stared ahead vacantly
and pursed his lips. He listened to Unsworth’s attorney’s questions, shifting
his eyes as he gathered his thoughts, before issuing laconic replies that
belied his swaggering online persona.

The reporters, fanboys, and critics who had packed the courtroom to
catch a glimpse of the world-famous billionaire didn’t know what to think.

There he was, hunched over in a black suit, white shirt, and bluish-gray tie.

Could this be the same person who built the world’s most important electric
car manufacturer, or proclaimed he would die on Mars? Musk was anything
but commanding.

Defamation cases are historically hard to win in the U.S., but
Unsworth’s case against Musk seemed strong. Musk didn’t deny tweeting
the claims about Unsworth, and though he had initially apologized for his
remarks, he continued to make allegations of pedophilia.

Faced with such an open-and-shut case, most members of elite society
would have settled, offering a six- or low-seven-digit sum to make the
lawsuit go away. After all, what was a few million dollars to a man worth
around $20 billion? Why would Musk bog himself down with the
embarrassing burden of legal discovery, depositions, and a trial when he
had important companies to run?
Unsworth’s lawyer, L. Lin Wood, a high-profile defamation attorney
from Georgia, prodded him with questions about his online habits. He asked
Musk what people posted on Twitter.

“They can assert facts, fiction, and anything that comes to mind,” Musk
responded.

“You told me, I believe, that it was a place where, in conversations,
people could convey facts, state opinions, or even insult people. Right?”
Wood asked.

“I mean, Twitter is a free-for-all where there’s all sorts of things, you
know, that sort of aren’t true, untrue, half true, where people engage in sort
of verbal combat effectively,” Musk said.

“I mean, there’s everything on Twitter.”
This was Musk’s defense. The plaintiff was simply a “creepy, old white
guy expat living in Thailand,” Musk said, and he did not mean that
Unsworth was literally a pedophile. His lawyer, Alex Spiro, a smooth talker
who completed a fellowship at the CIA before pivoting to become a highprofile attorney to the stars, built upon this strategy. His client was simply
joking, he said. Never mind that Musk had tasked one of his most trusted
staffers, Jared Birchall, with hiring a private eye to dig up dirt on Unsworth
and reverse engineer the truth of his allegation.

If one tried to imagine a person antithetical to Musk, one might come up
with Birchall. The former private wealth manager who operated in the
shadows, standing behind the impressive people he worked for,
safeguarding their money and interests. He didn’t tweet, and old posts on
his largely defunct Facebook were mostly thank-yous to people wishing
him happy birthday, videos about his love for God, and photos of his wife
and five children.

A tall, broad-shouldered man with a narrow nose and dimpled chin,
Birchall was guided by his faith. He was a devout member of the Church of
Latter-day Saints who didn’t consume alcohol or caffeine and grew up in a
touring family band called the Birchall Family Singers. Birchall graduated
from Brigham Young University in 1999, and a decade later donated to
oppose a 2008 California ballot measure to legalize same-sex marriage.

It was at Morgan Stanley, which he joined in 2010 after being fired from
Merrill Lynch following a ten-year stint as a private wealth manager, that he
first met Musk. The billionaire hired him from the bank in 2016, appointing
him head of Excession LLC, his family office, named for an Iain M. Banks
science fiction novel. Birchall catered to Musk’s every financial need,
pledging himself to his boss’s every cause to gain an unprecedented level of
trust.

Birchall set out on his assignment to prove Unsworth was a creep. He
paid $52,000 to someone he thought was a private investigator. But that
man, who faked his credentials, turned out to be a former convict and fed
Birchall and Musk false information about Unsworth.

As the four-day trial wore on, Spiro ran circles around his legal
counterpart. Wood struggled to explain the basic mechanics of Twitter, and
failed to goad Musk into admitting fault. His Georgia drawl and over-thetop southern charm also grated on the jury.

But Spiro spoke like a gregarious older brother back in town for
Thanksgiving. Not yet forty years old, he was already a rising star at Quinn
Emanuel, one of the country’s top litigation firms. His friendly, fast-talking
manner had won him famous clients like Robert Kraft, the owner of the
New England Patriots, and Jay-Z, the music mogul, and it also won over
juries. Tall and lean, with a boxer’s nose, he had an athletic ease even as he
clunked around the courtroom floor in a giant boot—he had broken his foot
playing pickup basketball. The Boston-raised Harvard law grad couldn’t
deny what Musk wrote. But he could spin it. His client had posted
thousands of tweets over the years on a platform that was known as a place
where people could argue, insult, and brawl, he said. Twitter was a war
zone.

“These tweets are not allegations of crimes,” Spiro lectured the jury.

“They are joking, taunting tweets in a fight between men.”
The jury seemed moved by that. Unsworth testified he felt “humiliated,
ashamed, dirty” by Musk’s label and added, “I have good days and I have
bad days.” Those in the court felt for the Brit, but it was nearly impossible
to assess the price of those “bad days.” Then, Wood committed the fatal
error. In closing arguments, he totaled what he believed his client was
entitled in damages: $190 million.

When the number was announced, someone in the gallery snorted.

Reporters looked up from their notebooks in amazement. Members of the
jury shifted their gazes downward as if the eye-popping sum was something
forbidden. It was a shocking number and, if approved by the jury, would
have amounted to the largest award ever in the defamation case of an
individual.

On the afternoon of December 6, the jury deliberated for less than an
hour and came back with a decision. Musk was not liable for defamation.

Spiro stood up as if in a trance. He—and Musk—had won. From then on,
Spiro would enjoy a position of privilege in Musk’s inner circle, working
alongside Birchall to make the billionaire’s every wish a reality.

“My faith in humanity is restored,” Musk told the journalists on his way
out of the courtroom. Anyone who tried to follow him was bodied out of the
way by a phalanx of burly guards. The billionaire disappeared down an
elevator, out a back door, and into a waiting Tesla Model S.

>>> A TRAIL OF CAMERAS befitting a rockstar followed Musk out of the
courthouse, but he was not always a household name. The eldest child of
three from a divided South African family, he came to the U.S. by way of
Canada, eventually earning a bachelor’s degree at the University of
Pennsylvania. He was accepted into a PhD program for materials science at
Stanford before dropping out to pursue a new consumer technology called
“the Internet.”
In 1995, Musk and his younger brother, Kimbal, cofounded Zip2, an
internet city guides company with a $28,000 check from their father, Errol
Musk, a figure Musk recalled as influential yet abusive. At twenty-three, the
entrepreneur toiled away at the early web service, sleeping in the office,
subsisting on Jack in the Box burgers and Cocoa Puffs, and showering at a
nearby YMCA in Palo Alto, California. It was a yeoman’s story Musk rarely
failed to mention in early interviews with news outlets.

“I think the Internet is the superset of all media,” a gangly, balding
Musk told CBS in 1998. “It is the be all and end all of media. One will see
print, broadcast arguably, radio—essentially all media folded into the
Internet.”
Even in those early years, Musk understood the value of a good story.

He was a salesman at heart, developing narratives around his work ethic
and visions of the future that would serve him in the decades to come. And
he gravitated toward anyone with a tape recorder or camera that would give
him airtime. He was also image-conscious, later correcting his receding
hairline.

After four years of toiling on Zip2, he sold the company to Compaq for
$305 million in 1999. He personally made $22 million in what was the
largest all-cash transaction for an internet company at the time, and then
went on to create X.com later that year. Positing that the internet would
fundamentally change all industries, Musk spoke in recruiting interviews of
a grandiose vision of how X.com could transform banking and displace
entrenched players like Visa and Mastercard. To the thirty employees he
hired to work out of an office on Palo Alto’s famed University Avenue,
Musk was a charismatic founder, with a convincing pitch for his online
banking moonshot and a track record. At twenty-eight, he was one of the
few people in the nascent era of the consumer internet to have already sold
a company. Why not hitch yourself to his star?
But before X.com could take on the big credit card corporations, Musk
found himself preoccupied with another competing start-up called
Confinity. Its founders, Stanford University alums Peter Thiel, Max
Levchin, and Luke Nosek, had developed a product called PayPal that
allowed people online to email each other money. For a while, Confinity
was located in the same Palo Alto building as X.com, leading some
Confinity employees to believe that X had copied their product.

The dot-com bubble burst in 2000, and by March of that year, both
X.com and Confinity decided to merge under the X.com name. Musk was
named the company’s chief technology officer, and later became chief
executive, but immediately grated on the former Confinity employees.

Obsessed with X.com after reportedly spending a small fortune on the web
domain, he lobbied to change the name of the PayPal feature to X, despite
the fact that PayPal already had brand recognition. It was seen as a mistake
by the Confinity crew, which included Thiel, Levchin, and David Sacks, a
law school pal of Thiel who came to lead the company’s product efforts.

They saw Musk as an obstinate leader who prioritized personal glory over
company success.

Musk never got to implement his vision. That September, he and his
wife, Justine, left for a two-week honeymoon in Australia. Musk had also
arranged for meetings with potential investors who could potentially
replenish the company’s cash reserves. While he was away, the former
Confinity team schemed for his removal. Sacks drafted a letter addressed to
the board, outlining his lack of confidence in Musk’s leadership. He pushed
for Thiel to be named chief executive.

In the press, Musk played off the change, arguing that it allowed him to
flex his entrepreneurial prowess. “One has to recognize where one’s
strengths lie,” Musk told the tech news site CNET after his ouster in
September 2000. “It’s more interesting for me in the early stages of running
a company, where the concentration is all on developing the product.” But
the move left Musk fuming. Thiel didn’t only take Musk’s job—he also
rebranded the whole company as PayPal, completely erasing his beloved X.

Thiel and Sacks’s gambit, whether by incredible foresight or sheer luck,
paid off. Seven months later, eBay announced a deal to acquire PayPal in
2002 for $1.5 billion in stock. The acquisition would take Musk, who
cleared more than $175 million, into another stratosphere of wealth. Despite
his management failings, he had sold two internet companies and become
one of the most successful entrepreneurs of a Web 1.0 era that would see
plenty of companies rise to the heavens before exploding into flaming heaps
of discarded ideas.

Before eBay had even completed its acquisition of PayPal, Musk
founded Space Exploration Technologies Corp., or SpaceX, in May 2002.

He committed $100 million of his PayPal windfall to space, with the goal of
getting to Mars and making humans a multiplanetary species, a particular
fixation of his from a childhood immersed in sci-fi novels.

Musk wasn’t the only entrepreneur trying to reimagine travel. In 2003,
two engineers named Martin Eberhard and Marc Tarpenning founded an
electric car start-up called Tesla Motors. Their work caught Musk’s eye and
he invested $5.6 million the following year, turning him into Tesla’s largest
shareholder and earning him the chairman seat on its board. SpaceX
occupied the majority of Musk’s brain, but he sometimes dabbled in Tesla’s
affairs and weighed in on design decisions for the company’s first car, the
Roadster.

Ahead of the car’s public unveiling in July 2006, Musk’s ego took over.

Hungry for credit, he emailed a public relations contractor the company had
hired for the event, saying he would “like to talk with every major
publication.

“The way that my role has been portrayed to date, where I am referred
to merely as ‘an early investor’ is outrageous,” he wrote. “We need to make
a serious effort to correct this perception.”
Following a New York Times story about the Roadster launch, in which
he wasn’t mentioned at all, he raged over email and said he was “incredibly
insulted and embarrassed” that Eberhard had been mistakenly referred to as
chairman of the company. He threatened to end Tesla’s relationship with the
communications firm.

By the following year, Musk got the attention he craved. As the
company fell behind on its production of the Roadster, he fired Eberhard
and took on the chief executive role himself. The company soldiered on
toward building a luxury sedan, losing millions of dollars a year. SpaceX
also struggled, teetering on the verge of bankruptcy after three failed
launches. In 2008, its Falcon 1 rocket finally reached orbit, leading the
company to win a $1.6 billion contract from NASA later that year. But the
reprieve was short-lived—Musk’s personal life crumbled as he divorced
from his first wife, Justine.

In early 2010, Tesla filed to go public. With no advertising budget, the
carmaker depended on media coverage to stir up excitement among
investors and consumers. Ahead of the IPO, Musk tried to control the
coverage, using Tesla’s blog to rebut inaccurate stories and trashing a New
York Times reporter who suggested his vehicles were only for the ultrawealthy, calling him a “huge douchebag.” When the Associated Press
reported on the imminent registration of Tesla’s initial public offering, he
called to scream at a communications staffer, telling them that their inability
to handle the story had ruined the company.

Although Musk appeared on the cover of Wired magazine with a
prototype of his car’s second model, the Model S, following Tesla’s initial
public offering, he fundamentally distrusted reporters and feared that a
single bad story could destroy his company’s prospects. News stories were
existential threats. If Musk saw an article he thought was incorrect—
whether in The New York Times or an obscure financial blog in the
Netherlands—he would pressure his public relations staff, sometimes
emailing them well past midnight, to correct the record. Reporters who
constantly questioned him or wrote too critically of Tesla or SpaceX were
personally blacklisted by Musk.

His craving for narrative control led him to Twitter. Celebrities like
Oprah Winfrey and Ashton Kutcher had joined the 140-character
microblogging service with 58 million users, and people were seizing
available handles—the unique usernames that followed the @ sign—as they
would distinct website domains.

An account called @ElonMusk started parodying the ambitious yet
paranoid entrepreneur in early 2009. Featuring a profile picture of a man
with a wide-brimmed hat covering his face, next to a donkey, the account
claimed to be the “genuine ElonMusk.” That March, the account tweeted
that it was “plotting to take over the world.” The account posted a handful
of times, sometimes mocking the Tesla and SpaceX chief executive, but
never garnered much attention. Eventually, whoever was behind it stopped,
and the account had its posts wiped. A new owner took over that summer
and began following other accounts, including those of professional
skateboarder Tony Hawk, actor LeVar Burton, and an organization
dedicated to breaking news. It remained silent for more than a year before
Musk announced himself.

“Please ignore prior tweets, as that was someone pretending to be me :)
This is actually me,” @ElonMusk wrote on June 4, 2010.

It took him more than another year to post again, a photo of a sign for a
Southern California ice rink that he had just visited with his kids in
December 2011. Then the tweets started to flow. There were thoughts on
philosophy, books he had read, and the occasional brag. (“Got called
randomly by Kanye West today and received a download of his thoughts,
ranging from shoes to Moses. He was polite, but opaque.”) His early posts
were earnest, if random, and while there were some updates about Tesla and
SpaceX, most of his tweets gave off the vibe of a bored middle-aged dad.

“Not sure I can handle just doing 140 char missives,” he tweeted,
frustrated by the character limits on tweets.

Still, he stuck with it, tweeting at all hours and jumping between corny
jokes, news articles, and photos from nights out. The posts gave a window
into Musk’s mind and he spoke without the manufactured corporate sheen
typical of business leaders whose messages were workshopped by
communications staffers.

“Feb is huge month. Model X world premier and public reveal of our
LA design studio on the 9th,” Musk wrote in January 2012 about his
company’s new sport utility vehicle. It was followed by commentary on
Tesla’s stock price, design improvements to a rocket, and a photo of a
SpaceX engine test-fire. Twitter gave Musk the visionary a way of
becoming Musk the salesman, keeping anyone interested updated on the
progress of his companies. On the platform, he owned his own narrative,
and he clearly explained his mission for both companies. For those who
worked with him, it was one of his greatest superpowers: the ability to stay
consistently on message, despite the criticism and uncertainty.

Twitter also accentuated an uglier side to Musk. Having fashioned
himself the underdog, he had had no problem going after journalists and
industry experts who claimed Tesla and SpaceX would fail. He used bursts
of acid text to debate stories on a Tesla vehicle’s short battery life or refute
reporting on what beverages he drank at breakfast. He called stories “fake.”
It was a business communications style never seen before, with an
extremely online chief executive willing to go to the mat over any
perceived injustice.

The communications pros Musk employed had no power over his
unfettered tweeting. But they also had to deal with the fallout of his
unplanned pronouncements or deadlines. They regularly monitored his
Twitter feed and had notifications on for his tweets, in an attempt to prepare
for damage control in case reporters came calling with questions.

In January 2012, Musk hinted in one late-night tweeting session that he
was separating from his second wife, the British actress Talulah Riley.

“@rileytalulah It was an amazing four years,” he wrote. “I will love you
forever. You will make someone very happy one day.” An enterprising
reporter at Forbes saw the tweet and contacted Musk, who proceeded to
explain why he was divorcing Riley. By the time Musk’s communication
staff had woken up on the West Coast, it was too late. A story was already
in the works.

“I’ve made a mistake,” Musk said to one of those staffers.

Musk was realizing just how effectively his tweets could be used to spin
his version of events to the masses. Court filings later revealed that it was
Riley, not Musk, who had filed to terminate the marriage. (Musk would
later remarry Riley and divorce her a second time in 2016.)
As Musk grew richer and his companies more valuable, he attracted
more media scrutiny, which, in turn, fed his paranoia. He suggested that the
entrenched players, from traditional car manufacturers to Big Oil to Wall
Street short sellers, worked in conjunction with traditional media outlets to
sandbag his electric automaker. In 2013, when people expressed concerns
about the Model S cars whose batteries spontaneously combusted, he
blamed the media. “Why does a Tesla fire w no injury get more media
headlines than 100,000 gas car fires that kill 100s of people per year?” he
tweeted.

Musk’s tweeting fed his legend. Tesla would state later in a financial
filing that its chief executive’s tweets were able “to generate significant
media coverage of our company and our vehicles.” Musk’s Twitter account
became a go-to platform for unplanned company announcements. He would
state a goal for one of his companies, which would then force his
employees to work as hard as possible to make it a reality.

>>> IN SEPTEMBER 2016, SpaceX prepared to take one of its most notable
payloads into orbit. Facebook had contracted with Musk’s company and
spent $200 million to launch a satellite called Amos-6, which was intended
to bring mobile internet—beamed from space—to parts of Sub-Saharan
Africa. Mark Zuckerberg, Facebook’s founder and chief executive, had
spent years planning the move as part of his social network empire building.

As two masters of the universe, Musk and Zuckerberg were
acquaintances and occasionally met to discuss larger topics like artificial
intelligence. The Facebook chief sometimes hosted Musk for walking
meetings around the social network’s sprawling Menlo Park, California,
headquarters. Musk was particularly concerned by the possibility that
companies like Facebook would harness their reams of data and
technological resources to create AI that could destroy humanity. During a
2014 dinner at his Palo Alto mansion, Zuckerberg urged Musk to stop
railing about the potential dangers of AI at speaking engagements and on
Twitter. It was all nonsense, Zuckerberg believed. Musk, enraged, refused
to back down.

Despite Musk’s disagreement with Zuckerberg, SpaceX did not turn
down Facebook’s business. It needed the money and attention. The
company loaded the Facebook satellite onto a Falcon 9 rocket at Cape
Canaveral, Florida, and prepared for a historic launch.

The satellite never made it to space. Two days before the scheduled
launch, SpaceX’s crew was running a test of the rocket’s engines when it
suddenly exploded in a ball of flames, incinerating Facebook’s investment.

SpaceX initially said little about the explosion, and its employees were still
scrambling to find out what had happened, when Zuckerberg posted to his
Facebook page.

“As I’m here in Africa, I’m deeply disappointed to hear that SpaceX’s
launch failure destroyed our satellite that would have provided connectivity
to so many entrepreneurs and everyone else across the continent,” the
Facebook chief wrote, placing the blame solely on Musk’s company.

After seeing Zuckerberg’s post, Musk instinctively wanted to
counterpunch. To him, Zuckerberg was a pretender, a man who focused on
building dinky social apps, while he solved hard problems like building
rockets and electric cars. But Musk held his fire, letting his grudge against
Zuckerberg build inside him.

>>> AT TESLA AND SPACEX, Musk refused to take advice from anyone about
his posts, and when one executive dared to point out that his tweets about
deadlines made life harder for his employees, he demanded that they never
speak to him about tweeting again. In other conversations, the boss
explained that tweeting was his way to rebut and spin the press.

At his SpaceX cubicle in late 2016, he told one executive that he
thought journalists were generally “idiots.”
“They need to be spoon-fed!” Musk said, miming a baby being fed
mushy peas. When asked what his plan was for several big SpaceX
announcements on the road map, he shrugged and simply said he would
tweet.

“With Twitter, we can talk directly to the people,” Musk added. “Why
do we need to go through journalists?”
By 2017, Musk’s Twitter habit had become an addiction. That year, he
tweeted 1,162 times, increasing his output by nearly 60 percent from the
previous twelve months to average more than three tweets a day. Most
people, even those who used Twitter daily, lurked and only read tweets, but
Musk tweeted freely, a stream-of-consciousness that blended juvenile jokes
with audacious bets on his own companies.

Elon Musk
@elonmusk
I love Twitter
9:50 AM Dec 21, 2017
5.8K 34K 168K
@redletterdave
You should buy it then
9:51 AM Dec 21, 2017
139K 1.5K 8.4K
Elon Musk
@elonmusk
How much is it?
9:52 AM Dec 21, 2017
1.2K 6.1K 31K
>>> BY MAY 2018, Musk’s resentment of the media coverage boiled over. The
billionaire was fed up with what he termed “the holier-than-thou hypocrisy
of big media” and proposed a solution. In Musk’s view, major media outlets
were controlled by powerful people with agendas funded by special
interests. Some, he suggested, used bots—or automated accounts—to
manipulate public opinion on social media like Twitter. He thought that he
and his companies were frequent targets.

“Going to create a site where the public can rate the core truth of any
article & track the credibility score over time of each journalist, editor &
publication. Thinking of calling it Pravda,” he tweeted, a reference to the
official newspaper of the Soviet Union’s Communist Party.

It was an idea Musk had considered for a while, and Birchall had
registered “Pravda Corp” with the California secretary of state the previous
year. Pravda would be a “media” organization, Birchall wrote in paperwork
that listed him as its leader. In truth, he was just the figurehead. When
needed by Musk, Birchall would assume titles for the billionaire’s
charitable foundation; his brain-computer interface start-up Neuralink; and
the Boring Company, his tunneling start-up. (Under Birchall, little would
come of Pravda.)
With Tesla sputtering to produce enough cars to meet its leaders’
projections that spring, Musk spent more time confined to the company’s
factory as his Twitter account became one of his few links to the outside
world. That May, his tweet output quadrupled from April, as he cultivated a
parasocial relationship with his followers. Twitter was home to many
fandoms—from English Premier League soccer teams to K-pop groups to
Donald J. Trump—and the rabid following for Musk was no different. Fans
created accounts to glorify his companies, attack his critics, and interact
directly with the man himself, who, unlike many celebrities, would like or
reply to tweets.

Bob Lutz, a longtime auto executive who had worked at Ford, Chrysler,
and General Motors, compared Musk’s supporters to “members of a
religious cult.”
“Just like Steve Jobs was worshiped at Apple, it’s the same way with
Elon Musk,” he said in one 2016 interview, adding that the Tesla founder
“is seen as a new visionary god who promises this phantasmagorical future,
a utopia of profitability and volume.”
>>> IN AUGUST 2018, while Tesla struggled through a difficult period that
Musk called “Production Hell,” its leader published another tweet that
would haunt him legally for years to come.

Elon Musk
@elonmusk
Am considering taking Tesla private at $420. Funding secured.

9:48 AM Aug 7, 2018
5.6K 20K 79K
he wrote, offering a 20 percent premium on Tesla’s share price that also
casually referenced stoner mythology.

It was an extraordinary post. Publicly traded companies took many
precautions before making announcements that could influence their stock
price and usually filed public disclosures with the Securities and Exchange
Commission, particularly around mergers and acquisitions or matters of
potential changes of control. Musk disregarded it all. Tesla’s stock price
shot up by 11 percent.

Musk would later claim that he had an agreement with Saudi Arabia’s
Public Investment Fund to privatize the company. Yet there was no formal
agreement in place, and funding was nowhere near “secured” as Musk had
claimed. Some of Tesla’s own board members, a number of whom had
grown tired of his tweeting and asked him to focus on building cars, had not
even been informed of his efforts.

In an interview with The New York Times less than two weeks after his
tweet, Musk wept as he acknowledged the stress he was under and
discussed rumors of substance abuse. He denied using marijuana—though
Tesla’s board members were aware of other recreational drug use—but did
admit to relying on Ambien to help him sleep. The next month, he went on
a podcast with the comedian Joe Rogan and smoked a blunt, reigniting
speculation about the causes of his odd behavior.

In late September, the SEC announced that it was suing Tesla and its
chief executive for making false or misleading statements to the public.

Tesla’s leader “knew or was reckless in not knowing” that his statements
were false or misleading, the nation’s top securities regulator wrote. Two
days later, Tesla and Musk settled. The company and its CEO would pay
two $20 million fines, while Musk would step down as chairman. The
agreement required that Musk enter a consent decree to appoint a “Twitter
Sitter,” a lawyer at the company who would approve his tweets with
material information to Tesla before they could be posted. Musk did not
have to admit to wrongdoing, though he could also not deny that he misled
investors. From the SEC’s perspective, the latter stipulation would prevent
the billionaire from claiming he did nothing wrong.

Musk learned nothing. The $20 million fine he paid personally
amounted to less than a tenth of a percent of his net worth at the time and he
appointed a longtime board member and loyalist, Robyn Denholm, to chair
Tesla.

Musk continued to tweet and tweet and tweet. It was unclear if there
was anyone approving his tweets at Tesla headquarters, and the SEC would
open investigations into two more of Musk’s tweets, including one that
misstated Tesla’s production numbers and a Twitter poll in which the
billionaire proposed selling 10 percent of his holdings. Little resulted from
those inquiries. Musk could not and would not be contained—not by
investors, not by his own board, and especially not by the U.S. government.

Beating his defamation case in 2019 further emboldened Musk to tweet
whatever he liked. In July 2020, richer and more influential than ever, Musk
laid out his sentiments in a giant middle finger to the regulator. He knew he
was untouchable.

“SEC, three letter acronym, middle word is Elon’s,” Musk tweeted. It
was neither his first nor last dick joke on the platform.

Skip Notes
* That reporter was one of this book’s authors, Ryan Mac, who was then a senior technology reporter
at BuzzFeed News. Elon Musk emailed him several times, unilaterally declaring that his messages
were “off-the-record,” which in journalism parlance means that the information provided may not be
publicly disclosed. Mac had not agreed to those terms with Musk, and BuzzFeed News chose to
publish the email exchanges in full because of their newsworthiness in revealing Musk’s state of
mind and beliefs about Unsworth, all of which were untrue. In a deposition ahead of the trial, Musk
would call his emails to Mac “one of the dumbest things I’ve ever done.”
D
4 > OneTeam
orsey was late. His phone lit up with a barrage of texts from his
personal assistant. Where are you?
On a balmy Houston evening in January 2020, Twitter’s chief executive
was supposed to be at a party at NASA’s headquarters. But it had already
started without him. Instead of his phone, Dorsey focused on the communal
bowl of queso in front of him, scooping up melted yellow ooze with a few
tortilla chips, as a handful of curious Twitter executives watched. Sitting
around him at a posh bar in the downtown Four Seasons Hotel, they were
savoring the moment. Their CEO was eating.

Consuming food might seem like a normal human activity, but for
Dorsey it was anything but. Years in the spotlight had changed him. He was
less relatable, and even less accessible, as he juggled the management of
Twitter and Square. The snack represented his first meal of the day. He
habitually skipped meals in an intermittent fasting exercise that had become
popular among Silicon Valley engineers. The booze was also catching up to
him. Sitting in the hotel bar—complete with low-slung leather couches,
blazing fireplace, and mood lighting—Dorsey and his entourage of Twitter
vice presidents and directors threw back top-shelf tequila.

Somewhat satiated and a little tipsy, he finally acknowledged his
assistant’s messages, saying he was on his way and peeling himself from
the bar. His employees followed dutifully, piling into a black SUV that had
been waiting for them outside.

“Is this an Uber?” one of them murmured. But the driver already knew
Dorsey, acknowledging him with a slight tilt of his head. The executives
realized the vehicle was Dorsey’s own, manned and tracked by his personal
security detail. They were whisked from the lights of downtown Houston,
traveling twenty-five miles southeast to NASA’s Johnson Space Center.

Dorsey, who was expected to hobnob with officials from NASA while
his employees drank and milled around the cavernous museum among the
rockets, tried to pull himself together in the car. But the inebriated gaggle of
staff were having none of it. They roasted him for his dietary habits and
office wardrobe choices, which sometimes included a pair of running
sandals. They brought up the twenty-three-year-old Sports Illustrated
swimsuit model he had dated, teasing him for buying her a house. She was
two decades younger than the Twitter cofounder.

“They have to be at least thirty-five or older,” one of the finance
executives cracked from the back seat. Others laughed.

To any other CEO, this might have been out of line. But Dorsey
welcomed the insubordination. These were his people, the folks who had
been in the trenches with him running Twitter, the multibillion-dollar
company and global town square he had built. Together, Dorsey and his
team had survived years of doubt, criticism, and financial struggles. The
few days in Houston were an opportunity to look back on troubled times
and realize they had come out of it stronger.

Indeed that’s how it felt to many of the employees at the celebration
called OneTeam. It was the second-ever gathering of the sort, a laudatory
summit with all the Silicon Valley tech giant trappings and excesses
designed to give workers the feeling they belonged to one of the kindest
companies in a cutthroat industry. Employees from around the world had
flown in for three days of group meetings, corporate indoctrination, and
plenty of drinking. Twitter had picked Houston, the site of the devastating
2017 Category 4 Hurricane Harvey, in part to give back. First responders,
citizens, and government organizations had used the platform to coordinate
disaster responses and communicate emergency information during the
storm, showcasing Twitter’s power.

Beyond the programming of speakers and group events and parties,
everything—from hotels to food to bar outings—was covered. Some
members of the C-suite even had access to a private jet that could whisk
them back to their Bay Area homes if they didn’t want to spend the night in
Texas. In all, Twitter spent tens of millions of dollars on the event, which
was viewed by leaders as a justifiable expense that would build
relationships and reinvigorate workers at a somewhat stagnating company.

And at the center of Twitter’s indulgent culture-building exercise was
Dorsey.

>>> DORSEY’S SECOND STINT as CEO had been a mixed bag. By 2019, the
stock price had barely budged from where it had been three and half years
earlier when he had replaced Dick Costolo. Wall Street had cooled on
Twitter. The company was no longer the high-flying disrupter of the late
aughts. Twitter had become squarely a midsize corporation that lacked
revolutionary ideas, new products, or vigor. Its public market valuation
hovered around $25 billion.

Twitter was growing, but modestly. That February, the company
announced that for the first time ever, it had turned an annual profit, making
$1.2 billion in what Dorsey said was “proof that our long-term strategy is
working.” It also disclosed that it had 126 million daily active users, up 9
percent from the same period the year before. In the land of giants,
however, that wasn’t impressive. Other players like Snapchat, and a
fledgling video app called TikTok, were gaining ground. Investors and
analysts dogged Dorsey with questions about whether or not he could keep
Twitter relevant, particularly while he had split duties leading Square at the
same time. The return of the company’s original product mind was
supposed to stimulate new ideas and Dorsey made some cosmetic changes
—notably expanding the tweet character limit from 140 to 280—but
nothing seismic was underway.

Dorsey’s push into “healthy conversations” did move the platform
toward publishing and promoting less hate speech and toxic content, via
user suspensions and bans, or decreased visibility for certain tweets in the
Twitter algorithm. Yet when crises took place, people still seethed on
Twitter. That March, a white supremacist had gone on a shooting rampage,
killing fifty-one people at two mosques in Christchurch, New Zealand. He
had live-streamed it on Facebook. To archive the footage and keep it online,
the attacker’s supporters had used Twitter. It was yet another example of
bad actors seeming to be one step ahead of the Silicon Valley tech
behemoths.

President Trump also continued to flummox the company. Unwilling to
penalize the leader of the free world, Twitter let its most engaging user
share a constant daily stream of bombastic posts, which drove constant
traffic to the platform but caused its leadership to feel ill at ease. In 2019,
Trump had used his account to tell Democratic minority congresswomen to
“go back and help fix the totally broken and crime infested places from
which they came,” riling up racist abuse. He had also tweeted 115 times in a
single day ahead of his first impeachment.

“We have seen abuse, we have seen harassment, we have seen
manipulation, automation, human coordination, misinformation,” Dorsey
said onstage that spring at the TED Conference, an annual gathering of
business bigwigs. “These are dynamics that we were not expecting thirteen
years ago.”
In Dorsey’s mind, Twitter was a public square, just like Washington
Square Park, the 9.75-acre space in Manhattan’s Greenwich Village where,
even as the billionaire chief executive of two major companies, he would
sometimes sit, take work calls, and watch the tourists, students, and buskers
around him. The park was neutral to what happened on top of it and there
was an expectation that people could express themselves freely there. Yet, if
someone with a megaphone started harassing others, people could call him
out or summon park police to maintain order.

In practice, however, finding the balance between free expression and
safety became the crux of Twitter’s problem. The users who were subjected
to abuse slammed the company for not doing more to clean up the site. On
the other side, suspended users accused the company of censorship. While
Dorsey spoke openly about Twitter’s struggles, he often came off as
philosophical.

That criticism was not helped by Dorsey’s regular interactions with
high-profile right-wing users of his platform. He had long been a proponent
of hearing from a diversity of voices, but in the polarization of the Trump
presidency, his efforts to meet with these divisive figures only caused more
consternation, even among his own staff. In March 2019, he went on Joe
Rogan’s podcast with Vijaya Gadde, who by then had been elevated to
Twitter’s chief legal officer. Another guest, conservative blogger Tim Pool,
attacked the pair for their supposed bias against the right. The following
month, Dorsey met in the Oval Office with President Trump, who accused
Twitter of discriminating against Republicans and removing thousands of
his followers. The chief executive kept in touch with figures like Ali
Alexander, a right-wing conspiracy theorist, and conservative firebrand
Candace Owens, who had made a name for herself by operating a doxing
website.

To combat the impression that their CEO was out to lunch, Twitter
comms arranged for Dorsey to tour each of the company’s global offices,
calling it the “Tweep Tour”—a reference to the company’s nickname for its
employees.

Dorsey was particularly moved by a visit to Africa that November,
which included stops in Ethiopia, Ghana, Nigeria, and South Africa. Over
three weeks, he met with dignitaries, engineers, and entrepreneurs,
becoming particularly fascinated with the potential use of Bitcoin, a popular
cryptocurrency, in the continent’s developing markets. “Sad to be leaving
the continent…for now,” he wrote at the end of his trip. “Africa will define
the future (especially the bitcoin one!). Not sure where yet, but I’ll be living
here for 3-6 months mid 2020. Grateful I was able to experience a small
part.”
Dorsey’s tweet was news to Twitter’s executives and board. There had
been no planning to allow him to run the company from any post in Africa.

Already facing concerns from investors and analysts that Dorsey was
seemingly distracted by Square, Twitter’s executives braced themselves for
questions about how Dorsey could run the company from halfway around
the world. The company’s stock fell 1.3 percent on the news.

>>> IF THERE WERE any indications that Dorsey was distracted or checked
out from his duties, they did not come at the 2020 OneTeam. Leslie
Berland, the marketing chief who orchestrated many of Dorsey’s public
appearances, placed him front and center.

Berland, who joined Twitter in 2016, was among the most beloved
personalities at the company. With a bright smile that flashed across high
cheekbones, the New York–based executive was Dorsey’s first major hire
during a reshuffle of the company’s leadership organization upon his return.

Her move at the time was a gamble. Berland was on track to be one of
the youngest people to join American Express’s C-suite but left her comfort
zone to take a chance on Dorsey and a dysfunctional company that was seen
to have never passed beyond its start-up phase. In her years there, she had
worn many hats, eventually adding human resources to her marketing
responsibilities and the less official title of “Jack whisperer.” To employees,
Berland was a maternal figure, moderating company-wide meetings with a
warm personality that drew everyone in.

For OneTeam, Berland leaned into the weirdness that was
quintessentially Dorsey. A church choir was flown in from Los Angeles to
perform one song, Toto’s “Africa.” The joke poked fun at Dorsey’s goal of
living on the continent, but it fell flat for some employees who were fixated
on how much it cost to cover flights and hotels for the performers.

Dorsey was receptive to his executive team’s efforts to make him the
driving force behind OneTeam. To kick off the event on January 14, he
walked onstage at Downtown Houston’s George R. Brown Convention
Center in an astronaut helmet, white Moon Boots, metallic silver pants, and
white trench coat with the conference logo emblazoned on the back. He
then led a fifteen-minute meditation session. Dorsey’s mom, Marcia,
beamed from the audience as her son led them through the cultish mindclearing exercises.

Beyond the woo-woo, Dorsey seemed bought in. Still in his Moon
Boots, he ran through an extensive presentation of his vision for the
company. With some of his talk written out partly in emojis on his iPhone,
he showed slides featuring historical figures such as Martin Luther King,
Jr., that read: “Everyone can be great, because everyone can serve.” He
spoke about his desire to work from Africa and his plan to decentralize the
company’s workforce so people would no longer have to work at the office
if they didn’t want to.

He also made a prediction that there would be a coming global incident
that may force people to shelter in their homes and use an internet platform
to communicate. He envisioned a world where Twitter—already important
for the 152 million users who visited the site daily—would be an even
larger influence. It felt like a Tony Robbins seminar where people down on
their luck spent thousands of dollars to hear from a guru revealing to them
life’s secrets. Dorsey was selling them on Twitter and, more important,
himself.

Other leaders took the stage to make their pitches, too. They included
Dorsey’s top lieutenants: Kayvon Beykpour, a genial product whiz; Bruce
Falck, a demanding executive who oversaw products for advertisers; and
Parag Agrawal, a quiet machine-learning expert who led Twitter’s
technology teams. The three men were responsible for executing Dorsey’s
ideas for the platform, and they joined Dorsey’s other deputies for a panel
that discussed their plans for the company. While Beykpour and Falck
bantered, Agrawal sat quietly with a slight slump in his shoulders that
belied his large frame. His onstage presence didn’t hint at the particularly
close relationship he enjoyed with Dorsey, who viewed Agrawal as a
kindred spirit with a bone-deep understanding of Twitter’s mission and
future.

Between talks from the likes of Olympian Simone Biles and NFL
superstar J. J. Watt, employees spent copiously on their corporate expense
accounts at bars and restaurants around Houston. One night, in an especially
grand display of the company’s largesse, Twitter rented out Minute Maid
Park, the home of the Houston Astros, for a fireworks display that wouldn’t
have been out of place on the Fourth of July.

Dorsey relished the good vibes. At a block party on the second night of
OneTeam, he walked around with Biz Stone, who had returned to the
company as an executive with an undefined role in 2017. They took it all in,
waiting in line with other employees for the Ferris wheel. They got into a
pod together, rising and falling on a clear Texas night on one of the last
rides of the evening.

>>> THE CONFERENCE’S THIRD and final day on January 16 was lighter on
programming. Among the speakers was Chrissy Teigen, the model and
television personality who ran one of Twitter’s more popular accounts. She
had come second in a poll of speakers that Twitter employees wanted most
to see at OneTeam, following the first-place vote getter who remained a
secret to most attendees until he dialed in via video call. He had been slated
to come to the company’s first OneTeam in 2018 but had been sidelined by
work and a few controversies involving his Twitter account. Finally, at the
coaxing of Dorsey, one of Twitter’s most followed—and polarizing—
celebrities was about to appear.

“I have no idea if this is going to work,” Dorsey said, as he strode onto
the convention center stage, fumbling with an iPad, his screen projected
behind him on a giant display for the audience. A dial tone blared through
the speakers for a few seconds. Then, with a smile and a wave, Elon Musk
appeared.

There were cheers and applause. “We love you,” one employee shouted.

Others whipped out their phones to take pictures and video of the supersize
projection of Musk, who was clad in an open black bomber jacket over a Tshirt that read occupy mars. Dorsey had previously called the Tesla and
SpaceX chief the most exciting influential person on the platform for
“sharing his thinking openly” as he solved “existential problems.” Still,
some in the audience wondered if Musk was an exemplary Twitter user,
given his history of bombast and legal problems that stemmed from his
online activity on the platform. Musk had emerged victorious in his “pedo
guy” tweet lawsuit only a few weeks earlier.

Over the video call, Musk, seated behind his desk at SpaceX’s
headquarters, was unlike his online persona. He was reserved and
sometimes barely audible, lacking the spikiness or juvenile humor that
permeated his tweets. Dorsey tried to draw him out, asking him about his
mission to establish colonies on Mars. “When do you think we’ll see the
first tweet from Mars?” Twitter’s CEO asked.

Musk stumbled over words, taking pauses to think. At other points, he
interrupted his own thoughts and seemed unable to string together sentences
as quickly as his brain fired. He complained about bots and trolls.

“I’m sure you guys see it all the time, people trying to manipulate the
system,” Musk said. “They’re trying to sway public opinion and sometimes
it can be very difficult to figure out what’s real public opinion and what’s
not, and what do people actually want, what are people actually upset about
versus manipulation of the system by various interest groups.”
He then leapt into discussion of the Mars Rover. Interplanetary tweets
might flow within nine years, the billionaire supposed.

Then Dorsey asked him for feedback. “What are we doing poorly, what
could we be doing better, and what’s your hope for our potential as a
service?” Dorsey asked.

Then added, “If you were running Twitter—by the way, do you want to
run Twitter?”
The assembled employees laughed loudly at the idea of Dorsey offering
his company to Musk. Both men paused for a moment. The laughter faded.

“What would you do?” Dorsey asked.

T
5 > An Invasion
he invader came in quietly. By mid-February 2020, Twitter’s board
heard rumors of big purchases of its shares, but the buyer’s identity
was concealed by equity swaps—financial instruments that did not trigger
SEC requirements for public stock disclosures. The value of the purchases
crept up and up, from thousands to millions, until, by late February 2020, it
hit $1 billion.

The buyer was Jesse Cohn, a top partner for Elliott Management, the
$71 billion fund founded by Paul Singer that was known for shaking up—or
destroying, depending on who you asked—corporate boardrooms around
the world.

With his stake secured, Cohn texted Omid Kordestani, Twitter’s board
chairman, and asked to talk. It was a phase shift in the secret campaign he
had been waging for weeks to remove Dorsey once again from his perch
atop Twitter. Kordestani, a suave Iranian American salesman who had led
Google’s business development during its heady dot-com days, knew the
second that Cohn’s name appeared on his phone that it couldn’t be good
news. On the call, Cohn confirmed his fears. Elliott Management owned a 4
percent stake in Twitter.

Cohn was brief and blunt. He told Kordestani to expect a letter detailing
the stake he had accumulated in Twitter and the demands that he planned to
impose. It was irresponsible to let Dorsey run the business while he was
distracted by his dual role at Square, Cohn argued.

On February 21, a few hours after his call with Kordestani, Cohn sent
his promised letter to Twitter’s board, formally announcing his stake in the
company. The letter stopped short of calling for Dorsey’s firing but outlined
the concerns about his part-time leadership. The board panicked.

Twitter was unlike Facebook and Snapchat, where the founder–chief
executives had structured their ownership specifically to protect themselves
from this kind of interference. Those companies had super-voting shares
that gave the founders outsize control over their organizations, even after
the companies had gone public. Dorsey owned only a thin slice of Twitter, a
2 percent stake worth about $531 million, and had no super-voting stock,
leaving him vulnerable.

Cohn had waited until the last minute to announce his position, just two
days before Twitter’s February 23 deadline to nominate new board
members. Twitter had a few open seats on its board that it had intended to
fill with independent directors, expanding the breadth of knowledge and
prestige in its boardroom. But the process of filling them had moved slowly.

At one point, Dorsey had suggested adding Musk but had been rebuffed.

Cohn insisted that he be immediately placed on Twitter’s board along
with three of his loyalists. There were only three open seats on the board,
but Cohn wanted to ensure he would control them and have a backup plan
to grab a fourth seat if any of the current directors stepped aside. The board
seats would allow Cohn to quickly get inside the company and start flexing
his muscles. The board huddled over the final week of February without
Dorsey present, trying to figure out what to do.

Twitter’s stock price had fallen more than 20 percent in late 2019 after
the company missed Wall Street expectations and revealed its ad service to
be ridden with bugs and outages that prevented advertisers from properly
targeting consumers. The numbers didn’t make Twitter look like a company
operating at peak performance or Dorsey like a chief executive with his eye
on the ball.

But people inside the company believed in Dorsey, and he had a loyal
and close-knit team of executives, some of whom might follow Dorsey out
the door if they thought he was forced to go.

Dorsey was livid about Elliott Management’s intrusion. He didn’t want
to be thrust into the spotlight for a public litigation of his successes and
shortcomings—not again after being fired once before and dealing with the
fallout from the 2016 election. He loathed the idea of out-of-touch finance
bros in windowpane-check button-downs meddling with engineering and
his vision for the product, and he did not want to be the focal point of a
drawn-out battle.

He threatened to quit rather than wait to be pushed out in an agonizing
repeat of his previous firing. Dorsey’s message to the board was clear: “It’s
him or me.” If Cohn was allowed to come in, he would storm out.

>>> ON A GRAY FRIDAY MORNING, Cohn’s jet touched down at San Francisco
International Airport. As the wheels hit the tarmac, the corporate raider
readied himself for a showdown. At thirty-nine, the Long Island native had
already led several activist shareholder campaigns against companies like
eBay and AT&T, and earned enough money for a $30 million Wall Street
penthouse apartment.

Cohn homed in on underperformers, quietly buying up stock. Once he
had some financial leverage, he would force out corporate leaders or seek
concessions to improve the bottom line. As the target’s profits rose, so
would the stock price. Then Cohn would sell, walking away richer, busted
careers in his wake.

Cohn did not particularly care who replaced Dorsey as Twitter’s chief
executive—anyone full time would be better, he believed. The company
was languishing under its part-time leadership and Dorsey would never
make Twitter his top priority, since the vast majority of his wealth came
from his shares in his digital payments company, Square. Worst of all, the
board had given Dorsey an unreasonably long leash, ignoring the problems
his lack of focus caused, Cohn thought.

Two of those perhaps overly lenient board members were on their way
to confront Cohn. Kordestani and Patrick Pichette, a graying venture
capitalist who had once served as Google’s chief financial officer, shared a
car that morning as they rode past the steely waters of the San Francisco
Bay and plotted their counterattack. The pair were in agreement: Dorsey
stays.

Cohn waited for them in a private conference room in the terminal that
had been specially booked for the showdown. When the board members
arrived, Cohn greeted them casually, despite the seriousness of the situation.

Pichette and Kordestani were put off, although they tried to stay pokerfaced. Cohn’s coup could upend one of the most important social media
companies in the world, a hub for political speech that was sure to play a
key role in the upcoming U.S. presidential election. Was he taking any of it
seriously?
The battle for Dorsey’s future could begin.

Cohn was quiet and polite, belying his reputation as a hard-driving CEO
killer. He dressed casually, forgoing the Wall Street uniform of a suit and
tie, and had brought only Marc Steinberg, an Elliott portfolio manager, not a
bevy of lawyers.

Cohn invited Pichette and Kordestani to sit and talk. Despite his mellow
approach, he was firm: Twitter’s stock was underperforming, and it was
Dorsey’s inattention that was causing the pain. He needed either to leave
Twitter or abandon Square. It was untenable for him to do both, Cohn
believed.

Pichette leaned on his experience at Google as he made his case to
Cohn. Sundar Pichai was technically the leader of only one company,
Alphabet, he argued. But under the Alphabet umbrella was the search
company Google, the video service YouTube, the corporate web suite
Cloud, and moonshot projects like self-driving cars. Pichai ran it all without
Wall Street worrying he was distracted.

Why not let Dorsey run just two companies, Twitter and Square? What
mattered wasn’t the number of businesses but having the right teams
installed around a visionary leader to make sure everything stayed on track.

Cohn should meet Dorsey, Pichette insisted. Only then could he understand
what made Dorsey so special.

Cohn thought Pichette and Kordestani seemed defensive, and he and
Steinberg tried to soften them with their friendly, informal approach. They
had brought stacks of documents to argue his point of view. Investors
deserved more from Twitter, given its role in public discourse. To Cohn, it
didn’t matter how many companies Pichai was theoretically capable of
running—it just wasn’t good governance to have a chief executive who was
constantly pulled in different directions. Just because a tipsy driver might
get home safely didn’t mean that getting behind the wheel after a night at
the bar was a good idea. Twitter needed a leader who was focused on fixing
its performance problems and could dedicate all of his time to the company,
Cohn said.

By the following weekend, February 29, word of Elliott’s intervention
had leaked. Twitter employees immediately erupted in outrage at the idea
that their quirky yet beloved chief executive might be ousted. Many of them
credited Dorsey with creating Twitter’s unique culture that put people and
speech over profit and speed. They tweeted support for Dorsey under the
hashtag #WeBackJack, sharing stories about his leadership and praying he
would stay.

Even some tech leaders stood up for Dorsey. “Just want to say that I
support @Jack as Twitter CEO,” Elon Musk tweeted.

>>> SEVERAL TWITTER EMPLOYEES came home from Houston after OneTeam
feeling incredibly ill. Maybe the aches and chills were caused by the
constant drinking and partying, but dozens of workers developed fevers and
stayed away from their offices in the weeks following the event. They joked
that they had the “OneVirus.”
By late January, news reports were circulating on Twitter of a
mysterious virus spreading rapidly across China. First detected in Wuhan,
the capital city of the country’s central Hubei province, the COVID-19
coronavirus recorded its first U.S. case near Seattle on January 20, 2020.

Had they perhaps contracted something other than the flu at OneTeam?
Twitter employees wondered.

Just as his employees rallied around him, Dorsey sent them away. On
March 2, the company encouraged everyone to work from home. Twitter
was one of the first major American corporations to do so—unsurprisingly,
given that its chief executive already encouraged remote work. As Twitter
workers scattered to their homes, they were told nothing about Elliott’s
maneuver.

Dorsey still seethed. He was required to recuse himself from board
discussions about potential changes, and resented being in the dark. From
the outside, it seemed like no one on the board was standing up for him, and
he became furious not just with Cohn but with his own board members.

Twitter’s bankers at Goldman Sachs, meanwhile, mounted their defense.

The best Dorsey could hope for, they said, was to fight money with money.

Dorsey needed a white knight investor to save him. Dorsey immediately
suggested Laurene Powell Jobs, the widow of Apple’s founder Steve Jobs.

The blond mogul managed her husband’s multibillion-dollar trust and was
one of the few people with the financial firepower to come to Dorsey’s aid.

Dorsey deeply admired her late husband, and knew that Laurene supported
founders and was fond of him. She also tended to invest in media
companies, climate projects, and other vehicles with a clear public benefit;
Twitter fit comfortably into that niche.

Dorsey pushed the board to pitch Powell Jobs, and she met with its
members to discuss a potential investment. But despite her wealth and
friendship with Dorsey, she declined to back him in the fight against Elliott.

The investment seemed wrong for her portfolio for several reasons, among
them that a messy boardroom battle didn’t suit her polished image.

Agonizing over what to do, Dorsey received an unexpected phone call
during the first week of March. On the other end of the line was Egon
Durban, the cohead of Silver Lake, an investment firm that specialized in
technology and entertainment. Unlike Cohn, Durban, a Texas native with a
deep tan from his golfing and surfing excursions around the world, had a
long history in Silicon Valley and understood what Dorsey wanted to
achieve at Twitter. He had made a name for himself by brokering the sale of
Skype to Microsoft for $8.5 billion in 2011. The Silver Lake leader may
have agreed that Twitter wasn’t living up to its potential—he had
considered taking Twitter private several years earlier—but he was a
friendly face who had gotten to know Twitter when he probed the company
for a potential acquisition.

Durban had read the news about Elliott Management and was calling
with an offer. Cohn had come to Twitter with a $1 billion battering ram. To
head him off, Durban would match him, funneling $1 billion into Twitter
himself. The money would be enough to force a truce with Cohn, keeping
Dorsey in place and buying him time to improve Twitter’s stock price. It
would turn into a high-stakes game of tug-of-war, but Dorsey had few
options. He accepted Durban’s offer.

Pichette continued to urge Cohn to meet with Dorsey himself. He flew
to New York to make his case to Cohn in person, walking through an eerily
empty airport as more and more travelers abandoned their plans amid fears
of the virus. Twitter’s bankers at Goldman hosted the second meeting, and
Pichette insisted that Cohn should see firsthand what Dorsey had to offer.

Cohn agreed, and Dorsey sullenly accepted the meeting, understanding
he would need to charm the investor in order to keep his job. Cohn flew
back to the West Coast and met Dorsey at Goldman Sachs’s office in Menlo
Park on Sand Hill Road, the famed Silicon Valley corridor where the
biggest venture capitalists set up shop to hear pitches from the most
promising start-up founders.

While Pichette and Kordestani had insisted that Cohn would recognize
Dorsey’s genius once he saw him in person, Cohn felt as though he already
knew reclusive founders like Dorsey—young men who believed they were
uniquely capable of changing the world and clogged Sand Hill Road as they
traipsed to investor meetings. While the venture capitalists might be
convinced that all it took to succeed was a laptop-toting visionary, Cohn
was more old-school. Businesses needed structure and discipline, he
thought.

Dorsey eyed Cohn suspiciously, trying to put on a friendly face. He
spoke in his usual thoughtful cadence, trying to explain Twitter’s
importance to Cohn. But the activist had come ready to poke the bear.

“How can you run both companies?” Cohn asked Dorsey.

Dorsey responded that he had a management process, explaining the
way he relied on Agrawal, Beykpour, and Falck, the deputies who had
recently joined him onstage at OneTeam, to make decisions in their areas of
expertise. The same went for Square, Dorsey said—he had people he
trusted running the show. When he needed to step in and make the final call,
they knew where to find him.

Cohn didn’t like what he was hearing from Dorsey in the meeting. He
worried that Dorsey surrounded himself with yes-men. Many of his trusted
executives, including Agrawal, had spent most of their careers at Twitter
and didn’t know how a normal business would be run. There was no
replacement for face time with a chief executive, and Dorsey’s tweeps just
weren’t getting enough.

At the end of the meeting, Durban headed over from Silver Lake’s
office, just yards away from the Goldman suite. His sudden presence—and
his promised investment in Twitter—took Cohn by surprise. The activist left
with his worries about Dorsey reinforced. But his role was to improve
Elliott’s investment, and a drawn-out fight with Silver Lake wouldn’t help.

Cohn set about making a deal that he could live with. Pichette and
Kordestani shuffled between the parties, ironing out a truce. A frustrated
Dorsey bemoaned Twitter’s lack of super-voting shares. Cohn insisted
Twitter expand revenue and attract new users, and pressured the board to set
up a new committee focused on governance, an attempt to tame the
freewheeling company. With $1 billion apiece on the line, Cohn and Durban
each had seats on Twitter’s board. Cohn dropped his demand for additional
board seats and only took one for himself.

By the end of the week, Dorsey had been rescued. “We are deeply proud
of our accomplishments and confident we are on the right path with Jack’s
leadership and the executive team,” Pichette said in a March 9 statement
announcing the truce. “While our CEO structure is unique, so is Jack and so
is this company.”
There was also some reshuffling. It was clear to Cohn that the
arrangement with Kordestani let Dorsey run amok. Pichette, an owly
Canadian who favored Patagonia pullovers, had more management
experience and an ease about him that made him a better candidate to rein
in Dorsey. He was swapped in as chairman.

Pichette also snagged the job of running the governance committee
Cohn had demanded. His first task, according to the deal Cohn struck with
Silver Lake and Twitter, was to evaluate the effectiveness of Dorsey’s
leadership, “given that the Company’s chief executive officer has another
chief executive officer role.”
The agreement brokered with Elliott was clear—the investment firms
could meddle in corporate governance and try to tether Dorsey to his desk,
but they would keep their noses out of product and policy decisions. The
arrangement would give Dorsey some leeway to pursue his lofty goals.

>>> ON MARCH 19, little more than a week after the truce with Elliott,
California issued its first stay-at-home order, banning residents from
leaving their homes except for essential tasks. As the pandemic began to
rage, Twitter’s headquarters, an Art Deco high-rise on San Francisco’s
Market Street, lay empty.

Dorsey initially retreated to his mansions in San Francisco’s Sea Cliff
neighborhood and in Big Sur. But he soon hit the road, traveling to Hawaii,
Costa Rica, and French Polynesia. His direct reports complained that they
could sometimes hear roosters crowing in the background of his conference
calls, a reminder that he was on an island, while they were trapped in their
apartments. In May, Twitter became the first tech company to announce that
its employees would work remotely, forever—a decision driven by
Dorsey’s desire to stay away from the office.

By the summer, he stopped chiming in during meetings entirely. He
routinely kept his camera and microphone off, leaving employees
wondering if he was still sitting near his laptop at all or if he had wandered
off to surf.

As Dorsey faded away, Cohn and the other directors discussed a plan
for Twitter to double its revenue by 2023 and increase its daily audience by
at least 64 percent, to 315 million people. Cohn pushed for even higher
targets, but Twitter executives resisted his demands, fearing that they were
unrealistic. If they committed to goals that were too lofty, the stock would
certainly spike and give Cohn an opportunity to sell his shares for a win.

But the Twitter team would be left holding the bag.

In late October and early November, a gaunt-looking Dorsey
videoconferenced into Congress to testify several times about content
moderation. Hidden behind a scraggly gray-and-white beard that descended
past his chest, Dorsey responded patiently to the senators’ questions about
decisions the company had made to delete certain tweets and allow others
to remain on the platform. He walked them through his nascent plans for
decentralizing social media—inspired by the technology behind Bitcoin, he
believed social media could run on public code governed by regular people
rather than corporations. Dorsey told the senators he wanted to give users
more control, empowering them to choose their own algorithms that would
govern the kinds of content they saw and excusing Twitter from its
moderation responsibilities. This was the path forward that all social media
companies would eventually follow, he insisted.

Although Dorsey took pains to set up his laptop with just a simple white
wall as his backdrop, some of his employees who had been on conference
calls with him recently recognized the location—Dorsey was dialing in
from a rental property in Hawaii.

Despite Elliott’s insistence that Twitter could not survive with a parttime CEO, Dorsey was freer than ever. Not even a public hearing in front of
Congress could confine him to a particular home or desk. A few days after
his November testimony, paparazzi captured him strolling on a secluded
Hawaiian beach with Sean Penn and Jay-Z.

O
6 > A Polynesian Vacation
n March 25, 2021, Dorsey, along with Facebook chief executive
Mark Zuckerberg and Google CEO Sundar Pichai, dialed in to testify
virtually in front of the U.S. House of Representatives’ Energy and
Commerce Committee for a hearing on combating disinformation and
online extremism. It was the fifth such hearing that Twitter’s leader had
been summoned to in front of Congress, and he was sick of it. The hearings
felt theatrical, with the senators or representatives grandstanding on the
culture war topic du jour.

Dorsey attended the hearing—still virtual because of COVID concerns
—from his Sea Cliff mansion kitchen, calling in from an iPad stacked on
top of a pile of books. His dishes, glassware, and a blockchain-based clock
could be seen in the shot framed behind his buzzed head and graying beard.

He did his best to explain how Twitter had arrived at its content
moderation decisions, trying to walk the lawmakers through the process.

But they kept interrupting him, demanding that he give yes or no answers
that left little room for nuance. Annoyed, Dorsey tweeted out a poll. “?,” he
wrote, asking his followers to vote yes or no.

Word of the tweet quickly reached the representatives who were
questioning him.

“Mr. Dorsey, what is winning, yes or no, on your Twitter account poll?”
Representative Kathleen Rice, a Democrat from New York, asked, raising
her eyebrows behind thick tortoiseshell glasses.

“Yes,” Dorsey replied, the corners of his lips poking upward from
behind his beard as he stifled a smile.

“Hmm, your multitasking skills are quite impressive,” she replied.

But Dorsey wasn’t looking to multitask for much longer.

>>> NO LEGISLATION EVER came out of the hours-long grilling sessions. The
press pilloried Dorsey and Twitter, regardless of what he said. And most
lawmakers seemed like they wanted to ask only about specific content
moderation decisions: Why was this taken down? Why was this left up? Why
was my account being shadowbanned? They didn’t appear to care about the
future of technology or solving the problems they complained about.

Dorsey firmly insisted that world leaders should not be subject to the
same rules as other Twitter users and refused to allow their accounts to be
suspended when they posted threats that would get a regular person booted
off the platform. He also staunchly defended Alex Jones, the far-right
podcaster and Sandy Hook school shooting truther, after he was banned
from Facebook, YouTube, and Apple’s podcast network, saying that Jones
hadn’t violated any of Twitter’s rules. Eventually, as pressure mounted and
Jones used Twitter to tell supporters to prepare their “battle rifles” against
the mainstream media and harass a reporter, Dorsey relented, banning the
conspiracy theorist and his company, Infowars.

Vijaya Gadde took on Twitter’s critics with a firmer hand. She had
joined Twitter in 2011, while Dorsey was still trying to find his way back
into the company’s day-to-day operations. When he secured his second
CEO term in 2015, harassment was becoming rampant on the platform.

Under his watch, she crafted Twitter’s rule book, drafting rules with her
team and securing Dorsey’s sign-off. To other Twitter executives, Gadde,
like Leslie Berland, was one of the few trusted voices who could speak
Dorsey’s language. She could convince him to adopt her suggestions, and
translate his desires to lawyers and investors who might otherwise find him
inscrutable.

Born in India, Gadde moved to the United States with her family when
she was three. She grew up in Beaumont, a small city in southeastern Texas
where her father had to ask permission from local Ku Klux Klan leaders
before he went door-to-door to sell insurance. After high school, she studied
law at New York University. She had worked for a decade at the Silicon
Valley legal powerhouse Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati, where she
focused on complex acquisitions and corporate governance matters. At
Twitter she avoided the limelight, and when she was forced to speak
publicly, her voice would sometimes crack. She was fiercely protective of
her connection with Dorsey, and some colleagues complained that she
didn’t give them enough insight into his movements and opinions.

In March 2020, Gadde realized that Twitter would need new rules
banning misinformation about COVID so it could take down tweets that
promoted ineffective treatments or spread conspiracy theories like the idea
that 5G technology caused the virus. But there was a problem—Twitter had
no framework for tackling misinformation and no staff responsible for
policing it.

Unlike at other social media companies—which would simply swoop in
to remove a post without explanation, and then retroactively justify the
decision—at Twitter, there had to be a rule first, and the rule had to be
public. Sometimes, Twitter published drafts of new rules and then gathered
feedback over months—even years—before finalizing them and enforcing
them. It was this bureaucratic approach that allowed Jones to stay on the
platform much longer than he was allowed to remain on others. At Twitter,
they had waited for Jones to break enough rules on the site to merit a ban.

But COVID changed things. Gadde turned to Yoel Roth, one of her
deputies who had helped identify and root out Russian disinformation
accounts after the 2016 election.

Roth, an earnest, baby-faced man, had spent most of his career at
Twitter, fighting misinformation. He joined the company in 2015, soon after
completing a PhD focused on online communication and communities, and
had written the closest thing Twitter had to a misinformation policy not long
before COVID struck. The new rules prohibited users from sharing photos
and videos that had been altered by artificial intelligence. The imagery,
known as “deepfakes,” included fake videos of politicians making fictional
statements or artificial pornography that placed someone’s face on a
different person’s body, and were becoming commonplace with the more
widely available and easy-to-use AI and video editing software. After
consulting with his team, Roth decided people who shared deepfakes on
Twitter would be banned in the most egregious cases, but if users created
them to parody someone, Twitter would simply label the tweet, warning
viewers it contained manipulated media.

Twitter executives were taken with the idea of labeling, no one more so
than Dorsey, who was fed up with the pressure from Congress and the
public over misinformation. His company had no business becoming an
arbiter of truth, he thought, and it was in an untenable position in a
polarized political climate where the idea of truth itself was contested.

Labels allowed Twitter to avoid taking down anyone’s speech wholesale.

Every day felt like another fire drill, and Dorsey was becoming inured to it.

The approach of labeling some risky tweets let Twitter protect its
reputation—it was doing something about misinformation—without
needing to fact-check every single questionable post or overstepping into
censorship of unverified content. Dorsey worried about censorship and
wanted to err on the side of leaving tweets online.

Then the pandemic struck. Usage of Twitter spiked as people sheltered
at home around the globe, totally reliant on their phones for contact with the
world, and Twitter became a hub for doctors to share tips on avoiding the
virus, for scientists to write long thread breakdowns of the latest research,
and for an army of armchair experts to swap theories about the virus’s
origin, debate the efficacy of masks, or make their own predictions about
the length and severity of the pandemic.

Twitter flooded with misinformation about COVID, and its team of
content moderators were overwhelmed. The only tools they had were
deleting tweets and suspending users, and they tried to reserve those
punishments for the most dangerous posts—like ones encouraging fake
“cures” that were, in fact, harmful.

Among the do-your-own-research experts on Twitter was Musk. On
March 6, he tweeted, “the coronavirus panic is dumb.” Two weeks later, on
a day when the U.S. reported 2,000 known COVID cases, he posted that the
country would be “close to zero new cases” by the end of April and that
“kids are essentially immune” from the disease. (Children were not immune
from the virus, and the U.S. averaged more than 20,000 daily COVID cases
by the end of April.) Armed with seemingly little information aside from
what he read in his Twitter timeline and the random links he clicked on,
Musk argued with virologists and doctors on the site, cast doubt on the virus
positivity rates in the country, and advocated for a drug—anti-malarial
treatment hydroxychloroquine—that had no verifiable impact on the
disease.

In some ways, Musk was simply mimicking the means by which he
learned about rocketry or automobile development, fields in which he had
little prior experience. He consumed publicly available information, made
quick judgments, and posited in his typical contrarian fashion that he could
do better than the experts. With rockets and cars, he had been wildly
successful. So why couldn’t he be right again, about COVID?
Musk also had a financial incentive to doubt the severity of the virus. A
pandemic would destabilize the economy and, more important, the
operations of Tesla and SpaceX. The people who worked on his
manufacturing lines would be forced to stay home. Musk had always
required his employees to show up for in-person collaboration and hands-on
work, and COVID lockdowns would prevent that. On March 13, Musk sent
out a company-wide email encouraging SpaceX’s workers to continue
coming in to the office because he had seen data that he claimed showed the
illness “is *not* within the top 100 health risks in the United States.

“As a basis for comparison, the risk of death from C19 is *vastly* less
than the risk of death from driving your car home,” he wrote. “There are
about 36 thousand automotive deaths [per year], as compared to 36 so far
this year for C19.”
While SpaceX stayed open—declared an essential business because of
its government contracts—Tesla was obligated to follow California’s stayat-home orders, sending Musk into a rage. The shelter-in-place orders
meant his workers weren’t in the factory. Musk became fed up, tweeting at
11:14 p.m. on April 28, “FREE AMERICA NOW.” He then replied to a farright activist, who had declared that the scariest thing about the pandemic
was how easily Americans “bow down & give up their blood bought
freedom to corrupt politicians,” and called her assessment “true.”
Musk continued his tirade on a Tesla earnings call the next day, when he
admitted the company was worried about not being able to quickly resume
production of cars in Fremont. “The extension of the shelter-in-place, or
frankly I would call it ‘forcibly imprisoning people in their homes against
all their constitutional rights’—that’s my opinion—and breaking people’s
freedoms in ways that are horrible and wrong and not why people came to
America or built this country,” he said. “What the fuck? Excuse me.

Outrage. It’s an outrage.

“If somebody wants to stay in their house, that’s great,” Musk
continued. “They should be allowed to stay in their house and they should
not be compelled to leave. But to say they cannot leave their house and they
will be arrested if they do, this is fascist. This is not democratic. This is not
freedom. Give people back their goddamn freedom.”
>>> AT TWITTER, THE tsunami of tweets about the pandemic was unlike
anything Gadde and her team had dealt with before. New details about the
virus emerged daily, so a tweet posted today could be misinformation
tomorrow.

Roth appealed to Dorsey. Twitter could use the labels it had built for
deepfakes to add warnings to misleading tweets about the virus, he said.

There was only one problem: the message cautioning viewers about
manipulated media was hard-coded into the label Twitter had built, so it
could only be used for one thing. Dorsey declared a “code red” and
demanded the company’s product and engineering teams build a label that
could include any kind of warning Twitter’s content moderators desired.

Roth seized the new tool and quickly began adding labels to COVID
misinformation.

The company did remove thousands of tweets under a policy that
assessed “demonstrably false or potentially misleading content” that had
“the highest risk of causing harm” but left up hundreds of thousands of
others, including those from Musk, which questioned the official response
to the pandemic but didn’t cross Twitter’s line into harmful misinformation.

With no end to the pandemic in sight, Dorsey doubled down on the label
strategy. Heading into the 2020 U.S. presidential election, the company was
under fire to do something about President Trump’s endless cascade of
reckless tweets. It had a long-standing policy of ignoring rules violations if
they came from world leaders, arguing that the public interest outweighed
potential harm. But maybe Twitter didn’t need to delete messages from
Trump, Roth thought. Maybe his tweets could be labeled, too. Dorsey gave
the go-ahead.

Trump had started to rail against the electoral process, warning of
fraudulent results and complaining about mail-in ballots, which were
expected to fall in favor of his opponent, Joe Biden.

Donald J. Trump
@realDonaldTrump
There is NO WAY (ZERO!) that Mail-In Ballots will be anything less than
substantially fraudulent. Mail boxes will be robbed, ballots will be forged
& even illegally printed out & fraudulently signed. The Governor of
California is sending Ballots to millions of people, anyone…. .

8:17 AM May 26, 2020
34K 30K 82K
Donald J. Trump
@realDonaldTrump
…. living in the state, no matter who they are or how they got there, will
get one. That will be followed up with professionals telling all of these
people, many of whom have never even thought of voting before, how,
and for whom, to vote. This will be a Rigged Election. No way!
12K 11K 47K
The intervention Twitter undertook was small—just a link underneath
Trump’s tweet that suggested users “get the facts about mail-in ballots” by
reading a CNN article. The reaction, however, was massive.

Republicans decried “censorship” and Trump blasted Twitter in more
tweets later that day. The company was “interfering” in the election and
“completely stifling FREE SPEECH,” he ranted. While Dorsey took most
of the heat, Trump’s supporters also started to target other employees.

Kellyanne Conway, one of the president’s most senior advisers, trained her
ire on Roth, after people started to dig into his old tweets looking for any
proof of left-wing bias among Twitter’s employees.

They quickly found what they were looking for. “I’m just saying we fly
over those states that voted for a racist tangerine for a reason,” Roth had
tweeted in November 2016, when he was still a junior employee. In a 2017
post, he wrote there were “ACTUAL NAZIS IN THE WHITE HOUSE.”
The tweets were screenshotted and spread across the site, making Roth, one
of the main people at Twitter who helped handle abuse campaigns, the
direct target of one. In interviews, Conway decried Roth as a censor, and
Trump piled on by posing for photos with a copy of the New York Post,
which featured a story about Roth and his supposed censorship on the
cover.

Twitter, of course, had seen abuse campaigns before, but few employees
besides Dorsey had been targeted at this scale: Roth was suddenly an ant
under the beam of light through a magnifying glass. As Twitter did damage
control, Roth went dark. Twitter assigned a security guard to sit outside his
home as death threats streamed in online. Dorsey also attempted to step in.

“There is someone ultimately accountable for our actions as a company, and
that’s me. Please leave our employees out of this,” he tweeted on May 27.

Twitter’s labels emboldened Trump to tweet more, leading Gadde and
her team to build a process for labeling Trump’s tweets. Only a few people
could make the final call to slap a label on the president’s posts, including
Gadde herself; Del Harvey, the head of safety; and Roth. When Twitter’s
content moderators flagged a tweet from Trump that seemed to violate
Twitter’s rules, Harvey and Roth would receive an urgent page. If they
didn’t respond, Gadde would receive one next.

The executives lived in the Bay Area, near Twitter’s headquarters, and
were routinely jolted awake in the wee hours of the morning by another
alarming message from Trump, who habitually spent time in the morning
tweeting from his bedroom in the White House before beginning his day.

The process quickly shifted from a monumental one of historical
consequence—a Twitter employee deciding to curtail statements by the
leader of the free world—to a minor irritation squeezed in between morning
alarms, coffee, and getting kids ready for school. Sean Edgett, the
company’s general counsel, was added to pager duty for Trump’s wild
tweets, but Dorsey was purposely left off the list. His global travel and
routine absences sometimes made him tough to reach.

To some of his employees, Dorsey seemed increasingly disillusioned
with Twitter and its daily free-speech fights. Over time, Twitter had created
a strike policy that booted users off the platform after they received several
warning labels. Dorsey began to wonder if Gadde was going too far by
banning people, making Twitter into a censor again—the thing he had
hoped labels would prevent. Dorsey also hated the requests from
government officials, including the FBI and White House, who flagged
tweets to be taken down that they believed were in violation of the
company’s policies. It felt like the company was doing the bidding of too
many outsiders and deviating from its mission to be an open public square.

Dorsey’s disagreements with his top policy deputy burst into public in
October, just weeks before the U.S. presidential election. Ahead of the
November vote, the FBI had repeatedly warned Twitter and other Silicon
Valley companies to be prepared for hack-and-leak campaigns similar to
those seen in 2016, when Hillary Clinton’s emails had been published in
part on Twitter by a hacker.

As Gadde’s team received more warnings from the FBI, they steeled
themselves for something similar. Two years earlier, as the company took
stock of Russian meddling on its platform, it had instituted a new rule
forbidding users from sharing information gleaned by hacking. If such an
occurrence were to happen again, Twitter would block ill-gotten documents
or information from appearing on the platform and freeze any accounts that
tried to share them.

It didn’t take long for that policy to be put to the test. On October 14,
2020, the New York Post published an explosive article featuring emails
extracted from a laptop belonging to Hunter Biden, presidential candidate
Joe Biden’s son. The messages showed the younger Biden had brokered a
meeting between his father and a Ukrainian executive he worked with, in
contradiction to Joe Biden’s claim that he never involved himself in his
son’s business dealings. There were also nude images of Hunter, a violation
of Twitter’s policy forbidding explicit pictures shared without the subject’s
consent, and images of him using drugs.

The provenance of the emails was murky. The Post reported that
Hunter’s laptop had been turned over by a repair shop.

To Twitter’s executives, the story seemed to have all the telltale signs of
a hack-and-leak: embarrassing emails leaked from an unknown source, just
in time to tip the scales of a presidential election. Gadde quickly made the
decision to block the link to the article from being shared on Twitter. She
also greenlit the suspension of the New York Post’s official Twitter account,
a move that blocked the publication from sharing any other stories until it
deleted its tweet that featured the Hunter Biden article.

The backlash was immediate and furious. Republican lawmakers and
Trump campaign officials accused Twitter of censorship, and even some
Democrats questioned whether Twitter, by cracking down on a mainstream
media outlet, had overstepped. Even Dorsey objected. “Our communication
around our actions on the @nypost article was not great,” he wrote. “And
blocking URL sharing via tweet or DM with zero context as to why we’re
blocking: unacceptable.”
His statement seemed confusing. Who was Dorsey criticizing?
Internally, however, employees knew where the message was being
directed. While Dorsey had been a proponent of empowering the executives
he put into positions of power to make their own decisions, he was now
effectively admonishing Gadde. She took his tweet personally, particularly
because he was more direct and harsh in what he said publicly than the
criticism he shared in private, she told people close to her.

On October 16, Twitter decided to limit the hacked materials rule only
to prevent hackers themselves from sharing information they stole, and to
add contextual labels to other tweets about the Biden emails, warning
viewers that they came from an unknown source. The Post would once
again be able to share its links, but the controversy continued for weeks.

>>> ON ELECTION DAY, November 3, Twitter had a team tracking
misinformation and voting results around the clock. As it became clear that
Biden was going to beat Trump, it monitored attempts to undermine trust in
the electoral process. The company labeled some 300,000 tweets over a
two-week period covering the election and its aftermath. Nearly 40 percent
of Trump’s election tweets in the four days after the election received
labels, warning that their content “might be misleading about an election or
other civic process.”
Dorsey had gone along with the labeling or the outright removal of
misleading information about COVID in the pandemic’s early days. But
with the advent of newly created vaccines from major pharmaceutical
companies like Johnson & Johnson and Pfizer, he balked at the idea of
taking action against tweets that questioned the efficacy of the shots. He
had given Gadde free range to make decisions previously, but by the spring,
he began micromanaging the moderation policy process around vaccine and
pandemic content.

He demanded to be added to an internal email thread used by
moderators that sent out an automated message when a tweet was removed
for violating the COVID misinformation policy, and often forwarded them
to Gadde, second-guessing the moderators’ decisions. Twitter’s CEO later
objected to labels applied to the account of Alex Berenson, a former New
York Times reporter who became a vocal opponent of the vaccines. Dorsey
also questioned the removal of tweets that discussed vaccination, bickering
over whether they truly violated Twitter’s policy against spreading
misinformation. Dorsey’s emails, often with few words, landed in Gadde’s
inbox on a weekly basis, a steady source of paper cuts to her relationship
with her boss.

She and others couldn’t understand why he had suddenly involved
himself. Still, Gadde tried not to make decisions about COVID policy
without speaking to Dorsey. “I need to talk to Jack about this, and we’ll
hear from him when we hear from him,” she would tell her team. Plans
about how to handle incendiary tweets about the virus often stagnated.

Some employees speculated that Dorsey was skeptical of the vaccines.

Over time, Dorsey’s closest staffers would assume he was unvaccinated,
although because Twitter’s offices remained closed and Dorsey did not
come in, they never knew for sure.

>>> IT WAS AROUND NOON on January 6, 2021, in the middle of the South
Pacific, when Dorsey got the call from Gadde, recommending he put the
president of the United States in time-out. He was on Tetiaroa, a pristine
atoll in French Polynesia, in a luxury resort called the Brando. It was from
here, on volcanic-formed land, shielded from the wild open ocean by a
natural fortification of living coral, that Dorsey had decided to run his two
businesses as most of the world remained closed during the pandemic.

Most employees had no idea where Dorsey was and some executives
tried to keep his whereabouts secret. It would be horrible for morale if
workers—many of whom were cooped up working from their beds or
couches—knew their leader was on an island with thirty-three private villas,
kayak tours, and a vast spa with personalized massage treatments. A few
months earlier, Kim Kardashian had spent $1 million to rent the whole
resort for her fortieth birthday, drawing widespread condemnation for
partying in the pandemic.

Working from the Brando, three hours behind San Francisco
headquarters, Twitter’s chief executive dialed into a Twitter leadership
meeting to go over the company’s goals for the year. It was at that moment
that executives started to get alerts about a large group of Trump supporters
amassing in Washington, DC. They had been drawn there by the president
with the promise of an epic rally. Trump had tweeted repeatedly that his
vice president, Mike Pence, could overturn the outcome of the election.

Dorsey had spent more than four years resisting the idea of booting
Trump off Twitter, digging into his position the more he was criticized for
it. Twitter’s leaders decided to finish the goals meeting, though some kept
one eye on their platform and developing news as Trump’s supporters made
their way to the U.S. Capitol.

To Twitter’s trust and safety employees, the potential for violence was
glaring. Harvey and Roth had warned for months that Trump would use his
account to stir up trouble and argued for his removal from the platform. A
few weeks after the election in November, Roth had drafted a document he
titled “Post-Election Protests and Calls for Violence” that outlined the kind
of activity Twitter might see in the wake of Trump’s loss, and how the
company should respond.

If there were tweets calling for protests based on misinformation—that
the election had been rigged or ballots had been altered—those tweets
would be labeled. Calls for violence from extremist groups would be
removed. Roth also wrote code that scanned Twitter for the coded phrases
Trump had used to rile up supporters, like “locked and loaded.” Tweets that
contained the phrase would be triaged by the company’s content moderation
team within thirty minutes, a rapid response in case they contained specific
election-related threats.

As the riot unfolded, however, Roth found there was little he could do.

He kept the television in his home office on mute, aghast as the mob
flooded through the Capitol, and tried to focus on Twitter. But few in the
crowd were tweeting about their exploits in real time. Most of the posts
about the riot were coming instead from journalists, news outlets, or
terrified online observers.

Roth also watched @RealDonaldTrump. After giving a speech near the
White House to his supporters, the president retreated to his residence to
egg them on from there as they proceeded to the Capitol. “Mike Pence
didn’t have the courage to do what should have been done,” he tweeted,
raging that his second-in-command had not stopped the certification of the
vote and that the election was being stolen from him. His “sacred landslide
election victory” had been “unceremoniously & viciously stripped away,”
he wrote.

Roth and his manager, Harvey, agreed that it was time to suspend
Trump. He was clearly undeterred by the hundreds of warning labels that
had been added to his tweets. His post about Pence posed a threat to the
vice president’s safety and warranted a permanent ban, Roth argued. He and
Harvey drafted an extensive letter outlining their rationale and presented it
to Gadde in a video call.

But the idea of banning a sitting president was too much for Gadde, and
she worried Dorsey wouldn’t approve even if she went along with the
suggestion. For regular users, there was always an escalatory process before
they got banned. They would get warnings, and then be blocked from
tweeting for a “cooling off” period. If they continued to break the rules after
that, they were finally suspended. “We haven’t done that yet,” Gadde
argued during the call. “We haven’t timed him out yet.”
After Gadde signed off, Roth and Harvey sat in silence for a moment,
just staring at each other. There was nothing to say.

Roth and Harvey rewrote the recommendation for Gadde, asking for
Trump to get a temporary time-out instead. “Any further policy violations
will result in suspension,” Roth wrote. He stared at the words on his screen,
then went back and bolded, italicized, and underlined them to hammer
home his point:
“Any further policy violations will result in suspension.”
As Trump’s supporters ransacked the Capitol, he released a video on
Twitter, repeating his claims that he had been cheated out of the presidency.

Each of his tweets seemed to manifest more violence in the real world. As
long as he had his favorite megaphone, there wasn’t an end in sight. The
safety executives expanded their document to include Trump’s video.

Gadde took the document to Twitter’s most senior executives, who
threw their support behind it. Beykpour took notice of Roth’s emphatic text.

“Does this mean we would be suspending him for anything else?”
Beykpour asked. “Good.”
“This is the right thing to do,” Matt Derella, the company’s chief
customer officer, commented at the top of the document. Roth watched as
the executives’ comments appeared in the margins—but he didn’t see
anything from Dorsey.

From his villa, Dorsey watched the events unfold on Twitter and joined
various emergency calls that sought to deal with the madness. Gadde called
him to tell him the news. The steady refrain of false claims—and the
violence that stemmed from them—were finally enough. On the phone,
Gadde told Dorsey that she had decided to lock Trump’s account for twelve
hours. From his retreat halfway around the world, Dorsey assented.

Dorsey sent a company-wide email to his employees, saying it was
important for Twitter to follow its own rules and allow any user, even
Trump, to return after a temporary suspension.

Roth felt shell-shocked and confided in Gadde. “I feel like I have blood
on my hands,” he told her.

“I think you’re taking too much of this on yourself,” Gadde responded.

“It’s not just your decisions, it’s not blood on your hands. We are making
these decisions together.”
Employees were livid. Their leaders had not done enough. Many had
long believed that Trump had no place on the platform. They watched as
their peer companies, like Facebook, unilaterally banned the former
president. Meanwhile, they were giving the president back his favorite
megaphone after a night’s sleep.

More than three hundred employees signed a letter directed to Dorsey
and other company leaders. “Despite our efforts to serve the public
conversation, as Trump’s megaphone, we helped fuel the deadly events of
January 6th,” read the letter, which was delivered to executives on the
morning of January 8. “We must learn from our mistakes in order to avoid
causing future harm. We play an unprecedented role in civil society and the
world’s eyes are upon us. Our decisions this week will cement our place in
history, for better or worse.”
The letter called for Trump to be immediately suspended. But some
senior engineers at the company went even further. They began discussing
what actions they would take if Dorsey refused, and decided they would
stop working by the end of January if Trump remained on the platform—
either holding a strike or resigning en masse.

Trump returned from his twelve-hour time-out unrepentant. He declared
he would not attend Biden’s inauguration. In another tweet on January 8, he
referred to his supporters as “great American Patriots” whose voices would
be heard long into the future. “They will not be disrespected or treated
unfairly in any way, shape or form!!!” he wrote.

Harvey believed the tweets were an invitation for violence at the
inauguration. Gadde and Edgett were resistant—the messages were
somewhat coded, and could be interpreted as benign by some readers.

Several lawyers at the company leaned on Edgett to change his mind, while
Harvey showed Gadde the responses to Trump’s tweets. His supporters
were interpreting it as she feared—an incitement to attack.

That afternoon, Harvey and Roth sat down again to write a new
recommendation: Trump had to go. As they drafted it, they stayed on the
phone and argued their position with Gadde, who eventually caved. As they
continued to work, Gadde signed off to call Dorsey and Twitter’s board.

The board agreed with Gadde’s recommendation. But Dorsey had one
demand—if Trump was going to be removed, Twitter had to publish its
reasoning publicly for the world to see.

Suddenly, the document that Harvey and Roth were throwing together
had to serve as the official explanation for the historic decision to silence
America’s leader, cutting him off from his 88 million followers.

They quickly cleaned up the document for publication. World leaders
“are not above our rules entirely and cannot use Twitter to incite violence,”
the two policy executives wrote. Trump’s new tweets “are likely to inspire
others to replicate the violent acts that took place on January 6, 2021, and
there are multiple indicators that they are being received and understood as
encouragement to do so.”
Harvey had no time to contemplate the decision. She was already
worried about the consequences for Twitter itself. Removing an account
like Trump’s, which occupied a large chunk of Twitter’s social graph—the
web of following and follower connections between users—could easily
crash the entire service. Freezing the account was only part of the process.

It also had to be removed from the social graph—other users’ follower and
following lists—and from the thousands of block lists of people who had
gotten fed up with seeing Trump in their feeds. She called several engineers
who worked on the social graph and warned them that Trump was about to
go, and that he might take the entire site with him.

Having faced the backlash of Trump supporters once before, Roth was
worried about safety. He moved the document he and Harvey had written to
a burner account and took out the names of all the other employees who had
worked on the draft. If it were leaked, the employees who had made the
decision to ban Trump would be anonymous.

Then, just after 3:00 p.m., it was time.

On the internal dashboard that governed all Twitter accounts, there was
a big red button: “PERM-SUSPEND.” If clicked, it would permanently
terminate a user’s account, erasing their social graph. Harvey decided she
would be the one to click it.

Roth stood up from his desk and walked upstairs to his living room,
where his husband sat watching the news. “Something is about to happen,”
Roth said. Moments later, the news broke: @RealDonaldTrump was gone.

The days of collective deliberation didn’t stop Dorsey from once again
second-guessing Gadde and her team in public. Dorsey painted the Trump
decision as one he wasn’t responsible for and didn’t wholeheartedly defend.

“I believe this was the right decision for Twitter. We faced an extraordinary
and untenable circumstance, forcing us to focus all of our actions on public
safety,” he tweeted on January 13. “That said, having to ban an account has
real and significant ramifications. While there are clear and obvious
exceptions, I feel a ban is a failure of ours ultimately to promote healthy
conversation.”
In the aftermath of the Trump ban, Harvey grappled with anxiety. She
had seen the underbelly of the internet, but the Capitol riot weighed on her
more heavily as some commentators rushed to trivialize the event. She
believed a political game was being played with people’s lives, one that
glossed over a societal failure. She scheduled a leave of absence from
Twitter for that fall. In June, when the Nigerian president Muhammadu
Buhari tweeted a threat to regional separatists, invoking the Nigerian Civil
War and promising to treat his opponents “in the language they
understand,” Harvey acted quickly, temporarily suspending Buhari’s
account and requiring him to delete the call for violence.

When Gadde realized what Harvey had done, she was frustrated that she
hadn’t been consulted. The Nigerian government responded by banning
Twitter in the country, an embargo that would take months to resolve and
cause tension between Gadde and Harvey. Trump cheered the decision in a
statement, saying, “Congratulations to the country of Nigeria, who just
banned Twitter because they banned their President.” In October, just one
day shy of her thirteenth anniversary working at Twitter, Harvey resigned.

To some close to him, the Trump ban also broke Dorsey. It was the red
line he had spent nearly half a decade promising not to cross. Twitter wasn’t
an idyllic, free, and open town square. “It was like he was the kid who built
the robot, which then destroyed the world,” said one former Twitter
executive.

O
7 > Resource Plan
n February 25, 2021, Twitter staged a flashy event called Analyst Day
to introduce investors to the new corporate goals it had outlined with
Cohn—doubling its annual revenue to $7.5 billion by the end of 2023 and
attracting 315 million daily active users by the same deadline.

Kayvon Beykpour, Twitter’s consumer product lead, and Bruce Falck,
who led the product team dedicated to advertising, were largely responsible
for the projections and were confident in their ability to hit them in about
three years. Beykpour would attract millions of new users with innovative
features, and Falck would drive up revenue with increasingly precise ad
targeting.

But Falck’s figures seemed especially aspirational to other executives.

He had claimed he would be able to get Twitter to $10 billion in revenue by
the deadline. Ned Segal, a dark-haired and dimpled former Goldman Sachs
banker who was the company’s chief financial officer, crunched the
numbers and scaled back Falck’s figure before allowing Dorsey to present it
to investors, warning the board that it was unreasonable.

Even the scaled-back figures seemed outlandish to some executives—
the equivalent of a longtime NBA benchwarmer saying he would average
thirty points a game and become an All-Star in three years. They meant the
company would need to increase its 2020 revenue of $3.7 billion and
dramatically improve its user figures, which stood at 192 million daily
active accounts.

The projections made leaders across the company incredibly
uncomfortable. “Some of us looked at each other knowing there was no
way we’d hit those targets,” one said.

Still, Dorsey trusted Falck and Beykpour to get the job done. To help
them, Dorsey had asked the board to support what he referred to as the
“Resource Plan,” which amounted to a spending spree. Like most tech
companies, Twitter had come through the height of the pandemic less
bruised than its leaders had anticipated. There had been huge bumps in
engagement as people glued themselves to their phones during lockdowns.

Dorsey wanted to use the extra cash on Twitter’s balance sheet to hire his
way out from under Elliott’s scrutiny.

Dorsey’s plan was to hire and acquire as many people as possible. The
new hires—and several key start-ups that Twitter would snap up—would
build new products and bring new innovations to Twitter, which in turn
would bring new users. And as the new users flocked in, so would the
advertisers. That would all lead to a massive increase in revenue, Dorsey
believed. The board rubber-stamped Dorsey’s plan, giving him freedom to
spend as he desired.

At Analyst Day, Dorsey wore a long, graying beard and a slicked-back
ponytail of hair that had grown long during the pandemic. He was
surprisingly candid about Twitter’s failings.

“We’re slow, we’re not innovative, and we’re not trusted,” Dorsey said,
assuring Wall Street that all that was about to change. It was a victory lap
for Cohn, who had successfully pressured Dorsey to focus on revenue.

Cohn’s other obsession hadn’t faded—he still believed that Dorsey was
being pulled in too many directions to diligently lead Twitter and that he
needed to step down. But they were in a stalemate. Dorsey refused to leave
while Cohn was on the board, and Cohn didn’t want to relinquish control
until he was sure that Dorsey would go.

While the governance committee agreed Dorsey could remain Twitter’s
CEO, Cohn pressed the board to come up with a succession plan, and they
put together a list of executives who would be able to fill Dorsey’s shoes
when the time came. The governance committee saw potential in Agrawal,
a brilliant engineer and Twitter’s chief technology officer, who had an
intensity that Dorsey lacked.

Although he tended not to draw attention to himself, Agrawal had
wisely cultivated his relationships with key board members. He rarely
missed a board meeting and spent time carefully walking the directors
through the logistics of Twitter’s infrastructure. Crucially for Cohn,
Agrawal also had the trust of Dorsey and many key technologists at the
company. He was a successor everyone would be able to stomach.

Dorsey grew distant as Cohn’s meddling continued. During one
company-wide meeting, he tried calling in, but his internet failed. In
another, he dialed in from a Costa Rican getaway and gave a lecture on the
power of Bitcoin, his iPad camera pointing upward at him at an unflattering
angle. Employees shifted uncomfortably in their seats. We don’t really do
anything with Bitcoin here, some thought. After the meeting, some placed
bets on when Dorsey would be on his way out of the company.

>>> BY THE END OF MARCH 2021, Dorsey was fed up with Cohn. A month
earlier, he had stepped in front of a camera and committed to the goals that
Cohn demanded. It was time for Cohn to go, Dorsey told his board. The
board began negotiating for Cohn to exit its ranks. It was a delicate
conversation—Cohn and Dorsey each wanted to emerge looking like they
had bested the other.

Cohn could depart on a high note, the board suggested. Twitter’s stock
was performing beyond anyone’s wildest expectations—its price was over
$70, a whopping 95 percent higher than when Cohn had joined the board a
year earlier. And the succession plans were in place for when Dorsey was
ready to exit. On March 31, Cohn agreed to leave the Twitter board once the
company found a director to replace him, and by June, a substitute had been
identified.

Twitter replaced Cohn on June 9 with Mimi Alemayehou, a Mastercard
executive who focused on development and finance in Africa. In a terse
statement, Dorsey briefly acknowledged Cohn’s role in redirecting the
company’s goals. “We continue to build upon our strengths and are proud of
our progress. We are appreciative of Jesse’s input and support during an
important year for us,” Dorsey said.

Having rid the company of Elliott, Dorsey kept up his global travels as
Twitter’s offices remained shuttered. In August, he and his good friend, the
music producer Rick Rubin, traveled to Boca Chica Village, a small Texas
town on the Gulf, to marvel at Starbase, SpaceX’s rocket launch facility.

Dorsey snapped a photo of a massive stainless steel test rocket to further
cement his bromance with his host. “Grateful for @elonmusk & @SpaceX
♥,” he tweeted. Behind the scenes, Musk and Dorsey maintained contact.

The SpaceX CEO sometimes messaged Twitter’s leader about his
frustrations with the platform, notably about an account called @ElonJet,
which tracked the whereabouts of his private plane using public flight data.

Musk pressured Dorsey to ban the account, though Gadde and her team
determined that the account did not violate any of Twitter’s rules.

Travel distractions and frustrations with Elliott aside, Dorsey still cared
about Twitter. That September, Esther Crawford, a director of product
management who had come to the company after it acquired her start-up,
met Twitter’s leader for the first time. She had prepared to explain her
vision for allowing content creators to make money on the platform, a
potential new stream of revenue for Twitter, which had been looking to
expand its business from its dependence on advertising. If creators chose to
accept cryptocurrency payments, her strategy might also be a way for
Dorsey to bring Bitcoin into Twitter.

Staring piercingly from the other side of the video call, Dorsey was
more philosopher king than chief executive.

“We don’t want to turn Twitter into a casino,” he said. To Crawford,
Dorsey felt like a protective parent guarding his creation. Then he veered
into a critique of capitalism.

“The corporation is bigger than the individual and the corporation just
wants to make money at all costs,” Dorsey continued. “Even if you have
good intentions, the power of the corporation will corrupt. All of us could
be corrupted. I could be corrupted.”
While Dorsey had made a fortune worth billions of dollars off Twitter,
he was anxious that his product, a communications platform meant to
connect people, could survive and grow only because it was a business.

Perhaps this was Twitter’s original sin, attempting to make money in the
first place. He continued to discuss with Crawford the ethics of
implementing creator monetization.

“There are mothers in Africa who will literally spend money on Twitter
rather than give it to their children,” he said.

The feature, a subscription service for Twitter creators to allow
subscribers to access premium content, launched a few weeks later. But
@Jack would not be around long to witness its progress.

O
8 > Parag
n the morning of Thanksgiving in 2021, one of Twitter’s board
members posted an odd tweet.

Martha Lane Fox, a British businesswoman who had sat on Twitter’s
board since 2016, wished a happy holiday “to all the people im lucky
enough to work with stateside.”
A dot-com-era entrepreneur, philanthropist, and baroness member of the
House of Lords, Lane Fox added a bit of international flavor to Twitter’s
collection of directors. While she didn’t celebrate the holiday, she rattled off
a list of Americans she was thankful to work with at Twitter: Leslie
Berland; Sean Edgett; Vijaya Gadde; Twitter’s leaders for human resources,
Jen Christie and Dalana Brand; and Ned Segal.

One name was conspicuously absent: Jack Dorsey.

For employees who kept tabs on the board, it was a potent signal that
something might be amiss with their chief executive. Some of them
wondered: What has Jack done now?
Four days later, on November 29, Dorsey was gone from Twitter’s top
job. The news leaked to the press before Dorsey had the chance to announce
it internally, and Twitter employees woke up to find news articles on
Dorsey’s exit plastered across their timelines. They frantically swarmed into
their workplace chat app, Slack, and into their group chats, searching for
any scrap of confirmation.

But Lane Fox, a few other board members who had been privy to the
succession talks, and a handful of Twitter executives in whom Dorsey
confided had been bracing themselves. Earlier that month, Dorsey had
dialed in to the board’s quarterly meeting and somberly announced that he
planned to step down as chief executive. Several members of the board,
who had not been aware of the governance committee’s plans, were
shocked at the sudden proclamation.

As the news sank in, it began to make more sense. Dorsey had been
increasingly disillusioned. When he bothered to come to meetings, he
seemed sullen and taciturn. He had one final demand for the board: His
successor would be Parag Agrawal.

At first, a few board members balked. They knew Agrawal as a thirtyseven-year-old soft-spoken engineer who toiled in the background to rehab
the company’s decaying infrastructure while its product, finance, and policy
leaders made headlines. Sure, he had been inked in Twitter’s succession
plan as the person to temporarily take the reins should Dorsey unexpectedly
go out of commission—but some of them thought that Agrawal needed
more development before he could become the boss. Most major companies
did contingency planning and picked replacements for key leaders. But it
was one thing to imagine an inexperienced leader taking over for an interim
period, and another to hand him the job permanently. Some thought a
formal search should be conducted to seek out Dorsey’s replacement.

But Dorsey was adamant and left the board little time to consider any
alternatives. By departing immediately, he was forcing the board’s hand.

They could go with Agrawal or be left with no permanent CEO, making it
seem as if the directors were unprepared. The direction of the company and
its stock price would be uncertain.

The board, which had backed Dorsey over and over again, decided to
comply, partially, with his demands. There would be no recruiting firm
hired, no formal search conducted, no candidates interviewed. Instead,
members of the board could toss out names of executives they thought were
capable of the job, and the others would consider them. David Rosenblatt, a
long-tenured board member who had run the ad platform DoubleClick
before it sold to Google in 2008 for $3.1 billion, had overseen Dorsey’s
return to Twitter in 2015. He suggested interviewing leaders from other
social media companies. Others suggested offering the top job to Agrawal
on an interim basis while they searched for a permanent leader.

Their backs against the wall, the board members agreed to elevate
Agrawal. An offer letter was hastily drawn up and presented to the
introverted technologist on November 29, the Monday after Thanksgiving.

“The Board believes that you will add tremendous value as the Company’s
CEO,” Bret Taylor, Twitter’s chairman, wrote in the letter. It was mainly
boilerplate language, but it outlined his compensation package, which,
typical for a top Silicon Valley job, was a pretty penny.

He would earn a million-dollar salary and be granted $12.5 million in
stock that he would earn out over time. He would also be protected in the
event he was suddenly fired; in that case, his stock would be paid out on an
accelerated schedule and he would receive severance payments. Taylor also
used the letter to push back on some of Agrawal’s doubters.

“The Board wishes to reiterate our excitement at your accepting this
new leadership role,” Taylor wrote.

After rumors of his departure had swirled online since the early hours of
November 29, and on the home pages of every major American news site,
Dorsey finally addressed them. “Not sure if anyone has heard, but I
resigned from Twitter,” he tweeted sarcastically just before 8:00 a.m. He
also shared the victory lap email he had sent to employees moments earlier,
announcing his departure and Agrawal’s appointment. The subject line was:
“Fly.”
“Parag started here as an engineer who cared deeply about our work and
now he’s our CEO (I also had a similar path…he did it better!),” Dorsey
wrote. Like Taylor, Dorsey made sure to seed the narrative that Agrawal had
the board’s unwavering backing.

“The board ran a rigorous process considering all options and
unanimously appointed Parag,” Dorsey told employees. “He’s been my
choice for some time given how deeply he understands the company and its
needs. Parag has been behind every critical decision that helped turn this
company around. He’s curious, probing, rational, creative, demanding, selfaware and humble.”
His praise for Agrawal seemed sincere to those who knew both men
well, though Dorsey’s description of the board’s “rigorous process” wasn’t
accurate. It had been rushed, precisely because he wanted it to be.

Employees reeled. Dorsey’s departure, announced just after the holiday,
seemed abrupt and ill-timed. Was another activist investor like Elliott
creeping into the stock, forcing Dorsey out before he was ready to go?
Much of Twitter’s rank and file didn’t know how absent Dorsey had
become over the past year.

Twitter’s workforce was even more surprised to see Agrawal rise to the
top job. He wasn’t a visible leader within the company, and many workers,
had they known Dorsey was planning his exit, would have placed their bets
on Beykpour, Segal, or Gadde. Beykpour had a handle on the product,
Gadde had been Dorsey’s right-hand woman for years and taken on the
company’s toughest political issues, and Segal seemed well equipped to run
the business after keeping it mostly in the black during the tumult of the
pandemic.

Most employees hardly knew Agrawal—if they knew him at all. And
while Dorsey credited him with turning Twitter around, his fingerprints
weren’t visible to many within the company.

Agrawal was eager to change that. In mid-November, soon after he had
been offered the top job at Twitter but before the announcement, he called a
trusted adviser and told them Dorsey would soon be stepping down.

Agrawal would become Twitter’s chief executive. And he wanted to discuss
who to fire first.

Agrawal wanted to restructure and streamline the company, getting rid
of several leaders in the process. Some of those leaders were his closest
friends and Twitter’s longest-serving employees, but Agrawal wasn’t
sentimental. He believed he needed to do what was best for Twitter, and that
meant radical change to invigorate the company.

“I need you to help me,” Agrawal told his friend. He wanted advice, and
he liked to reason through difficult decisions by having a trusted deputy
argue each of the pros and cons. Agrawal liked to puzzle through the
counterarguments to his own opinions, and wanted to debate getting rid of
allies as well as enemies. In his mind, no one person—not even himself—
was more important than Twitter.

He also needed to figure out what to do with his own small team.

Despite being the company’s CTO, Agrawal had less than forty people
reporting to him. It was an unusual setup that left him with little
management responsibility and generated accusations from detractors that
he sat in an ivory tower, disconnected from the company’s actual
employees. In a few days, Agrawal, who had always avoided managing
people, would be responsible for more than 7,000 workers. The
management of his small team of employees would need to be taken over
by someone.

As he shifted people around, he began thinking of another bold idea:
Why not restructure the entire company? Rebuilding Twitter’s corporate
leadership could dissolve the blockages that had plagued Dorsey’s second
tenure as its leader and allow the company to move faster. Twitter suffered
from having three men responsible for various bits of its product—there
was Beykpour, who oversaw the side of the platform that its users saw;
Falck, who led products for advertisers; and Agrawal himself, who oversaw
its infrastructure. All of them funneled into Dorsey, vying for his attention
and trying to get him to back their decisions even as he drifted further away
from Twitter. The engineering team, led by longtime tweep Mike Montano,
and Twitter’s design team, run by a former Facebook executive named
Dantley Davis, drifted in between, each also reporting to Dorsey but
dispatched to work on various bits of the product. The convoluted structure
tangled the chain of command. Agrawal considered it a five-headed
monster.

Agrawal didn’t need to stroke egos by handing out C-suite titles, and he
didn’t want to waste time sorting out who was making bad choices. He
wanted a few effective lieutenants, and clear accountability for screw-ups.

He suggested thinning out Twitter’s top ranks to just three executives,
including himself.

The person on the other end of the phone call was overwhelmed. The
timelines Agrawal proposed for firing executives and revamping the
company were aggressive. Agrawal had a lot he wanted to do, and he was
eager to act.

>>> AGRAWAL HAD BEEN working toward the role for more than a decade. He
was raised in Mumbai by an academic mother, who had taught economics,
and a science-minded father, who worked for the country’s Department of
Atomic Energy. At first, he followed in his father’s footsteps, studying at
the Atomic Energy Junior College in Mumbai, but soon gravitated to
computer science. He graduated at the top of his class at the Indian Institute
of Technology Bombay, and immigrated to the United States in 2005 to
enroll in a PhD program at Stanford University. India’s technology
institutes were revered in Silicon Valley for churning out exceptional
engineers, and Agrawal, a strikingly confident and relaxed student, enjoyed
a warm welcome at Stanford. He considered several professors before
joining a research team focused on data management, led by Jennifer
Widom.

In the third year of Agrawal’s studies, Widom took a sabbatical to
travel. She was gone for the whole year, isolated from her students by
distance and unreliable internet in some of the remote locales she visited.

Without her supervision, some of the students struggled. But not Agrawal,
who “blossomed in his independence and capabilities,” Widom recalled.

Before he could finish his dissertation, Agrawal got an intriguing offer
to head north to San Francisco for a job at Twitter, a nascent social media
company that had been founded a year after he arrived in America. It wasn’t
the kind of tech giant that typically snapped up Stanford graduates, many of
whom were lured by the more lucrative salaries offered by Google or
Facebook, but it did give Agrawal the kind of database work that occupied
his attention at school.

“Oh don’t worry, I’m going to finish my thesis,” he promised Widom.

Then, in October 2011, he vanished into his work at Twitter. It took him
another year to complete the dissertation, and he ended up returning to
Stanford for a few months to focus on the work. When Widom signed off in
the summer of 2012, Agrawal celebrated with a rare tweet: “Finally,” he
wrote, sharing a photo of the finished, signed dissertation.

Agrawal rarely participated in the combative, goofy, and high-velocity
discourse on Twitter. If he tweeted at all, it was usually to reshare travel
photos from his Instagram or snippets about his relationship with Vineeta, a
fellow Stanford student whom he would eventually marry, or to celebrate
Twitter milestones, like a 2013 blackout that wiped out power during the
Super Bowl and sent hordes of users rushing to the site to chatter about the
outage. He also occasionally fanboyed over Elon Musk, retweeting his
posts about rocket launches or his revelations of new Tesla models. In
September 2015, he shared a photo from the launch event for the Model X,
with Tesla’s chief executive standing front and center as he presented the
new white electric SUV. To a certain subset of Silicon Valley engineers who
were Agrawal’s peers, Musk represented the ideal leader: a visionary
technocrat guided by science and engineering who listened to his own
instincts above all else.

In 2018, Twitter gathered its entire workforce together in San
Francisco’s Moscone Center for its first-ever OneTeam. Dorsey took the
stage to wild applause from his employees. He was deep in his guru phase
and spoke about drinking his salt juice for maximum hydration. Then he
told his employees to check under their seats.

They reached under their chairs to find gift bags filled with bottled
water, a packet of lemon juice, and a little baggie of salt. Agrawal dumped
all the lemon juice and salt into his water bottle, gulping the concoction
before Dorsey could finish walking through the recipe. “Just a pinch of
salt,” Dorsey advised.

>>> DORSEY VIEWED AGRAWAL as a confidant, someone with a holistic vision
for Twitter who was also fluent in its code. The two sometimes met on
weekends, with Agrawal finding ways to draw the taciturn Dorsey out of his
shell and into debates about the future of the platform. Dorsey seemed to
appreciate Agrawal’s bluntness—he wasn’t afraid to disagree with Twitter’s
founding father and didn’t seem cowed by his celebrity status like other
employees, who would stop the chief executive in the office to ask for
selfies. While other executives tiptoed around him, Dorsey could count on
Agrawal for an honest take.

But Agrawal was blunt with his teammates, too, and his hard-charging
nature sometimes clashed with other engineers who worked alongside him.

He could be intractable, and when his team disagreed with him, he would
sometimes keep pushing what he wanted anyway. Before he became CTO,
he began arguing that the company had to stop running its own servers and
move everything into a cloud service like Google Cloud or Amazon Web
Services.

Google and Amazon offered flexibility, allowing companies to expand
quickly without having to buy and build more server space, giving start-ups
and Fortune 500 corporations alike the ability to be more agile and not
worry about the upkeep of infrastructure. That was the world Agrawal
wanted to operate in. At Twitter, no one could get servers fast enough to
launch their projects, and he was annoyed by the slow pace.

There was just one problem with his plan: cost. Twitter’s in-house way
of piecing together its infrastructure in its own data centers came at a
fraction of the cost the company would be charged by Google or Amazon.

Still, Agrawal wouldn’t drop it. Years later, when he became Twitter’s chief
technology officer, Agrawal finally executed his plan, inking multimilliondollar deals with Google and Amazon, even while Twitter still ran its own
data centers. Agrawal had a knack for turning Dorsey’s idealism into
concrete plans. In 2019, Dorsey tweeted he would ban political advertising,
catching his policy specialists by surprise. He asked Harvey to craft a new
rule based on his tweets but said Agrawal would have the final say—Dorsey
was leaving for a silent retreat.

Dorsey was fascinated by Bitcoin and wanted to find ways to
incorporate the blockchain, the public ledger technology upon which the
cryptocurrency was built, into the social media service. Both agreed Twitter
had to stop moderating content by hand, picking and choosing which tweets
violated its bespoke rules. Eventually, most tweets would need to remain
live on the platform, with algorithms choosing which should be circulated
widely and which should be choked off from the company’s powerful
distribution systems.

They also wanted Twitter to be more transparent, so its users would
understand its inner workings. In meetings with other engineers who
believed in the power of decentralization, or the idea that technology
shouldn’t be controlled by one person or company, they concocted plans to
build a new version of social networking with publicly available code.

Instead of hiding away its proprietary secrets, Twitter would tell everyone
how it functioned. The new Twitter would rely on a protocol, which was a
way of saying that it would be a web service that anyone could build on,
similar to the one that served as the backbone of all email services, allowing
a Google mail account to connect with a Yahoo one.

It was an audacious plan. If Dorsey and Agrawal succeeded, they could
end the era of empires in social media. There would be no more walled
gardens lorded over by Mark Zuckerberg or others who owned pieces of
people’s online identities. Instead, users could easily flit from Twitter to
Instagram to TikTok, posting to each platform as they saw fit with a single
identity. The plan could someday rid Twitter of its persistent annoyances—
shrill questions from members of Congress about why this tweet or that one
was allowed, advertisers and Wall Street bankers pressuring the company
about revenue. Twitter’s guts would match its mission to be a public utility
for conversation.

They called the project Bluesky. The name was intended as a symbol of
freedom for Twitter’s bird logo, referencing the open firmament where the
bird would someday fly.

“We’re facing entirely new challenges centralized solutions are
struggling to meet. For instance, centralized enforcement of global policy to
address abuse and misleading information is unlikely to scale over the longterm without placing far too much burden on people,” Dorsey tweeted in
December 2019, announcing the project. “The value of social media is
shifting away from content hosting and removal, and towards
recommendation algorithms directing one’s attention.”
O
9 > Bluesky
n January 21, 2020, Agrawal ventured into the fog of San Francisco’s
Richmond district. He’d recently returned to the city after Twitter’s
OneTeam festivities in Houston and was wearing only a thin gray
sweatshirt, not enough for the wind and chill. He braced himself against the
cold as he dashed up the marble steps of the Internet Archive, a digital
library founded in 1996, which occupied a former Christian Science church
bolstered by commanding white columns, to attend a series of talks on the
future of decentralized social media.

Agrawal found a seat in the wooden pews. In the church of online
knowledge, Agrawal was much more at home than at the glitzy parties of
OneTeam.

He watched as Jay Graber, a slight developer dressed cozily in a
pullover and black tights, took the stage and rattled quickly through a slide
presentation on decentralized social media. She had been researching the
ecosystem for several years and saw potential in decentralized technology,
but also flaws—none of the current offerings could manage to meet the
basic expectations of average social media users, she noted.

At the end of the evening, the host called Agrawal to the mic. Behind
his wood-framed glasses, Agrawal appeared flustered. Standing at six foot
two, he seemed to shrink into himself, tensing his shoulders like he was a
turtle peeking out of its shell. Twitter wasn’t properly addressing
misinformation and harassment, he said, and the company’s job was
moving from simply hosting content to directing attention. “What we see is,
controversy and outrage rather than healthy conversation gets more
attention,” Agrawal admitted.

He hoped that starting over with Bluesky could solve Twitter’s
problems. “Decentralization is not an end, it’s a means to an end,” he said.

His primary job was to find people to staff the team and to appoint a muchneeded leader, Agrawal added.

In the crowd, Graber listened closely. Bluesky was everything she
wanted to build—an elegant decentralized platform that could introduce
radical new technology to everyday users without asking them to learn
clunky blockchain systems or compromise on the ease of mainstream
services like Instagram and Twitter. After the talks ended, she approached
Agrawal.

Agrawal appeared more relaxed in the small discussion than he had
been onstage—he seemed entirely different, less like an engineer with his
head lost in the code and instead warmer and more personal.

As they chatted, Agrawal and Graber felt each other out. She wanted to
understand what his motivations were for building Bluesky, while he was
curious about her approach to decentralized tech. Was she, like him, a nerd?
Was she a crypto acolyte, or a protocol fanatic?
“No one has an inherent right to reach millions,” Agrawal told Graber.

He and Dorsey had started using the catchphrase “freedom of speech, not
freedom of reach” to describe their plans for Bluesky, he explained. They
envisioned it as a place where anyone could say anything—but not
everyone would be able to tap into the viral potential of Twitter’s
recommendation algorithm.

Graber liked what she heard. Agrawal invited her to join a chat room
dedicated to the project. It was filled with a dozen or so other developers
who had heard Dorsey’s call to action and wanted to contribute to Bluesky.

The group began to hold conference calls every few weeks to hash out what
their future might look like. Agrawal sometimes joined the calls, and he
hung out in the chat room to size them all up, looking for the right person to
lead the group. Dorsey joined the chat, too, but was quieter.

It became clear to Agrawal that Graber was the best choice. He invited
her to come visit Twitter’s headquarters. It seemed as if momentum was
building for her to lead Bluesky. But then twin hammers dropped. Elliott
Management charged into Twitter’s stock, and COVID hit. The chaos threw
Bluesky’s very existence into question. Agrawal had championed the
project, but without Dorsey to guarantee funding and make it a priority,
Graber feared the entire vision could collapse. And as the pandemic set in,
Agrawal and other Twitter employees were increasingly distracted,
navigating remote work and battling wildfires of misinformation that flared
incessantly across the platform.

Graber became certain: Bluesky would need to be fully independent of
Twitter if it was going to succeed. She couldn’t rely on a controversial and
easily toppled CEO for money and protection. She also didn’t want to lean
on Twitter’s engineering teams to pick up her slack. Bluesky would need its
own money and its own engineers. Also, while it could take feedback from
Twitter, it would need the authority to break away from its parent company
at any time. Rumors swirled among Twitter employees and Bluesky
contributors that the project would be killed before it even began, slashed in
another ruthless maneuver by Elliott. Even after Dorsey was rescued by
Silver Lake, Graber wasn’t confident he could protect Bluesky forever.

Dorsey approved of Bluesky being formed as a fully independent
company in late 2021. All he wanted was a form of social media that could
evade capture or control altogether, be it by advertisers, Wall Street raiders,
politicians, or shareholders. A month after Graber’s lawyers signed off on
the Bluesky paperwork, Dorsey handed Twitter over to Agrawal.

>>> IN HIS FIRST message as CEO to employees on the morning of
November 29, 2021, Agrawal thanked Dorsey, calling him a mentor, and
stressed the need for performance above all else. Then he turned his
attention to the more than 7,000 workers he now led.

“I joined this company 10 years ago when there were fewer than 1,000
employees,” he wrote. “While it was a decade ago, those days feel like
yesterday to me. I’ve walked in your shoes, I’ve seen the ups and downs,
the challenges and obstacles, the wins and the mistakes.”
It was time for everyone to throw their full weight onto the gas pedal.

“The world is watching us right now, even more than they have before,”
he said. “Let’s show the world Twitter’s full potential!”
Agrawal believed that fixing the way Twitter moderated content was
one of the most important things he could do to demonstrate that potential.

In his conversations with Dorsey, he had become certain that Twitter had
gone too far in policing online speech; he wanted to open the platform up
more. The company’s only tool for controversial tweets was to ban the user
who posted them. It was a guillotine where Agrawal wanted a pair of
tweezers.

With deep experience in artificial intelligence, he thought he could use
the technology to solve many of Twitter’s problems—the ever-accelerating
harassment, the fears about speaking up, the sluggish growth—with one
master stroke. Soon after he took over as CEO, Agrawal tapped Jay
Sullivan, one of his product leaders, to help flesh out the plan.

He called the sandy-haired Sullivan into the office on a weekend in
early 2022. The pair took over a conference room and Agrawal explained
his vision. He wanted to slash the dependence on human reviewers and
allow machine learning to take faster action against content that violated its
rules. Agrawal planned to stop removing content from Twitter altogether,
except in the most egregious situations.

In his typical fashion of requiring his deputies to reason through all
sides of an argument, Agrawal asked Sullivan to define “free speech.” He
thought the phrase had lost all meaning. He wanted to hear Sullivan argue
for what it was, and what it wasn’t.

The two sat staring at the blank whiteboard. “How can we enable
freedom of expression?” Agrawal asked.

Before joining Twitter, Sullivan had worked at Facebook and dealt with
some of the platform’s most challenging content moderation problems, like
child exploitation. He’d also advocated for Facebook to encrypt direct
messages, a move that lawmakers disliked because it would allow criminals
to hide their messages from subpoenas. He was deeply aware of the
tradeoffs a massive social media company had to make as it juggled
privacy, safety, and speech.

The product manager felt Twitter had already gotten a lot right. He told
Agrawal that the platform should keep its policies that prevented societal
harm, taking down tweets that promoted terrorism, threatened violence, or
sexualized children.

Agrawal agreed. It was the gray area that concerned him—tweets that
made Twitter feel like a toxic cesspool but didn’t break its rules. “How do
you make it more fun and lively, like you want to be there?” the chief
executive mused.

The two men discussed what parts of Twitter should be inaccessible to
the site’s infamous troll armies. Accounts that shared ugly but permissable
content shouldn’t be promoted by Twitter’s algorithms or allowed to
monetize their accounts—this would give the company some distance from
its worst offenders. Advertisers would have to be protected, of course. The
major brands that fueled Twitter’s business often balked when they saw
harassment or hate speech on the platform, pausing multimillion-dollar
campaigns until the scandal of the week flamed out.

Agrawal and Sullivan began to sketch their ideas on the whiteboard.

Instead of playing whac-a-mole with bad tweets, each account on the
platform would earn a ranking of 1 through 5, based on the kind of content
it produced. If the account consistently posted tweets that violated Twitter’s
rules, it would get shoved down the rankings to a 5, where it would lose
access to promotion by the company’s algorithms and couldn’t be shared. If
an account posted valuable content, was verified, and followed Twitter’s
rules, it would be ranked at 1 and get the most reach.

The system ought to be transparent, Agrawal told Sullivan, letting users
and the world know where their account fell on the spectrum and what they
would need to do to move up a level. That change would lessen the
conspiracy theories that always swirled around the company, as people
across the political spectrum claimed Twitter was censoring or
shadowbanning them.

The whiteboard sketch looked like a series of concentric rings, with the
lowest-ranked accounts at the gravitational heart of Twitter. The outer
reaches represented the company’s miscreants, and their content would be
visible only to people who chose to follow them.

Sullivan was intrigued. He started copying down Agrawal’s vision in his
notebook. “What is this thing?” he asked Agrawal.

Agrawal wasn’t sure what to call it yet. All he knew for certain was that
Twitter had to change.

Sullivan stared at the drawing on the whiteboard. With Twitter at the
center and its users orbiting around it, the sketch looked like a planet.

“What about Saturn?” Sullivan suggested.

A
10 > Twitter in Trouble
grawal was worried about the state of Twitter’s business. In early
February of 2022, he and Segal had reassured their investors that the
company could still reach the ambitious growth goals laid out in response to
Elliott Management’s intrusion—$7.5 billion in total revenue and 315
million daily active users by the end of 2023.

Despite those promises, Twitter netted a $220 million loss on $5 billion
in sales in 2021, setting the company up for a tense 2022. The company
would need to run flawlessly that year to stay on track with its revenue and
user targets, and Agrawal, a first-time chief executive, knew he had little
room for error. He was already operating with a reputation deficit. The
stock market reacted to his appointment with little more than a yawn, and
the prevailing question from most was summed up by one New York Times
headline: “Who is Parag Agrawal?”
Four days after he was named chief executive, on December 3, he went
through the dramatic restructuring he had promised. He fired Montano, the
engineering head, and Davis, the design leader, in an attempt to create
“clear decision-making, increased accountability, and faster execution,” he
wrote in an internal email.

While Davis had caused internal strife among some employees during
his tenure, Montano was seen as a loyal soldier who, like Agrawal, had
spent more than a decade at the company rising through the engineering
ranks. His exit was seen as an early example of the chief’s ruthlessness.

Agrawal would not be afraid to show some of his closest friends the door.

Privately, he fretted that Twitter hadn’t transformed enough since
Elliott’s attempted coup against Dorsey. Agrawal knew that another hedge
fund or private equity firm could crunch the numbers and realize Twitter
was a target. Silver Lake had been willing to bail out Dorsey, but Durban,
its deep-pocketed leader, was emphatic that Twitter needed to improve its
numbers and that he wouldn’t double down with another rescue.

Agrawal scuttled hiring plans for 2022 and looked for other ways to
make Twitter more lean. Product and engineering teams, who had just been
asked to present plans for growth that year, were taken aback. The hires
they had been told they could make would no longer happen, and the plans
they’d presented before the holidays were trashed.

To prove he was still confident in Twitter’s progress, Agrawal and Segal
announced a $4 billion share buyback program in early February 2022. “It
represents confidence in our strategy and execution,” Segal said. “We are
putting our money where our mouth is.”
While share buybacks typically lift the price of a company’s shares—as
an organization spends cash from its balance sheet to decrease the supply of
its stock—Twitter’s shares barely budged in the weeks after. But that may
have been due to another announcement a few days later.

On February 16, Twitter announced that its newly appointed chief
executive was taking a “few weeks” of parental leave so that he and his
wife, Vineeta, could welcome their second child, a baby boy. It was a
progressive move in keeping with Twitter’s people-first equity ethos, where
employees, regardless of gender, received up to twenty weeks of parental
leave for new children. But it was still radical for a CEO, much less one
who had been in the job for less than three months, to make such a move,
particularly in the grinding, male-dominated culture of Silicon Valley.

Some tech leaders shared the views of Musk, who told The New York
Times in 2020 that he didn’t have to spend much time with his newborns,
including one he had recently welcomed with his then-partner, the musician
Grimes.

“Well, babies are just eating and pooping machines, you know?” he
said. “Right now there’s not much I can do. Grimes has a much bigger role
than me right now. When the kid gets older, there will be more of a role for
me.”
Twitter’s executives attempted to head off any criticism. Agrawal
planned to continue working a few days a week, and official statements
leaned into the idea that all parents should have a role in their children’s
early development. “Thank you @paraga for leading by example and taking
paternity leave,” Segal tweeted. “I wish leaders did this when I was early in
my career and becoming a father.”
The market remained unforgiving. By the end of February, Twitter’s
stock was down more than 54 percent from the year prior. Agrawal could do
no right.

>>> MUSK, MEANWHILE, started 2022 flying high. With a net worth of $219
billion, he ranked at the top of the Forbes billionaires list for the first time,
propelled by the public market performance of Tesla and the everincreasing private valuation of SpaceX. Musk had feared that the pandemic
and its economic standstill would stifle Tesla’s momentum after surviving
the uncertain days of 2018, but the automaker thrived, shipping cars at an
increased pace, constrained only by its ability to meet voracious global
consumer demand.

The company had enjoyed a sixfold increase in profit to $5.5 billion as
its market valuation hit more than $1.2 trillion in November 2021. The
company had been worth a little more than $60 billion when Musk
proposed taking it private three years earlier. Apple, founded in 1976, took
forty-two years to become the first publicly traded American company to hit
the $1 trillion market cap milestone. Tesla did it in eighteen years.

But many people worried the company was overvalued, including Musk
himself. Tesla’s shares seemed to have decoupled from any financial reality
or traditional metrics. The advent of mobile trading apps like Robinhood
made it easy for a new class of millennial and Gen Z first-timers to buy and
sell stocks, and Tesla, with its bombastic, always-online chief executive,
became an attractive pick.

Musk had at times chafed at Tesla’s unrealistic value. In early May
2020, after Tesla’s stock price had more than tripled over the previous
twelve months, he tweeted, “Tesla stock price is too high imo.” The stock
price fell more than 12 percent in thirty minutes, though it would recover in
the days after and soar to new heights, bolstered by unparalleled fandom.

And in November 2021, with Tesla’s shares near an all-time high, Musk
had asked in a Twitter poll if his followers supported his “selling 10% of
my Tesla stock” because of criticism around “tax avoidance.” While it
seemed magnanimous, he already knew he’d have a massive tax bill—
nearly $11 billion—due to the exercise of a stock bonus plan that gave him
$24 billion worth of Tesla shares. By the end of that December, he would
sell off 15.7 million Tesla shares to cover his tax obligation, and give
another $5.7 billion worth of stock to his own foundation to incur further
savings.

>>> LESS THAN TWO WEEKS after Agrawal told employees that he’d be
taking some time off for parental leave, Russia invaded Ukraine on
February 24, igniting a conflict that gripped the world as imagery of
bombings, bodies, and blood spread across social networks like Twitter. The
war led advertisers to halt their spending on social media. Brands like Ford
and Visa didn’t want to see their ads plastered next to a gory image of battle
on Twitter, as the war complicated an already darkening global economic
situation marked by inflation and rising interest rates.

Within a month, the bleak truth was clear. Twitter’s advertising had
plummeted and Agrawal realized the company was not going to be able to
deliver on the targets. His focus flipped quickly from success to survival.

He began to search for other areas to cut fat. During the pandemic,
many Twitter executives worked remotely from Hawaii and proposed to
hold the next #OneTeam on the islands. When they realized the price tag for
bringing the entire company to Hawaii for a few days, they scaled back and
settled for Disneyland in Southern California instead. The budget for the
lavish affair, which would bring Twitter employees back together for the
first time since the pre-pandemic times of January 2020, was $37 million.

To Agrawal, it was an egregious expense. While the company had
already put down deposits for hotels and conference space, he decided that
the cultural celebration would have to be canceled. It was all too easy to
imagine photos of Twitter employees taking in the fireworks landing on
people’s timelines alongside pictures of Ukrainian corpses.

He also began planning a layoff. The move, a consequence of
overhiring during the pandemic as all online businesses received boosts,
was set to be Twitter’s biggest staff reduction in years. Agrawal hoped to
cut between 20 and 25 percent of Twitter’s workforce, dismiss many of its
contractors and consultants, and shut down office spaces that had gathered
cobwebs during the pandemic. He code-named the cost-cutting measures
“Project Prism” so execs could chatter about it in the office without alerting
their employees.

The austerity proposed in Prism would be extreme by Twitter standards.

The layoffs alone would save the company $750 million, and by slashing
parties, travel, marketing budgets, and the cloud contracts he had pushed
for, Agrawal hoped to save more than $1 billion. The days of freewheeling
spending and lax oversight were over.

W
11 > Musk’s Shopping Spree
hile Musk’s businesses seemed to be booming, his personal life was
another matter. He was increasingly erratic, mixing Ambien and
late-night Twitter binges. He had a reputation for using drugs including
LSD and ecstasy at parties, and would later say publicly that he had a
prescription for ketamine, a dissociative anesthetic that can ease depression,
and used it to get out of negative states of mind. Close family members
became so concerned with Musk’s mood swings and shifting behavior in
early 2022 that they began discussing a possible intervention that could
make him aware of his issues. The billionaire, however, was unreceptive
and evaded his family’s attempts to interfere in his personal life.

Musk’s Twitter feed had become faster, louder, and increasingly
unhinged. By the end of 2021, Musk was averaging more than 250 tweets a
month, and they had taken a distinct rightward turn. He always fashioned
himself a libertarian with liberal tendencies, a business scion who backed
Barack Obama and deigned to join the Trump administration’s business
councils, albeit holding his nose. The pandemic changed him.

He had rarely entangled himself in politics, but his tirades against
COVID lockdowns and his crusade to keep Tesla factories open drew him
into political sparring matches on Twitter. He believed his critics were
infected by a “woke mind virus” that sought to destroy the country and limit
progress by focusing on divisive issues of racial and social justice. He was
disdainful of the social justice movements that had gripped the U.S. in
2020, following the murder of George Floyd, and hated the resulting pushes
for diversity, equity, and inclusion that swept corporate boardrooms in the
months after.

Like many white male tech CEOs, he saw his companies as pure
meritocracies, where hard work and smarts rose to the top. To Musk,
diversity initiatives were antithetical to success, watering down his
workforces with underqualified female or minority candidates and
discriminating against white or male applicants.

Railing against the ails of liberalism, he fought against efforts to
unionize workers at Tesla’s factories. In 2021, a federal court found that a
Black former lift worker at Tesla’s Fremont factory had been racially
abused at work, awarding him $137 million. While a judge later reduced
that payout on appeal, the decision opened the floodgates for a host of other
discrimination lawsuits against the electric automaker.

“traceroute woke_mind_virus,” Musk tweeted in December 2021,
referencing a diagnostic computer command that allowed engineers to track
the path of data across the internet and discover where it originated and how
it was spreading.

Musk had gone fully anti-woke. On Twitter, he regularly engaged with
right-wing influencers, slammed Democratic politicians over initiatives to
tax the wealthy, and decried transgender people’s insistence on being
referred to by their chosen pronouns, a demand he viewed as contrary to
free speech. He was uninhibited, and continued to use the platform to lash
out.

He also used Twitter to flirt. He had met Claire Boucher, the musician
known as Grimes, over Twitter, and the couple appeared together at the
2018 Met Gala. She was seventeen years his junior, but the elfish singer,
known for her futuristic style and shock value antics, was a kindred spirit.

She, too, dreamed of dying on Mars and was fascinated by the possibility of
a techno-utopian future governed by AI.

Musk rarely sought peace in his romantic life. He had previously dated
the actress Amber Heard, in a relationship that seemed to swing wildly
between extremes of passion and anger. Their bust-ups, which mostly
stayed out of the major gossip rags, were infamous among his family and
staff.

His romance with Boucher could be erratic, too. In 2020, shortly after
the singer announced she was pregnant with Musk’s child, he unfollowed
her on Twitter, the second time in two years he had done so during a rough
patch. The mess didn’t seem to bother Musk—after all, he had used Twitter
to announce his divorce from his second wife.

Musk could have falling-outs with Kimbal, too. He subjected his
brother to the same unfollowing treatment on Twitter, which made it
awkward given Kimbal served as a director at Tesla and SpaceX. Kimbal,
who sometimes had concerns about Musk’s mood swings, eventually
resigned from SpaceX’s board in January 2022. And while the brothers
made up after their arguments, Musk’s willingness to cut Kimbal and other
kin off when he was angry reaffirmed to his family that he could be prone
to bouts of emotional instability.

>>> IT WAS IN THIS ENVIRONMENT that he decided, seemingly on a whim, to
make his move. As Agrawal was slashing at Twitter, Musk was spending.

His spree was enabled by Tesla’s share price, which had come down a bit
from the heights of the end of 2021 but still translated to a public market
valuation of more than $1 trillion by early January. That gave Musk a
stunning amount of purchasing power.

Unlike the average person, Musk did not have to sell his shares to get
cash. Indeed, he had sold some of his Tesla stock at the end of the year to
cover his tax obligations, but he preferred to hold on to as much of his
equity as possible to give him more control over Tesla’s decision-making.

Instead, to get liquid cash, Musk used his Tesla shares to obtain loans. Tesla
disclosed in financial filings that by the end of 2021, Musk had pledged
more than 92 million shares, or nearly 40 percent of his stake in the
company, “as collateral to secure certain personal indebtedness.” At the
time, the shares pledged were worth more than $32 billion.

This unfathomable well of wealth made Musk extremely confident.

Tesla was clearly doing well, as was SpaceX, which completed thirty-one
launches in 2021 as the market leader in the private launch business. As
private share sales at the end of the year valued SpaceX at $100 billion,
Musk’s mind began to wander on to the next problem he wanted to solve
for humanity. “So I asked myself what product I liked, and that was an easy
question,” Musk later told his biographer, Walter Isaacson. “It was Twitter.”
Musk spent hours on Twitter every day and his shifting politics and
online filter bubble made him particularly sympathetic to the idea that the
company was silencing speech. He saw himself as the only man who could
stem Twitter’s continued leftward slide. By the end of January, he deputized
Jared Birchall to begin quietly buying up chunks of Twitter’s shares.

Birchall had his former firm, Morgan Stanley, execute the trades, which
began on January 31 when the stock opened trading on the New York Stock
Exchange at $35.43. The instruction was simply to buy as much as possible,
as quickly as possible.

In their haste to execute Musk’s command, the traders blew past a
deadline imposed by the Securities and Exchange Commission, which
requires any entity that accumulates more than 5 percent of a publicly
traded company to disclose their stake. Twitter’s board never caught wind
of the transactions.

By March 14, Musk had accumulated 9.2 percent of Twitter’s
outstanding shares. The stake, which was worth nearly $3 billion, made him
the single largest shareholder in the company, bigger than mutual fund
company Vanguard, and Dorsey, who held only 2.3 percent. Few besides his
innermost circle knew about the move. He was required by law to disclose
what he owned by March 24, but Musk did not publicly announce his
purchases until April 4, in a belated SEC filing.

Up until that point, Musk behaved fairly normal online—at least by his
standards. He tweeted about environmental, social, and governance (ESG)
corporate initiatives (“the Devil incarnate”) as well as the mainstream
media (full of “groupthink”), and inserted himself in the crisis of the period,
the Russian invasion into Ukraine.

At first, he showed unwavering support for Ukraine and played the
hero, saying that SpaceX’s satellite internet service, Starlink, would be
available in the country. “Hold Strong Ukraine,” he tweeted in the early
weeks of the invasion, with six Ukrainian flag emojis. Later, he posted in a
mix of Russian and English to challenge Vladimir Putin to “single combat.”
Musk, however, grew increasingly uncomfortable with his initial
position. In early March, he tweeted that he refused requests by some
foreign governments to block Russian news sources that had been used to
spread propaganda about the war from Starlink’s internet.

“Sorry to be a free speech absolutist,” he wrote, angering Ukrainian
supporters who saw his move as tacit endorsement and enabling of the
Kremlin’s information warfare. The criticism stung Musk, who began to see
the full-throated support of Ukraine as an orthodox position held by some
of the “woke” liberal elements that he had grown to hate.

Ten days after his post about Ukraine holding strong, he had developed
a new opinion and shared two memes to underscore his reversal. One
featured a photo of a cartoon drawing of a non-player character, or NPC, a
derogatory term for people who are incapable of forming their own
independent thoughts. “I support the current thing,” read the text on the
image, with the cartoon framed by LGBTQ symbols as it held a Ukraine
flag. Another meme, taken from the Netflix show Narcos, showed a man
staring off into the distance. “Netflix waiting for the war to end to make a
movie about a black ukraine guy falls in love with a transgender russian
soldier,” read the inscribed text.

Musk hardened his position as he spoke with his closest associates. “I
saw your tweet re free speech,” Antonio Gracias, a technology investor,
former Tesla board member, and close friend, texted Musk on March 5.

“Wtf is going on Elon…”
The EU passed a law banning Russia Today, and internet providers like
Starlink had been told to deny access to their sites, the SpaceX chief
replied. “Actually, I find their news quite entertaining,” he continued. “Lot
of bullshit, but some good points too.

“Free speech matters most when it’s someone you hate spouting what
you think is bullshit,” Musk added, continuing his defense of Russia Today.

“I am 100% with you Elon,” Gracias replied. “To the fucking mattresses
no matter what…. . this is a principle we need to fucking defend with our
lives or we are lost to the darkness.”
Musk’s conversations with Gracias and other friends gave him purpose.

By then, his Twitter share acquisition spree was well underway, but he had a
renewed justification for the object of his desire. If liberals and their media
and tech industry cronies couldn’t be trusted to uphold free speech, maybe
he could do it himself. Twitter, after all, was a company based in one of the
most liberal cities in the U.S. It must be compromised, he believed. “I’m
worried about de facto bias in ‘the Twitter algorithm’ having a major effect
on public discourse,” Musk tweeted on March 24.

That day, his phone started to buzz with messages from his ex-wife
Talulah Riley. Unlike his first partner, Riley stayed in longing contact with
Musk, who sometimes tweeted about his cherished memories of their
relationship. On this occasion, the actress was incensed about Twitter’s
recent suspension of the account of the Babylon Bee, a right-wing satire site
that Musk and Riley thought was funny. The publication had received
warnings from Twitter in the past for breaking its rules, but had its account
suspended after it violated a policy against misgendering people, when it
named Rachel Levine, a Biden administration official and transgender
woman, its “man of the year.”
“Can you buy Twitter and then delete it, please?! xx,” Riley texted
Musk.

“Or can you buy Twitter and make it radically free speech?” she wrote
moments later, peppering her messages with more kisses. “So much
stupidity comes from Twitter xx.” Musk liked her message, appending a
thumbs-up to it, but didn’t respond further.

Instead, he lashed out in a late-night Twitter binge. “Free speech is
essential to a functioning democracy. Do you believe Twitter rigorously
adheres to this principle?” he asked his Twitter followers in a poll. “Please
vote carefully,” he cautioned.

By March 26, the poll had accumulated more than two million votes.

More than 70 percent of Musk’s followers had an overwhelmingly negative
view of the platform and its handling of speech. “Given that Twitter serves
as the de facto public town square, failing to adhere to free speech
principles fundamentally undermines democracy,” Musk tweeted. “What
should be done? Is a new platform needed?”
More responses poured into his Twitter notifications, congratulating him
on his tweets and egging him on. Twitter was a censor, a cesspool, a plague
on open discourse, they said. “Buy twitter,” replied Mike Cernovich, a farright influencer who had once encouraged Pizzagate. He wrote that Twitter
only respected those who were “leftist making death threats against
conservatives.”
“Doesn’t sound very balanced,” Musk replied.

The billionaire also received encouraging text messages from friends
and acquaintances, among them Oracle founder Larry Ellison, who agreed
for the need of a new Twitter; Mathias Döpfner, a German media executive
who called for Musk to buy Twitter and then hand it over to him to run; and
Sam Bankman-Fried, the founder and leader of crypto exchange FTX, who
wanted to invest.

But one message in particular caught Musk’s attention. It came from a
typically quiet correspondent who had been entered into the Tesla chief’s
phone contacts as “jack jack.”
“Yes, a new platform is needed,” Dorsey texted Musk. “It can’t be a
company. This is why I left.”
Although he had resigned as chief executive months earlier, Twitter’s
cofounder had yet to disentangle himself fully from the social media
platform and remained on its board. Still, despite his position and the
obligations that came with it to protect Twitter, he was encouraging Musk to
build a competitor.

“Ok,” Musk wrote back. “What should it look like?”
Dorsey didn’t hesitate to describe the vision he’d laid out to Agrawal
and other executives before his resignation. “I believe it must be an open
source protocol, funded by a foundation of sorts that doesn’t own the
protocol, only advances it,” Dorsey responded. “It can’t have an advertising
model. Otherwise you have a surface area that governments and advertisers
will try to influence and control.”
“Super interesting idea,” Musk replied.

Dorsey was pleased with the response and went even further, trying to
woo Musk. Twitter was too compromised to salvage, he suggested.

“I’m off the twitter board in mid May and then completely out of the
company. I intend to do this work and fix our mistakes. Twitter started as a
protocol. It should never have been a company. That was the original sin,”
Dorsey texted. “I wanted to talk to you after it was all clear, because you
care so much, get it’s importance, and could def help in immeasurable
ways. Back when we had the activist come in, I tried my hardest to get you
on the board, and our board said no. That’s about the time I decided I
needed to work to leave, as hard as it was for me.”
The two billionaires were courting each other. But both of them were
keeping secrets, too. Musk didn’t divulge that he had recently acquired
more than three times as much Twitter stock as Dorsey. At one point during
the exchange, Dorsey griped that his ownership stake was only 3 percent—
not even remotely close enough to give him the power to make unilateral,
paradigm-shifting decisions needed to resuscitate the social network.

Dorsey didn’t mention that his protocol work on Bluesky had begun
years ago, or that Twitter’s board had gone to the mat to save him from
Elliott. He didn’t disclose his fiduciary duties and conflicts as a board
member at Twitter and Bluesky. And he didn’t note that he had handselected Agrawal as his successor—even as he undercut him.

But what Dorsey said got Musk’s juices flowing. He started to fixate on
how he could improve Twitter. Over the past few weeks, he had used his
account to slam Twitter for its focus on cryptocurrency-related features, its
lack of ability to handle bots, and its nonpublic algorithm. He also made
jokes about how terrible the platform made him feel, despite the hours he
spent on it every day making and consuming content. He was a shareholder
now, and a large one at that. Maybe he could be the one to agitate for
change?
An hour after chatting with Dorsey, Musk texted Durban. He had
worked with Durban before on his botched deal to take Tesla private in
2018. Silver Lake had agreed to back Musk in the deal, only to have the
transaction fall apart when the Saudi money Musk had claimed was
guaranteed turned out to be anything but. The relationship between Musk
and Durban, once close, had become chilly in the aftermath of the Tesla
disaster.

“This is Elon. Please call when you have a moment,” Musk texted. “It is
regarding the Twitter board.”
On the call with Durban, Musk was more direct than he had been with
Dorsey. He was Twitter’s largest shareholder, Musk said, having snapped up
more than 9 percent of its stock. And he wanted to use his position to force
changes at the company, perhaps joining the board as Durban had done. It
came spilling out of the mouth of the world’s richest man.

No one in Twitter’s leadership had heard whispers of a possible
intrusion. Birchall’s contacts at Morgan Stanley had been able to avoid
detection by Twitter as they amassed Musk’s stake, which was almost three
times larger than Elliott’s had been.

The Silver Lake head quickly phoned Martha Lane Fox, who oversaw
the board’s governance decisions; Bret Taylor, Twitter’s chairman; and
Agrawal. Twitter had a problem, Durban told them. The group agreed to
keep its interactions with Musk positive—he was a much better ally than
enemy.

>>> DURBAN CONNECTED MUSK with Lane Fox, Taylor, and Agrawal to
organize a face-to-face meeting. (Musk, who often tweeted boob jokes and
appointed few women to leadership roles in his companies, saved the two
men by their full names in his phone but referred to Lane Fox as “Martha
Twitter NomGov” in his contacts.)
The intrusion could have been Agrawal’s nightmare come to life—
another outsider meddling in Twitter’s stock. But he didn’t see it that way.

He had imagined that he and Twitter might be vulnerable to another activist
investor who would come in, squeeze him for a few months, and then leave.

But Agrawal was a Tesla fan and thought Musk’s big investment in the
company showed he was committed to Twitter’s success.

With Musk came chaos. But if it meant Agrawal, a green CEO, could
lean on the perspective of one of the industry’s most successful people, it
might benefit Twitter. He and Taylor had a quick call with Musk on the
night of March 27, after the Tesla chief finished a meeting with his autopilot
engineering team.

Agrawal found that he had things in common with Musk. Both
executives felt Twitter had gone too far in restricting speech on the platform
and wanted to find ways to loosen the company’s grip on content
moderation. They tended to be hard-driving, and impatient for change. And
each saw himself as a top engineer, able to solve the complex problems
Twitter faced that had stymied former leaders.

But Musk came to the call with a new bombshell that unsettled the two
Twitter leaders. He would consider taking a seat on Twitter’s board, he told
Agrawal and Taylor. But he was also mulling the other options he could
pursue with his new stake in Twitter, including taking it private or spinning
up an entirely new competing social media service. Durban had already
warned them that Musk could be a wild card, and he was proving it on the
call. He might be willing to work with them, but he could just as easily turn
their lives upside down.

They met in person for the first time on the last day in March, with
assistants booking an Airbnb near the San Jose, California, airport to stay
out of the public eye and accommodate Musk’s travel schedule.

Taylor, who looked like Prince William if the royal had been raised on
coding boot camps instead of Eton etiquette, had a veteran’s résumé in
Silicon Valley. He helped develop Google Maps and launched a start-up that
he later sold to Facebook, where he rose to become chief technology officer.

But he had never been in a position like this.

Calm and analytical, he was being groomed to lead Salesforce by Marc
Benioff, the billionaire chief executive of the sales software company.

Benioff made him co-CEO in the same week that he was elevated to be
Twitter’s board chairman, as Dorsey handed the reins to Agrawal. Taylor
was a rising star and a steady, inoffensive choice. He rarely tweeted, aside
from occasional posts about his beloved San Francisco 49ers and Golden
State Warriors.

He preferred to do business in person and spent much of his time globetrotting to meet face-to-face with Salesforce customers. While he was
respectful of Twitter’s remote work policies and went along with Twitter’s
custom of holding most board meetings over video calls, Taylor didn’t want
to pass up the opportunity to meet Musk in person. He found that his
willingness to show up often charmed clients and thought it would get him
on Musk’s good side.

Taylor flew into San Jose that night. He was the first to arrive at the
Airbnb. “This wins for the weirdest place I’ve had a meeting recently. I
think they were looking for an airbnb near the airport and there are tractors
and donkeys,” he messaged the group.

The men shared a meal at the house and discussed what Musk could
bring to Twitter as a board member, interrupted occasionally by noisy police
helicopters that flew overhead. Agrawal and Taylor had agreed to view the
meeting as a job interview, and questioned Musk about what he would bring
to the boardroom, probing his views on Twitter and asking about his
management of his other companies.

Musk was interested in joining the board, he told them. But he was still
weighing his options and thought he might buy the company outright, or
start a competing social media platform. Musk’s disclosure was bizarre. If
he really intended to start a competitor, why would he need to accumulate a
massive stake in Twitter to do it? And why would he give them advance
warning of his plans? Surely the billions he had already invested in Twitter
would be better spent on his own start-up, if he truly intended to found one.

It seemed to Taylor and Agrawal that Musk’s two realistic options were to
stage a hostile takeover or join the board. It would be up to the two men to
convince Musk to take the latter route.

“Great dinner :),” Musk wrote in the group chat. “Definitely one for the
memory books haha.”
>>> MUSK WOULDN’T STAY at the strange Airbnb or in San Jose for very long.

He had a planned weekend of debauchery in Berlin and headed to
Germany’s capital soon after his dinner with Agrawal and Taylor. By Friday
evening, he was spotted at KitKatClub, a legendary club founded by an
Austrian pornographer in the early ’90s and once known for its latex parties
and encouragement of public sex. On Saturday, there was a stop at another
club, Sisyphos, for the birthday party of his good friend and college
roommate, Adeo Ressi. Musk donned a Zorro mask before he and a group
headed to Berghain, the techno mecca that is regarded as Berlin’s most
famous—and hard to access—club.

Located in a former heating plant built in the postwar years, the club
straddles Berlin’s East-West divide and can be imposing for outsiders, who
are very much not welcome. The line, guarded by gruff bouncers with face
tattoos, can stretch for hours around graffitied walls and chain-link fences;
those who are permitted to enter know the etiquette. Dress down and
preferably in black. Don’t speak, but if you must, do so in German.

Musk arrived in the witching hours of Sunday, and followed none of the
customs. He strode up to the bouncers, announced who he was, and asked
to come in. They looked him up and down and shook their heads. “Not
today.” Unused to rejection, Musk took out his phone and turned to Twitter
in a less than sober state. “They wrote PEACE on the wall at Berghain! I
refused enter,” he tweeted at 4:53 a.m.

As Musk crashed after his weekend of partying, Twitter’s board
gathered on a video call to talk about him later that same Sunday, April 3.

Most of the board members were wary. Adding a famous, loudmouthed
director would change the chemistry of the group and could be distracting,
especially as they tried to steer a novice CEO, who also attended the
meeting. And of course, some of Twitter’s employees wouldn’t be pleased
about it, since Musk used Twitter to spread misinformation about COVID
and push anti-transgender rhetoric.

Lane Fox argued that getting Musk to agree to join the board would be a
huge relief. His musings about staging a take-private or founding a
competitor would destabilize Twitter if he brought them to fruition. Adding
him to the board was the easiest way to neutralize him, since it would
harness him with a duty to act in the best financial interests of Twitter.

Dorsey chimed in with a rare comment. “I consider him a friend,” he
said of Musk, adding that his technical accomplishments would be valuable
for Twitter.

Eventually the board agreed to welcome Musk to their ranks. The
directors decided that the best way to keep Musk from running off the rails
would be to limit his ownership of Twitter to below 15 percent and require
the erratic billionaire to sign a cooperation agreement that would dictate
how he could behave as he sought to influence the company.

Dorsey quickly shared the board’s decision with Musk. “I heard good
things are happening,” he texted.

As Musk prepared to fly out of Berlin, Lane Fox scrambled to get the
necessary paperwork in front of him. The sooner he signed, the better. Musk
connected Lane Fox to Birchall and asked the head of his family office to
deal with the “important paperwork” needed for him to join Twitter’s board.

But when the documents came through, Musk wasn’t particularly happy
with the arrangement. The agreement Lane Fox sent him capped the amount
of shares he could buy and forbade him from making critical public
statements about the company and its leaders. The document was corporate
boilerplate, virtually identical to the agreement that the board had required
Jesse Cohn to sign when he agreed to halt his hostile campaign two years
earlier.

Most directors wouldn’t flinch at the idea of being required not to
publicly dump on the company they managed. But Musk wasn’t like most
directors, and he hated the idea of being muzzled. Birchall rejected the
document on his behalf.

By Monday morning, April 4, Twitter’s board was in a bind. Musk had
belatedly filed a notice with the SEC disclosing his ownership stake in the
company, and it was now public, leading to a flood of media coverage.

Twitter’s lack of public communication on the matter made it unclear if he
was friendly or hostile. The uncertainty was causing turbulence for Taylor
and the other directors, who were still trying to wrangle the billionaire into
signing the board agreement. With Musk groggy from his flight, Lane Fox
offered a revised agreement that was “even more pared back.”
It was still not to the liking of Musk, who held all the power. With his
ideals about making more irreverent speech possible on Twitter, he couldn’t
agree to silence himself. Twitter’s directors needed him to sign this
agreement. Without it, there was no way of knowing what the erratic
billionaire could do. But Musk remained difficult. It was his way or no way.

“Thank you for considering me for the Twitter board, but, after thinking
it over, my current time commitments would prevent me from being an
effective board member,” he wrote on a text thread with Birchall, Taylor,
and Lane Fox. “This may change in the future.”
The text led Taylor, Lane Fox, and Agrawal to hit the phones. They had
to give Musk what he wanted or risk another Elliott situation. Twitter’s
CEO, barely in the hot seat for four months, pushed for appeasement, and
eventually got it. Twitter’s board quickly returned to Musk with a revised
agreement. The stock ownership limit remained, but there were no restraints
on what he could or couldn’t say about Twitter.

The Company and the Board will take all action necessary so that as Mr. Musk
will be appointed to the Board.

On Monday night, Musk signed on the dotted line. With his problem
resolved, Agrawal sent Musk the language of a tweet he was going to post
making the announcement. It was something Musk would never do—ask
someone for approval of his posts—but he played along.

“I’m excited to share that we’re appointing @elonmusk to our board!”
Agrawal tweeted the next morning. “Through conversations with Elon in
recent weeks, it became clear to me that he would bring great value to our
Board. Why? Above all else, he’s both a passionate believer and intense
critic of the service which is exactly what we need on Twitter, and in the
Boardroom, to make us stronger in the long-term. Welcome Elon!”
The congratulations rolled in, but few well-wishers were more effusive
than Dorsey, who became very emotional when Musk’s appointment was
confirmed. “Thank you for joining!” he wrote. “Parag is an incredible
engineer. The board is terrible. Always here to talk through anything you
want.”
Dorsey, who had watched as frantic emails rolled in from his fellow
board members about how to handle the Musk situation, had remained
silent. Although he had told them about his friendship with Musk, the
directors had no idea that Dorsey had been encouraging the entire maneuver
in private messages with him.

After years of trying, Dorsey had his favorite tweeter on the board of
the company he helped create. It was a board he hated, despite the
protection it had offered him over the years. With Musk around, perhaps
there was a way to implement the radical changes he had dreamed of. Musk
was his opportunity.

“When is a good time to talk confidentially?” Musk texted back.

Dorsey responded in fourteen seconds: “anytime.”
Musk rang him soon after.

S
12 > An Offer
ince taking over as Twitter’s chief executive at the end of November
2021, Parag Agrawal had been afforded few breaks. There had been
the internal reorganization, his attempts to resuscitate Twitter’s stock price,
and the board dance with Musk. Even his part-time paternity leave, which
was supposed to give him time with his newborn son at the start of the new
year, had been cut short by the Ukraine war. By the first full week of April
2022, however, the tide seemed to have turned. He had announced Musk as
his newest board member and was ready to relax.

Twitter’s CEO wasn’t the only one breathing a sigh of relief in early
April. As COVID restrictions loosened around the world, employees went
globe-trotting. Hawaii was a popular destination, and some leaders on the
finance team headed to Maui. They were still far away from their home
base in San Francisco when Musk broke the news: He would not be joining
Twitter’s board.

Instead, he intended to buy the whole company.

>>> THE INITIAL REACTION among employees to Musk’s board appointment
was mixed. The billionaire had developed a brash, trolling reputation on
Twitter, and few people were better acquainted with his online tendencies
and persona than those who worked on the platform. Indeed, that reputation
had garnered him hordes of followers—Dorsey among them—who saw
Musk’s post-first-ask-later approach to Twitter as refreshing and
aspirational. To them, he was a builder who couldn’t be tamed and whose
rough edges could and should be ignored because he had achieved so much.

Over the years, however, Musk’s posting had alienated a lot of people.

Twitter employees immediately began to surface concerns on the
company’s Slack channels. After all, one of the company’s core values was
to “communicate fearlessly to build trust.” Dorsey had always encouraged
his workers to speak truth to power, which in practice meant that employees
tweeted about company concerns, spoke up at internal meetings, and
challenged decision-making in internal chat rooms. When Musk was
appointed, Twitter’s employees did what they had always done.

Their concerns included his treatment of workers at Tesla and how
factory workers had sued the company over allegations of racial
discrimination. They brought up the misinformation he spread during the
early months of the pandemic, as well as his false accusation of pedophilia
on their very platform. Many knew their protestations would likely be
fruitless—the decision had been made. But they felt obligated to say
something.

“We know that he has caused harm to workers, the trans community,
women and others with less power in the world,” one tweep wrote on Slack.

“How are we going to reconcile this decision with our values? Does
innovation trump humanity?”
One employee pointed out that if they or any of their colleagues posted
some of the things Musk tweeted, they would be the subject of a human
resources investigation. “Are board members held to the same standard?”
they asked.

Others at the company, however, didn’t agree. To them, Musk was a
once-in-a-lifetime entrepreneur and the possibility of learning from a man
who had built a multibillion-dollar fortune across disparate industries was
alluring. And now that he was on the board, he wouldn’t bad-mouth the
company anymore, they argued. Agrawal, who read the dissenting messages
on Slack, was firmly in this camp. No reasonable board member would
harm the company, and bringing Musk onto the board was one of his most
significant changes as CEO. He was ready to defend it, even as it crumbled
before him.

>>> MUSK’S RESERVATIONS about joining Twitter’s board of directors began
almost immediately, even before Agrawal’s celebratory tweet. As a director,
his voice would be one among ten others. He would have no operational
control. For his whole career, Musk had succeeded by being the lead
decision-maker. He followed his gut and couldn’t be shackled by any
corporate structure or opposed by dissenters. His leadership style was
completely undemocratic. The board at SpaceX, for example, consisted of
friends who were early backers, company leaders, and an executive at
Google, which had invested in SpaceX.

Within hours of his delayed SEC filing disclosing his stake in Twitter on
April 4, he was inadvertently reminded of the limitations of his power by
friends and acquaintances who buzzed his iPhone with congratulations,
including hedge fund billionaire Ken Griffin (“Love it!!”), Döpfner (“Fast
execution ”), and libertarian venture capitalist Joe Lonsdale (“Hope
you’re able to influence it”). Some railed against what they saw as left-wing
influence run amok, a progressive ooze that had seeped into the company’s
executive functions and affected decisions around content moderation and
product development.

“Are you going to liberate Twitter from the censorship happy mob?”
wrote Joe Rogan.

“I will provide advice, which they may or may not choose to follow,”
Musk replied.

Musk’s inability to call the shots ate at him. He told a Tesla board
member that he had not really wanted to join the board but gave in only
after Twitter pushed hard. And when others asked him to pull favors—
including the Babylon Bee editor Kyle Mann, whose publication’s account
had been suspended for violating the platform’s harassment rules—he
conceded he wasn’t in a position to make such calls.

“So can you bust us out of Twitter Jail now lol,” Mann asked.

“I do not have that ability,” Musk said tersely.

In another text with CBS host Gayle King, who asked him to bring an
edit button to Twitter, he wrote, “Owning ~9% is not quite control.”
On April 7, Musk was preparing for another major Tesla event in Austin
with Twitter still on his mind. Named the “Cyber Rodeo,” by Omead
Afshar, one of Musk’s most trusted associates, the gala was the grand
opening for the car manufacturer’s new Texas factory, whose development
had been overseen by Afshar. Since Tesla and SpaceX had moved more
operations to the Lone Star State, Musk had started to think of Texas as
“home,” or whatever the approximation of home was for a jet-setting
billionaire. But as he flew to Austin from Colorado Springs, where he had
given a talk to cadets at the Air Force Academy, he remained more
concerned about Twitter than his upcoming speech at the Tesla party. “I
have a ton of ideas, but lmk if I’m pushing too hard. I just want Twitter to
be maximum amazing,” Musk texted Agrawal. He reminded Twitter’s chief
that he “wrote heavy duty software for 20 years” and that he still wanted to
see Twitter’s codebase.

Agrawal was thrilled that one of Silicon Valley’s idols wanted to go so
in-depth. “In our next convo—treat me like an engineer instead of CEO and
lets see where we get to,” he responded. He highlighted his engineering
experience and said he has spent long hours in the codebase as chief
technology officer. He also told Musk not to worry about leaks to the press
that suggested employees were unhappy about the prospect of Musk joining
the board—the “silent majority” supported him, Agrawal promised.

Musk was welcomed back to the Gigafactory that night by a drone light
show, in which flying robots with LEDs formed the company logo and
various Tesla vehicles in the evening sky near the 10-million-square-foot
building. Inside, thousands of adoring fans waited for the arrival of their
“technoking,” who drove onstage in a black Tesla Roadster through the
Blade Runner–styled party. There were cheers, raised cell phones, and
shouts of “You’re my hero!” and “I love you!” Musk exited the car, wearing
a black cowboy hat, Aviator sunglasses, and a too-tight Cyber Rodeo Tshirt. The rock star adoration was accentuated by Musk’s late arrival. “We
needed a place where we could be really big,” Tesla’s chief said of the new
factory. “And there’s no place like Texas!”
More than twenty-five minutes later, he paused his halting, partly adlibbed speech for the orgiastic screams, which only got louder when a
prototype of the Cybertruck—the Musk-described “magnum opus” of his
company—drove onstage. “Here at Tesla, we believe in throwing great
parties, so let’s get this party started!” he exclaimed before clambering into
the driver’s seat as fireworks shot into the night sky.

Despite the adulation and sycophancy, however, Musk’s mind remained
restless. As he moved around at his own Giga Rodeo and after-party, all
anyone wanted to talk about, it seemed, was the other company that he
didn’t own. Sure, a new Tesla factory was noteworthy, but there was more
excitement about Twitter and his involvement. What was he going to do?
Everyone wanted to know, and even those closest to him had no clear idea.

Neither did Musk.

>>> THE NEXT DAY, Friday, April 8, the Tesla chief flew to Lanai, the
Hawaiian island owned by Larry Ellison. The trip was meant to be for rest
and relaxation with his latest love interest, Natasha Bassett, a twenty-nineyear-old Aussie actress, but Musk continued to stew about Twitter. He had a
call with Agrawal to discuss engineering processes at the company and he
voiced his gripes about fake users and spam that flooded his replies.

Agrawal listened, and tried to assuage his newest board member by acting
as a sounding board. When Musk sent him a screenshot of a bot he had
come across on Twitter after the call, Agrawal texted back within the hour.

“We should be catching this,” he responded.

Musk’s initial hours on the small Hawaiian island were anything but
restful. He stayed up late into the night browsing Twitter and at 2:37 a.m.

local time reshared a chart showing graphs of the differences in how people
of different political parties trusted different news outlets. Then he trained
his attention on another set of stats. An account called @stats_feed tweeted
the top 10 most followed accounts, placing his own in eighth place, with 81
million followers. Ahead of him were @BarackObama (131.4 million
followers), soccer player @Cristiano Ronaldo (98.8 million followers), and
singer @LadyGaga (84.5 million followers), but none of the accounts
posted at the volume that he did—some hadn’t tweeted in days—and he
wanted to know why.

“Most of these ‘top’ accounts tweet rarely and post very little content,”
he wrote in the witching hours on Lanai. “Is Twitter dying?”
It was an observation that might have felt innocuous from someone who
was new to the platform. Of course celebrities posted less. They had teams
of social media experts and communications people dictating, editing, and
vetting what they could or could not say, and for most of them, posting was
about self-promotion or the pushing of products (#ad). Musk was one of the
few celebrities who controlled his own account entirely and tweeted with
reckless abandon. He found it incomprehensible that he was atypical, a
celebrity with a massive platform shitposting, replying to fans, and duking
it out in the marketplace of ideas. He observed that Taylor Swift had not
posted for three months and Justin Bieber had tweeted only once in 2022—
this was a travesty to a man who couldn’t go a few hours without jabbering
away online.

From a board member, however, Musk’s post was an attack on the
company. Board members had a fiduciary duty to shareholders and asking if
Twitter was falling apart wasn’t exactly the greatest endorsement of the
platform.

It fell to Agrawal to do some damage control. In their earlier
conversations, he and Musk had agreed to be candid with each other, and
Agrawal felt no hesitation in bluntly telling Musk off. Without thinking
much of it, he composed a long, typo-strewn text message to Musk and sent
it off, not bothering to ask the board’s advice. He was the chief executive
after all, and wanted to be firm.

“You are free to tweet ‘is Twitter dying?’ or anything else about Twitter
-but it’s my responsibility to tell you that it’s not helping me make Twitter
better in the current context,” he wrote to Musk, an hour and a half after the
billionaire’s tweet. “Next time we speak, I’d like to you provide you
perspective on the level of internal distraction right now and how it hurting
our ability to do work.”
Musk responded forty-nine seconds later.

Bzzzt. “What did you get done this week?”
A seven-word slash at Agrawal’s heart. Never mind that he had spent
much of his week corralling Musk, explaining Twitter’s operations, fielding
his questions, and announcing his appointment to the board. Dealing with
Musk felt like a full-time job, but the billionaire had taken aim at his work
ethic. He had little time to process it before the next bomb dropped forty
seconds later.

Bzzzt. “I’m not joining the board. This is a waste of time.”
Another fifteen seconds.

Bzzzt. “Will make an offer to take Twitter private.”
The board was bureaucracy, and no one was going to tell him what to do
or how to do it. Certainly not a guy who had been chief executive for four
months.

He hadn’t given up completely on the idea of creating his own separate
social media platform either. Earlier that morning, he had been texting with
Kimbal about a Twitter-like site built on blockchain. Users would spend
tiny amounts of money to post messages, cutting out bots. As Musk slung
arrows at Agrawal, he was simultaneously texting his brother about his idea.

“I think a new social media company is needed that is based on blockchain
and includes payments,” he wrote to his younger sibling.

Still, to Musk, Twitter was unique. After all, it was where he had built a
loyal following and become one of the platform’s most prominent voices.

Other people, including Donald Trump, had tried and failed to build their
own popular social networks. Owning it was more than attractive, and with
Tesla’s shares still flying high, he had the means.

Agrawal was shell-shocked. He read Musk’s one-two punch over again,
then fixated on the knockout blow.

“Can we talk?” Agrawal typed back. Musk didn’t text back.

As he waited for a response that would never come, Twitter’s chief
executive called Taylor, Twitter’s chairman. He quickly laid out what had
happened and said he hadn’t been expecting Musk to go from 0 to 100 over
such an innocuous text. Taylor read through the text screenshots that
Agrawal sent, equally surprised. Until then, the chairman had felt that his
and Twitter’s relationship with Musk had been going swimmingly. Since the
Airbnb meeting, they had worked in lockstep to meet Musk’s demands and
announce his appointment to the board. A few days earlier, Taylor had even
sent the Tesla chief a link to a tweet of “Twitter’s next board meeting”
featuring a photo of Musk, from his appearance on Saturday Night Live, in
which he was dressed as a character from the Super Mario video game
franchise, sitting at a conference table with normally dressed young
professionals. Musk reacted with “Haha.”
That Saturday morning, Taylor was wondering how the man whom he
had welcomed with open arms was now holding a gun to his head. “Parag
just called me and mentioned your text conversation,” Taylor texted Musk
at 5:10 a.m. in Hawaii. “Can you talk?”
Musk scanned the message and drafted a reply. He didn’t change his
tone. Between texts from his brother he sent his response. “Please expect a
take private offer,” he wrote.

“I saw the text thread,” Taylor responded, his fingers racing across his
iPhone screen. “Do you have five minutes so I can understand the context?
I don’t currently.”
His phone lit up with four fast texts from Musk in a two-minute span.

“Fixing twitter by chatting with Parag won’t work.”
“Drastic action is needed.”
“This is hard to do as a public company, as purging fake users will make
the numbers look terrible, so restructuring should be done as a private
company.”
“This is Jack’s opinion too.”
Taylor understood Musk’s concerns about bots—he had brought it up in
the Airbnb meeting and with Agrawal—but why did Musk think Twitter
needed to be private to fix the issue? Even less clear was the comment
about Dorsey. Taylor knew Twitter’s cofounder had been deeply affected by
the Elliott process, but Dorsey hadn’t suggested taking Twitter private. Still,
Taylor knew that arguing with Musk would only further enrage the
billionaire. He turned down the thermostat.

“Can you take 10 minutes to talk this through with me?” he texted a few
minutes later. “It has been about 24 hours since you joined the board. I get
your point, but just want to understand about the sudden pivot and make
sure I deeply understand your point of view and the path forward.”
Musk demurred, saying he was busy and would talk to Taylor another
time instead.

The billionaire spent the rest of the day playing the hits from his Twitter
account, tweeting about his array of enemies, including the media, U.S.

senator Bernie Sanders of Vermont, and short-sellers who bet against Tesla.

By Saturday evening, Musk turned to his new perceived enemy, Twitter’s
management, and sharpened his knives. He started a Twitter poll and shared
it with his followers, asking if he should “convert Twitter SF HQ to
homeless shelter since no one shows up anyway.”
To his followers, it looked like Musk, a newly christened board
member, was just getting to work. They had become accustomed to this
trolling behavior, and the tweet, which took shots at both Twitter’s
supposedly lazy workforce and San Francisco’s social issues, was red meat
to them. To Taylor and Agrawal, however, it revealed Musk was unserious
about being a director. The cooling-off period had done nothing for his
hostility. They had to act.

“Hey—can you speak this evening?” Taylor texted Musk. “I have seen
your tweets and feel more urgency about understanding your path forward.”
Musk didn’t text back. But a few hours later, he shot off another poll.

“Delete the w in twitter?” he wrote, a change that would flip the company’s
name from a bird reference to a joke about female anatomy. More red meat.

By then, Musk was already making moves. He had informed Birchall of
his plan to leave the board and engage in a takeover. Birchall contacted
some former colleagues at Morgan Stanley, who got down to business to
engineer a plan for the boss.

A
13 > Poison Pill
s they had during the Elliott challenge, Twitter’s board enlisted their
bankers at Goldman Sachs to mount a defense. If Musk truly intended
to snatch the social media company out of their control, he had two options
for doing so. He could bring an offer to the board for them to review, and
they could choose to accept if the price was right. Or he could stage a
tender offer, naming his price per share and inviting Twitter’s current
shareholders to sell off their stock to him. The latter option was riskier for
both Musk and the board. A public tender offer could throw Twitter’s stock
into seizure, with wildly fluctuating prices as the market tried to bet on the
deal and its probability of closing. Musk would have to make more
disclosures to the SEC and they would govern the process—inviting his
most despised regulator to take a magnifying glass to his plans. And for the
board, it would rip control out of their hands. Musk could name any price,
bash the company in any way, and create chaos at every turn.

Popularized during the bull market of the 1960s, tender offers became
the weapon of choice for hostile buyers as they laid siege to vulnerable
companies. A bidder would announce their intentions by placing an ad
known as a tombstone in a national newspaper. In the ad, the bidder would
name their price, which was usually higher than the stock’s market value, to
entice shareholders into selling. A purchase offer would also be mailed to a
company’s stockholders, informing them of the opportunity to sell. Such
bids often came against a company’s board’s wishes, but shareholders
sometimes saw the chance to make some quick money, and they took the
bait.

As opposed to a tender offer, a direct offer from Musk was theoretically
more appealing for both the billionaire and the board. Musk would face
fewer regulatory hoops, and the board could negotiate. Its members could
set terms for the deal and attempt to rein in Musk until the transaction could
close.

Prolonged negotiations could also buy Twitter’s board more time. As
they had during Elliott’s attack, board members could shop for friendlier
investors and explore a sale to a more stable buyer. But in order to put the
company up for sale, they needed to decide what Twitter was worth. Its
bankers at Goldman Sachs set about developing financial models to
determine a reasonable price.

By the next day, Taylor wanted to move on from the board seat offer.

Musk was a pain in the ass, and there was no sense in keeping someone on
the board who didn’t want to be there. Moreover, he and Agrawal were now
sitting on information that was inherently material to Twitter’s stock and its
shareholders. If Musk wanted out, they would have to formally tell the
SEC. And they would have to disclose his apparent overture to buy the
company.

“Acknowledging your text with Parag yesterday that you are declining
to join the board. This will be reflected in our 8-K tomorrow. I’ve asked our
team to share a draft with your family office today,” Taylor wrote to Musk,
using a term for an SEC financial filing that Twitter was obligated to share
with the public whenever major changes occurred at the company. “I’m
looking forward to speaking today.”
It took nearly two hours for the billionaire to respond.

“Sounds good,” he wrote. “It is better, in my opinion, to take Twitter
private, restructure and return to the public markets once that is done. That
was also Jack’s view when I talked to him.”
Again, Taylor was blindsided by conversations that a sitting Twitter
board member had been having with a loud public critic and potential
bidder. Musk kept mentioning his private conversations with Dorsey as
justification for his takeover. Why was Dorsey encouraging him?
Taylor thought the board might have time to round up other potential
buyers and set off an auction. But Musk moved with characteristic swiftness
—and uncharacteristic silence. He kept as quiet as possible for three days,
leaving Agrawal, Taylor, and the rest of the board guessing at his next
moves. His Twitter account, an expression of Musk’s id and a typically
reliable barometer for what he was feeling, remained relatively inactive. His
only tweet during the period came on the evening of Sunday, April 10. It
was a single emoji of a blushing face with a hand over its mouth. (The post
was later deleted.)
On Wednesday, Musk flew from Hawaii to Vancouver for the TED
Conference, the annual confab where willing people gave inspirational talks
in front of rich people under the motto “ideas worth spreading.” Agrawal
crossed paths with him in the air as he headed to Hawaii for some time off
with his family. Musk left one girlfriend, Bassett, for another, as Boucher
joined him in Canada and used the opportunity to take their son, X, to visit
her grandparents in a nearby town. But Musk didn’t join them. Instead, he
worked with Birchall from room 1001 at the five-star Shangri-La,
hammering out an offer for Twitter.

It was an unusual transaction for Musk. The billionaire and his
companies were not known as big spenders. SpaceX rarely made
acquisitions, and Tesla had completed only about a dozen deals in its
lifetime, the most notable being its $2.6 billion acquisition of solar energy
company SolarCity in 2016. Even that transaction was highly suspect.

Musk had been SolarCity’s chairman, and it was speculated that he had
approved the deal to bail out a floundering company founded by his two
cousins, Peter and Lyndon Rive. Acquisitions typically went against Musk’s
ethos. He sought to run his companies as efficiently and cheaply as
possible, and usually pushed Tesla and SpaceX to find in-house solutions
rather than purchase other firms.

Even taking into account the handful of deals he’d orchestrated at Tesla
and SpaceX, Musk’s push for Twitter simply had no comparison. He wasn’t
buying the social network to glom it on to an existing company. He wanted
it for himself. If there was any precedent, it was Jeff Bezos’s $250 million
purchase of The Washington Post in 2013, widely perceived as a goodwill
project to save one of the great institutions of American journalism. Musk
buying Twitter was more than two orders of magnitude larger than that deal,
and would give him control over one of the most trafficked and influential
sites of the modern internet.

That Wednesday afternoon, Musk broke his monastic silence and texted
Taylor. Musk typically made decisions impulsively and enjoyed stepping on
the occasional rake, but this time he carefully chose his words. His message
seemed to have been vetted by advisers, with a tone that was far too formal
to have been tapped out by his own thumbs. Immediately, Taylor
understood that Musk was completely serious about going hostile.

“After several days of deliberation—this is obviously a matter of
serious gravity—I have decided to move forward with taking Twitter
private,” Musk wrote. “I will send you an offer letter tonight, which will be
public in the morning. Happy to connect you with my team if you have any
questions. Thanks, Elon.”
The two executives had a tense phone call after Musk sent the message.

Musk was cold and blunt. He would not tolerate any negotiations, he told
Taylor.

“I am not playing the back-and-forth game,” Musk said. “I have moved
straight to the end.” His offer would be firm and final, he said.

If the deal didn’t work, Musk said he would consider unloading his
Twitter stake, potentially sending the stock’s price spiraling downward.

“This isn’t a threat,” Musk said. He simply had no confidence in Agrawal,
and the investment was junk if he couldn’t call the shots and make changes
as he saw fit.

Taylor played it cool. “Send the offer,” he told Musk. Twitter would
give it a fair consideration and get back to him. That was all Taylor could
commit to, and he refused to be sucked into a debate about the
qualifications of current management. They ended the call with Musk
directing any further questions to Birchall.

Musk had tapped Birchall’s network of Morgan Stanley bankers, and
they had rallied to meet his demand for a quick acquisition of the social
media company. For such a complex transaction, Musk’s letter, which was
sent that evening, was shockingly brief, a mere 145 words. It was also a
radical departure from the belated disclosure Musk filed with the SEC
announcing his investment, in which he declared that he would remain a
passive shareholder, not using his stake to sway the company. Everything
had changed.

Bret Taylor
Chairman of the Board,
I invested in Twitter as I believe in its potential to be the platform for free
speech around the globe, and I believe free speech is a societal imperative for
a functioning democracy.

However, since making my investment I now realize the company will neither
thrive nor serve this societal imperative in its current form. Twitter needs to be
transformed as a private company.

As a result, I am offering to buy 100% of Twitter for $54.20 per share in cash,
a 54% premium over the day before I began investing in Twitter and a 38%
premium over the day before my investment was publicly announced. My offer
is my best and final offer and if it is not accepted, I would need to reconsider
my position as a shareholder.

Twitter has extraordinary potential. I will unlock it.

The letter was serious, but had a callback to Muskian lore. The price,
$54.20, was a pothead reference and a callback to his 2018 attempt to take
Tesla private. It would value Twitter at about $44 billion. Musk shared a
laugh with Birchall over the weed reference, before settling in for the night
with Boucher.

At 4:23 a.m. while hanging with the pop singer in his Vancouver hotel
room, he tweeted a link to an SEC filing.

“I made an offer,” Musk wrote.

>>> TAYLOR CALLED AN emergency board meeting on Thursday morning,
April 14. The discussion was sobering. Musk had accelerated rapidly from
bizarre threats to what seemed to be—despite the trolling joke in his
proposed price—a real offer to buy Twitter.

They needed to give Musk serious consideration, Taylor instructed. It
was their duty to shareholders to weigh the offer carefully, especially
because it represented a premium on Twitter’s current stock price. But it
wasn’t clear to the directors that Musk’s offer was one of conviction, or if
he might leave them twisting in the wind.

Twitter would need to fend him off, at least for a little while, the board
decided. They had to survey other buyers and suss out whether another
competitive bid was possible. And even though Musk had firmly said he
wouldn’t negotiate, he was the richest man in the world. Maybe they could
squeeze him.

They also decided that Taylor, Lane Fox, and Pichette should be
responsible for managing the deal-making with Musk on a special
transaction committee. Each of them were independent directors, without
the same biases and ties to the company as Agrawal. And none of them had
had extensive previous dealings with Musk like Durban, who had consulted
with Musk on his botched take-private of Tesla in 2018.

The board said publicly that it would “carefully review” Musk’s
proposal. But privately, its members agreed to implement a “shareholder
rights plan,” or a company defense better known as a “poison pill,” a tactic
developed by company boards in the 1980s to shield themselves from the
corporate raiders. A poison pill would mean flooding the market with new
Twitter shares that existing shareholders would be able to buy at a steep
discount. If implemented, the move would likely damage Twitter’s share
price by increasing the supply of outstanding shares. But it would also make
it incredibly expensive for Musk to keep buying up shares to accumulate a
controlling position.

Musk’s offer was certainly a premium on Twitter’s share price, which,
after recovering in recent weeks, hovered around $45. But many Wall Street
analysts believed Twitter was worth far more—after all, its stock had been
above $70 just a year earlier. The social media company could reach those
heights again, some firms insisted, urging the Twitter board to seek a higher
price from Musk.

While Twitter’s board huddled on a video call, Musk was on the move.

He strode onto a glossy stage in Vancouver that morning, wearing a crisp
white shirt beneath a black overcoat, plopped down in an armchair and
pulled his ankle up across his knee, revealing shiny motorcycle boots.

These would be his first public remarks about his Twitter offer, and the
audience at TED sat with rapt attention.

“I do think this will be somewhat painful, and I’m actually not sure I’ll
be able to acquire it,” he said to his interviewer.

In his discussions to join the board, Musk had talked with Agrawal
about his concerns of free speech, content moderation, and the supposed
liberal influence on internal decision-making. At the conference, he
ratcheted up that rationale even further, positioning himself as Twitter’s
savior. He didn’t care about the money. He was doing this to wrest control
of the internet’s town square from its censorious overlords.

“This is just my strong, intuitive sense that having a public platform that
is maximally trusted and broadly inclusive is extremely important to the
future of civilization,” he said. “I don’t care about the economics at all.”
Once he stepped off the TED stage, Musk upped the ante, goading the
board with a tweet. “Taking Twitter private at $54.20 should be up to
shareholders, not the board,” he wrote, hinting at his nuclear tender option.

>>> INSIDE TWITTER, MANY employees were aghast. Could Musk really buy
the company? What changes would he make?
But some cheered the idea. Musk had fans throughout Silicon Valley,
and Twitter was certainly no exception. They celebrated the idea of a
decisive leader. Others believed that Twitter had caved too easily to liberal
ideals and lost sight of its moral mission—allowing all conversations to
thrive.

Sensing their voices were not the majority, Musk’s internal cheerleaders
broke away from the frenzied chatter in the company’s Slack channels and
formed their own group, titled #I-Dissent. The name was a nod to their
opposing views on Musk, and the channel quickly became a battleground.

Employees bickered and went back and forth about the pros and cons of
Musk buying the company.

The fear and anger brewed into a toxic stew and Agrawal scrambled to
address his troops. He took a red-eye from Hawaii on the night of April 13
—the same day he’d arrived in the islands—and landed back in the Bay
Area early the next morning. Once on the ground, he called into the board
meeting, then prepared for an emergency all-hands meeting with his
workers, in front of whom the chaos was playing out publicly via frantic
tweets.

To many tweeps, Musk was antithetical to the people-first, empathetic
culture they had signed up for. Some tweeted jokes to mask their concerns,
with one employee quipping that they had moved a therapy appointment to
attend the Agrawal-led all-hands meeting. Others began updating their
résumés. Later, one engineer would create a widely shared internal
document titled “Reasons Not to Work for Elon Musk,” with two dozen
bullet points of the billionaire’s character failings, among them his early
COVID denial, extreme wealth, and online bullying.

The pushback about Musk’s purchase on internal chats was loud and
furious. Employees clung to the news of other potential acquirers. Some
workers made impassioned pleas for their bosses to reject Musk’s bid, while
others glued themselves to their Twitter timelines and began a crash course
in corporate finance. What was a poison pill and how would it work? Would
it change the price of their own stock grants? What grounds could the board
use to reject Musk’s offer, and what would it take to make another offer
viable? Employees from around the world dialed in to the video meeting,
which started at 2:05 p.m. in San Francisco.

Agrawal tried to rally them, telling them he believed “everything would
work out as it should.” His workers pressed him to say more about the deal
and asked why he hadn’t been more transparent with them when Musk first
started buying up stock in the company.

“This provides all of us with this moment where we feel distracted,
where we feel a loss of control,” Agrawal told employees. “I am personally
going to spend my time focusing on things I can control, and I believe it
will matter.”
One employee said Musk had placed them in a hostage situation,
essentially cornering the company’s management into selling Twitter.

“I don’t believe we are being held hostage,” Agrawal said to them all.

The comment didn’t instill confidence. Twitter’s staff wanted
leadership. Some wondered why Agrawal didn’t use his Twitter account to
fight back while Musk bashed them. It was the kind of thing they could
have counted on Dorsey to do. Trying to encourage calm, Agrawal seemed
rigid and his answers rehearsed, as if he was reading off a script.

“I believe Twitter stands for way more than one human, any human, me
or anyone else, and their values. Twitter stands for open, public
conversation,” Agrawal said. “It is best defined by everyone who uses the
service.”
Given his answers, some employees thought Agrawal was already
resigned to the outcome. He told them to ignore the noise Musk was
making and focus on their jobs, since that was the only thing within their
control, and that he would do the same.

What did he just say? Employees frantically messaged each other. Was
their chief executive really just going to bury his head in the sand while the
richest man in the world lambasted them on Twitter?
It wasn’t Agrawal’s first testy all-hands with employees, but it left many
wanting more. Dorsey, for all his faults, projected stability and knew how to
wield his influence. Agrawal seemed unprepared for the battle ahead.

ACT II > >
A
14 > “Bring the cattle”
s soon as Musk tweeted on April 14 that he had made an offer for
Twitter, everyone on the platform began taking sides. A contingent of
Trumpers, right-wingers, and libertarians, who believed the company had
inappropriately censored accounts that shared their political beliefs, cheered
the move. Musk was their savior, the man who nobly sacrificed his own
money to rescue society.

“Elon Musk is willing to do what only he can do,” wrote Dinesh
D’Souza, a right-wing political commentator known for denying the results
of the 2020 U.S. presidential election. “He is putting a substantial chunk of
his vast fortune on the line to save free speech in America.”
Others were less comfortable with the idea of one human controlling
one of the most important pieces of digital real estate. Fred Wilson, an early
Twitter investor and former board member, called the platform “too
important to be owned and controlled by a single person.”
“The opposite should be happening,” he wrote. “Twitter should be
decentralized as a protocol that powers an ecosystem of communication
products and services.”
But unlike email, Twitter wasn’t a protocol. It was a business and a
public one, making it possible for a motivated individual with the highest
net worth on earth to put in an offer.

>>> AFTER NEWS OF his offer broke, it didn’t take long for Musk’s phone to
light up with messages. Gayle King, the prominent television host, called
the proposed takeover a “gangsta move” and told the billionaire he was “not
like the other kids in the class.” Marc Merrill, the cofounder of video game
developer Riot Games, called Musk “the hero Gotham needs” while Adeo
Ressi sent a prayer hands emoji with hopes that his former college buddy
could fix the platform. The level of hero worship that Musk—who often
cast himself as the savior for the world’s problems—received gave him
confidence. This was the right move.

Congratulations also came from members of his inner circle. These
were some of his closest friends and company lieutenants—men he knew he
could rely on. And like courtiers, they lined up to kiss the ring.

“Thank you for what you’re doing,” wrote Omead Afshar, the de facto
leader of Tesla’s Austin operations whose official title was Project Director
for the Office of the CEO. A former ski instructor and medical device
company engineer, he worked his way through the ranks of Tesla and had
ingratiated himself with Musk by never saying no. At the automaker, he
became known among employees for his ability to manage Musk’s
expectations or translate bad news to the boss, and was given the
responsibility of overseeing big projects like the build-out of the
Gigafactory.

“We all love you and are always behind you!” Afshar texted. “Not
having a global platform that is truly free speech is dangerous for all.”
Steve Davis, head of the Boring Company, also chimed in. Like Afshar,
he idolized the entrepreneur, though people who knew him said he took it
even a tad further. Davis saw Musk as his North Star, and his life’s mission
was to help Musk achieve his idol’s dreams. As Birchall would tell others:
“If Elon asked Steve to jump out of a window, he would do it.”
Musk had texted his tweet announcing his offer to the Boring
Company’s head early on Thursday morning along with ideas for a “Plan
B” to build a “blockchain-based version of Twitter.”
“Amazing!” Davis wrote back after waking up and seeing the messages
from his boss. “Not sure which plan to root for. If Plan B wins, let me know
if blockchain engineers would be helpful.”
Neither Afshar nor Davis, however, were quite as jazzed as Jason
Calacanis, a tech entrepreneur who pivoted to investing and hosting
podcasts. One of his early companies had funding from Musk, and over the
years, Calacanis, a beady-eyed man with a penchant for name-dropping his
famous friends, became one of the staunchest defenders of Tesla and its
leader. He often made it known that he owned the first Model S ever
created.

Over a thirty-one-hour period starting on the day of Musk’s
announcement, the investor sent eight texts in a row before his friend
deigned to respond. Calacanis said that removing bots and spam from
Twitter would be far easier than the engineering problems faced by Tesla’s
self-driving team. He argued that Twitter’s verification system of blue
check marks should be extended beyond members of the media and
celebrities. And after getting his first reply from Musk, he suggested that
Musk immediately fire employees to cut costs.

“Sharpen your blades boys “,” he wrote. He then sent Musk some of
his own tweets outlining product ideas.

In return, Musk gossiped. He believed Agrawal, who had already
returned to San Francisco by Thursday morning, was still on vacation. He
impugned the Twitter chief’s work ethic to Calacanis, while failing to
mention that he, too, had been in Hawaii earlier that week. Twitter’s chief
executive and its hopeful buyer had, by coincidence, left the islands on the
same day.

EM
Btw, Parag is still on a ten day
vacation in Hawaii
JC
No reason to cut it short…in your first
tour as ceo
JC
(!!!)
JC
Shouldn’t he be in a war room right
now?!?
EM
Does doing occasional zoom calls
while drinking fruity cocktails at the
Four Seasons count?
JC
>>> ONE MEMBER OF Musk’s inner circle who knew better than to leave a
paper trail of texts was Birchall. Perhaps having learned from the “pedo
guy” trial, which exposed his embarrassing communications, he limited
important communications with Musk to phone calls or messages on Signal,
an encrypted app that could be configured to delete text history.

Birchall didn’t necessarily worship Musk unconditionally. He did,
however, see him as a generational leader who could usher humanity into a
new era of progress with his cars and rockets. He had relocated his family
from California to Texas in 2020, as his boss warred against the Golden
State’s COVID policies, and settled in a mansion outside of Austin to be
closer to Musk.

“Elon lives on the rails and he always comes close to the edge,” Birchall
would sometimes tell people who came to work closely with Musk. “It is
our job to keep him on the rails.”
It was Birchall who authorized Musk’s Twitter share purchases—
flaunting SEC rules in the process—and handled the paper pushing during
the board-seat rodeo. And it was Birchall who snapped into action to
backfill a plan when Musk rashly decided he didn’t want the seat but rather
the whole company. As his boss laid out his vision on the TED stage in
Vancouver, the financier was already sussing out investors who might put
money into a Musk-led Twitter. The world’s richest man would have control
and would finance the deal mostly with his own cash and debt
commitments, but Birchall sought to lessen that burden by attracting
minority shareholders.

Among those potential investors was Michael Kives, a Hollywood agent
who had represented the likes of Katy Perry, Bruce Willis, and Arnold
Schwarzenegger and founded K5 Global, an investment advisory firm.

Musk sometimes stayed at Kives’s Beverly Hills mansion when he was in
Los Angeles and dined with the agent’s celebrity friends. Kives was a
connector and had been texting with Musk two days before he announced
his bid, suggesting he should meet with Sam Bankman-Fried, the FTX
leader who hoped to make improvements to Twitter. (Kives served as one of
Bankman-Fried’s biggest hype men in Hollywood and earned $125 million
after the crypto mogul made a $700 million investment into K5.)
Kives would be one of a handful of people in Musk’s ear about
Bankman-Fried, who pushed hard to invest in Twitter. Birchall vetted
Bankman-Fried before connecting him with Musk. He also diligently
worked the phones, hitting up every connection in Silicon Valley.

Finding people who said they wanted to back Musk wasn’t hard.

Turning around a stagnant company like Twitter was unlike anything he had
done before, but his reputation was such that investors were willing to take
a risk just to curry favor or be close to him. In their eyes, Musk was the
greatest technology mind of his generation and his TED interview was a
clarion call that he was open for business. Musk’s supreme confidence in
himself was what had driven him to success at Tesla and SpaceX, and it was
that same confidence that Morgan Stanley bottled and sold in their pitch to
potential investors in his Twitter.

Morgan Stanley prepared a pitch deck for Musk’s Twitter 2.0 and
passed it around to potential investors. By 2028, the document claimed,
Twitter’s revenue would be $26.4 billion, a staggering increase from the $5
billion it accumulated in 2021. The eye-popping figure was far more
aggressive than the trajectory outlined by an optimistic Agrawal at the start
of his tenure as CEO, and it seemed improbable that Musk could quintuple
Twitter’s revenue.

To get there, the bankers told investors that Musk would decrease the
company’s reliance on advertising, which generated 90 percent of its
revenue. Within six years, the company would take in $12 billion from
advertising; $1.3 billion from a new payments business; and some $10
billion in subscription fees from Twitter Blue, an existing product that
offered improved features for the site’s fanatics. The deck also mentioned a
mysterious product known as X. While the bankers didn’t know exactly
what X would be, they still parroted Musk’s projections for 104 million
subscribers to the unknown service by 2028. Overall, Twitter would have
931 million users by then, the pitch deck said, more than triple the 217
million users that it had at the end of 2021.

The picture painted of Musk’s Twitter was one of efficiency. The
company would become a well-oiled machine, spinning off $3.2 billion in
cash by 2025, and $9.4 billion by 2028, the deck said.

At Twitter, Segal puzzled over the numbers. It was his team’s job to
make similar financial models, and short of Musk pulling a rabbit out of a
hat, his figures did not make sense, particularly as the global economic
picture worsened. Twitter’s sales executives felt the same way. Did he not
realize that the company depends on advertising and that subscription
products have provided little impact on revenue? they wondered. Some
speculated the figures were completely made up.

Still, investors—some considered the savviest in Silicon Valley—
wanted to place their faith in Musk. He dreamed of a different reality, one
where humans were multiplanetary or put computer chips in their brains or
built tunnels to avoid traffic. His appeal went beyond normal logic. He
would find a way, investors believed.

>>> ON THE MORNING OF APRIL 15, Good Friday, Twitter’s board regrouped
to decide how to handle its new enemy. The day before, onstage at TED,
Musk had revealed more about his plans for Twitter than in his
conversations with Agrawal. During their chats, Musk had at times played
coy, framing himself as a willing adviser who could easily miss the mark.

But at TED, Musk said he wanted to open-source the company’s
recommendation algorithm, allowing anyone to pore through the code that
drove certain tweets to the top of the timeline and fight back against the
“scam armies” of bots on Twitter. He also insisted that most of the site’s
content moderation rules had to be scrapped.

His tweet about going directly to shareholders with his offer also
worried Twitter’s directors. They would need to act quickly to block him.

Taylor called a vote on implementing the poison pill in order to buy them
time. The directors unanimously agreed.

If Musk continued buying shares and accumulated more than 15 percent
of Twitter, the pill would trigger, making it financially onerous for him to
continue. The stall tactic gave the company a bit more time to reach out to
other financiers and find out whether any of them could beat Musk’s “best
and final” offer. But the problem was finding any one person or
organization with the kind of money to outbid the world’s richest man.

The firm on everyone’s lips was Silver Lake. Egon Durban, the firm’s
managing partner, already sat on Twitter’s board and had been willing to
splurge on a rapid bailout two years earlier in order to rescue Dorsey.

Perhaps Durban would once again tap into the firm’s resources to protect
Twitter. Because Silver Lake already owned a significant stake in the
company, it would need to spend less than other potential acquirers.

But Durban’s position on the board made such an arrangement
awkward. When he joined in 2020, Silver Lake signed an agreement to not
acquire more than 5 percent of Twitter—part of its truce with Elliott
Management. The board would have to lift the cap, a move that Musk
would certainly attack as preferential treatment.

The other name in the mix was Thoma Bravo. The Chicago-based firm
was one of the largest private equity firms in the world and had a track
record of taking major software companies private—perhaps Twitter could
pique its interest. But even though Thoma Bravo had about $100 billion
under management, challenging Musk was a big ask—and Twitter didn’t fit
the firm’s portfolio, which focused mostly on business software.

The big tech companies like Google and Salesforce, and media giants
like Disney, of course, were options. But all of them had taken whiffs of
Twitter before and did not like the smell. President Trump had seemed to
have little interest in antitrust enforcement, but the Biden administration
had made it a top priority to investigate mergers and crack down on
corporate giants that snapped up smaller competitors. Any tech company
that submitted an offer for Twitter was daring the Justice Department and
the Federal Trade Commission to come calling.

>>> IN THE PANTHEON of American business deals, a $44 billion acquisition
does not even crack the top ten. America Online made an ill-fated $182
billion acquisition of Time Warner at the turn of the century, the equivalent
of $309 billion in 2023’s inflation-adjusted dollars. In 2015, Dow Chemical
acquired DuPont in a $130 billion merger of chemical giants. Meanwhile,
Disney paid $71.3 billion for 21st Century Fox in 2018, and United
Technologies paid $121 billion for Raytheon, the defense contractor, in
2019.

Still, $44 billion was objectively a shit ton of money. It was more than
had ever been paid for another social media company—more than double
the $19 billion paid by Facebook to acquire WhatsApp in 2014. It was also
about equal to the annual gross domestic product of Paraguay, and larger
than the GDP of Iceland, Jamaica, and Senegal. In April of 2022, it
represented about 20 percent of Musk’s net worth. (Bill Gates was the first
person on Forbes’s annual billionaires rankings to amass a net worth greater
than $44 billion. The magazine calculated he was worth $51 billion in
1998.)
That one man could accumulate such a fortune, much less be willing to
spend it on a company for ideological or personal reasons, was a testament
to the world’s widening wealth inequality. This simply wasn’t what the elite
did with their money. To buy and operate a global corporation for one’s own
pleasure was unheard of. Musk was breaking the rules of what it meant to
be rich.

But even for one of history’s wealthiest people, it was still an expensive
and complicated purchase. The vast majority of his wealth was tied up in
his Tesla shares, and offloading $44 billion worth of Tesla stock was
inconceivable. If the market perceived his sell-off as a lack of confidence in
the automaker, it could tank Tesla’s stock and hurt his loyal investors. He
also would be decreasing his control over the company. Some tech
founders, like Mark Zuckerberg, had guaranteed they would maintain
control of their companies by setting up dual-class shares and granting
themselves outsize voting power to control their boards, but not Musk. Like
Dorsey before him, he could stand to lose control over his company if
Tesla’s board turned against him—however unlikely that would be—and he
needed to hold on to as many shares as possible. He would have to find
another way to come up with money.

>>> ONSTAGE AT TED, Musk had been candid about the fact that Twitter’s
board could rebuff him. Although he didn’t share the specifics of how he
might force the deal through, taking his bid directly to shareholders in a
tender offer would be the only route left for him if his offer was not
accepted.

Of course, Musk couldn’t keep the secret for long. On Saturday, April
16, as Twitter’s employees and board members tried to set their phones
aside for the weekend’s Passover and Easter celebrations with their
families, Musk kept up the pressure. “Love Me Tender,” he tweeted that
afternoon, surrounding the title of the 1956 Elvis Presley hit with emojis of
music notes.

The not-so-veiled reference made his intentions clear to Twitter’s
directors and executives. Instead of waiting for the board to agree to his
terms, Musk could take his $54.20-a-share bid directly to the shareholders,
giving them a window of opportunity to sell their stock to him at that price
instead of the public market price of about $45. The tender offer would not
allow Musk to circumnavigate the poison pill—Twitter’s board could still
flood the market with cheap shares.

But if shareholders were eager to take Musk’s offer, they might clamor
for the board to remove the poison pill and let them sell at his higher price.

Musk had often relied on his fans to generate public pressure in support of
his positions in the past. With winking tweets, he had raised the price of a
meme cryptocurrency called Dogecoin. The Twitter deal would be no
different. It was a $44 billion game of chicken.

That weekend in Austin, some of Musk’s friends asked him if he was
worried about overextending himself. He was already trying to electrify the
world’s cars and get people to Mars; why would he waste his time on
Twitter? Musk said he would need five years to turn Twitter around. And,
he told them, running a social media company was nothing like launching
rockets or manufacturing cars. To him, it was just a website where people
posted whatever they wanted. How hard could it be?
>>> WITH THE THREAT of a tender offer on the horizon, Agrawal needed to
figure out how many of his institutional investors might take Musk’s bait.

Other directors were anxious to know, too. If they voted against Musk
without the support of investors, they would quickly find themselves in an
even more painful bind.

Lane Fox, who already had some relationships with major investors,
volunteered to coordinate the outreach. She began the process of arranging
meetings for Taylor and Pichette with firms, including the Vanguard Group,
the American investment adviser that held a 9.2 percent stake in the
company, and asset manager BlackRock, which held a 6.8 percent stake, to
gauge their sentiment. Would they sell if Musk came to them with his offer?
Each video call seemed to expand with new faces. The bankers from
Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan were there, along with a phalanx of lawyers
from two different white-shoe law firms: Gadde’s former shop, Wilson
Sonsini, and the litigation specialists from Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP.

Twitter hired both firms to represent it.

The discussions were dizzying. But one thing was clear to Agrawal:
little more than four months into the job, his leadership was on trial. If he
intended to reject Musk, he would need to show a compelling case that he
could raise Twitter’s share price higher than Musk’s offer—and do it
immediately.

While most of the board was focused on rescuing Twitter, one member
seemed to be gleefully cheering Musk on. That weekend, Dorsey tweeted,
“As a public company, twitter has always been ‘for sale,’ ” and went on to
say the board had “consistently been the dysfunction of the company.” The
public dig at his colleagues landed during their round-the-clock work and
pissed everyone off. Taylor called Dorsey and asked him to lay off his
public criticism of the company. Dorsey sullenly agreed. After their
discussion, a Twitter user pressed him about his criticism of the board,
noting he had been a member for years without trying to turn things around.

Dorsey replied, “So much to say…but nothing that can be said.”
Agrawal tried to tune out his former mentor’s subtweets. He knew that
Twitter was in a bleak position. The hope of hitting its 2023 goals for
expanding revenue and users had faded from a long shot to nearly
impossible. To win investors over, he would have to make the case that he
could run a leaner Twitter—and that meant accelerating the layoffs he had
been considering.

The cuts would have to be much more significant than he had originally
planned. News of layoffs usually sent a company’s shares rising, since
jettisoning employees meant more money on the company’s balance sheet.

And the bigger the cuts, the bigger the boost. Agrawal set his sights on as
much as 25 percent, a drastic reduction that would shatter Twitter’s friendly
culture and turn him into an enemy of his employees, but possibly—just
possibly—save the company from Musk.

Execution would matter, too. Agrawal couldn’t just get rid of
employees. He planned to cull the executive suite as well, and to drive those
who remained to build and launch new products as quickly as possible. He
had already pushed to reform the company’s annual review and bonus
process, which under Dorsey had effectively prevented managers from
ranking and incentivizing workers. Twitter’s mellow pace, governance by
consensus, and days of rest, monthly recharge days introduced under
Dorsey, would all have to disappear.

The staff reduction, Project Prism, was the ace up Agrawal’s sleeve. If
he and the board could woo investors with his plan and show they had a
way of creating more shareholder value than what was presented by Musk,
they could reject the $44 billion offer.

“No one thinks Elon credible…. yet,” Durban texted Segal on Easter
Sunday, trying to comfort him as he and Agrawal drew up the cuts. While
he didn’t know it, the investor’s language hewed closely to the private texts
between Musk and Calacanis. Both sides focused on deep cuts and saw the
workers as cannon fodder.

“You and Parag will bring the cattle,” Durban added, a crude rancher’s
reference that compared the layoff plan to livestock being sent to slaughter.

Segal responded by proposing a whopping $1 billion in cuts over the
coming year, with $700 million of that savings coming from the workforce
reduction. “Winner winner chicken dinner,” Durban cheered.

The Silver Lake partner was pleased. “We just drew three of a kind and
have a chance for a full house,” he said. “Elon has a pair right now.” If all
the numbers kept lining up right, Twitter would hold the winning hand.

Selling the rest of the board—and Twitter’s biggest shareholders—
would be another matter, Durban cautioned. The layoffs and strategy for
earning more revenue would need to be airtight.

“You’re going to be an old school great company,” Durban texted.

“I’m learning,” Segal replied. “Parag been great. I’ve done this before
but not at this pace under duress.”
“Both of you will be assassins,” Durban reassured him. “Turnarounds
make the career.”
Companies under pressure molded great leaders, he continued. The pain
would be good for Segal in the end. Iron sharpened iron. Musk’s attack
would make Segal a stronger executive.

“You guys are scared to get tossed out,” Durban noted.

“Scared is good!” Segal replied, with a caveat. “Scared of losing not
getting thrown out.”
“They’re the same thing,” Durban wrote.

That afternoon, Durban was late to a call with Twitter’s bankers and
legal advisers because he was tied up on another phone call with Morgan
Stanley’s chief executive, James Gorman. Morgan Stanley was working
with Musk, and Durban wanted them to know exactly what it was like to
orchestrate a deal with the mercurial Tesla executive.

>>> MUSK SPENT MOST of his Easter weekend continuing his trolling
campaign. He flew back to Austin on his Gulfstream jet on Saturday and
readied for a family Easter egg hunt the next day with his dog, a Shiba Inu
named Floki. The dog was a recent addition to Musk’s entourage, and the
billionaire used it as a prop to gain online support from investors in
Dogecoin. On Sunday, he dressed Floki up as an Easter bunny next to a
basket of golden eggs bearing the Dogecoin logo. The cryptobros ate it up.

Between all the Dogecoin shilling and his winking tweet about a tender
offer, Musk used his account to attack Twitter’s board members. Besides
Dorsey, they collectively owned little stock in Twitter, he announced, a flaw
that he believed meant their financial interests were not aligned with those
of shareholders. He also criticized them for earning salaries that ranged
from $250,000 to $300,000 for what were essentially part-time jobs. Twitter
would save a significant sum under his management, Musk said, simply by
no longer needing to pay a board of directors.

The board decided it should reach back out to Musk. They worried that
total silence would give Musk too much time to stew, and that he might
rush ahead with his tender offer if he didn’t believe the board was taking
him seriously.

Taylor sent him a polite yet stern text. “Elon, I am just checking in to
reiterate that the board is seriously reviewing the proposal in your letter. We
are working on a formal response as quickly as we can consistent with our
fiduciary duties. Feel free to reach out anytime.”
Musk brushed off the message, but he was eager to speak with another
member of Twitter’s board.

He’d heard that Durban, his one-time partner, had been gossiping with
Gorman at Morgan Stanley about how he was a nuisance. The Tesla takeprivate deal that Durban had worked on with Musk in 2018 had collapsed
spectacularly, and the litigation that followed ensnared many of Musk’s
high-profile backers and bankers in years of depositions and legal
discovery. It was an endless mess, and didn’t suggest that Musk would be
an easy man to work with on the biggest take-private deal in the history of
Silicon Valley.

The backchanneling infuriated Musk. He hated it when anyone
criticized him, especially someone who had once drifted through his inner
orbit. He lashed out at Durban in a text message. “You’re calling Morgan
Stanley to speak poorly of me…” Musk wrote.

Durban didn’t text him back.

O
15 > Parag’s Last Stand
n the morning of Friday, April 15, Agrawal was in Twitter’s San
Francisco offices with Gadde, finalizing the plans to enact a poison
pill strategy. But amid those discussions, his mind wandered. He pulled
Gadde into a conference room and sketched his plan for Project Saturn, the
idea he had dreamed up with Jay Sullivan to transform Twitter into a more
permissive, freewheeling platform.

The concept began as a product. In more than a decade at Twitter,
Agrawal had heard every version of the debate over online speech. It was
one area where he believed he could leave his mark as chief executive,
radically changing not only the way his company handled the content
flowing across its platform but the way the entire social media industry did.

The problem was that Twitter mostly relied on people to review tweets
by hand, a bespoke process that didn’t fit the explosive pace of the timeline,
and in which everyone wanted to second-guess the company’s every move.

Agrawal wanted to use technology to create an elegant solution.

Twitter spent endlessly on contractors who sifted through reports about
harassment, violence, and child exploitation in more than a dozen languages
from disgruntled users, trying to figure out which were legitimate
complaints. Particularly thorny situations, like breaking news from mass
shootings or questions about how to handle an account like
@LibsofTikTok, a user who drove harassment against LGBTQ people,
were escalated up to Twitter’s staff and usually landed on the desk of Yoel
Roth, who became Gadde’s content moderation deputy after Harvey’s
departure. Problems with world leaders or political figures needed to be
reviewed by Gadde herself before any action was taken. That human
process could be slow.

As controversial content flowed through the moderation process, critics
found it still sitting in their timelines. Members of Congress howled over
election interference, special interest groups highlighted discrimination and
hate speech, and misinformation went viral. Everyone had a tweet they
hated and wanted it to be removed faster, then turned around and questioned
why a tweet they approved of had been taken down. Even employees
occasionally rebelled.

Twitter’s goal was to grow—but even if Agrawal managed to attract
new users in droves, his content moderation problem would grow in
proportion. Twitter had never truly gotten a handle on harassment, and users
consistently told the company in surveys that they didn’t log on as
frequently as they did to other social apps because they experienced abuse,
or worried they might. Twitter’s toxic reputation limited its growth.

Since his whiteboard session with Sullivan months earlier, Project
Saturn had been one item among many on Agrawal’s to-do list. He hoped to
unveil his new idea with a splashy debut that summer. Saturn would slowly
begin to make an appearance on the platform, and Agrawal would order
tweaks to the system as Twitter tested it out in real time. But Musk’s
surprise offer wrecked Agrawal’s plans. Instead of an iterative public
launch, Project Saturn needed to happen at light speed.

Gadde’s plate was full with wrangling the horde of lawyers brought in
to manage Musk’s offer. So she called Roth on Saturday, April 16, yanking
her deputy away from Passover celebrations with his family. As Roth
listened, Agrawal explained his vision once more.

“I’ve been thinking about this,” Agrawal said. “We were going to have
the conversation later in the year, but we’re having it now because of Elon.”
With the takeover looming, Agrawal wanted to supercharge his plan.

“The role Twitter plays is around what gets attention, not what’s
hosted,” Agrawal said to the two trust and safety executives. “We define the
attention economy on social media. Speech on the internet is already free,
but reach isn’t and it shouldn’t be.”
Agrawal wanted only tweets in the tightest ring, the ones ranked at 1, to
be boosted by Twitter’s algorithm. Those would represent the best of what
Twitter had to offer. The lower scores would receive less of a boost from
Twitter, and users would have to seek them out if they wanted to see them.

Agrawal used Trump’s account as an example to explain his vision.

Trump had been warned so many times, but went on breaking Twitter’s
rules, the chief executive said. Those tweets would have landed the former
president in an outer circle, probably 3 or 4, and his audience would be
diminished. But under Agrawal’s new plan, Trump would never have been
banned, and he would be able to move back toward the inner circles of
Twitter over time if he behaved better.

Roth and Gadde had plenty of questions for Agrawal. His plan required
them to drastically overhaul the rulebook they had spent the majority of
their careers writing, and they would have to come up with new
consequences for misbehavior on Twitter.

Agrawal pressed Roth to move as fast as possible. He wanted to
announce Saturn within a week and needed Roth to draft fresh rules by
then, and have the product work underway. Agrawal allowed Roth to pull in
a small team of fewer than a dozen engineers, designers, and policymakers
to make the work go faster.

Roth was intrigued but a little panicked. One week was no time at all,
and he was distracted by the constant headlines about Musk’s effort to buy
Twitter. It felt like whiplash to Roth, flailing as they reacted to Musk’s
chaotic proclamation that Twitter was failing to protect free speech.

But it was also an opportunity for Roth to make dramatic repairs to the
content moderation system he’d grappled with for a decade. The rules were
patchwork, and the tools he had to enforce them were weak. Over the
course of the pandemic and Trump’s final days in office, Roth had become
convinced that Twitter needed a more sensible approach to content
moderation, and while he had done his best to make the right decisions, he
had only an inbox full of death threats to show for it.

>>> HAVING SET ROTH on the path to write up the rules for Project Saturn,
Agrawal turned to Segal and began working on Prism, his plan to slash
Twitter’s budgets.

With the poison pill in place, there were three paths available to Twitter:
First, Agrawal could devise a plan to continue to run it as a public company,
with institutional investors agreeing to back the chief executive and hold
out against a tender offer from Musk. Second, Twitter could find another
buyer, ideally one who shared the company’s values and would cause less
chaos. Finally, the board could agree to Musk’s offer and hand over the
keys.

On Monday, April 18, Taylor and Pichette met with shareholders. While
Agrawal and Segal hammered out their plans to cut costs at Twitter, the two
board members locked themselves in meetings with the company’s top
institutional investors, carefully polling them on whether they wanted to
accept Musk’s price or back the company against the erratic billionaire,
allowing Twitter to reject his offer and remain independent. Whatever their
personal views, Taylor and Pichette had to maintain an air of detachment
about Twitter’s fate as they took the temperature of their shareholders.

Within twenty-four hours, they were concerned by the feedback and
called a meeting with Lane Fox and the other board members on the special
transaction committee to discuss their limited options. Agrawal, Segal,
Gadde, and Twitter’s outside counsel called in over video lines, along with
Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan bankers. No one had good news to share.

Taylor and Pichette said that mutual fund managers and investment
companies like Vanguard and BlackRock had held large positions in the
company for years because they thought it had great potential to be the
conversation platform for the entire world—but Twitter failed to live up to
those expectations. Management, both Dorsey and Costolo before him, had
been slow and sloppy, leading Twitter to miss its opportunities.

Maybe that could change under Agrawal, investors agreed, but he was a
relative unknown to Wall Street. Could they count on him to force the
widespread changes Twitter desperately needed, or would he continue to
plod along like Dorsey? What was Agrawal’s plan to save Twitter? The
investors needed to know. Some were willing to back him, if he could lay
out a strategy for flourishing.

Other investors had their heads turned by Musk’s advances. Take his
offer seriously, they told Taylor and Pichette. The price of $54.20
represented a significant payout. Twitter’s shares might eventually rise on
their own under Agrawal’s leadership, but his future success was not
guaranteed, they thought.

The bankers couldn’t offer a white knight either. Thoma Bravo and
several other investment firms had phoned with questions about a potential
acquisition of Twitter. But none of them had put together firm offers, and it
didn’t seem like the private equity shops were serious.

>>> AGRAWAL LEFT THE MEETING tense and spent Tuesday afternoon poring
over financial models with Segal and ordering managers to finalize their
layoff lists. With Musk blabbing away on Twitter, there was no time to
waste. Agrawal would need to present the board with Twitter’s business
plan for moving forward as a public company, so its members could assess
whether Twitter had a fighting chance. If Agrawal could convince the board
and shareholders that, under his leadership, the company would soon be
worth more than what Musk offered, they could reject his offer.

Dorsey’s philosophy since the Elliott intervention had simply been to
build great products, and the users and revenue would naturally follow.

While Dorsey hired more engineers and greenlit more products, the rocket
ship never took off.

Agrawal aimed to reverse that strategy, putting finances first. He was
ready to promise the board that Twitter could clear at least 35 percent in
adjusted profit in 2023—a steep increase from the company’s best quarters,
where the figure typically hovered around 20 percent. He proposed that
from here on out, Twitter’s revenue would rise at a faster rate than its
expenses.

There would also be severe cuts across the company. The mass layoffs
would save Twitter hundreds of millions of dollars, but it wouldn’t be
enough. Agrawal planned to lay off the revenue and product leads, Falck
and Beykpour, and to close some global offices as well as several floors at
its San Francisco headquarters, trimming Twitter’s real estate footprint.

Twitter’s lavish marketing budget would also shrink considerably.

The layoffs would save about $257 million in 2022, according to
Segal’s projections. Those savings would grow in 2023, adding up to the $1
billion he had discussed with Durban. The office closures would save about
$10 million in 2023, and slashing the marketing budget would save about
$80 million that year.

The next day, April 20, the full board convened to listen to Agrawal’s
plan. This was his moment to make the case for himself and save his job.

Ever since Dorsey had approached him with the idea, he had dreamed of
leading the company—but that dream had not included being under direct
threat by Musk. He cleared his throat and looked directly into his laptop
camera.

“Recent events are a symptom, not a cause, of the problems that have
plagued us. We must face and address the root causes with urgency, and set
forward an immediate plan to address the root causes,” Agrawal said in a
script he’d prepared for the call. The root problem, according to the chief
executive, was that Twitter had grown aimlessly, adding new employees
and expenses without any solid results.

“We need to switch modes as a company,” he said. “We need to make
hard decisions that we have historically resisted, lead top-down and do so
urgently.”
As his pitch to save Twitter came to a crescendo, Agrawal was
emphatic. He knew that he could transform Twitter if he could just get a
little more time. He forced a smile, trying to make the board members feel
his optimism through their computer screens. In just five months, he’d
already managed to restructure the company and could feel the pace
accelerating. He needed them to feel it, too. But as a board member, he
couldn’t oppose Musk outright. He had to demonstrate his neutrality.

“This plan will change us and define us,” Agrawal said. “The future and
how we deliver for our shareholders is in our control, and we will succeed
or fail based on our focus and leadership through change, and how well we
execute now. We can do this.”
And how would the board know when Twitter was winning? “When we
stop thinking like an underdog and own our role as the most important
service in the world,” Agrawal said. Twitter wouldn’t be a midsize runnerup in the social media conversation—it would dominate the entire
discussion.

It was what Durban wanted to hear from Agrawal’s impassioned plea.

But other members, like David Rosenblatt, appeared to have made up their
minds. Rosenblatt, who ran the e-commerce site 1stDibs, was a keen
observer of financial markets and knew that Musk was offering a great
price. The board needed to understand Agrawal’s vision so they could
decide what Twitter was worth, and make sure that Musk’s offer was indeed
as generous as it sounded. But the deal was likely to go through, some
board members believed, and once it did, Agrawal’s plan would cease to
matter.

Then Segal stepped in to walk the directors through Twitter’s financial
outlook for the rest of 2022 and what they could expect from the business in
2023. The war in Ukraine had driven advertisers off the platform en masse,
as brands were concerned about their ads showing up next to violent
content. Twitter was $61.5 million short of its expected revenue for the first
quarter of the year, Segal said.

The war wasn’t the only headwind Twitter was facing, Segal cautioned.

The conflict would continue to cost the company money, and the economy
was weakening. Inflation was up more than 8 percent that month from a
year ago, as the Federal Reserve cautioned it might hike interest rates for a
third time and analysts warned of a recession.

Twitter was falling short. The company was on track to miss its target of
$7.5 billion in revenue by the end of 2023 by $1.85 billion. It was also
going to be 50 million users under its goal of 315 million daily users. If the
economy continued to slouch, the situation would get even more dire, Segal
explained. If Twitter remained public, he would have to break all this news
to investors at the company’s regularly scheduled earnings call on April 28.

The directors weren’t sure what to do. They instructed Agrawal to give
the plans to the bankers at Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan to review against
Musk’s proposal. The bankers would use it to tally up what Twitter was
worth and compare it to what Musk offered. If the board was going to vote
in Agrawal’s favor, its members needed to know that his vision for Twitter
wasn’t just wishful thinking. The bankers needed to give it their seal of
approval, affirming that Agrawal’s Twitter could outperform Musk’s offered
price of $54.20 by turning him down and continuing as a public company.

Only then could the board of directors offer their support without betraying
their fiduciary duties to shareholders.

The board agreed to reconvene four days later on Sunday to make their
final decision.

>>> A DAY AFTER Agrawal’s last stand, Musk surprised the board again by
announcing his most coherent plan yet to buy Twitter in documents filed
with the SEC. Morgan Stanley and a group of other lenders had offered him
$13 billion in debt financing and another $12.5 billion in loans staked
against his shares in Tesla, the billionaire revealed. Musk also signed a
commitment letter agreeing to pour $21 billion of his own fortune into the
deal. For the first time, Musk’s offer was more substantial than what he
could fit in a tweet. He was saying he had the money to cover the $44
billion sales price plus the additional $2.5 billion in closing costs.

While Musk was lining up his cash, Twitter continued to lose money.

That Thursday evening, the board of directors received a note from Segal.

The chief financial officer wrote to tell them that, in just twenty-four hours,
Twitter’s revenue projections had become even weaker.

Segal had met with his team hours after the board meeting on
Wednesday, and they told him Twitter was about $10 million short of
meeting its revenue goals for the quarter. The swirl caused by Musk’s
chaotic acquisition offer had caused some advertisers to hesitate, and
employees who were supposed to be focused on sales were distracted. It
seemed likely that Twitter would be short another $10 million by the end of
the following week and, if the chaos continued, could fall $100 million
short of the annual revenue Segal had described to the board.

“We recognize flagging these issues in such short order after
Wednesday’s meeting may cause additional questions; the business
environment is very dynamic,” Segal wrote.

Fully aware of the revenue shortcomings, the board agreed to move
forward with Agrawal’s layoff plans while they continued mulling Musk’s
offer. They voted by email to approve the plan. Even Dorsey agreed to the
cuts, responding to the email discussion with a simple thumbs-up emoji.

While the $44 billion bid hung over them, the board still needed more time
to evaluate their options. Twitter would follow Agrawal’s agenda for at least
seventy-two more hours.

On Friday, April 22, Taylor and Pichette updated the rest of the board
members on their ongoing conversations with institutional shareholders.

Most of them were interested in Musk’s offer, and it didn’t seem like
Twitter could count on them to present a show of force against Musk if he
launched a tender offer.

The tide was shifting in Musk’s favor, slowly but forcefully pulling the
board toward his irresistible promise of $54.20 per share. If the
shareholders themselves were eager for Musk’s money, the board couldn’t
stand in their way. It was time to scrutinize Musk’s financing and make sure
he could pay.

The board dispatched its bankers at Goldman and JPMorgan to meet
with Musk’s team at Morgan Stanley and get more information about his
financing. They wanted to go over Musk’s terms so they could decide
whether or not his offer was sound.

M
16 > Just Say Yes
usk’s fresh financing brought with it fresh faces. Among those
brought in to work with the mercurial billionaire was Michael
Grimes. As one of Morgan Stanley’s hard-charging rainmakers, the firm’s
head of global technology investment banking did whatever it took to
impress, from knocking on the doors of prospective clients’ homes to
snooping on his daughter’s internet usage to understand teens’ online habits.

He had even moonlighted as an Uber driver to win the company’s trust
ahead of its 2019 initial public offering, which Morgan Stanley led.

However, Grimes, a sharp-faced man, had a mixed reputation, having
overseen Facebook’s disastrous 2012 IPO in which the company’s valuation
plummeted by billions of dollars due to volatile early trading. The fiftyfive-year-old had seen it all in the Valley, but had yet to work closely with
its richest figure. This was his chance.

At his bankers’ insistence, Musk also hired merger and acquisition
lawyers from the firm Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom to support the
transaction, instead of relying on Birchall and Spiro, his defense lawyer.

Founded in 1948, Skadden was a relatively young firm competing with
other blue-chip American names, many of which could trace their roots to
the nineteenth century.

By the 1980s—a period defined by the excesses of Wall Street and
swashbuckling corporate raiders—Skadden had made a name for itself as
the go-to international law firm for hostile takeovers. While other whiteshoe firms turned their noses up at the idea of taking over another business
without its consent, Skadden saw proxy fights and boardroom wars as an
opportunity. The firm had overseen historic deals representing billionaire
Ronald Perelman’s $2.7 billion takeover of Revlon and media company
Capital Cities’ $3.5 billion acquisition of ABC.

By the 2010s, however, Skadden had become almost allergic to the
hostile takeover work on which it had built its name. Once happy to lay
waste to a company board and ram through a deal for a private equity client,
the practice was taking more of its cues from the establishment corporations
they once battled with glee. It was steady business, and by 2021, Skadden
was a top-five law firm by revenue, with annual bookings of more than $3
billion. Still, despite its successes, the firm had never truly cracked the big
consumer tech companies of Silicon Valley.

Musk’s Twitter deal presented Skadden with an opportunity to buck that
trend and do one of the most novel tech deals ever. Musk was a tricky client
who was known for his questionable legal demands and churning through
lawyers who didn’t anticipate his whims. The challenge of representing him
in the once-in-a-lifetime deal fell to Mike Ringler, a new partner on the
firm’s mergers and acquisitions team.

With a Georgetown law degree and a gleaming bullet pate, the deals
lawyer had spent twenty-two years of his career at Wilson Sonsini, which
represented Apple, LinkedIn, and, of course, Twitter. At Wilson Sonsini, he
had worked closely with some of the lawyers now representing Twitter on
the opposite side of the acquisition, and together they had closed industrydefining deals, among them Pixar’s $8 billion sale to Disney in 2006,
YouTube’s $1.7 billion sale to Google that same year, and Hewlett
Packard’s $25 billion acquisition of Compaq in 2002.

Wilson Sonsini’s lead partner on the deal, Marty Korman, one of the
Valley’s biggest dealmakers, had worked alongside Ringler for nearly two
decades, giving him unique insight into the man who sat opposite him at the
negotiation table. A broad-shouldered lawyer with a buzz cut, Korman
knew his one-time colleague had been dealt a bad hand: Ringler had no
power and was doing the bidding of one very capricious man, who often
didn’t listen to legal counsel.

Ringler at times did not even have direct access to Musk. In meetings
between the two sides’ attorneys, Ringler sometimes disclosed he hadn’t
had the opportunity to run certain terms by his client. Most of his
interactions were with Birchall and Spiro, and Ringler made it known that
his directive from Musk was to “get this deal done.” Musk anticipated
resistance to his offer, and told his lawyers that moving quickly and
aggressively would allow him to pluck Twitter out of the sky without a
protracted fight.

>>> ON THE AFTERNOON of Saturday, April 23, after more than a week of
silence with Twitter’s side, Musk contacted Taylor again. “Would it be
possible for you and me to talk this weekend?” he texted.

“That would be great,” Taylor responded. He suggested a call that
evening with himself, Musk, and Sam Britton, a banker who led Goldman
Sachs’s tech business from its San Francisco offices. Britton and Segal were
close from their days at Goldman, and Britton had spent countless hours on
video conferences with Taylor and the rest of the Twitter team over the past
week, sussing out the strengths and weaknesses of the company’s business
plan and Musk’s financing.

At 4:30 p.m. in San Francisco, Britton and Taylor dialed Musk’s cell.

After his blowup at Agrawal, when he questioned the chief executive’s
productivity, and his constant taunting tweets, Musk was more collegial. He
told Taylor and Britton he was unwavering about the price he was willing to
pay for Twitter.

Taylor had held out hope that there might be a way to squeeze a few
more dollars out of the billionaire. Securing an even higher price would
demonstrate his ability to tame the erratic billionaire and would satisfy the
investors who recalled Twitter’s heyday in 2021, when its shares had
floated comfortably above $70. Twitter had closed trading that week at
$48.93—buoyed by investors expecting that the deal would close at or
above Musk’s price. But just as Musk had told Taylor previously, he
insisted he would pay $54.20 a share. If the board rejected him, he would
go directly to Twitter’s shareholders with the offer.

Informed by his conversations with institutional investors, Taylor knew
it was a nuclear option he couldn’t risk. A tender offer would wrest any
control of the sale process away from the board, and Twitter’s chairman
feared that if he sought a higher offer, Musk would blow the whole thing
up. Taylor politely told Musk he would be back in touch shortly and ended
the conversation.

With his phone pinging constantly as Twitter’s bankers and lawyers sent
him updates, Taylor could barely get in a few hours’ sleep. But he went to
bed that evening convinced that Twitter would have to be sold to Musk.

At 11:00 a.m. in San Francisco, Sunday, April 24, Taylor joined the rest
of Twitter’s directors on a video call to make their final decision. Lane Fox
dialed in from her home in London, where she’d spent most of the spring as
she struggled with health issues. Rosenblatt and Pichette joined from the
East Coast, while Taylor and Agrawal called in from the Bay Area.

Britton walked the board through Goldman’s recommendation. Based
on everything Twitter’s management had said it might accomplish, the
company’s past performance, and the state of the stock market, Musk was
offering a fair price. JPMorgan rendered the same opinion.

Taylor calmly described his conversation with Musk the previous day.

The chairman’s demeanor reminded some of the directors of a judge
presiding over a courtroom, coolly directing his advisers, some of whom
appeared sleepless and frazzled by the frantic pace.

Their tormentor was unwilling to budge on price, Taylor said, and an
attempt to negotiate would likely end in disaster. Musk was clearly ready to
charge ahead with a tender offer if he did not get his way, and he could even
offer a lower price to Twitter’s shareholders than the $54.20 currently on
the table. He could also bail on the entire transaction, leaving the
shareholders high and dry.

The best thing to do, Taylor admitted, was to take Musk’s offer. It would
lock the billionaire in at an acceptable price and give the board some
control over how the transaction played out.

Other board members agreed. Twitter’s closest comparable public
company, Snapchat, had seen its share prices fall about 20 percent that
month, while six tech giants—Apple, Amazon, Google, Meta, Microsoft,
and Netflix—collectively had lost more than $2 trillion in market value
since the start of the year. It was a dicey moment for the wider American
economy. Market analysts who thought Musk’s offer was a lowball effort
just weeks earlier had started to change their tune as well.

Most of the board members felt resigned. Any emotions about the
prospect of selling the company to someone who planned to upend it had
fallen away, and all that was left was a grim determination to make Musk
pay full price. They were focused on their lawyers’ advice to secure the best
price for Twitter, come what may.

The conversation shifted to ensuring that Musk couldn’t weasel out of a
deal. If the board did take Musk’s offer, how could its members be certain
that the Tesla executive would follow through? He had already agreed to
join their ranks, only to flit away mere days later. Any agreement with him
would have to be airtight.

With the bankers’ recommendations in hand, the directors gave the goahead: Taylor and the transaction committee should meet with Musk and
attempt to thrash out an acquisition agreement that would bind Musk to his
price.

While the other directors dropped off the call, Taylor stayed on with
Lane Fox, Pichette, Twitter’s management team, and the phalanx of bankers
and lawyers to start hammering out what the deal should look like. The
lawyers would have to draft something from scratch, and quickly began
brainstorming shackles to ensure Musk didn’t wiggle away.

As they huddled that Sunday afternoon, Britton felt his phone buzz. The
Goldman banker was stunned. In all his years of managing complex tech
deals, he had never seen anything like the email that was sitting in his
inbox. Musk’s team had drafted up a seller-friendly agreement on their own
and were offering it to Twitter. The billionaire was completely bypassing
the ritual dance that preceded massive transactions like this one, in which
the seller outlined the deal, the buyer revised it, and the two sides
negotiated back and forth, sometimes for months.

But Musk wanted none of it. Not only had he thrown together his own
acquisition agreement, he was insisting that it be finalized and signed by the
very next morning, so that it could be announced to the public before the
stock market opened that Monday.

The draft agreement was accompanied by a letter from Musk himself.

“$54.20 has been and will remain my best and final offer, period. This is
binary—my offer will either be accepted or I will exit my position,” Musk
threatened.

Just as the board had during its meeting that morning, Musk noted that
the market had continued to decline, making his offer all the more lucrative.

“With your cooperation, we can negotiate changes that you require to be
able to announce a transaction before the market opens tomorrow that the
shareholders can then vote on. I would respect the outcome of that vote if
the shareholders prefer the management plan to my $54.20, and exit my
position entirely if that is the outcome of the vote,” Musk added.

Britton jumped in, interrupting the meeting to tell everyone about the
bizarre missive he’d just received. The conversation quickly shifted from
how to approach Musk with an agreement to how to revise the one the
billionaire proffered.

>>> AS THE NEGOTIATIONS BEGAN, Gadde, Twitter’s head lawyer, found
herself in comfortable territory. Before her time overseeing Twitter’s legal
and policy matters, she had spent ten years as a corporate governance
lawyer at Wilson Sonsini, where she had been privy to the ins and outs of
boardroom proxy fights and tender offers. She had been part of the team of
lawyers—along with Korman and Ringler—who had defended biotech
giant Genentech against an unsolicited offer from the Swiss healthcare firm
Roche and advised it to hold out for a larger offer in the depths of the 2008
financial crisis. The following year, Roche acquired Genentech for $46.8
billion, wringing out $3 billion more from the original offer.

Gadde knew that Twitter would have to lock Musk in a straitjacket of an
agreement, giving him no way to extricate himself once he signed. She
trusted Korman, her former mentor, and was confident in Twitter’s ability to
get what it wanted, telling members of her legal department almost from the
outset of negotiations that the deal was going to happen.

The speed at which Musk wanted to close the deal gave Twitter’s board
an incredible advantage. Acquisitions of this size and complexity could
typically take months or more than a year to close, as bankers and lawyers
engaged in due diligence, negotiating, and paper pushing, but Musk wanted
Twitter and he wanted it now.

So his side sped ahead. Still firm in his belief that he wouldn’t allow the
Twitter board to muzzle him, Musk refused to sign nondisclosure
agreements that would have allowed him and his advisers to review
nonpublic information about Twitter’s inner operations and finances.

Twitter’s deal team was in a state of disbelief. No normal buyer would
engage in such an expensive and elaborate transaction without first looking
under the hood. Nondisclosures were common in any corporate takeover,
and as one person who worked on the deal put it, signing one was as natural
as “deciding to wear pants when you walk out into public.” But Twitter
never sent anything to Musk before the deal was signed that it hadn’t
already made public to its shareholders. He had prevented that from
happening.

Had Musk signed an NDA, he and his bankers would have been able to
see Twitter’s depressing financial projections. Or he could have asked for
figures to do external analyses of Twitter’s user numbers or the amount of
fake and spam accounts that he professed to worry about. Had he known the
full picture, he might have lowered his offer or pulled it altogether. But his
bankers proceeded with the deal sight unseen. At Musk’s insistence, Ringler
continued to aggressively push for the deal to close.

Twitter’s lawyers believed Musk was trying to shove the deal forward at
breakneck speed to force them to balk. It seemed like a tactic: Musk
appeared to want the board to reject him, giving him a reason to launch the
hostile tender offer.

So Korman and his counterpart at Simpson Thacher, Alan Klein, came
up with a new strategy: “Just say yes.”
Wall Street had been accustomed to the “just say no” defense, a tactic
among public company boards that arose in the 1980s to deal with
corporate raiders. The idea was simple and stemmed from the idea that
boards could discourage a hostile takeover by rejecting any offer
immediately and simply refusing to negotiate with a bidder. Twitter’s
lawyers flipped this approach on its head. Because they believed Musk’s
side wanted them to stall or refuse, they advised the company’s board to
agree to Musk’s terms—which locked in his inflated price. Give no
indication Twitter wanted anything other than a quick and easy sale, they
said.

Korman and Klein could hardly believe their luck. They knew they
were dealing with a slippery character and angled for an agreement that
placed all the legal risk on the buyer.

Musk’s draft did most of that work for them. By pushing his lawyers to
get the deal done immediately, Musk undermined his own position. After
his team sent the agreement on Sunday, he was eager to finalize everything
by Monday morning.

On a video conference line that evening, Klein, Korman, Ringler, and
bankers from both sides hammered out a deal through the night. Ringler
insisted that the bankers at Goldman Sachs and JPMorgan had to stop
shopping the company around to other buyers in the private equity world.

He didn’t want Twitter’s board to back out at the last minute and
recommend another acquirer to shareholders. Korman and Klein sensed
they could get a few more concessions and marked up the agreement with
changes.

Korman was adamant that Musk had to use his own name on the
agreement. He demanded that Musk sign the document—not
representatives of one of his companies—an unheard-of move in corporate
deals that placed Musk legally on the hook. He and Klein also insisted that
Musk be personally liable to come up with all the money, aside from the
loans he had secured from his banks, to complete the transaction. In the
eyes of the two board lawyers, it had to be the way. If they agreed to the
transaction only for Musk to renege, the damage to the company’s
reputation and stock price would be irreparable.

Each side agreed to a hefty breakup fee to hold them to their word: $1
billion. If Twitter’s board went out and found a new buyer, they would have
to pay Musk the sum to walk away. Musk would have to fork over the
amount only if the deal failed because of the collapse of his $13 billion in
debt financing. But the billionaire had no other outs. Twitter’s lawyers
included a “specific performance” clause in the contract that allowed the
company to sue him to force the deal through. Musk couldn’t just change
his mind and pay the breakup fee to escape.

With little fuss, Skadden agreed to all the amendments. By about 10:00
a.m. on Monday in San Francisco, a few hours past the Musk-imposed
deadline of market open, the details of the merger agreement, a contract that
laid out the union of Twitter with a holding company controlled by Musk,
had been hammered out. Twitter’s board gathered on another video call to
discuss final steps.

The meeting was a virtual funeral. The eleven directors knew they had
done their duty—getting the best possible price for shareholders. Durban,
who had cheered Agrawal on as he sketched his plan to keep Twitter
independent, had a new fixation: making his one-time client pay.

Others, like Agrawal, had been with the company for more than a
decade and seen it through high highs and low lows. He felt pride but also
overwhelming angst. He had believed in the potential of Twitter and his
ability to help the company achieve it, and the sale seemed like an
admission of defeat. He had been chief executive for only 147 days, and it
seemed as if half of that time he had been wooing or jousting with Musk.

The rest of his tenure as Twitter’s leader would be spent transitioning the
company to new ownership.

Lane Fox had also enjoyed a long tenure on Twitter’s board and held its
mission sacred. She mused about the corner she and the directors had been
painted into, as they were forced to put a price tag above all else. Was the
share price really the only thing that mattered? What about the impact on
Twitter’s employees, or the likely destruction of the platform?
The lawyers reminded everyone that their role was simple—they were
there to represent the interests of the shareholders. The only thing to
consider was whether the people who owned Twitter’s stock were getting a
fair price and the best possible outcome.

Dorsey sat silent. His fellow board members pressed him—not for the
first time—on his relationship with Musk. They wanted to know how much
planning the two men had done behind the scenes. Dorsey had promised his
colleagues several times that he had not agreed to help Musk with the
transaction. Although most of the board members owned tiny fractions of
Twitter’s stock, Dorsey held about a 2 percent stake and stood to make
nearly $1 billion from the deal.

But Dorsey didn’t need to sell off his shares if he didn’t want to. Musk
gave him the option to roll his shares into his new ownership, allowing him
to remain involved with the company long after the rest of the directors
were gone. Had Dorsey talked to Musk about sticking with Twitter? the
board wanted to know. Dorsey swore he had no plans to roll his stake over
to Musk.

No one was sure they could believe him. Dorsey, always a cipher, had
become even harder to read after he had resigned as chief executive five
months earlier. Even the Twitter executives in the meeting—Agrawal,
Gadde, and Segal—who had spent years working alongside Dorsey, had
fallen out of touch with him.

But Dorsey’s potential involvement in a new Twitter wouldn’t change
the price that Musk paid. Several board members were livid with him and
considered him a snake. After years of backing his leadership, they thought
he had bad-mouthed them and gone behind their backs.

With that, the board voted unanimously to approve the terms of the sale
and agreed they would recommend the same to shareholders, who had to
vote to approve the deal.

As Twitter’s board voted, Musk was in Austin at the Tesla Gigafactory
with Luhut Binsar Pandjaitan, an Indonesian minister who oversaw the
country’s investments. They were supposed to discuss mining, as Indonesia
sat on reserves of minerals that were crucial for electric car batteries. But
the billionaire was distracted by the commotion of the deal.

“I think this is the craziest thing I’ve ever done,” Musk said to
Pandjaitan. “I’m going to regret this for the rest of my life.”
Just before 11:45 a.m. in San Francisco, Twitter’s shares stopped trading
on the New York Stock Exchange.

Five minutes later, the company published a press release.

Twitter, Inc. (NYSE: TWTR) today announced that it has entered into a
definitive agreement to be acquired by an entity wholly owned by Elon Musk,
for $54.20 per share in cash in a transaction valued at approximately $44
billion. Upon completion of the transaction, Twitter will become a privately held
company.

The release also included statements from Taylor and Agrawal. The
chairman chose to focus on “the best path forward for Twitter’s
stockholders.” The chief executive said he was “deeply proud” of his
employees and their work. Neither statement touched on what either man
thought was in store for the future of the company. That was left to the new
owner.

“Free speech is the bedrock of a functioning democracy, and Twitter is
the digital town square where matters vital to the future of humanity are
debated,” said Musk. “I also want to make Twitter better than ever by
enhancing the product with new features, making the algorithms open
source to increase trust, defeating the spam bots, and authenticating all
humans.”
Just after the press release went live, Dorsey reached out to Musk.

“Thank you,” he texted Musk, including a heart emoji.

“I basically following your advice!” Musk responded, so excited that he
didn’t check the message for typos before sending it.

“I know and I appreciate you,” Dorsey wrote. “This is the right and only
path. I’ll continue to do whatever it takes to make it work.”
>>> BY THE TIME the deal was announced, Twitter employees were on
tenterhooks. Most found out along with the rest of the public, reading the
press release or news stories that were passed around on text threads or
posted on Twitter. Outrage and frustration reigned on Slack.

“Oh man it would be awful if someone looked over all my Slack
messages and discovered I think Elon Musk is a thin skinned, self
aggrandizing, egotistical troll with a authoritarian management style and an
understanding of the issues involved in social media roughly rivaling that of
a well read 8 year old,” one person wrote in a Slack channel called #socialwatercooler, where employees gathered to crack jokes and banter.

It was easy enough to find the dissenters, as they mouthed off in Slack,
and reignited the criticism of Musk from when the company had first
announced his joining the board weeks earlier. Still, there were plenty of
employees who welcomed Musk, or at least didn’t immediately dismiss
him.

That camp had become disillusioned with the lack of growth and
innovation at Twitter or seen their ambitions and ideas sidelined by a
checked-out Dorsey. And they saw Musk’s track record at Tesla and SpaceX
as more than enough proof that he could lead a turnaround at Twitter. They
found a place to commiserate in Slack channels like #I-Dissent, and their
reactions ranged from cautiously optimistic to downright gleeful. Rolling
the dice on Musk was better than slogging through the malaise that had
plagued the company since Dorsey’s tenure.

“I remember the first oneteam in SF where Elon was a guest and
everyone loved him,” one employee wrote on Blind, an anonymous chat
app for workers. “Then the herd found out later that Elon disagrees with
them on some issues and they became enraged, threw tantrums on Slack
and denounced him from the human race.”
Dorsey chimed in that evening on Twitter. He chose to communicate his
feelings about the sale of his company with music, sharing a not-so-subtle
link to a Radiohead song titled “Everything in Its Right Place.”
Just to make sure no one missed his meaning, Dorsey fired off more
tweets, extolling Musk and laying out his complicated views on the beast he
created.

Jack
@jack
I love Twitter. Twitter is the closest thing we have to a global
consciousness.

10:03 PM Apr 25, 2022
1.1K 5.9K 27K
Jack
@jack
The idea and service is all that matters to me, and I will do whatever it
takes to protect both. Twitter as a company has always been my sole
issue and my biggest regret. It has been owned by Wall Street and the
ad model. Taking it back from Wall Street is the correct first step.

569 5K 31K
Jack
@jack
In principle, I don’t believe anyone should own or run Twitter. It wants to
be a public good at a protocol level, not a company. Solving for the
problem of it being a company however, Elon is the singular solution I
trust. I trust his mission to extend the light of consciousness.

4.7K 17K 70K
Twitter’s employees couldn’t help but think that Dorsey was looking for
a scapegoat. He had known the stakes and expectations of running Twitter
as a business when he rejoined the company as CEO in 2015, and while it
was noble to think that Twitter could be a protocol instead of a corporation,
he and the other cofounders had made the decision to head in the opposite
direction years earlier. Employees also saw an incredible irony in calling
Twitter a public good and then endorsing its sale to the world’s richest man.

They mocked Dorsey’s phrases “singular solution” and “extending the light
of consciousness” in group chats.

Some executives who had also become disillusioned with Dorsey by the
end of his tenure began to speculate about their former boss. They
wondered if Twitter’s creator had actually been speaking to Musk about
buying the company earlier than previously known, and began to ask if his
August 2021 visit to SpaceX’s Starbase in Texas was where Dorsey kickstarted a takeover conversation. They never found solid evidence for their
theories.

One person who was bothered by Dorsey’s message was Agrawal.

Dorsey was the reason he was CEO, but Dorsey’s wooing of Musk had
completely undermined his position. After the acquisition was announced,
Agrawal didn’t follow Dorsey on a victory lap. Instead, he sent a curt email
to his executive team, telling them to put the layoffs on hold. “Given our
announcement today, we will not be moving forward with Prism,” Agrawal
wrote. “While we will continue the work to build the best Twitter and
operate efficiently, the Prism plan is no longer the right path forward. Please
know that you are still under NDA and should continue to keep Prism
strictly confidential. Thank you for all the work you did to get here, and for
your leadership now as we move forward.” Although they didn’t know it,
the deal spared Falck and Beykpour from the chopping block.

Executives didn’t get any other directives from their leader for the rest
of the day, leaving them to fixate on the headlines just like their underlings.

It was the first of many times that Agrawal’s communication during Musk’s
disruptions would leave employees wanting more. But he didn’t know what
else to say. The process had drained him. At an all-hands meeting with
employees that day, his message wasn’t uplifting. “Once the deal closes, we
don’t know what direction this company will go in,” he told Twitter’s
employees.

Agrawal would later tell a confidant that Musk was unlike anyone he
had ever had to deal with. There was just no way to assess Musk’s baseline
behavior on any given day. Agrawal could normally get a measure of the
abilities and limits of the people he worked with, using that as a gauge to
predict how they would act, he told his friend.

“With Elon, he can always take it to another level,” he said. Musk could
always do something crazier. Working with him was next to impossible.

V
17 > Golden, Golden
ijaya Gadde had barely slept by the time the deal closed. The
negotiations had stretched Twitter’s chief legal officer thin as she
stayed in constant communication with the board’s lawyers. The comfort of
reuniting with familiar faces at Wilson Sonsini had quickly worn off as they
sprinted to comply with Musk’s demand to sell one of the world’s most
prominent social media companies in twenty-four hours.

This was her first brush with one of Musk’s favorite operational tricks—
imposing an impossible deadline and testing people by seeing how quickly
they could race to meet it.

On the afternoon of Monday, April 25, she held a call with her legal and
policy employees. Gadde was direct, but her strong vocal fry became more
pronounced when she spoke in front of large groups, a side effect of her
nerves. She projected certainty even as her voice cracked: Twitter has a
watertight deal with Musk. That meant that at some point, they should
expect Musk to own the company, and with that would come some drastic
changes, she said.

Gadde had a reputation for stoicism. But as she recited her teams’
accomplishments and impact, she began to tear up. They should take pride
in the work, she said, and encouraged them to continue doing so, no matter
the outcome of the sale. It was a tribute to all they had accomplished that
Twitter was worth $44 billion.

With the deal signed, Dorsey dove in. That Tuesday, he started
backchanneling with Musk in earnest, telling the Tesla executive that he
would help set priorities for the transition and get Twitter’s management in
line. In a text message, he downplayed the abilities of Agrawal, having
named him only five months prior as his ideal successor.

“He is really great at getting things done when tasked with specific
direction,” Dorsey wrote, making Agrawal sound like a freshman in need of
a homework assignment. “Would it make sense for you me and him to get
on a call to discuss next steps and get really clear on what’s needed? He’d
be able to move fast and clear then.”
The trio gathered on a video call at 5:00 p.m. in San Francisco. Dorsey
had prepared an agenda that covered Twitter’s biggest problems and
outlined short- and long-term goals, and Musk tore into it immediately.

Following Dorsey’s advice, he began directing Agrawal on how he wanted
Twitter to be run.

Agrawal tried to explain his own views. There were reasons Twitter had
moved slowly, and particular roadblocks it needed time to overcome, he
said. Dorsey sat back, watching his successor and his idol debate.

It was clear that Musk was getting frustrated. He fired off a new
demand at Agrawal: fire Gadde. He viewed her as the architect of Twitter’s
censorship regime. Twitter needed to become a more lax, anything-goes
environment, Musk believed, and he was unwilling to wait for change.

Agrawal was appalled. Musk didn’t seem to understand that, although
he had signed a contract to buy Twitter, he didn’t own it yet. Until Musk’s
money transferred, Agrawal was still the CEO, and he would hire and fire
whoever he liked. He looked to Dorsey, who had worked in lockstep with
Gadde for years, but Dorsey remained impassive.

Agrawal refused. Gadde would stay, he said firmly. Musk was free to do
whatever he wanted once he owned Twitter, but until then, Agrawal would
call the shots.

Musk was furious. All he heard were excuses for why Agrawal had
failed to execute and why he wouldn’t try hard enough in the coming
months to meet Musk’s expectations. Keeping Gadde at the helm of
Twitter’s content moderation was inexcusable, Musk believed.

“You and I are in complete agreement,” Musk wrote to Dorsey after the
call ended in a stalemate. “Parag is just moving far too slowly and trying to
please people who will not be happy no matter what he does.”
Just as Dorsey had waived the opportunity to stand up for Gadde, he
threw Agrawal under the bus. “At least it became clear you can’t work
together,” Dorsey responded.

It took two days for news of Gadde’s meeting with her staff to leak, but
by Wednesday, April 27, of that week, Politico had a story: “Twitter’s top
lawyer reassures staff, cries during meeting about Musk takeover.” Saagar
Enjeti, a conservative podcast host, tweeted a screenshot of the headline,
but put a different spin on it. “Vijaya Gadde, the top censorship advocate at
Twitter who famously gaslit the world on Joe Rogan’s podcast and censored
the Hunter Biden laptop story, is very upset about the @elonmusk
takeover,” he wrote, tagging Twitter’s prospective new owner.

Within two hours, Musk responded. If Agrawal wouldn’t fire her, Musk
could always turn up the heat. “Suspending the Twitter account of a major
news organization for publishing a truthful story was obviously incredibly
inappropriate,” he wrote.

Twitter’s decision to block links to the New York Post story about
Hunter Biden’s laptop was easy to attack since the company itself had
already admitted it made the wrong call. But Musk needed to vent, and this
was his way of throwing his toys out of the crib when he didn’t get what he
wanted.

Over the years, Gadde had faced waves of abuse for Twitter’s policy
and enforcement decisions. She had faced death threats after Twitter banned
Trump’s account in the wake of the January 6 riot at the Capitol. That
experience and others had inured her to the abuse that stemmed from tough
policy decisions. But Musk’s post ignited something else. His comment was
retweeted more than 50,000 times, including by many right-wing
sympathizers. Some of them added racist commentary and called her an
ungrateful immigrant. As the abuse cascaded, some business leaders,
including former Twitter CEO Dick Costolo, slammed Musk for attacking
an employee.

Twitter’s lawyers had slipped a line into the merger agreement that
prohibited Musk from disparaging the company or its executives in his
tweets, but Musk had little regard for his contractual obligations. He would
say what he wanted.

Employees at Twitter tried to find a silver lining as threats rained down
on their top lawyer. Perhaps Musk’s tweets violated his agreement not to
bad-mouth the company, and Twitter had a way to escape from the
transaction, they speculated.

Gadde, however, tried to calm them. Even if Musk’s missives
technically broke the agreement, she knew that the company would never
jeopardize the $44 billion deal over a tweet.

“Letting this cycle pass and focusing on the important work we do
everyday is the best path forward,” Gadde wrote on Slack.

The cycle did not pass—at least not as expected. As he saw comments
about Twitter’s chief legal officer flooding in beneath his tweet, Musk
became even more fixated on Gadde and what he saw as a great injustice
against the New York Post.

Agrawal attempted to manage the situation as best he could. Not
wanting to upset the deal, he posted a vague tweet a few hours after Musk’s
that attempted to defend his colleague without further fanning the flames. “I
took this job to change Twitter for the better, course correct where we need
to, and strengthen the service,” he wrote. “Proud of our people who
continue to do the work with focus and urgency despite the noise.”
On Twitter, the CEO’s post was pilloried as spineless. It didn’t mention
Gadde or Musk by name, and seemed like a sterile message crafted by
public relations staffers. Agrawal knew that he was muzzled from saying
more, and in the meantime, he took the blame and dealt with more
immediate matters. He authorized Twitter’s security team to provide
around-the-clock detail at Gadde’s San Francisco home in case the online
attacks translated into real-life ones.

Having learned to disassociate from the platform, Gadde stopped
reading the notifications on her Twitter account—but her protective
husband, a start-up founder named Ramsey Homsany, could not remove
himself. He monitored her replies as the abuse rolled in.

Gadde wanted to get on with her work and life. That night, to mark the
signing of the deal, Twitter’s executives had organized an outing together. It
was game five in a best-of-seven NBA playoff series between the Denver
Nuggets and the Golden State Warriors, and Twitter had some of the best
seats in the house.

They would be blowing off steam in a “bunker suite” at San Francisco’s
Chase Center. Twitter had signed a multiyear deal for access to the fully
catered, subterranean lounge underneath the stands, which also came with
seats near the court and cost the company millions of dollars. The suite was
one of Segal’s favorite haunts and, with Dorsey’s permission, he had signed
off on the lavish expense to give executives and salespeople a place to woo
important clients. (Dorsey maintained his own suite in the stadium, with
seats he didn’t have to share with his employees.) But that night, the
bunker, fully stocked with wine, top-shelf booze, and charcuterie, would be
used for the executives’ own pleasure.

Gadde was excited for the game—anything to take her thoughts away
from a sleepless and mind-bending ninety-six hours. She was determined
not to be affected by Musk’s trolling. But the optics of Gadde sitting
courtside as Musk railed against her content moderation policies worried
Twitter’s communications team, and security staffers fretted about keeping
her safe. A top communications staffer called Gadde and said it would be
awkward for her to attend while so many people were feeling sorry for her.

What if a camera captured her there cheering and broadcast it to a national
television audience? And what if Musk caught wind of that?
Gadde, who had stayed silent throughout a week of Musk’s
provocations, felt disappointed. While the rest of the executives who had
worked on the deal watched the Warriors win and advance to the next round
of the playoffs, she had to follow the game from home.

>>> GADDE TRIED TO distract herself with work. Agrawal called another
meeting with her and Roth to discuss Project Saturn. This time he brought
Sullivan, his product lead, to meet with the trust and safety team as they
hashed out what the future of Twitter would be.

“Our current approach appears to be one where we are swimming
upstream. It feels unsustainable,” Agrawal said, his voice laced with
exhaustion. The chief executive had been pushed to the brink by Musk over
the past two weeks and he couldn’t recall a time he’d worked longer hours
on a more frenetic series of problems.

“No matter how good our policies and enforcement are, without
fundamental shifts in product, transparency, and control, we’re not solving
for the global optimum of people feeling that they can trust us and that they
can feel safe speaking on the service,” he continued.

Roth walked the executives through his draft for Saturn. They hated it.

Although Agrawal had insisted users ought to know which ring they
were in, and how to progress to a better one, he didn’t like it once it was in
front of him. It seemed creepy and surveillant, he said.

Gadde and Sullivan agreed. The ranking system felt like a social credit
score, the kind of surveillance system that an authoritarian regime might
use to track its citizens and determine their trustworthiness. In her time at
Twitter, Gadde had staked her reputation on fighting surveillance and
government overreach. She had fought back against governments who tried
to convince Twitter to identify pseudonymous users and resisted calls to
remove dissident tweets. She had blocked the CIA from accessing Twitter’s
firehose and challenged gag orders from the Justice Department that
prevented Twitter from speaking publicly about surveillance requests it
received from the U.S. government. Gadde didn’t want Twitter to institute a
content moderation system that resembled a surveillance apparatus.

Sullivan tried to put it gently—the idea was right, but the
implementation was wrong.

“With clear published rules and norms, and transparency about why
someone is in the state they’re in, you’ve provided sufficient information
for fairness and trust to exist,” Sullivan interjected. “In that world, you may
still not like that one company is making a judgment.”
After sprinting through the harrowing week that culminated in the sale
of Twitter, Roth was tired and frustrated. He had to go back to the drawing
board.

A product manager named Keith Coleman stepped in to help. Coleman,
a former Google executive who came to Twitter in 2016 when the company
bought his small start-up, had decamped to Hawaii during the pandemic to
pursue his passion for surfing. Early in his career at Twitter, Coleman had
been responsible for boosting the platform’s stalling user growth. But in
recent years, he had begun experimenting with content moderation
products.

Inspired by Wikipedia, which allowed anonymous internet users to
write and edit its corpus of encyclopedia entries, Coleman had dreamed up
a similar system for Twitter. He called it Birdwatch, and it allowed Twitter
users to fact-check controversial tweets and add notes to them with more
context. The notes could debunk misinformation or correct the record as
fresh headlines emerged. Wikipedia’s army of editors enabled the site to
move at light speed, and the site was often updated within minutes after
news of a celebrity death or an international conflict broke.

Coleman’s idea was that Twitter could do the same, letting users fix
misinformation on the platform faster than its content moderators could. In
January 2021, he began rolling out Birdwatch, which quickly became
popular with Twitter’s leadership. Alongside Dorsey’s nascent investment in
Bluesky, Birdwatch showed that Twitter was opening its gates to users,
letting them have more control over their experiences on social media.

Since he’d become a darling of the C-suite based on Birdwatch’s
success, Coleman seemed like a natural partner for Roth as he redesigned
Twitter’s content moderation strategy.

While Roth and Coleman tried to reimagine what Saturn would look
like, Agrawal and Sullivan focused on rallying the troops. Roth wasn’t the
only Twitter employee who was burned out and frustrated—employees
were quitting Twitter in droves, and those who didn’t barely wanted to
work.

On May 4, Agrawal held a company-wide meeting to talk to employees
about Musk’s looming acquisition. While he waited for workers from
around the world to log in to the virtual meeting, the beat of Jill Scott’s hit
“Golden” blared incongruously through the office, defiantly wallpapering
over the grim mood. “I’m living my life like it’s golden, golden,” Scott
crooned as disgruntled employees filed into Aviary, the event space in
Twitter’s headquarters where workers gathered in person for all-hands
meetings.

Agrawal had come down with COVID and stayed home but told his
staff over a video line, “We are shifting our focus back to our work.”
The chief executive quickly kicked the conversation over to Sullivan, to
the disappointment of some employees who still hoped their leader would
speak candidly with them about Musk. Sullivan tried his best to inject life
into the room.

“One of the things I’m hearing is, ‘Why bother?’ ” Sullivan said. “We
have responsibility to hundreds of millions of people every day, all over the
world. They are using our products to communicate and participate in
conversations about the most urgent and important things happening on
earth.

“We don’t know what the future is going to hold, but what we’ll know
is we left it all on the field for the people who rely on us every day,” he
said.

Sullivan then walked through the work that lay ahead, including
Agrawal’s vision for Project Saturn. Although the secret content moderation
overhaul wasn’t ready to be revealed to all of Twitter’s employees, Sullivan
hinted at what was coming.

“Social media is in a crisis of confidence right now,” he explained.

“We’ve been ahead of our peers and there’s something we can do there with
product mechanics. People producing more healthy content can get more
exposure, and people have more control if they want to see the wild and
woolly.”
Some employees rolled their eyes at the pep talk, while others were
invigorated. But most focused on Agrawal, who sat silently on the screen as
his deputies owned the conversation. They wanted to hear directly from
him.

>>> WITH THE MERGER agreement signed, Musk’s quest for funders went
full-steam ahead. The billionaire’s bankers had already secured $13 billion
in debt financing that would be leveraged against Twitter, leaving Musk
needing to come up with $33.5 billion—enough to cover the rest of the $44
billion price tag and $2.5 billion in closing costs.

The cash needed to cover that astounding figure would come from
different sources. Musk, of course, already had a 9.6 percent Twitter stake,
which amounted to $4 billion. There was the possibility he could sell off
shares in Tesla or SpaceX to raise money. And Musk had also secured a
$12.5 billion personal loan that had used his shares in Tesla as collateral.

Musk viewed the personal loan as something of a stopgap. It was
incredibly risky to layer a loan on top of a volatile asset like Tesla’s stock,
where Musk’s decisions could swing the price and add or shave off billions
of dollars in valuation on any given day. Knowing this, the billionaire had
already started courting investors in mid-April to raise outside funding. And
in those conversations, one person in particular had stood out to his advisers
as a potential cash cow.

Along with Jared Birchall and Michael Kives, Michael Grimes pushed
to get Sam Bankman-Fried to invest. Wooed by the FTX leader’s head
spinning accumulation of wealth—he was already reported to be worth
more than $22 billion at thirty years old—and his coterie of connections
from Tom Brady to Bill Clinton to Tony Blair, Grimes told Musk the crypto
billionaire would be willing to put at least $3 billion and up to $10 billion
into Twitter. Grimes called Bankman-Fried an “ultra genius and doer
builder” in the mold of his current client.

“Does Sam actually have $3B liquid?” Musk asked the banker, skeptical
of the crypto entrepreneur. Musk continued to dodge him.

“Sorry, who is sending this message?” Musk wrote to Bankman-Fried
on May 5 after the crypto billionaire texted him, despite having been
connected to the FTX leader twice via message.

Bankman-Fried never put into the deal any of the billions he promised
to Grimes and others, though Musk did invite him to roll over his existing
stake in Twitter—about $100 million—to convert into shares in his private
company. (Musk would later claim that Bankman-Fried never did.) Six
months later, FTX collapsed and Bankman-Fried landed in jail for
defrauding customers. He was later sentenced to twenty-five years in
prison.

Musk had privately described the opportunity to invest in his Twitter as
“oversubscribed,” meaning there were more investors than shares available.

It might have been true, or it might have been a bit of salesmanship, but
Musk went around with a donation box in hand as if he was a member of
the PTA raising money for a new school library. The figures he discussed
with his friends were eye-watering, out of reach for all besides the yachtowning class. He had texted Ellison on April 20 recommending that the
Oracle founder invest at least $2 billion or more and selling him on the
“very high potential” of his company.

“Since you think I should come in for at least $2B…I’m in for $2B ,”
Ellison wrote back four days later, just a day before Twitter announced the
merger agreement.

“Haha thankss :),” Musk replied.

While Morgan Stanley had sent around a pitch deck to potential
investors, some of Musk’s friends backed him on gut instinct alone. They
had an unwavering faith in his entrepreneurial ability, with some asking to
get into the deal to forge tighter connections to him. Marc Andreessen, the
heralded head of venture firm Andreessen Horowitz, texted Musk that his
fund was ready to drop in $250 million with “no additional work required.”
Musk’s conversations were with a who’s who of the world’s rich and
elite. There was Reid Hoffman, a former PayPal associate and LinkedIn
cofounder, who told Musk he’d probably be able to put in $2 billion from
one of his venture capital funds. There was also Satya Nadella, the CEO of
Microsoft, who was connected to Musk by Hoffman; Sean Parker, a
cofounder of Napster and first president at Facebook; and John Elkann, heir
to the Italian dynastic family the Agnellis. He texted with James Murdoch,
the son of News Corp mogul Rupert Murdoch and a Tesla board member,
and his wife, Kathryn, who asked if Musk would bring back Dorsey as
CEO. (“Jack doesn’t want to come back,” Musk replied. “He is focused on
Bitcoin.”)
Not everyone that Musk or his bankers approached, however, forked
over checks. Founders Fund, the venture fund founded by Peter Thiel,
Musk’s PayPal cofounder and frenemy, was among the tech investors who
seemed unimpressed by the venture.

Thiel was not a fan of Twitter. “We wanted flying cars, instead we got
140 characters,” Thiel famously once said, mocking Twitter’s original value
proposition. His firm passed when approached by Musk’s team. Morgan
Stanley also reached out to a diverse group of potential backers including
Japanese investment conglomerate SoftBank, former New York City mayor
Michael Bloomberg, and Joe Rogan.

Even some of Musk’s closest associates couldn’t meaningfully
contribute. Kimbal declined to invest. Antonio Gracias, the financier who
promised his friend that he’d go “to the fucking mattresses no matter what”
for his old friend, did not deploy money from his private equity firm, and
only made a personal investment. The same went for David Sacks, the
former X.com colleague who had helped remove Musk decades earlier. The
men had made up since then, with Sacks, a successful entrepreneur in his
own right, becoming enamored with the power and opportunity that came
with being close to Musk. But when Musk asked if Sacks’s fund, Craft
Ventures, could invest, the investor demurred.

“I don’t have a vehicle for it (Craft is venture),” he texted Musk on
April 28. Venture funds, which raise money from outside investors like
pension funds and school endowments, typically have narrow areas or
focuses in which they agree with their funders that they can invest in. “I’m
in personally,” Sacks added, noting that his personal investment “would be
mice-nuts in relative terms.”
One friend who was very enthusiastic about helping Musk was Jason
Calacanis, the angel investor and podcaster who continued to provide
advice on how to run Twitter and to offer his services. “Board member,
advisor, whatever…you have my sword,” he texted Musk in the days before
the billionaire signed on the dotted line. While Calacanis had never been
involved in a take-private transaction like this, he pushed the billionaire to
allow him to establish a “Special Purpose Vehicle” (SPV), or shell company
in which investors could pool their money to invest. Instead of seeking
large checks in the hundreds of millions of dollars from individual
institutions, an SPV allowed entities that wanted to invest single-digit or
low two-digit million-dollar checks to get into the deal. But it also gave
Musk less control over who he allowed to invest, and he became frustrated
with his swordsman.

“What’s going on with you marketing an SPV to randos?” Musk texted
Calacanis. “This is not ok.”
Calacanis recoiled like a puppy being yelled at by its owner. This was
how he invested, he assured Musk, and he had fundraised more than $100
million in commitments. He stared at his phone as a barrage of texts arrived
from his lord.

JC
People really want to see you win.

EM
Morgan Stanley and Jared think you
are using our friendship not in a good
way.

EM
This makes it seem like I’m desperate.

EM
Please stop.

Calacanis’s noisy roundup of micro investors made it appear as though
Musk couldn’t secure the famous executives and blue-chip firms needed to
close the deal. Begging for a million here and two million there undercut
Musk’s claims that he was “oversubscribed.” It made Twitter look less like
the deal of the century and more like a GoFundMe campaign.

Calacanis would reach out to Birchall to smooth things over before
returning to his texts with Musk. This was a deal that captured the world’s
imagination, he said, massaging the billionaire’s ego. Everyone wanted in.

“And you know I’m ride or die brother—I’d jump on a grande for you,”
Calacanis texted, misspelling grenade. Would Musk do the same for his
loyal friend?
>>> BY MAY 5, Musk had secured commitments from outside investors to
invest $7.1 billion into his deal. He filed a document with the SEC to
disclose the money and show that he was serious, though behind the scenes,
Musk’s plans were not all rosy. Despite Ellison’s texts a few days earlier
about investing $2 billion, the filing showed him contributing only $1
billion.

There were other interested parties, however. The Qatar Investment
Authority, which had more than $460 billion in assets, committed $375
million. As a condition for the deal, the Gulf State asked for Musk to attend
the 2022 FIFA World Cup Final, which it was hosting later that year. There
was also funding from Vy Capital, a Dubai-based venture fund founded by
former Goldman bankers. The firm—which counted Birchall’s son as an
analyst—had already invested hundreds of millions of dollars in Musk’s
Boring Company and Neuralink, and agreed to contribute $700 million to
the Twitter deal.

Sequoia Capital, the famed backer of Apple, agreed to $800 million.

Andreessen Horowitz upped its earlier commitment of $250 million to $400
million. Musk had earned fortunes for some of these firms in the past, and
they put their faith in his track record.

Musk also left room for crypto money. Even without Bankman-Fried,
he saw plenty of opportunity in the FTX head’s crypto contemporaries.

Morgan Stanley pitched the deal to Brian Armstrong, the chief executive of
Coinbase, and to the Web3 Foundation, an organization that sought to
develop other decentralized digital currencies beyond Bitcoin. But it was
Binance, the world’s largest crypto exchange, that pulled the trigger. The
company, led by an enigmatic Chinese-born founder named Changpeng
Zhao, was flush. It facilitated more than $75 billion in daily trading volume
of cryptocurrencies including Ethereum, Dogecoin, and others. It
committed $500 million to Musk’s cause with the intent of weaving
blockchain technology into the social network.

>>> ON THE AFTERNOON of May 6, Musk walked through the glass doors of
Twitter’s San Francisco headquarters for the first time since his deal was
announced. He was about half an hour late, but he strolled unhurriedly
across the lobby.

Although he preferred to surround himself with a handful of his most
trusted associates, on this overcast Friday, Musk was accompanied by two
people he barely knew: Kristina Salen, a bleach-blond executive who had
recently left her job overseeing the finances of World Wrestling
Entertainment, and Pat O’Malley, another financial executive with decades
of experience in tech.

Salen and O’Malley had been dispatched to audition for Musk by
Grimes and his team of bankers at Morgan Stanley, who seemed to be
aware that the billionaire would likely require some adult supervision as he
remade Twitter to his liking. Either of them would make a fine chief
financial officer, Grimes thought.

It was quite clear that Musk did not understand the terms of the $44
billion deal. The day before, he had finally inked a nondisclosure agreement
that would give him access to private information about Twitter’s finances
and technology. He told James Murdoch that he was in San Francisco to do
“due diligence” on Twitter.

But the period for due diligence was long gone. If Musk had wanted a
peek under the hood to inform his purchase, he would have needed to get it
before signing the merger agreement. As Twitter’s buyer, he was entitled to
information about the company—but whatever he learned couldn’t change
the terms of his contract.

Salen and O’Malley trailed Musk into a flashy fishbowl of a conference
room on the second floor of the company’s offices. The room was at the
center of a suite decked out with giant hashtags and bird paraphernalia,
which Twitter used to entertain statesmen, celebrities, and major
advertisers.

Segal shook Musk’s hand and invited the billionaire to sit down across
from him at the table. The room was packed with about twenty bankers,
lawyers, and Twitter staffers, but one person was notably absent: Agrawal.

He instead dialed in on a video screen at the head of the table, still fighting
off COVID.

Twitter’s chief financial officer tried to push past the awkwardness of
sitting down with Salen and O’Malley, his potential replacements. It wasn’t
clear to Twitter’s team why the two executives were there, and whether they
were advising Musk on the deal or being considered for full-time roles.

Segal handed Musk a single sheet of paper that outlined the basics of
Twitter’s performance over the past several years. There were only about
ten lines on the sheet, ticking through the company’s key financial data like
revenue, profits, losses, and user numbers.

Musk scoffed. “I want to see the most detailed spreadsheet you have,”
he demanded.

Several members of Segal’s staff flinched. The finance department used
hundreds of spreadsheets to manage budgets, sales figures, and revenue
projections. Twitter’s active-user tallies were calculated by engineering
teams outside of Segal’s direct management chain, and those employees
probably used hundreds of their own datasets to arrive at the figures. The
most detailed spreadsheet at Twitter was not something anyone had ever
considered.

Segal tried to redirect. “Let’s just start at the right altitude,” he
suggested. Twitter could always round up data for Musk later.

Musk was persistent. He didn’t want a bird’s-eye view of what was
going on at Twitter. He wanted to dive into the data, wherever it happened
to be. At Tesla and SpaceX, he was known for peppering engineers about
minutiae to do with car parts or rocket engine designs, and he expected
those who worked for him to know the answers or be able to find them
quickly. He commanded Segal to bring him details.

As they went back and forth—Segal trying to keep Musk focused on the
one-pager and Musk insisting he needed to see more—some of the CFO’s
staff believed they were watching their boss lose his job in real time.

Finally, Musk agreed. “Okay,” he said. “We’ll do what you suggested.”
Segal steadied himself and began rattling through Twitter’s metrics as he
had dozens of times for investors over his five years at the company.

Salen and O’Malley, taking cues from Musk, pressed Segal on the
details and raised esoteric questions to demonstrate their skill and
experience. He politely but stubbornly kept deflecting, trying to keep the
meeting on the rails while Agrawal stayed muted, concealing his coughs.

Although the meeting focused on finances, Musk briefly turned his
attention to the problem of bots. All he had to do was open his replies and
he faced an onslaught of messages that were obviously not from real users.

He pulled out his cell phone and demonstrated.

His own experience was Musk’s most vivid guide, and he was
convinced that Twitter was plagued by far more bots than it had ever
admitted to investors. The company included a disclosure in each of its
earnings reports that claimed fewer than 5 percent of its users were bots or
spam accounts. Musk wasn’t buying it. That wasn’t his experience, as
scammers often created accounts that mimicked his username and profile
details to hawk cryptocurrency scams or peddle fake goods.

Agrawal broke his silence to describe the way Twitter arrived at its
figure. The company pulled a sampling of accounts at random each quarter
and reviewed them to see how many spam accounts had bypassed its filters.

He’d also been working on improving Twitter’s automated detection
systems, Agrawal added, to make it harder for spammers to spin up fake
accounts in the first place. And Musk’s account was a bad example of a
regular user’s experience on the platform—he had tens of millions of
followers, making him a natural target for scammers who wanted to trick
his fans into their crypto schemes.

Musk felt he was being duped. The Twitter people kept telling him: Just
trust us. We have a system. You don’t need to look too closely. He wanted to
make his own assessment with raw data, and it seemed like the executives
were still stalling. The meeting lasted more than three hours, stretching into
the evening as Musk continued to hammer the executives for more details.

He exited the office into the San Francisco darkness wholly unsatisfied.

Musk immediately called Alex Spiro, convinced that Twitter’s
management was lying, and insisted that the lawyer get him what he
wanted. Now.

Spiro, used to these kinds of after-hours demands for urgent action, sent
a request to Twitter’s board lawyers that very night. As everyone who had
worked alongside Musk knew, it was pointless to give him a vague
summary—he would insist on looking at the details and making up his own
mind.

Included in a list of other items Musk wanted to see in preparation for
the acquisition, Spiro asked for access to Twitter’s so-called firehose, a realtime feed of all the tweets flowing through the platform and the associated
engagements, such as likes and retweets. The firehose was akin to a Twitter
timeline that followed every single account. Twitter siphoned from the
firehose to make its quarterly bot estimates, Agrawal had told Musk during
the meeting. So the billionaire wanted to see it.

The firehose was a peculiar piece of Twitter technology. The raw,
unfiltered information was public, at least in theory, but no user followed
every account on Twitter as it would make their experience of the site
unusable. Twitter allowed news organizations to access a version of the
firehose so they could detect breaking news before it landed on their
reporters’ desks, and some media outlets paid to receive alerts as topics
bubbled up on Twitter. Researchers could also gain access to the firehose
and to study the platform and its handling of hate speech, misinformation,
and other hot-button issues.

But the company also protected the firehose as proprietary, and it did
keep some portions of the dataset a secret. After Dorsey became enmeshed
in the protests surrounding the police killing of Michael Brown, Jr., Twitter
cut off the CIA and other intelligence agencies from accessing the firehose
in 2016. The company believed that its data could be easily turned against
activists and other users, and that intelligence agencies shouldn’t be allowed
to take advantage.

The nuances about who was allowed to access the firehose, and how
much data they could collect, made it the perfect wedge for Musk and
Twitter to battle over. The billionaire had no respect for Twitter’s
deliberative and meandering governance. Twitter executives, perhaps
naively, thought that if they just explained the years of reasoning behind
their decisions, the billionaire would understand. But few could reason with
Musk once he had made up his mind.

M
18 >
usk wanted to pump the brakes.

On Sunday, May 8, he texted Michael Grimes about his worries.

The following day, Russian president Vladimir Putin was due to give a
speech on the status of the war with Ukraine on a holiday meant to
commemorate the Soviet Union’s victory over Nazi Germany. Musk had
been telling those close to him that he had been in communication with
Putin and Ukrainian officials since the start of the fighting, and he would
later push for a peaceful solution in which Russia would obtain the disputed
territory of Crimea. It was a solution that was wholly unacceptable to most
Ukrainians, but Musk urged the appeasement of the Russian aggressors to
prevent a global war.

“Putin’s speech tomorrow is extremely important,” he wrote to Grimes
late that afternoon. “It won’t make sense to buy Twitter if we’re headed into
WW3.”
Quite the swerve. Musk had already signed on the dotted line to buy the
company—and he was in the process of asking his friends for investment.

Why was he suggesting he may not follow through? Let’s wait to see what
Putin has to say and “take stock of where things look after that,” Grimes
texted back.

Musk’s mind then pivoted to a completely different topic: the meeting
with Segal and the lack of clear answers around bots and spam. The
billionaire believed Twitter’s management was toying with him, so he
wanted to investigate everything. The more he stewed, the angrier he
became, and he started chatting with members of his inner circle about
suing Twitter executives.

“An extremely fundamental due diligence item is understanding exactly
how Twitter confirms that 95% of their daily active users are both real
people and not double-counted,” Musk texted Grimes. “They couldn’t
answer that on Friday, which is insane.”
The banker didn’t write back.

“If that number is more like 50% or lower, which is what I would guess
based on my feed, then they have been fundamentally misrepresenting the
value of Twitter to advertisers and investors,” Musk wrote thirteen minutes
later.

No text response.

A little more than an hour after that, Musk had arrived at a eureka
moment. If the bots were swarming Twitter in greater numbers than the
company had ever admitted, he should be allowed to back out of the
acquisition.

“To be super clear, this deal moves forward if it passes due diligence,
but obviously not if there are massive gaping issues,” he told Grimes over
text.

>>> AGRAWAL WAS FIGHTING on multiple fronts, but the battle for his
employees’ trust was going against him. When he was first named chief
executive, some didn’t even know he worked at the company.

Twitter’s C-suite and board, who had regular contact with the CEO,
came to like him. Similar to Dorsey, he could be quiet and cerebral, but they
found him to be warm in small groups, and he took time to listen or explain
complex engineering concepts. He towered over people like a friendly oak
tree.

Twitter’s employees had remained remote after the pandemic, however,
and most workers had only interacted with Agrawal via video calls where
he was reduced to a small box. In those company-wide meetings, he could
be robotic, frequently looking off screen as if he were reading from a script.

It also didn’t help that he could say very little to them about the deal, as
employees hungered for any scrap of information and wondered if they
would have jobs once Musk took over.

He either didn’t have the answers or was hamstrung by the various
nondisclosure agreements and legalese around nonpublic information that
came with the complex, multibillion-dollar transaction. One misstep could
jeopardize the deal, and with Musk seemingly looking for any excuse to
pull the rip cord, the novice chief executive erred on the side of caution and
relied on workshopped answers and empty platitudes.

What little internal support might have remained for Agrawal
evaporated on May 12. That morning, he sent out an email to Twitter’s
employees notifying them that most new hiring would be frozen while
spending would be cut. More important, however, he was firing two key
executives who he had planned to lay off a month earlier, before Musk’s
offer disrupted everything: Kayvon Beykpour, the head of consumer
product, and Bruce Falck, the head of revenue-generating products.

Employees were blindsided.

Beykpour’s termination was particularly harsh. A personable thirtythree-year-old with a strong jaw and easy smile, he had started his career
building apps from his Stanford dorm room and was one of the people
employees speculated would take over for Dorsey once the time came. He
bled Twitter and was married to another Twitter executive. But he had made
several missteps with the company’s products, and some workers gossiped
that Agrawal’s move was a power play as the company got ready to transfer
ownership to Musk.

In explaining himself, the chief executive did not mince words. “It’s
critical to have the right leaders at the right time,” Agrawal wrote. He said
that Jay Sullivan, who joined Twitter six months earlier during the
company’s growth phase, would replace Beykpour.

In Agrawal’s mind, the decision was simple. At the beginning of the
pandemic, the company had decided to grow dramatically, spurred by the
activism of Elliott Management. Beykpour and Falck were responsible for
driving that growth, and their projections became the basis for the
company’s announcement of its long-term goals to investors. But both
executives had come up far short of their ambitions, and “as a company we
did not hit intermediate milestones that enable confidence in these goals,”
Agrawal continued. So he opened the trapdoor and sent both men tumbling
down the chute.

The business reasoning may have been sound, but Agrawal’s lack of
emotional intelligence would hurt him. Completely surprised, Beykpour
was on paternity leave, celebrating the birth of his first child, when he
learned of his termination. It was a brutal way to conclude his seven years
at the company and he took it personally, particularly after seeing Agrawal
deal with Musk’s antics during his own parental leave a few months earlier.

“The truth is that this isn’t how and when I imagined leaving Twitter,
and this wasn’t my decision,” Beykpour tweeted that day. “Parag asked me
to leave after letting me know that he wants to take the team in a different
direction.”
Sullivan seemed to Agrawal like a natural replacement for Beykpour—
he had already been filling in for the product leader during his paternity
leave, and he had the efficient leadership style of a former Facebook
executive. But Sullivan was horrified by the decision and argued over the
phone with Agrawal about it the weekend before the axe fell, begging him
to reconsider.

Sullivan, a mild-mannered man with a verbal tic, felt loyal to Beykpour.

The product executive had recruited Sullivan to Twitter, and their lively
conversations were one of Sullivan’s primary motivations for joining the
company. Agrawal told him that Falck’s performance had faltered and
Twitter desperately needed to get its revenue business in order, but he was
vague about his motives for getting rid of Beykpour.

The firing would have a chilling effect on all the women who work at
Twitter, Sullivan argued. If they saw a top executive removed during a
family leave, they would be hesitant to use their own parental benefits. And
Sullivan himself would become the living embodiment of a decision he
believed was deeply wrong.

Agrawal agreed with it all. “I understand the trade-offs,” he said. “I
know what I’m doing.”
Then the chief executive went further. He told Sullivan that he wouldn’t
just oversee the consumer products that Beykpour had built, but would also
take on the revenue products that were Falck’s purview. Sullivan had a bit
of experience building features for advertisers, but it wasn’t his strength,
and he said so. “You’re the right leader for the right time,” Agrawal said
simply.

Sullivan hung up and called Beykpour. An apology tumbled out of him.

“This is the worst,” he kept repeating.

To some employees, the firings made little sense. It was like starting a
full bathroom remodel on a house someone else had already agreed to buy.

With Musk looming, they wondered why Agrawal decided to create more
waves and toss a lieutenant, particularly while he was spending time away
with his family. Twitter was supposed to be a compassionate workplace—at
least for now. Some tweeps felt that the company should abide by those
standards until the keys were handed over.

Sensing the tide turning against him, Agrawal took to his Twitter
account to lay out the reasoning for his recent decisions. Unlike Musk or
Dorsey, the chief executive was not a prolific tweeter. He started his
procession of tweets by acknowledging his role as a “lame duck” CEO.

While he said he expected the deal to close, the company needed “to be
prepared for all scenarios,” he wrote. He wasn’t just working to keep the
lights on.

Parag Agrawal
@paraga
People have also asked: why manage costs now vs after close? Our
industry is in a very challenging macro environment – right now. I won’t
use the deal as an excuse to avoid making important decisions for the
health of the company, nor will any leader at Twitter.

3:10 PM May 13, 2022
33 134 2.7K
Once again, his tweets made no direct mention of the billionaire who
had upended his tenure and made his life hell. But there was a veiled
reference. Agrawal said he wasn’t going to be the “loudest sound bite” and
promised to focus on “the ongoing, continuous, and challenging work our
teams are doing to improve the public conversation on Twitter.”
The thread didn’t resonate with the rank and file, and raised more
questions than it answered. It felt like the same public relations drivel they
had been force-fed since the Musk circus began. And while Agrawal said he
believed the deal would close, the qualification about preparing for “all
scenarios” led employees—and the public—to once again wonder if Musk
was serious. If employees were listening in hope of a voice of comfort and
trust, it would not come from their chief executive.

At his first meeting with Beykpour’s former product team, Sullivan
seemed dejected. “I don’t defend that. I don’t know how to defend that,” he
told them about the sudden firing. Sullivan’s candid approach made him
seem like the more humane executive.

>>> THE SHIFTING ECONOMIC landscape spared no company, not even Tesla.

While the company’s shares—and subsequently Musk’s net worth—had
entered 2022 nearing all-time highs, they began to plummet by early April,
affected by the macroeconomic environment and its chief’s own actions.

The day after Musk first announced his deal for Twitter, Tesla’s shares fell
more than 12 percent as investors worried he’d be selling off stock in the
automobile company to fund his purchase. On May 4, the company’s shares
were down nearly 17 percent from a month earlier, closing the trading day
at $317.54.

Tesla’s value was of crucial importance to Musk. Not only was much of
his personal fortune tied up in his roughly 20 percent ownership stake in
Tesla, but he had also pledged some of those shares as collateral, including
for a $12.5 billion personal loan to fund the Twitter purchase. (That
personal loan was later reduced to $6.25 billion in early May after Musk
was able to raise outside funding.)
Tesla’s shareholders also worried that Twitter would divert Musk’s
focus. Adding Twitter to the billionaire’s constellation of companies would
only further divide his limited time, they thought, and the electric
automaker needed to continue to deliver new cars and products. Moreover,
analysts, shareholders, and Tesla’s own management worried about the
potential financial knock-on effects of paying for the social network. In a
2022 financial filing, the company had previously outlined the risks of the
personal loans made to its chief executive, “which are partially secured by
pledges of a portion of the Tesla common stock currently owned by Mr.

Musk.

“If the price of our common stock were to decline substantially, Mr.

Musk may be forced by one or more of the banking institutions to sell
shares of Tesla common stock to satisfy his loan obligations if he could not
do so through other means,” the company wrote. “Any such sales could
cause the price of our common stock to decline further.”
In essence, investors and the company itself were fearful of a domino
effect. If Musk failed to pay back his loans, he would have to sell his Tesla
shares. And if he sold off his Tesla shares, the company’s investors could be
spooked and sell off their own shares. That would drive down the share
price further, leading Musk to have to sell off more shares at an even greater
discount to create the necessary cash to pay off the loans. And so on and so
forth.

In the week after May 4, Tesla’s stock dropped another 23 percent,
reducing the company’s valuation by $226 billion. One of Musk’s greatest
powers was his ability to instill confidence. But the Twitter deal sowed
doubts, and, in turn, Musk began to doubt himself. He would tell those
close to him he was unsure if he should push through with his acquisition.

(By the end of May, Musk completely did away with the remaining $6.25
billion of the personal margin loan by raising more outside funding, though
the damage to Tesla’s stock had already been done.)
As Tesla’s shares plummeted, Musk pushed harder on the bot issue, his
doubts about spam and fake accounts evolving into a full-blooded
conspiracy theory. Twitter’s executives must be hiding something from him,
and Musk pushed his lawyers and bankers to do better due diligence.

On May 9, lawyers from Skadden had started messaging Twitter’s
teams for access to the firehose. The reams and reams of data, they
believed, would allow them to do their own research and potentially prove
out their boss’s bot hypothesis.

On Twitter’s side, the requests seemed preposterous. The executives had
given Musk’s advisers the chance to sit down with their engineers for a live
demo so they could walk through their calculations. Moreover, providing
firehose access wouldn’t allow Musk’s team to determine the difference
between a real or fake user, which required private account information that
didn’t come from the enormous dataset that included only public tweets.

Twitter combed through personal information including user locations,
emails, IP addresses, and other data that simply couldn’t be shared because
of global data privacy laws.

It also defied logic. Twitter had given Musk the chance to do due
diligence on its financials and user numbers before he had agreed to sign
the deal, and the billionaire had balked at the idea. Twitter had nearly ripped
his hand off shaking on the deal.

Musk, perhaps riled up by his own conspiracy or angered by the tricky
predicament where he now found himself, began to uncork in the only way
he knew how, unleashing a steady stream of criticism about Twitter on
Twitter. He railed against Twitter’s algorithmic recommendations and, on
May 12, tweeted that he believed “Trump should be restored to Twitter.”
Then, after an evening of posting about spam, the culture war over paper
straws, and supposed media hoaxes, he fired off something that caught
everyone by surprise.

“Twitter deal temporarily on hold pending details supporting calculation
that spam/fake accounts do indeed represent less than 5% of users,” Musk
tweeted at 4:44 a.m. Austin time on May 13.

This was the public’s first real hint he was having doubts. Reporters
scrambled to see if it was even possible for Musk to halt the deal after
signing the contract.

To Musk’s inner circle, the move was seen as self-sabotage. Even if
Musk believed he had a way out of the deal, what was the use in
announcing it to the world and tipping his hand? His Twitter habit had once
again put him in a corner, and Spiro and Birchall frantically texted and
called their boss to fix the situation.

It took two hours and six minutes for them to convince Musk to act.

“Still committed to acquisition,” he tweeted at 6:50 a.m., just as much of
the American financial press was beginning to stir. It was an incredible,
confusing set of back-to-back tweets. Few knew what to think. Twitter’s
stock dropped nearly 10 percent. Tesla’s shares rose 5 percent. Musk
stopped tweeting for thirteen hours.

>>> BY THE EVENING OF SUNDAY, MAY 15, Agrawal had become fed up with
Musk’s posturing about the so-called bot problem. To Agrawal and
Twitter’s board, Musk’s logic was particularly shoddy. Correcting bots and
spam were one of the particular reasons the billionaire gave for buying the
company, after all.

“If our twitter bid succeeds, we will defeat the spam bots or die trying,”
Musk had tweeted on April 21. He then repeated the line four days later in a
press release announcing his Twitter bid. Three weeks later, what had
changed?
Agrawal had had enough. The Twitter peanut gallery had pilloried him
for appearing weak as Musk led a harassment campaign against Gadde,
even though he had resisted Musk’s private demand to fire her. He had
remained silent as Musk’s twitchy fingers used the platform he oversaw to
start the board member merry-go-round and push a de facto hostile
takeover. After spreading his wings on Twitter a few days earlier to explain
the firings of Beykpour and Falck, he felt encouraged. The Tesla chief was
just taking his crazy to another level, this time to undermine the work of his
employees.

That night he drafted a fifteen-tweet thread, vetting it with the
transaction committee and lawyers. Many of those who saw it told Agrawal
not to send it. The tweets would only antagonize Musk, they said, and there
was no point in trying to reason with someone so erratic by using facts and
logic. Agrawal could also risk jeopardizing the deal, giving Musk more
fodder to wiggle out of his contract.

But Agrawal believed in the solidity of the merger agreement and he
wouldn’t be mentioning Twitter’s potential buyer by name or handle in any
of his tweets. In Twitter parlance, it was a “subtweet,” a post that clearly
bashes another user without directly naming them. In this case, it was
abundantly clear who Agrawal was talking about, and he hit the tweet
button at 9:26 on Monday morning in San Francisco: “Let’s talk about
spam. And let’s do so with the benefit of data, facts, and context…”
The spam problem, he said, was complex and dynamic, an everevolving problem that led the company to suspend half a million accounts a
day. Using sophisticated techniques and data science, Twitter estimated that
spam accounts were less than 5 percent of daily active users. And because
of that, it was impossible for any outside party to accurately assess the bot
problem, because they couldn’t access the full wealth of Twitter’s data.

Musk didn’t care. He responded initially with a single emoji:
Elon Musk
@elonmusk
@paraga
1:03 PM May 16, 2022
3.7k 8.7K 50K
a troll move that garnered 51,000 likes, three times more than Agrawal’s
lead tweet in the thread. It was childish, but effective—a grade-schooler
winning an argument against a PhD student by calling them a playground
insult.

Fourteen minutes later, he used actual words.

“So how do advertisers know what they’re getting for their money?”
Musk wrote. “This is fundamental to the financial health of Twitter.”
Never mind that Twitter disclosed these figures in public financial
reports. And never mind that Musk had already agreed to buy the company.

He once again won the battle in the court of Twitter opinion. Agrawal’s
account went silent for a week.

U
19 > Bots and Horses
ntil Agrawal’s thread, Musk had expressed most of his ire at the chief
executive in private. He sometimes seemed to even enjoy his
discussions with Agrawal as they bonded over engineering.

Before he registered his interest in buying Twitter, Musk had poked a
little fun at Agrawal, tweeting a meme in December 2021, shortly after
Agrawal had stepped into Dorsey’s shoes, which showed Agrawal’s face
superimposed on the body of former Soviet Union leader Joseph Stalin, as
if he was executing Dorsey. While Musk had needled the board, Gadde, and
the company more generally during the hostile negotiations, Agrawal had
been spared direct attacks online. His strongly worded messages, however,
changed that. If you hit Musk, he would hit back.

Throughout May, the billionaire continued to slam Agrawal over the bot
issue and tagged him in tweets with various user complaints, as if he were a
nosy boss directing complaints to a regional manager. In one, Musk asked
why some users were unable to load his tweets: “What’s going on
@paraga?” In another, he challenged Agrawal to take action on a 2016
tweet by Hillary Clinton and called it “a Clinton campaign hoax,” insisting
it violated Twitter’s policies against political disinformation. Political
observers pointed out that Musk was simply echoing a Trump talking point.

Agrawal never replied.

Twitter’s rank and file saw the lack of public reaction as an extension of
Agrawal’s meek personality during company-wide meetings. Musk was
openly denigrating their work—on the platform they built—and their leader
said nothing. And while Musk posted like a twelve-year-old off his Ritalin,
that approach still seemed better than Agrawal’s communication blackout.

Employees began openly poking fun at their subdued chief executive.

After suffering a series of embarrassing hacks over the years, Twitter had
upped its security and forced top executives to use YubiKeys, hardware
devices that generated random passwords, to shield Twitter’s digital empire.

Once, Agrawal unexpectedly piped up in a Slack group that was open to all
employees. But rather than a comforting missive, his message was a
randomly generated collection of letters and numbers, apparently copied
from his YubiKey. Employees mocked him by posting gobbledygook
passwords of their own.

As Agrawal’s trust among the rank and file eroded, he also lost one of
his earliest supporters in the boardroom. On May 25, Dorsey
unceremoniously left Twitter’s board at the end of his term as a director. He
had made no secret of his disdain for Twitter’s board, and his
backchanneling with Musk had made him a liability during the negotiations.

The man who had helped create Twitter, who had fought so hard to be
named its CEO, had nothing left connecting him to the company besides his
multimillion-dollar stake.

>>> ON MAY 27, Musk’s private jet took off from Los Angeles bound for
Saint-Tropez and the French Riviera. It was meant to be a quick trip so that
he and Natasha Bassett could attend the wedding of Ari Emanuel, the acidtongued Hollywood mogul. Emanuel was the CEO of Endeavor, the
entertainment conglomerate that owned a talent agency, World Wrestling
Entertainment, and the Ultimate Fighting Championship, and had become a
friend and confidant of Musk’s. Emanuel’s nuptials to fashion designer
Sarah Staudinger was a star-studded affair, graced by the likes of Larry
David, Sean “Diddy” Combs, and Mark Wahlberg. The event, on a private
hilltop villa overlooking the coast, was also attended by Emanuel’s business
associates, among them Egon Durban.

Throughout the deal, Durban had avoided interacting with Musk when
possible. While he counseled Agrawal and Segal—and backchanneled
criticism of Musk to others in the financial world—he tried not to lock
horns. The small affair, however, made their interaction inevitable. On the
side of the event, Musk, dressed in a blue suit with no tie, sparred verbally
with Durban as guests milled about, unaware that one of the world’s most
consequential deals was being litigated within feet of them. Neither man got
what they wanted out of the kerfuffle and Musk flew home after less than
two days in France.

>>> BY JUNE 6, Musk was still trying to get his hands on Twitter’s firehose
data and losing patience with the company’s refusal to provide it without
guardrails governing how it might be used. Musk’s threat of building a
competitor was still ringing in the board’s ears, and they didn’t want to give
him open-ended use of all the tweets that made up Twitter.

Ringler delivered a scathing letter to Gadde that day. “Mr. Musk has
made it clear that he does not believe the company’s lax testing
methodologies are adequate so he must conduct his own analysis,” Ringler
insisted. If Twitter didn’t hand over the data immediately, Musk was
considering backing out of the deal, the lawyer added.

His message set off alarms in the boardroom. The board had waltzed
Musk into what they saw as an inescapable contract, but his threat of
backing out was still worrisome. If Musk followed through with it, he
would cause even more disruption among Twitter’s employees and
investors, and Twitter would have to file a messy, public lawsuit to force
Musk to buy the company.

Twitter’s board and chief executive saw it as their utmost responsibility
to get the acquisition over the line. Everything—employee concerns, their
pride, and even their own jobs—came second to making Musk pay the $44
billion. And with the bottom having fallen out of the stock market, they
knew there was no way the public would value Twitter anywhere near
$54.20 a share.

The board proposed a compromise for the firehose. They would give
him limited access to one datastream going back to January 2021, and thirty
days of historical information from the firehose. It could assuage Musk’s
concerns that the company was stonewalling, without giving up the entire
kingdom.

Agrawal also tried to bring Musk back into the fold, inviting him to
meet Twitter’s employees. He hadn’t led the company for very long, and
knew that a closed deal would likely be the end of his short tenure. But
there weren’t a lot of options. If Musk’s bid failed, Agrawal would have the
near impossible task of rebuilding a company with a damaged reputation.

With a sale, he could pocket tens of millions of dollars—the result of the
acceleration of his chief executive compensation package—for less than a
year of work, wipe his hands clean, and start anew, having faced off against
Musk and won.

Internally, Twitter’s workers continued to pressure their chief executive
for more information about what the hell was going on. He gave them very
little, but in Musk, he saw a potential solution to the communication gap.

Maybe he could allow workers to present their questions to their future boss
directly.

On Monday, June 13, Agrawal sent out an email to the company, saying
that Musk would be joining them on Thursday for an all-hands meeting.

Twitter’s CEO, however, was not the one who would be moderating.

Instead, the responsibilities fell to Leslie Berland, Twitter’s chief marketing
officer.

>>> BERLAND HAD NEVER interacted with Musk directly, so to prepare, she
scheduled two calls with him. She had been around large male business
egos for most of her career and had developed a way of not only navigating
but harnessing them for her own or the company’s wider benefit. As the
“Jack whisperer,” she was a sounding board for Twitter’s former chief
executive. Berland couldn’t handle everything Dorsey did—sometimes he
would make decisions or tweet major company news without vetting it with
her—but she did try to channel his energy and innate disregard for
authority. Musk was an amped-up version of that.

The man on the other side of the line, however, was a different one from
the person who tormented Twitter’s board and executives with his tweets.

Musk was personable, making small talk about his family. He was engaged,
asking what the employees at the company thought about the deal, and
interspersing the conversation with small jokes that he’d laugh at himself. It
was a pattern that would play out in various conversations with Musk and
Twitter’s executives over the coming weeks and months. On some days, he
could be completely pleasant, normal, even. On others, he was on the
warpath for blood. It depended on what else had happened that day, what he
had seen on Twitter, and who surrounded him.

Berland drew a good day. Ending the small talk, she prepared him for
questions they believed employees would ask, with Musk sharing ideas on
how he’d answer them. She told him to expect questions about why he
wanted to buy the company and predicted there would be questions about
his views on working from home and diversity and inclusion initiatives. The
conversation meandered, with the CMO trying to keep Musk on track. He
spoke of his love for the platform and his views of it as the global town
square.

Having led dozens of these meetings for Twitter employees in the past,
Berland understood there couldn’t just be easy questions. Twitter’s internal
culture was one focused on transparency, and its employees often used the
opportunity to pose uncomfortable, if not biting, inquiries to management.

It was a practice that had once been employed at Facebook and Google,
allowing executives to gauge what was important to their workforces and
giving employees a modicum of belief that they could hold their leaders
accountable. It was her job to prepare him for that.

So Berland presented some banana peels. She asked how Musk would
respond if employees asked about a looming class-action lawsuit from
Black workers at one of Tesla’s factories who alleged rampant racism. She
asked how he would answer questions about layoffs. And then she asked
about his political tweets, including those about transgender people.

In 2020, Musk had tweeted that “pronouns suck,” joining the growing
backlash against people whose gender identities didn’t conform to a binary
structure. Twitter employees feared what would happen to their trans
colleagues once Musk took over.

Later that month, Musk’s oldest child, one of a pair of twins he had with
his first wife, changed her name to Vivian Jenna Wilson, removing her
father’s last name. News outlets would later report on the name change,
which was the first indication that Musk had a trans daughter. On a legal
document, Vivian Wilson wrote that the reason for the change was “Gender
Identity and the fact that I no longer live with or wish to be related to my
biological father in any way, shape, or form.”
>>> THE MORNING OF the all-hands meeting, Thursday, June 16, Korman and
Klein wrote to Ringler, notifying him that the board had decided to hand
over some of Twitter’s firehose data. Ringler relayed the message to his
handlers as Musk readied himself for the call.

Some Twitter employees were eager to hear from Musk. There was
indeed a large contingent of workers who had already made up their minds
on their new prospective owner, but others remained ambivalent. The last
time they had heard directly from Musk was at the January 2020 OneTeam
celebration. These were very different circumstances and some wondered if
this was the moment Musk would finally reveal his grand vision for the
company.

But Musk was late. He couldn’t get his laptop to work with the Google
video conferencing software and eventually logged in from his iPhone.

Before Musk’s video started, a Google account avatar briefly flashed across
some employees’ screens. It showed two hands shaped into a 69, a number
associated with a sex act.

After a brief, halting introduction from Agrawal that was certainly read
from a script, Berland took over. Musk shifted his camera to frame his head
as if he were video chatting with a friend. An unknown man stood in the
background of his shot, fiddling with a laptop. It was a bizarre start and
somewhat disappointing for Twitter’s employees.

“Why do you love Twitter and also why did you and why do you want
to buy Twitter?” Berland asked, kicking off the conversation.

It was a softball, but Musk seemed oddly unprepared. He put his hands
to his chin in a thinking pose and stared into space for eight seconds, before
delivering an unpolished, rambling answer that spanned his own personal
enjoyment of the platform, his need to express himself, his disdain for the
media outlets that got his messages wrong, and the need for a place to
communicate freely. He segued into why Twitter needed to be more like
WeChat, the popular app in China.

“Why aren’t more people using Twitter and why do people click away
from Twitter?” Musk said. “Think of WeChat, in China, which is a great
app. But there is no WeChat equivalent outside of China and I think there’s
a real opportunity to create that. You basically live on WeChat in China
because it’s so useful and so helpful to your daily life.”
It was a strange statement to some employees. For years, American tech
leaders, including Zuckerberg and Snapchat CEO Evan Spiegel had
dreamed about making the West’s WeChat—a single, universal app where
people could chat with friends, hail taxis, order food, or make payments—
but they had little to show for it. It was true that WeChat had more than 1.3
billion users, but that was because the app was used in a country whose
government closely policed the internet and picked which apps and
businesses could be successful and used by its citizens. China certainly
didn’t allow free speech either.

Berland shifted the conversation to some more immediate employee
concerns. They worried about Musk’s ending of remote work policies and
stock compensation in a private company. They fretted about layoffs as
news outlets reported on impending cuts. Musk gave no definitive answers
but stressed that he preferred in-person work over remote, feeling that it
contributed to the “esprit de corps” of his workers. Then he laid out his very
basic principles. “If somebody is getting stuff done, then great, I love
them,” he said. “And if they are not, then I don’t like them. I do not love
them.”
“Anyone who is a significant contributor should have nothing to worry
about,” Musk later added. “I do not take actions which are destructive to a
company.”
The talk lasted for about forty-five minutes, as Musk wandered into
politics (“My political views, I think, are moderate,” he said, adding that he
just voted Republican), advertising (“I would probably want to talk to the
advertisers and say, ‘Hey let’s make the ads as entertaining as possible’ ”),
and alien life (“To be clear, I’ve seen no actual evidence for aliens”). For all
the bluster about bots over the past few weeks, Musk had little to say
beyond echoing earlier comments that he sought to make the platform better
by making it more difficult for fake and spam accounts to proliferate.

Berland also skipped the trans question.

“I want Twitter to contribute to a better, long-lasting civilization where
we better understand the nature of reality,” Musk said.

The meeting ended with most employees having no clearer sense of
what Musk would do when he took over. Those hoping for some grander
plan were disillusioned; Musk didn’t have one. But at least they knew
where he stood on extraterrestrial life.

>>> AS MUSK TALKED with his future employees, he was also working to put
down a small rebellion at SpaceX. The previous month, Business Insider
had dropped a bombshell story, reporting on the existence of a settlement
between Musk’s rocket company and a former employee, a flight attendant
who accused Musk of sexually propositioning her on a 2016 flight to
London. On his private jets, the billionaire often hired flight attendants who
were trained masseuses.

On the flight, the billionaire reportedly rubbed his flight attendant’s leg
without her consent and exposed his erect penis. According to her account,
he knew that the flight attendant was an avid horse rider and offered to buy
her a horse if she engaged in a sexual act. She refused.

The flight attendant worked for Musk for two more years, before being
convinced that her opportunities on the job had become limited. She lodged
a complaint with SpaceX in late 2018, and by that November they had
agreed to a $250,000 settlement.

In response to the story, Musk tweeted that the accusations were “utterly
untrue.” He told the outlet: “If I were inclined to engage in sexual
harassment, this is unlikely to be the first time in my entire 30-year career
that it comes to light.” When the Insider story broke, it gave some Twitter
employees brief hope it could tank the deal. On Slack, reactions ranged
from disgust to dark humor, as they mocked Musk with equine jokes and
horse emojis. At SpaceX, some workers wondered if the story was just the
latest piece of evidence of a toxic, male-dominated culture, led by a chief
executive who tweeted about sex acts and starting a university with the
acronym TITS. Months earlier, female SpaceX employees had already
spoken up about stories of sexual harassment and discrimination, which the
company brushed aside. Even after the Insider story published, Musk
continued to deny it, claiming that he doesn’t use a flight attendant and
demanding that his accuser describe any “scars” or “tattoos” on his body.

For some SpaceX employees, the story was too much. They had signed
up to work at the company because they believed in furthering mankind’s
exploration of space, but they hadn’t anticipated their CEO’s heel turn. As
Musk prepared to speak to employees at Twitter at their all-hands meeting
on June 16, they circulated an open letter within SpaceX calling their chief
executive’s behavior “a frequent source of distraction and embarrassment
for us.”
“Elon is seen as the face of SpaceX—every Tweet that Elon sends is a
de facto public statement by the company,” read the letter, which was
signed by more than four hundred people. “It is critical to make clear to our
teams and to our potential talent pool that his messaging does not reflect our
work, our mission, or our values.”
By the following day, five of the letter’s organizers were rounded up
and fired for what SpaceX president and COO Gwynne Shotwell labeled
“overreaching activism.” Others were brought into meetings with managers,
who had clearly been told to discipline their subordinates. In one such
meeting, Jon Edwards, a vice president who oversaw launch vehicles, called
the letter an extremist act. One employee replied whether Musk had the
right to sexually harass workers without repercussions. Edwards didn’t
respond directly but offered an excuse. “SpaceX is Elon and Elon is
SpaceX,” he said.

Some at Twitter saw the firings as what lay ahead in their future. Musk,
the supposed defender of “free speech,” would never be one to tolerate
criticism or dissent. And if employees did, or raised concerns, he could use
his Twitter account to undermine facts. He had plenty of well-paid,
powerful executives who had tied their success to his and were willing to
protect him. Despite the revelation of the settlement, Twitter’s board
remained focused on selling the company to Musk. Nothing could get in the
way.

>>> EVEN AS MUSK met with Twitter’s employees, his lawyers continued to
lob grenades in the background. Twitter had continued to deny their
requests for full firehose access, worried about him siphoning data for the
competing social platform he had threatened to build.

Musk’s arguments that Twitter engineers were lax in detecting bots were
ridiculous to Twitter’s leaders, who began to wonder if Musk planned to do
something else with the data. After rounds of venomous letters between
Ringler and Korman, the Skadden lawyer sent a clear shot across the bow
on June 17. “Mr. Musk made clear that Twitter’s continuing failure to
provide him with the data and information he has been requesting since
May 9, 2022 constitutes a breach of his merger agreement with Twitter,” he
wrote. “That breach remains uncured.”
Korman and Twitter’s legal team were surprised by the statement but
viewed it as just another attempt by Musk’s advisers to give him an out.

They replied three days later, with a strongly worded letter of their own.

“Mr. Musk insisted on a rapid negotiation of a merger agreement on a take
it or leave it price basis,” they wrote, and the sale agreement gave him no
right to “unfettered access to vast amounts of proprietary and competitively
sensitive data.” Then came the hammer.

“It was only after the equity markets entered a steep decline following
the execution of the merger agreement that Mr. Musk began making
statements questioning Twitter’s SEC disclosures, and asserting Twitter had
breached the merger agreement, all in an apparent attempt to create
optionality should he change his mind about the deal,” Korman wrote.

Still, the company would agree to grant Musk’s side access to the
firehose sets of data anyway and prepared to provide credentials for his
engineers to access the information. Twitter’s engineers set up the
information on a tool that allowed them to track how Musk’s side ran
queries of the data in order to audit what they were looking at. Early on,
they realized the billionaire’s team wasn’t doing much of anything with the
data or running particularly meaningful searches. The request, in their view,
had been a farce.

O
20 > Sun Valley
n June 17, Ringler sent a new letter, demanding Twitter hand over
even more information. He was no longer after just tweets but, rather,
demanded correspondence between the Twitter board and the company’s
top executives about its spam calculations, including personal emails and
text messages.

Musk’s lawyer also asked for fresh mock-ups of Twitter’s financial
state. He wanted to see the company’s updated budgets and projections for
2022, along with the financial models Goldman Sachs had drawn up when
they recommended that the Twitter board accept Musk’s offer.

Segal tried to rein Musk in, asking the billionaire to sit down with
Agrawal, who could personally walk him through the bot estimation
process. One of the company’s best and longest-tenured engineers, Agrawal
would be able to show Musk exactly how it worked in perfect detail, Segal
said on a call.

Musk agreed to an in-person meeting on June 21—but then backed out,
claiming he had a conflict. Meanwhile, his team had started playing around
with Twitter’s massive amount of data. Within two weeks, they quickly hit
the limit Twitter had imposed, preventing more than 100,000 queries per
month on the dataset, and demanded leeway to make more. Twitter raised
the cap to 10 million.

Klein and Korman, the lawyers who had steered the board through the
transaction, were worried. The request for personal messages was
completely out of bounds and suggested that Musk did not plan to go
through with his purchase. It read more like a discovery request, the kind of
probing a company would receive as part of a lawsuit. They also puzzled
over Musk’s sudden interest in Twitter’s finances. At TED, the billionaire
had proudly declared that he was unconcerned about the economics of the
deal. Why the about-face?
That month, the stock market had plunged to historic lows. Gas prices
had skyrocketed. A recession seemed inevitable. Musk’s offer had been
generous in April but was outlandish by June. The billionaire was on the
hook to overpay wildly.

>>> IF MUSK WAS STILL ANGRY about the bots or the data-sharing
information, he didn’t tweet about it. On June 22, the day after he was
supposed to meet with Agrawal, he began a nine-day period of silence on
the app. Some Twitter executives, who monitored his tweets as if they were
the weather, wondered if he was all right. Musk also cut back in private
communications with his bankers and lawyers, leaving his team hesitant to
make decisions in his absence. Within a week, news outlets, which typically
reported breathlessly on Musk’s posts, began publishing stories about his
absence from his favorite platform.

Segal had a clue as to his whereabouts. An intriguing rumor had reached
his ears: Musk wasn’t available to iron out aspects of the deal because the
billionaire had had another child.

When Segal relayed the information to Twitter, some executives and
board members wondered if it were a trick. Some information about the
negotiations had leaked, and Musk’s side might have been using a story
about a new baby as a test balloon to see if it would make it into the press
or onto the New York Post’s gossipy Page Six. So they kept the information
secret—not wanting to upset the deal—but considered sending a gift. They
never did.

Board members speculated that Natasha Bassett, Musk’s most recent
girlfriend, was the mother of a new baby. But the child, a boy named
Techno Mechanicus Musk, had in fact been born by a surrogate for Boucher
and Musk. It was their third child together, following a daughter born the
previous December. In both instances, news of the birth was kept out of the
press, with Musk keeping uncharacteristically quiet about his eleventh
known child. Prior to his sudden silence, Musk had tweeted steadily
through June about his fear of human population decline and the falling
birth rates in countries around the world. “Past two years have been a
demographic disaster,” Musk tweeted in mid-June. “I mean, I’m doing my
part haha.”
When it came to humanity’s impending doom through population
decline, Musk’s hero complex was in full force. He and his first wife,
Justine, had six children together, though their first had died tragically of
sudden infant death syndrome at ten weeks, traumatizing both parents and
contributing to their divorce in 2008.

After two stints of marriage to actress Talulah Riley, neither of which
led to children, Musk and Boucher had X Æ A-12 Musk in 2020. Then a
second child, a daughter named Exa Dark Sideræl Musk, came via
surrogate two years later.

Exa was not the child’s planned name. Boucher had hoped to name her
daughter Valkyrie but was unaware that Musk was also planning on having
twins with one of his employees, Shivon Zilis. A Canadian with piercing
blue eyes, Zilis was a venture capitalist and had met Musk while serving on
the board of OpenAI, the artificial intelligence nonprofit he had cofounded.

In 2017, he recruited her to work for Tesla and Neuralink as director of
operations and special projects.

In 2021, while carrying twins, she remained mum even to coworkers
about the identity of the father, saying only that she had used in vitro to
conceive. In November, she gave birth to Valkyrie Alice Zilis, a girl, and
Strider Dax Zilis, a boy, petitioning the following year to add Musk’s last
name, according to court filings obtained by Business Insider reporter Julia
Black.

Boucher, whose daughter was born a few months after Zilis’s twins, was
furious to learn that Musk had not only fathered other children at almost the
same time but also used a name, Valkyrie, that she had been saving for her
future daughter. She raged at Musk, one of many episodes in their up-anddown relationship, and would tell those close to her that his secrecy would
damage her attempts to build and maintain a family. Boucher wrote a poem,
titled “Letter to S,” which referenced her pain at Musk’s betrayal and
mentioned the name Valkyrie, and posted it to Twitter a few months later:
But one thing I cannot abide:
The insult to my daughter’s pride.

Zilis and Musk would take to calling their daughter Azure, perhaps in an
attempt to subside the drama. But it continued. Boucher oscillated between
various states of love and animosity toward Musk. She was kept away from
the twins and in turn sparred with Musk over access to her own son, X,
whom the billionaire often kept by his side. Like his business dealings,
Musk’s personal life was chaotic.

>>> BY JUNE 28, Roth and his small team had written a fresh white paper for
Agrawal that sanded down some of the creepy edges of Project Saturn and
included product mock-ups to show what users would see when they
investigated which ring they were in and how to move to a more popular
ring.

“At the core of recent debates about content moderation and free speech
are a set of opposing preferences: On one hand, many of the people who use
Twitter want us to moderate more, and take more significant steps to curb
the spread of potentially harmful content online,” Roth wrote. “On the
other, we hear the feedback loud and clear that some people feel we
moderate too much, or unfairly, and haven’t left enough space for people to
express themselves and connect with the communities they care about, on
their own terms.”
Agrawal liked the new version and insisted that Twitter publish it as
soon as possible, even with Musk’s acquisition seeming more precarious
than ever. He left a set of directives as a comment on Roth’s draft: “1. take
responsibility 2. enable people to have control 3. no one size fits all
solutions.”
Project Saturn was nearly ready to go. Agrawal was excited to show the
world that he was a visionary leader who could rival Dorsey when it came
to inventing new technologies. His fresh approach to content moderation
could give Musk what he wanted—a Twitter that kept nearly all speech
online—while still adhering to the company’s principle of keeping the
conversation healthy. The entire social media industry, which struggled with
the same burdens, might see what Twitter had done and follow suit.

Musk was still cold turkey on Twitter that day, staying silent on June 28,
his fifty-first birthday. Still, the backbiting on the deal continued. As
Twitter’s board grew more and more concerned that Musk was going to
walk away from the deal, they directed their lawyers to reach out to his
team on his birthday and inquire about the state of his financing so they
could get a better sense of whether he had the money.

Klein and Korman reminded Musk that he was on the hook to buy the
company and that he needed to line up the financing for it as soon as
possible. “You are not presently devoting sufficient resources and attention
to these obligations,” they wrote.

The formal request for information about his money seemed to anger
Musk, who accused Segal and Agrawal of using their lawyers to “cause
trouble.”
“That needs to stop,” he texted Segal and Agrawal the next day.

Segal made a last-ditch effort to reengage Musk. He called Musk
directly on June 30 and asked him what Twitter could do to allay his
concerns about bots. Would he please take the sit-down with Agrawal?
Segal probed, trying to figure out what Musk was really after.

Segal later told colleagues he pleaded with Musk to take another look at
the sampling process Twitter had sent him in May, which outlined its
strategy for tallying bots.

Musk, sounding bored, admitted he had never read the document.

Instead, Twitter was spending way too much, he asserted, and asked if
Segal had considered staff cuts. He also said one of his longtime confidants,
Antonio Gracias, would be taking over financial matters related to the deal.

Gracias was a handsome son of immigrants who grew up in Grand
Rapids, Michigan, and made his name by hitching his star to Musk’s rocket
ship. While attending the University of Chicago in the 1990s, he met the
entrepreneur through a law school friend and kept in touch with Musk as he
built Zip2.

While Musk lit fires in Silicon Valley, Gracias had finished his law
degree, done a stint at Goldman Sachs, and embarked on a career in private
equity. He started two of his own firms, and by 2001 he was running Valor
Equity Partners out of Chicago. He reconnected with Musk, who had by
then taken over Tesla and was in dire need of capital. Gracias obliged,
funding both Tesla and a years-long friendship, at one point providing his
buddy with a $1 million personal loan. Musk eventually rewarded him with
the second-ever Roadster, Tesla’s first car, and board seats at the automaker
and SpaceX. His stature grew with Musk’s, as did the size of his private
equity fund, which eventually came to count the Church of Jesus Christ of
Latter-day Saints as one of its largest investors.

Musk told Segal to wait to hear from Gracias. But in the weeks that
followed, Gracias never contacted Twitter’s CFO.

>>> EVEN WITH THE launch of Project Saturn imminent, Gadde was
skeptical. She was the primary architect of Twitter’s content moderation
policies and had seen firsthand how much work was required to implement
a functional rulebook. Every day, Twitter users found creative ways to test
the boundaries of her policies, and it took significant human judgment to
determine which tweets should be moderated. It wasn’t that technology
couldn’t help—she was sure that Agrawal’s plan could chip away at the
problem.

But Gadde focused on the tool she knew best: litigation. For years, she
had been deeply worried about the rising demands for censorship coming
from India. Although Prime Minister Narendra Modi ostensibly ran a
democracy, he had become increasingly autocratic about critical online
posts. Twitter found itself at the epicenter of Modi’s crackdown. As he
struggled to put down protests by farmers in 2021, Modi’s government
passed new social media legislation that required companies to remove
posts that criticized the government and placed criminal penalties on their
employees if they refused.

Gadde had several policy workers in India, and they often received
visits from government officials. She feared they would be arrested if
Twitter continued to resist calls from the government to remove content
from opposition politicians, journalists, and nonprofit groups. On July 5,
she directed Twitter to sue the Indian government, arguing that Modi had
interpreted the law too broadly. The best way to fight for freedom of
expression, at least in Gadde’s view, was in court.

>>> BEFORE SUNRISE ON FRIDAY, JULY 8, Ringler sent a letter to Gadde,
confirming the fears of the Twitter board.

“Mr. Musk is terminating the Merger Agreement because Twitter is in
material breach of multiple provisions of that Agreement,” he wrote. The
letter claimed the company had broken several of its agreements with Musk
and misled him—and the public—in its quarterly earnings reports, which he
had relied on when agreeing to the acquisition.

His lawyers argued that the company’s refusal to give him its firehose
data was good enough reason for him to abandon the deal. Musk also cited
Agrawal’s decision to fire Beykpour and Falck, and Gadde’s to pursue legal
action against the Indian government’s censorship demands. His agreement
to buy the company stipulated that its management had to keep things
running as usual until the deal could be completed—a routine requirement
that prevented resentful or reluctant sellers from recklessly joyriding the
company for months before handing it over in disrepair. By firing the
executives, Musk argued, Agrawal had gone beyond normal operating
procedure and damaged Twitter.

For some on the board, Musk’s declaration was a relief. For two
months, they’d been tiptoeing around his temper tantrums. They’d appeased
him, plying him with reams of data like a mother offering different pacifiers
to a fussy toddler. Finally, they could go to war with him instead.

One of the directors who relished the moment was Durban. “We’re
going to make him pay every fucking penny,” he said during a meeting.

Taylor was more circumspect. “The Twitter Board is committed to
closing the transaction on the price and terms agreed upon with Mr. Musk
and plans to pursue legal action to enforce the merger agreement,” the
chairman tweeted that afternoon. “We are confident we will prevail.” It was
the only thing Taylor ever said publicly about his battle with Musk.

Since he helped draw up the merger agreement in April, it had been
obvious to Korman that Musk was going to try to back out. That foresight
had driven him to insist that Musk sign it personally. But the validation of
his instincts was little comfort.

Korman wasn’t the only attorney who could plainly read Musk’s
intentions. Musk’s antics had also caught the attention of several partners at
Wachtell, Lipton, Rosen & Katz, one of the top corporate law firms in the
United States, which in the 1980s had invented the poison pill tactic that
Twitter deployed. They were well-known in takeover defense, often fending
off hostile acquirers like Musk, and trial specialists, unlike Korman’s and
Klein’s firms.

When Musk began his complaints in early June about Twitter not
sharing its data, Benjamin Roth, one of Wachtell’s partners, seized the
opportunity. “I’ve been following with interest the news about your pending
transaction with Elon Musk,” Roth wrote in a June 7 email to Gadde, Segal,
and Edgett, Twitter’s general counsel. “If what I am reading is accurate, it
seems there is a meaningful risk of litigation to enforce the terms of your
merger agreement. We would be extremely interested in representing
Twitter in preparing for this possibility and in the unfortunate event that it
comes to pass.”
Roth highlighted the firm’s deep ties to the Delaware court where any
litigation with Musk would inevitably land. Although Twitter’s headquarters
sat in San Francisco, the company—along with most American corporations
—claimed as its home the corporate haven of Delaware, which offers
favorable taxes and limited transparency. But one of its most appealing
features was its court system specifically dedicated to corporate disputes.

Delaware Court of Chancery, which was founded in 1792 but traced its
roots to feudal England, presided over botched mergers and fiduciary duty
failures, and did so on expedited timelines so that companies did not have
to wait years for the plodding federal court system. Their fast track was
presided over by experts in corporate governance law—one chancellor, six
vice chancellors, and three magistrates—and offered a curtailed appeals
process, which ensured decisions were firm and actionable. If a merger was
ordered by the court, money would soon be changing hands.

In his email, Roth pointed out that one of the most reliable experts on
the unique court “sits about 25 feet down the hall from me,” referring to
Leo Strine, the former Chancery Court vice chancellor who was among
Wachtell’s partners. Strine had made a name for himself on the court in
2001 when he forced the poultry producer Tyson to buy IBP, a beef packer
that it had bid $3.2 billion to acquire before attempting to back out of the
deal. The ruling proved that Delaware was willing to force a merger, even
though significant bad blood had accumulated between the parties, rather
than permitting a breakup fee.

“That experience has been taught and handed down to the next
generation like my colleague Bill Savitt, who is the cochair of our litigation
practice and I believe is the leading Delaware litigator,” Roth wrote. He
copied both Strine and Savitt on the pitch to Twitter’s top brass.

In response, Twitter quickly began negotiations with Wachtell. While
Korman and Klein continued to handle the day-to-day correspondence with
the billionaire’s team, Twitter quietly worked in the background with Savitt
to begin prepping for the eventuality that the company would need to sue to
force Musk to complete the transaction.

Savitt had an angular face and dark, arched eyebrows that gave him a
slightly perplexed look, but he rarely lacked poise when it came to
boardroom showdowns. After college, he spent the late 1980s in New York
City, jamming on guitar in rock bands and driving a taxicab to make ends
meet. Although he landed a few gigs at the famed punk venue CBGB, he
eventually went straight, enrolling in law school at Columbia. By 1998, he
found himself clerking for Supreme Court Justice Ruth Bader Ginsburg,
and two years after that he joined the ranks at Wachtell, where he clung to
his rocker roots by displaying a robin’s-egg-blue Fender Stratocaster in his
office.

His quirky background and cool demeanor made him an easy fit at
Twitter, where he seemed to some almost a Dorsey-like figure, as if the
company’s founder had gone to law school instead of hacking together
dispatch services. Twitter officially retained Wachtell on June 21, as the
letters between Twitter and Ringler increased in acidity.

Savitt’s past had another twist that made him intriguing to his new
clients: a previous run-in with Musk. Tesla had hired Wachtell to defend it
in a shareholder lawsuit stemming from its 2016 acquisition of SolarCity,
but when the firm lost a motion to dismiss the case, Tesla fired Savitt and
his team, showing the lawyer how mercurial Musk could be.

Tesla went on to win the lawsuit, leaving Savitt frustrated about losing
the client. Suddenly, he found himself readying for a showdown with the
billionaire.

>>> THE DAY AFTER Musk called off the deal, July 9, Agrawal, Segal, and
Taylor met in the lobby of the Sun Valley Lodge, a grand, wood-paneled
resort tucked in the mountains of central Idaho. In the winter, the lodge
played host to ultrawealthy vacationers and off-duty Olympians who
flocked to Idaho for some of America’s best snow and most private skiing.

In the summer, the skiers gave way to equestrians and golfers from similar
tax brackets who paced the halls of the resort, retracing the steps of Ernest
Hemingway, who booked a suite at the lodge to finish his 1940 novel, For
Whom the Bell Tolls.

Agrawal, in a black T-shirt with an ultrasoft cashmere hoodie over top
to ward off the mountain air, and his wife, Vineeta, had arrived the previous
Tuesday. The first few days of the conference had been a relatively peaceful
mix of business meetings. Vineeta, who led the biotech and health
investment portfolio at venture firm Andreessen Horowitz, had her own
work to do; she greeted the other Twitter executives and set off in search of
coffee.

That Saturday morning was different. Out of the corner of his eye,
Agrawal could see heads turning. Even after Dorsey had named him chief
executive, he had remained relatively anonymous, able to wander through
San Francisco with ease. But here in Idaho, at the annual Allen & Company
conference, known as a summer playground for those with three-comma
fortunes, Agrawal was suddenly a celebrity by way of his highly public
clash with Musk. It was his first time attending the conference; while Taylor
and Segal were regulars at the event, the chief technology officer of Twitter
had never merited an invitation.

It didn’t help that Musk had arrived in Sun Valley late that Thursday
evening. On Friday morning, as the world woke up to the news that he was
abandoning the Twitter deal, he was breathing the same mountain air as
Agrawal, Taylor, and Segal. The odds of a chance encounter on the treelined paths of the resort kept everyone staring at the Twitter team, not
wanting to miss a serendipitous confrontation.

Taylor didn’t flinch, launching into the plan for the day. Together, the
men would attend the interview Musk was scheduled to give later that
morning. They would stay cool and calm, even if Musk insulted them to
their faces. And after, they would regroup for a call with their legal team.

Musk was among a who’s-who list of tech and media tycoons scheduled
to attend that week, including Shari Redstone, the chairman of Paramount
Global, and Disney’s Bob Iger. Outside the resort hotel, stages peppered the
lawn to host speeches. But because the place was crawling with press and
nosy onlookers, the attendees were given headsets to listen to the talks so
the speeches weren’t broadcast to the masses over a PA system.

The Twitter team filed outside and took their seats, greeting the other
executives around them before slipping on their headsets. Musk took the
stage with a grin on his face, well aware of the question on everyone’s
mind.

Almost immediately, he launched into a tirade. Twitter was completely
overrun with spam, Musk claimed. Then he turned to the audience. “Does
anyone really believe that the bots are fewer than five percent?” he asked.

Maybe it was the fact that they all were wearing headsets, but the crowd
seemed ill-prepared for an audience participation segment. No one was sure
whether to answer aloud or to raise their hands, or to just sit in silence as
Musk continued his complaint. The billionaires and multimillionaires
looked around uneasily at each other.

Musk was unperturbed, barreling along as though the audience had
cheered in agreement. “See, I told you,” he said. Taylor sat unruffled, his
hands folded lazily in his lap.

Musk brushed off further questions about the deal, citing the impending
lawsuit that Twitter had threatened to file. But he didn’t shy away from
press reports that he had recently fathered a secret set of twins with one of
his employees, Zilis. The world was suffering from a severe
underpopulation crisis, Musk told the audience, and the only way to start a
colony on Mars would be to have more children.

>>> ON SUNDAY, as Segal sat on the metal benches inside a quaint Idaho
airport near the resort, his phone buzzed. Jay Sullivan, Twitter’s general
manager and product head, was on the line. The men were set to discuss
Twitter’s developer platform, a portal for independent coders who wanted
to build new features for Twitter. But Sullivan had other ideas. He had been
stewing over the deal and couldn’t bite his tongue any longer.

Sullivan pleaded with Segal to reconsider the lawsuit. Musk was clearly
going to be a terrible owner for Twitter, Sullivan said. And now that he
didn’t even want it, couldn’t they just let the billionaire walk away?
“I don’t want to do business with someone who acts this way,” Sullivan
told Segal forcefully, trying to hammer home what an awful fit Musk was
for Twitter’s mission.

“Try to keep an open mind,” Segal suggested. The board believed
selling Twitter to Musk was the best outcome, he reminded the product
lead. It was the right price for shareholders, and they all had an obligation
to see it through, even if it meant suing to force the deal ahead.

Sullivan raged at the idea. “I’ve read my Milton Friedman, okay?” he
snapped, citing the famed free-market economist. He understood that the
board had a fiduciary obligation to sell to the highest bidder and didn’t need
it explained to him by the CFO. “There’s some higher calling here.”
Sullivan pressed on, asking Segal why he hadn’t been called in to
present to the board when it was weighing Musk’s offer. Surely, as the head
of product, he should have been given the opportunity to present his vision
to the board and make the case that Twitter could be run independently. It
was hard for anyone, other than Musk, to claim to be the best man to serve
as the steward of the preeminent online speech platform, but Sullivan at
least wanted to make his case. He didn’t know that Agrawal had made the
pitch already, as part of Prism—the only part of the plan that had been
shared with him were the layoffs.

“I just care so much about the service,” Sullivan sighed. Even though he
knew there was no backing out of the deal, he was venting, demanding that
Segal acknowledge his argument.

Segal tried to comfort him, saying that Elon might come in peace. There
was the bombast he’d seen onstage, ranting about population decline, and
online, tweeting poop emojis at his CEO. But Segal still thought there
might be a more reasonable Musk somewhere behind all the showmanship,
a man who genuinely wanted to do the right thing and just needed to learn
how Twitter worked. Everything up until now, even the lawsuit, might be
histrionics. Besides, his hands were tied. His personal feelings about Musk
didn’t matter—he was obligated to complete the transaction.

O
21 > Court of Chancery
n July 10, Savitt introduced himself to Musk’s lawyers with a curt,
three-paragraph letter. “The agreement is not terminated,” he wrote to
Ringler. Musk’s excuses were just that, Savitt added. Meanwhile, Twitter’s
engineers had kept a close eye on the firehose data, monitoring how Musk
directed his lawyers and engineers to query it. His behavior raised a glaring
red flag.

Although Musk had purportedly called off the deal, his team continued
to run thousands of queries against its data. The ongoing analysis was
extremely troubling to Twitter employees. If the deal was indeed off, then
Musk should have no longer been interested in the company’s data and user
information. Instead, he was doubling down. After his April musings to
Agrawal about perhaps starting a competitor, it seemed to Twitter that Musk
might be intending to use the company’s proprietary data to do so.

Twitter’s lawyers, however, were less conspiratorial. To them, the
searches implied that, even though Musk was claiming the bot problem was
out of control and using it to wiggle out of the acquisition, he hadn’t found
a smoking gun yet. He was still trying to justify his decision—which meant
he probably knew he didn’t have much of a case.

Savitt unleashed Twitter’s lawsuit in Delaware’s Court of Chancery on
July 12. The document was excoriating, venting the pent-up frustrations of
a board and company that had been muzzled for months.

“Musk refuses to honor his obligations to Twitter and its stockholders
because the deal he signed no longer serves his personal interests,” read the
suit. “Musk apparently believes that he—unlike every other party subject to
Delaware contract law—is free to change his mind, trash the company,
disrupt its operations, destroy stockholder value, and walk away.”
The sixty-two-page document laid out what Twitter’s board and legal
advisers believed was Musk’s true motivation to escape—financial losses
inflicted by Tesla’s falling stock price.

Savitt tore into Musk’s bot obsession, calling it “a model of hypocrisy.”
“Musk said he needed to take the company private because, according
to him, purging spam would otherwise be commercially impractical,” he
wrote. “But when the market declined and the fixed-price deal became less
attractive, Musk shifted the narrative, suddenly demanding ‘verification’
that spam was not a serious problem on Twitter’s platform, and claiming a
burning need to conduct ‘diligence’ he had expressly forsworn.”
Musk played it off as though getting sued had always been part of his
master plan. He tweeted a meme that showed him laughing. “They said I
couldn’t buy Twitter. Then they wouldn’t disclose bot info,” the caption
read. “Now they want to force me to buy Twitter in court. Now they have to
disclose bot info in court.”
His fans lapped it up. Of course, their hero was playing fourdimensional chess, luring Twitter into suing him and then trapping them
into discovery. But Musk was serious about getting out of the deal, and he
saw the lawsuit as defiance by the disobedient Twitter executives.

Musk brushed the whole thing off and deputized the fight to Alex Spiro,
his bulldog litigator. But in Chancery Court, the rules were different from
the federal courthouses where Spiro had secured victories for Musk, and
everything in Delaware moved on a fast timeline.

Spiro brought in his own team of Delaware experts to back him up. He
used Andrew Rossman, a lawyer from his own firm who had experience in
the state’s business court, and Ed Micheletti, a Chancery Court veteran from
Skadden who had carried other high-profile busted deal cases. Micheletti
had represented Toys “R” Us during shareholder lawsuits over its 2005
leveraged buyout, arguing before Strine when he was a vice chancellor at
the court.

The case advanced by Micheletti was clear: Twitter was run by
complete idiots. They had no idea how to count their users properly, which
made their estimates about the number of bots on the platform completely
unreliable. And worse, they were malicious—they knew their numbers were
wrong and, instead of fixing the problem, had gone to great lengths to hide
it from Musk for as long as possible.

“Musk was flabbergasted to learn just how meager Twitter’s process
was,” Micheletti wrote in a response to Twitter’s lawsuit on July 15.

“Human reviewers randomly sampled 100 accounts per day (less than
0.00005% of daily users) and applied unidentified standards to somehow
conclude every quarter for nearly three years that fewer than 5% of Twitter
users were false or spam. That’s it. No automation, no AI, no machine
learning.”
The papers painted Twitter as a tech company in name only. According
to Micheletti, Twitter just pulled up 100 random accounts every day, an
oafish, gum-chewing reviewer stared at them and then rubber-stamped them
all as real users. The lack of rigor or technical prowess cut at the heart of
Musk’s business plan, the lawyer argued. Musk wanted to get rid of
spammers, verifying the identities of users as they signed up, and then sell
them subscriptions so that he could lessen Twitter’s dependence on
advertisers for revenue. The business plan worked only if the users were
real—bots didn’t pay subscriptions.

Musk’s constant railing against Twitter’s executives wasn’t harming the
company but instead was furthering its economic interests, Micheletti
posited.

“With the sense of humor of a bot, Twitter claims that Musk is
damaging the company,” he wrote. “Twitter ignores that Musk is its second
largest shareholder with a far greater economic stake than the entire Twitter
board.”
Aside from launching barbs at the board, Micheletti had another
objective. He asked the judge to delay the trial until February. That, he
claimed, would give Musk enough time to get to the bottom of the bot
problem. Twitter was pushing for trial as soon as possible, citing the
deadline for the deal to close: October 24. Both sides knew that Musk’s
only way out of the acquisition agreement was if his loans fell through,
which would allow him to pay the $1 billion breakup fee and walk away.

The loans were set to expire in April 2023. By asking for a February trial,
Musk was running down the clock—something Savitt couldn’t allow.

But Musk was in for a lesson in how Chancery Court worked.

Chancellor Kathaleen McCormick had been expecting Twitter’s lawsuit.

The forty-three-year-old, who wore her thick brown hair cropped plainly
below her shoulders, had followed the headlines about Musk’s disputes with
the company and knew the fight would eventually end up in her courtroom.

She even kept a lurker Twitter account under a pseudonym, which she
occasionally used to scroll through the news. When Twitter filed its case,
her secretary printed it out and plopped it on a ledge that held stacks of
incoming papers in McCormick’s office. “Here it is,” the secretary said, not
needing to explain which case she was referring to.

McCormick, the first woman to lead the court since its founding,
assigned herself to oversee the Twitter dispute, following a court tradition in
which the lead chancellor took cases under the most scrutiny and left less
troublesome litigants to the six vice chancellors. By that summer, the small
Delaware court had already been stretched to its breaking point with new
cases, but Twitter demanded urgency. Despite coming down with COVID
on July 17, McCormick barreled ahead with a virtual hearing, and declared
the trial would begin in October.

The date became an event horizon for everyone involved. For the
lawyers, it was the deadline to uncover a smoking gun, and they began
lobbing subpoenas at anyone who had ever worked at Twitter or had
associated with Musk. For Twitter employees, it was the outer limit of their
suffering—at least by then, they would know the outcome. Some started
interviewing for other jobs, realizing they wanted off the ship. Others
scheduled leaves of absence for the fall, hoping to avoid the takeover
altogether.

As they had when the board instituted the poison pill to block Musk’s
acquisition in April, employees turned to Twitter itself to learn about the
obscure process of chancery trials in Delaware, uncovering accounts of
legal scholars and court observers. There would be no jury and no witnesses
—just a sumo match between lawyers, with McCormick deciding Twitter’s
fate.

W
22 > “Sorry I didn’t get your
special”
hile Agrawal left the legal filings to the lawyers, he remained
intimately involved in the litigation strategy. He had no legal
experience; everything he knew about mergers and acquisitions had come
from overseeing deals that Twitter did to buy start-ups. But public company
buyouts were foreign to him, and aggressive negotiations that ended up in
court seemed like something that happened on a different planet.

Still, Agrawal dug in and learned. He had an obsessive personality and
loved to game out every scenario, needing to know all the possible moves
available to him on the chess board. He read case law stemming from
previous hostile takeovers and sat with lawyers in their strategy discussions,
privately telling associates that he thought he had absorbed more on the
intricacies of these complicated deals than Spiro. If this was going to be his
legacy as Twitter’s CEO, Agrawal wanted to be a decision-maker rather
than a passive player who rolled over for the richest man in the world.

Yet, as he gained proficiency in those aspects of running a business, he
was floundering in others, unable to communicate the details that
employees wanted to hear about the future of their workplace. The trust
deficiency between the chief executive and the rank and file was growing.

Most employees only ever saw or interacted with Agrawal on video calls, so
his staff proposed a tour to different Twitter offices where he could
personally introduce himself to employees.

He started in June at the company’s London office, which had a coffee
bar for employees. While professional baristas typically staffed the kiosk,
Twitter’s comms staffers had Agrawal and other execs work there for about
an hour, serving coffee and talking with anyone who stopped by. They wore
khaki aprons and served from a menu that included a coffee drink called a
“Parag Special” and “Ned’s Cookies”—named after the Twitter CFO’s
recipe for chocolate chip cookies sprinkled with sea salt.

The U.K. office’s head sales exec hosted an onstage discussion with
Agrawal, before presenting him with a framed emoji-styled portrait,
featuring the chief executive’s distinct glasses and five-o’clock shadow.

Agrawal sheepishly accepted the gift and continued his employee meet-andgreet at the company’s Dublin office later that week.

In late July, Agrawal visited Twitter’s New York office in Manhattan’s
posh Chelsea neighborhood. It was going smoothly, with the CEO greeting
each worker as they stepped up to place their order. Then one junior
engineer approached the counter and tried to make an impression on his
boss’s boss’s boss with a joke.

“Can I just have a regular cappuccino?” he said to Agrawal with a
smile. “Sorry I didn’t get your special. I hope I don’t get fired or
something!”
Twitter’s chief looked up from the ordering system with a confused
stare.

“Why…why would I fire you?” Agrawal said.

He locked eyes with the engineer, who started to panic after realizing
that the chief wasn’t reading his social cues. Rumors of layoffs had swirled
among employees. Surely, Agrawal knew everyone was anxious?
The employee stammered under his breath and quickly moved down the
line to wait for his drink.

>>> AS TWITTER WAGED a paper war in Delaware, trying to bury Musk’s
legal team in endless filings, Project Saturn was forced to the back burner.

Because the Saturn team included some of Twitter’s brightest stars in
product and policy, most of them were dragged into endless briefings with
lawyers to explain how they detected bots on the platform.

Another one of Agrawal’s game-changing projects stalled, too. Jay
Graber and her handful of engineers at Bluesky had been patiently waiting
to hear from Agrawal about how Musk’s bid would disrupt their nascent
effort to build a decentralized social media ecosystem that could someday
become the backbone for Twitter, Facebook, and any new platform that
happened to emerge.

Agrawal had reassured Graber that she had nothing to worry about. He
would make sure the checks kept clearing and that she would have the
latitude to continue building the protocol.

Bluesky’s corporate documents set aside a board seat for a Twitter
representative, guaranteeing that Twitter would be able to supervise
Graber’s process and work to incorporate what she built back into the social
media giant. With Dorsey gone, the seat was Agrawal’s.

It was a natural fit. Dorsey had always cared about the “what”—
building a decentralized protocol for social media—but it was Agrawal who
was interested in the “how” and was eager to dive into technical discussions
with Graber. But Agrawal, perhaps as a gesture of respect to his mentor,
signed over the board seat to Dorsey.

Graber was becoming increasingly impatient with the entire ordeal. She
couldn’t get a straight answer from Agrawal about when their work would
resume, and so she began hiring a small team to build Bluesky its own app.

They could always integrate with Twitter later, Graber figured, but if people
could start using Bluesky right away, then there would be no need to wait
for the resolution of the lawsuit against Musk.

>>> BY AUGUST, Twitter’s legal battle was well underway, and its leaders felt
increasingly confident that they would be able to force their erratic
opponent to buy the company. On Monday, August 1, Agrawal charged into
his San Francisco office with a renewed sense of purpose. He wanted to
push Project Saturn forward, making his mark on Twitter before he had to
hand the platform off to Musk.

“What’s not changing: Twitter taking accountability for impact on the
world,” he wrote to colleagues who were working on the initiative. “What’s
changing: minimizing centralized control and increase control and
transparency for people.” He told Gadde and Sullivan that Saturn would be
revealed to the public by the fall and instructed them to write it into their
plans for the year.

The chief executive also broke the news to his communications staff.

They would need to begin editing blog posts and briefing reporters for the
launch. But one flack balked. She had worked under Gadde for years,
bearing the brunt of criticism from the press for Twitter’s controversial
decisions about the New York Post, COVID, and Trump, and she was
disgusted at the idea of allowing Trump and other banned users to return to
the platform. It seemed like a ridiculous regression to her and she refused to
work on it.

It was a hint to Agrawal that his grand vision might not be welcomed by
many people who had come to rely on Twitter’s rules. Still, he pressed on.

Agrawal also informed Savitt about what he was planning. Savitt, too,
had serious concerns. Each time Agrawal made a decision that he thought
would improve Twitter, another letter from Musk’s lawyers landed in the
litigator’s inbox, claiming that Agrawal had made material changes to
Twitter’s business that opened another loophole for Musk to escape from
the acquisition.

“Are you operating in the normal course of business?” Savitt asked
Agrawal. Upending Twitter’s entire content moderation strategy—which
was one of Musk’s stated goals when he offered to buy the company—
seemed risky. But Agrawal had been planning Project Saturn before Musk
signed the merger agreement, he argued. Wouldn’t it be more normal to
continue with his plans as though nothing had happened?
Savitt asked that his lawyers be allowed to review all the documents
related to the initiative, but ultimately agreed to the launch.

In the early morning hours of August 23, Agrawal’s phone started
buzzing frantically, piercing his sleep. He grabbed it and started scrolling,
and the headlines he saw about a former Twitter executive named Peiter
Zatko opened a pit in his stomach. Saturn would have to wait—again.

H
23 > Mudge
ired by Dorsey in November 2020 to become its head of security,
Peiter Zatko was better known by his hacker moniker, Mudge, and
had earned renown in the tight-knit security community in the 1990s for
research into a type of security vulnerability known as a buffer overflow.

While many hackers shared Dorsey’s anarchistic skepticism of the
government, Zatko realized that he could advocate for broader security
reforms by working with the feds than by peppering them with attacks from
the shadows. He took a job at the Defense Department’s research wing,
DARPA, and worked with Bill Clinton’s administration to mitigate
cyberattacks.

When Dorsey hired him, there was just one problem—Twitter had, just
weeks earlier, hired another executive for essentially the same role. Her
name was Rinki Sethi, and while she didn’t have Zatko’s industry prestige,
she had experience running security organizations. Sethi was told to report
to Zatko.

A power struggle quickly unfolded. Both were charged with patching
the company back together after a bruising hack in July 2020, when a group
of teenagers commandeered the site. To her new employees, Sethi seemed
sharp-elbowed and suspicious of her staffers, often micromanaging them.

She quickly drew up a list of people she wanted to fire, alienating longtime
employees. Zatko had prestige, but his employees suspected he had checked
out from security at the height of his fame in the ’90s and didn’t have a
working grasp of modern security systems.

Both Zatko and Sethi embarked on land grabs, trying to wrest parts of
the security organization for themselves. Sometimes they assigned
conflicting work, and employees didn’t know which executive they were
supposed to be following—the one the CEO preferred or the one who
actually managed them. Some Twitter security workers were particularly
suspicious of Zatko’s deep ties to the government, which Twitter’s staff
largely viewed as another adversary to be prevented from spying on users.

The former DARPA official appeared on video calls with a folded American
flag and military trophies displayed in the background.

It was no secret that Zatko and Sethi were at odds, and the executives
quickly launched competing complaints against each other with the human
resources department questioning each other’s ethics. Within a year, it was
obvious the arrangement wasn’t working.

Zatko, at least, seemed to realize that the tide was turning against him.

He appealed to Agrawal, asking the new chief executive to come visit him
at home in New Jersey during Agrawal’s holiday trip to the East Coast.

Agrawal initially agreed to the sit-down but then put the meeting off, saying
he was unable to make time during his trip. But Zatko used his access to
Twitter’s systems to check the travel arrangements for Agrawal’s security
detail and found no last-minute adjustments. He believed Agrawal was
lying to him.

By January 2022, Agrawal was ready to act. In one of his first moves as
chief executive, he decided to fire both Zatko and Sethi and start fresh.

In a last-ditch effort to save his job, Zatko appealed to the board of
directors, claiming that Agrawal had blocked him from briefing the board
about the extent of Twitter’s security problems. Thousands of employees
had broad access to Twitter and could take down the site if their accounts
were compromised, he warned. And such a compromise was likely, Zatko
continued, because the employees weren’t installing regularly scheduled
security updates that would protect their devices from being hacked. Zatko
argued that the gaping holes ran counter to what Twitter had been telling the
Federal Trade Commission for years—that it had a robust security program
and could be trusted with its users’ personal data.

“I joined because I felt an ‘attachment to mission,’ ” Zatko wrote in a
plaintive email to Pichette that February, several weeks after his dismissal.

“I’m different from a lot of the world that way.”
Zatko extracted a $7 million settlement from Twitter in June, after his
lawyers argued that his firing was unjustified. But he was wounded and
watched from the sidelines as Musk buffeted the company. He believed that
Agrawal was toying with Musk as the engineer had done with him. He
hadn’t overseen Twitter’s bot tallies, but Zatko had asked around about it
while at Twitter. He didn’t think Agrawal was being honest about the scale
of the problem.

The former security executive signed on with Whistleblower Aid, a
nonprofit legal organization, and the group agreed to help him submit a
complaint to Congress, the FTC, and the SEC. The securities regulator paid
awards to whistleblowers whose claims led to enforcement actions, so
Zatko stood to make a tidy sum on top of his Twitter settlement.

Whistleblower Aid ensured that they would help his claims go far and wide.

On August 23, the group did just that, coordinating news stories of Zatko’s
whistleblower report in The Washington Post and on CNN.

Twitter’s security program was a complete disaster, Zatko claimed. The
company had always struggled to secure user data. At first, it grew too
quickly, and its databases were held together with virtual bits of tape and
string. Then, hackers recognized its influence over global discourse. It
became too enticing a target to pass up. The FTC intervened in 2011 and
had kept watch over the company ever since.

The agency’s ongoing oversight of Twitter gave regulatory significance
to Zatko’s complaint. The security problems meant that Twitter was still
violating its 2011 agreement with the agency to clean up its act, Zatko
argued.

The report was a boon for Musk and his lawyers. His case had been
floundering, as round after round of discovery failed to turn up proof that
Twitter had manufactured its spam estimates. But here, finally, was
someone who was willing to confirm Musk’s theories. Better yet, Twitter
had already paid him off handsomely in exchange for his signature on a
nondisclosure agreement. It seemed as if the company had known about its
bot problem all along and covered it up.

Spiro vowed to subpoena Zatko immediately. Agrawal, meanwhile, was
frustrated. As far as he was concerned, Zatko was yet another problem
inherited from Dorsey. He had tried to move decisively, as he always did,
and clean it up quickly. But here Zatko was, using a loophole to escape his
nondisclosure and splash his whistleblower complaint across the internet.

Agrawal launched a strident defense of the company to his employees,
many of whom wanted to know if Zatko’s claims were true. On August 24,
the day after the whistleblower complaint was published, Twitter’s chief
executive summoned his workers to a company-wide meeting.

“There are accusations in there without any evidence,” Agrawal said.

Twitter’s staff could hear the frustration in his voice, and to some it seemed
that Agrawal was finally relatable. “Honestly, some of it just doesn’t make
any sense. The narrative that has been created is false.”
Sean Edgett, Twitter’s general counsel, took the mic next. “We have
never made a material misrepresentation to a regulator, to our board, to all
of you,” he said. “We are in full compliance with our FTC consent decree.”
Twitter’s top security and privacy executives, Damien Kieran and Lea
Kissner, debunked Zatko’s allegations one by one. Twitter had more work
to do on its security, but things were not so desperate, they said. By the end
of the meeting, most employees were reassured that the former executive
wasn’t credible—after all, it had been his job to fix Twitter’s security
problems, and instead he’d taken a massive payout and walked away.

But Spiro and Musk’s team of lawyers wasted no time. On August 29, a
week after Zatko’s claims were published, they wrote to Twitter to break off
the deal again. His suggestion that Twitter had misled the FTC was reason
enough to end the acquisition, even if Musk’s concerns about bots turned
out to be nonsense, Musk’s legal team argued. “These violations would
have material, if not existential, consequences to Twitter’s business,”
Ringler wrote in a fresh breakup letter.

Spiro also worked Zatko’s claims into the lawsuit, demanding that Musk
be allowed to walk away from the deal because the damning whistleblower
report revealed Twitter had misled the public about its user numbers, which
the company referred to as monetizable daily active users, or mDAUs.

“Stunning events over the last week, however, have revealed that the
misrepresentations regarding mDAU were only one component of a broader
conspiracy among Twitter executives to deceive the public, its investors,
and the government about the dysfunction at the heart of the company,”
Musk’s lawyers wrote to the court in mid-September. “The Musk Parties
and Twitter’s many other investors were sold a different company than the
Twitter that actually exists—one that was more valuable, more popular,
more secure, and more compliant with governing law.”
Chancellor McCormick agreed that Zatko’s claims should be
incorporated into the trial but seemed somewhat skeptical of Musk’s entire
approach. In a hearing about the whistleblower report, as Musk’s side
argued that there would have been no way for them to find out about Zatko
if he had not come forward publicly, McCormick gently offered a reality
check.

“We’ll never know, will we?” she said lightly. “There was no due
diligence.”
As the October trial date approached, McCormick was becoming
increasingly concerned about the media firestorm and the security risks it
could bring to her court. Her staff arranged for a secret entrance on a
loading dock, where Musk could come and go without being seen. They
also worried about mysterious graffiti that appeared outside the courthouse
and around Wilmington, Delaware, that made cryptic reference to the case.

“Dievest,” a tag in bright Twitter-brand blue paint read, splashed on the
wall of the parking garage used by McCormick and other staffers. “Twitr
paid.” Was it a backing message for Musk? A threat? A signal of support for
Twitter? McCormick threatened to come into work with a power washer
and remove the graffiti herself before the owner of the garage buffed out the
strange message.

With the trial date looming, Twitter’s leadership became more and more
optimistic that they would win. Musk’s excuses for vacating the deal were
too thin to hold up in court. Throughout the litigation, Savitt had braced
himself for surprises, knowing Musk would find more cards to play. While
the Zatko report was a challenge, Savitt thought it would take more than a
disgruntled former employee to crack the merger agreement.

Musk’s best path to escape owning Twitter was for the board itself to
recommend that shareholders vote against the deal. But on September 13,
the board took the deal to Twitter’s shareholders, who voted
overwhelmingly—98.6 percent—in favor of it. Twitter’s stock was
puttering along at about $41 per share, and Musk’s offer of $54.20 was too
good to refuse. All that was left was the looming trial.

E
24 > An Accelerant to X
ven as Musk’s lawyers pleaded with Chancellor McCormick to air
Zatko’s allegations, they recognized that their client’s path to victory
was narrow. Zatko had been long gone from Twitter by the time Musk made
his bid and hadn’t been directly involved with the FTC’s oversight of the
company. Some of Musk’s lawyers believed McCormick was skeptical of
the billionaire, as she awarded Twitter wins on motions, and thought their
client wouldn’t get a fair trial.

So Musk began to test the waters. Emanuel, Musk’s friend, made an
overture to Durban to settle the dispute. Musk’s representatives later asked
for a 30 percent discount, which would have valued the company at about
$31 billion. The board dismissed the lowball.

Musk was scheduled to be deposed by Twitter’s lawyers on September
29, but some of his lawyers thought it best to prevent Musk from talking
under oath. Musk could barely contain himself from tweeting things that
jeopardized his case. Who knew what he might say in person?
Spiro and the Twitter board began discussing a new offer—a 10 percent
discount. The price would value the social media company at roughly $39.6
billion, a slim premium above its $39.2 billion market capitalization.

Entertaining discussions of a discount was risky—shareholders had already
voted to approve Musk’s offer, and undercutting the vote would certainly
expose them to lawsuits. The board’s goal was to get Musk’s money into its
shareholders’ hands, and even though they were confident they would win
at trial, nothing was certain. A courtroom loss would leave shareholders
with nothing, and a small discount could be worthwhile if it guaranteed
Musk would pay.

The smaller discount left Musk squeamish. Since he had agreed to buy
the company in April, interest rates had increased and a change in purchase
price would mean he would have to renegotiate the terms of his debt
financing. The higher interest rates would erase a significant chunk of his
potential savings.

Still, Musk’s side warned that if the Twitter board didn’t agree to settle
the case, Musk would pursue them to the ends of the earth with lawsuits.

You don’t want Musk as an enemy, the members were told. The billionaire
chafed at the idea of paying the Twitter executives’ multimillion-dollar
severance packages, known as “golden parachutes,” and he wanted to wage
a scorched earth campaign against everyone he thought had wronged him
over the course of the deal. Twitter’s board was worried about Musk’s
threats. Some members already had security outside their homes after
receiving sinister online messages, and they sought assurances that Musk
wouldn’t sue them personally if they agreed to a discount. Spiro thought the
demand was outrageous and shady. It seemed to him that the board wanted
additional legal protections after a bruising summer of litigation, another
sign they had something to hide.

Musk’s September 29 deposition came and went without the billionaire
showing up. He would reschedule, his lawyers claimed.

Inside Twitter, Roth was losing faith that Project Saturn would ever see
the light of day. It seemed obvious that Musk would lose the lawsuit, and
that whatever work he accomplished would be immediately reversed by
Twitter’s new owner.

Sullivan had his doubts, too. He was eager to build the technology that
he and Agrawal had brainstormed all those months ago. But Project Saturn
had been stripped down from a grand product vision to a couple of blog
posts while everyone waited to see what would happen with the deal. It
didn’t make sense to Sullivan to do a splashy announcement about a
product that didn’t exist yet—especially with Musk about to take over and
upend everything.

He went to Gadde with his concerns. The lawyer, who had harbored
doubts about Saturn for months, agreed. There was a lot of flash and no
substance yet, and the two executives tried to coax Agrawal off the ledge.

Even though he was committed to leaving a legacy, there was no point in
doing it unless Saturn would stick, they told him.

In early October, Agrawal sailed through his deposition without being
baited into saying anything stupid, giving Twitter’s lawyers more
confidence in the strength of their case. Hours after Agrawal finished
testifying, Musk’s team suggested the billionaire might finally be ready to
pay full price for Twitter. Musk’s desire to control Twitter may have won
out, or he may simply have been painted into a corner by Twitter’s legal
team. He told his lawyers that, even if he won the lawsuit, he would lose in
the long run—because he wouldn’t end up owning Twitter.

“It seemed inevitable to me that he was always going to acquire the
company. There’s nothing on earth that guy loves more than he loves
Twitter,” said one lawyer who worked for Musk’s side. “It may be that he
never really intended to go to trial, he never thought he could win, but was
using it as a tactic to renegotiate the deal.”
>>> GADDE STILL WASN’T sure what to expect when she strode into the dull
gray lobby of One Market Plaza on October 3 and rode the elevator up to
Wilson Sonsini’s offices on San Francisco’s Embarcadero. She was one of
the few Twitter executives and board members who had not yet given a
deposition to Musk’s legal team, but she was finally due to face them that
Monday morning.

Despite Musk’s offer to buy Twitter at the original price, Gadde didn’t
trust him to follow through and showed up ready to testify. She felt
confident that she could handle Spiro’s bombastic approach. But Spiro was
late.

As the minutes ticked by, Gadde became confused. Was this a tactic to
frustrate her and bait her into an argument? It seemed like an amateur move,
but she’d come to expect bizarre antics from Musk’s prized lawyer.

After a half hour, Gadde realized: Spiro wasn’t coming. She chatted
with her lawyers about what his absence might mean. The teams that
oversaw spam and platform manipulation reported to Gadde—surely
Musk’s lawyers wouldn’t miss the opportunity to grill her about Twitter’s
problems with bots.

His team said they’d cancelled the deposition and Gadde somehow
hadn’t gotten the memo. Finally, that evening, a letter from Musk arrived
confirming the reason Gadde had been stood up. The deal was officially
back on. Musk would buy Twitter for $44 billion after all, put Twitter’s
lawsuit against him to bed, and avoid ever sitting down to talk under oath.

The following day, it was as if he’d never tried to bust up the deal in the
first place. “Buying Twitter is an accelerant to creating X, the everything
app,” he tweeted.

“I’
25 > “Not owned by a fucking
moron”
m trying to think what Twitter would get by NOT accepting the
exact same offer,” a Twitter engineering manager wrote on Slack, in
response to the sudden news. He shared his musings in a 2,000-person
channel called #stonks, where employees traded advice about how to
manage their Twitter stock options and debated the company’s financial
performance.

Bitter responses flooded the channel.

“A lot lower stock,” one worker responded.

“It’d get to not be owned by Elon Musk,” another said.

“Not owned by a fucking moron?” an engineer chimed in.

Despite their disgust, the chattering employees understood that his $44
billion offer overvalued their company. Twitter’s stock rocketed upward
with confirmation that a deal was all but done. Trading of Twitter’s shares
was temporarily halted, and once trading resumed, Twitter closed out
Tuesday up more than 22 percent at about $52 a share. The deal, as one
employee in #stonks put it, would “put bread on the tables of shareholders”
and that was all that mattered to Wall Street.

Edgett sent a terse note thanking employees for their patience. “We
received the letter from the Musk parties which they have filed with the
SEC,” he wrote. “Our intention is to close the transaction at $54.20 per
share.”
The email seemed clownishly redundant. Of course Twitter intended to
close the deal—it had been the refrain that executives drummed into
employees all summer. But Twitter’s board members and legions of lawyers
didn’t know what to make of Musk’s sudden pronouncement. He had ripped
the rug out from under them, and they had no reason to trust anything he
said. This could be a stall tactic, a way to wiggle out of his deposition or to
delay the lawsuit until his loans expired the following April. Still, his
pronouncement heightened the grim sense of duty in the boardroom. The
members knew they must sell, but any optimism that Musk might be a good
steward of the platform had long been erased.

In court, Twitter’s lawyers were fighting to get their hands on even more
of Musk’s text messages that might reveal his true motives for tanking the
deal—the billionaire had turned over no messages between May 24 and
May 30, when Musk was arranging funds to replace his $6.25 billion
margin loan, nor between June 1 and June 7, when Musk was whipped into
a fervor over the supposed bot problem and directed his lawyers to tell
Twitter he might back out of the deal. Savitt hadn’t found concrete proof
that Musk’s bot complaints were a smokescreen, but it was possible.

Whatever Musk’s intentions, Twitter should press on until they saw $44
billion hit their accounts, Savitt insisted. He still wanted to proceed to trial
in Delaware.

But Musk’s lawyers had other plans. They told Chancellor McCormick
that they would close the deal by October 28 and that a trial was no longer
necessary. On the evening of October 6, the chancellor agreed to give Musk
what he wanted. If the deal wasn’t done by the end of the month, she told
Twitter it could have a November trial date instead.

>>> THE DEADLINE TO BUY Twitter set off a frenzy in the Musk camp. After
spending the summer insulting Twitter’s top executives online and claiming
he wouldn’t buy the company, Musk suddenly had to corral the funds all his
friends had promised him back in April. No matter that some of them might
have had doubts about the value of Twitter in the meantime, Musk was
coming to collect.

From the outset, Morgan Stanley had pitched the Twitter deal as an
opportunity to back a generational entrepreneur. But rising interest rates
meant investors were more cautious than they had been. Some of Musk’s
potential funders, like Reid Hoffman, who had once considered putting in
$2 billion from his venture fund, pulled out completely.

Other investors needed cajoling. Dorsey had wavered in his
commitment to Musk. While he had been one of the biggest cheerleaders of
Musk’s takeover in April, he had recently waffled about rolling his nearly
$1 billion Twitter holding into Musk’s private version of the company.

Dorsey had two options: he could either let Musk buy him out at $54.20,
just like every other shareholder, or he could take a small ownership stake
in whatever Twitter would become, perhaps increasing his fortune if Musk
later re-listed the company on a public stock exchange.

Since early May, the two billionaires had discussed how to run the
social network, but Dorsey seemed unconvinced by the man he once called
the “singular solution I trust.” Dorsey was worth $6 billion, but most of that
was tied up in equity in his company, Block, the new name of Square, and
Bitcoin, and he didn’t have much cash on hand to invest. He considered
taking the cash at the $54.20 price and leaving the site he helped create in
the rearview mirror.

This left Musk in limbo, so he cut his friend a sweetheart deal. Not only
did he promise not to damage Twitter, but he also swore that, if Dorsey ever
wanted out, he’d pay Dorsey the full price of $54.20 per share for his stock.

Unlike other investors, the Twitter cofounder had a guaranteed floor price if
the company’s value decreased under Musk. That meant no inherent risk for
Dorsey—other than relying on Musk’s word—and he agreed. For Musk, it
seemed like a necessary compromise to ensure he had another $1 billion to
put toward his acquisition. Musk believed there was no way Twitter could
lose value under his management.

Another major Twitter stakeholder who experienced doubts was Al
Waleed bin Talal Al Saud, a sixty-seven-year-old Saudi Arabian prince. The
grandson of the first ruler of the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia, Al Waleed was a
flashy figure who had studied at American colleges before becoming an
investment manager of the royal family’s money.

In 2011, Kingdom Holding had put $300 million in Twitter, taking a
more than 3 percent stake in a company that was valued at the time at $8
billion. Al Waleed’s company held on to the investment for more than a
decade and he became an avid user, tweeting pictures from his palace
compounds, his meetings with world leaders, and his private jet.

Kingdom Holding still retained its Twitter stake when Musk came
knocking, but it had become less clear who actually controlled Al Waleed’s
company. In December 2017, the Saudi billionaire was one of 320 royals
and government officials who were rounded up and detained on the orders
of Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman, Al Waleed’s cousin. The prince,
who came to be known simply by his initials, MBS, locked his family
members and bureaucrats in Riyadh’s Ritz-Carlton for months, extracting
concessions, payments, and pledges of allegiance to his cause to become the
country’s next leader. The Wall Street Journal reported that MBS sought at
least a $6 billion ransom payment from his cousin, while Al Waleed sought
to obtain his freedom by offering MBS an ownership stake in Kingdom
Holding. He was released in January 2018.

By 2022, Al Waleed had become an MBS loyalist. On paper, he
remained Kingdom Holding’s chairman and was not a fan of Musk’s offer
to buy Twitter. Like other longtime shareholders, he fondly recalled when
Twitter’s stock soared above $70 per share in 2021 and tweeted that he was
opposed to Musk’s offer, arguing that $54.20 didn’t come close to the
“intrinsic value” of the company.

The insult stung Musk. He had held a grudge against Saudi Arabia after
its sovereign wealth fund had declined to take Tesla private and told those
close to him that Saudi money in the U.S. tech industry was everywhere,
representing a threat to national security. Although he had his own hand out,
he wasn’t wrong. The Saudi government had invested billions of dollars in
companies across Silicon Valley. He fired back at Al Waleed’s post with a
pointed tweet that referenced the execution of Washington Post columnist
Jamal Khashoggi, a killing carried out at MBS’s command.

“Interesting. Just two questions, if I may,” Musk wrote on April 14.

“How much of Twitter does the Kingdom own, directly & indirectly? What
are the Kingdom’s views on journalistic freedom of speech?”
By October, however, both men had changed their tune. Al Waleed
perhaps saw an advantage in remaining close to the world’s richest man,
and Musk, whatever his morals, needed money. Kingdom Holding rolled
over the entirety of its stake, which was valued at $1.9 billion, and was set
to become one of the largest outside shareholders in Musk’s Twitter.

>>> WITH THE SALE of Twitter all but certain, Agrawal began having private
conversations with his top executives about whether they would work for
Musk. He asked them to set aside the way he’d been treated by the
billionaire.

True to his engineering background, he encouraged them to gather
information about the new owner before making up their minds. “Just
because this is the way it’s gone for me, doesn’t mean it will go this way for
you,” Agrawal said. “Get the data to make the right decision.”
That data would, of course, include personal calculations about money.

Many of Twitter’s top executives, including Agrawal, had contracts with
change-of-control clauses. That meant if there was an acquisition or new
leadership brought in to run Twitter, they would receive lucrative exit
packages that cashed out grants of stock they would otherwise have earned
out over years of service. The payout was intended to erase biases against a
buyer, keeping executives open-minded about an acquisition without fear of
losing their salaries. If Musk wanted them to stay, he would need to extend
new job offers to them. But the exit packages gave many of the leaders,
who figured Musk would fire them, a comfortable financial
cushion.Agrawal would earn his salary and unvested stock options, giving
him a golden parachute of more than $57 million. Segal would earn more
than $44 million and Gadde around $20 million.

But for workers outside the executive suite, a soft landing wasn’t
guaranteed. Some decided they would work for such an erratic owner only
if Musk offered improved compensation. Others, realizing their bosses
would likely vanish, dreamed of climbing the ladder. Workers panicked
about the impending deal, fearing layoffs or cuts to Twitter’s cushy benefits.

Executives tried to reassure them by pointing out Musk’s contract required
him to leave pay and benefits unchanged for a year after buying the
company, but the promises rang hollow. Employees knew Musk didn’t
always honor his agreements.

The executives’ exit packages, which were publicly disclosed in the
company’s financial filings, drove a wedge between the company’s
leadership and its rank and file. The money was more than any regular
worker dreamed of making in a lifetime. They couldn’t believe Agrawal
would be paid so much for spending less than a year in the top role. Twitter
had supposedly been a place where executives cared about what happened
to their employees. Now they were on their own.

>>> WITH THE DEAL BACK ON, Twitter executives were called in to a series of
whirlwind meetings to provide some semblance of a transition before
October 28, the court-mandated closing date. Most acquisitions included a
coordinated transition period, with both parties hammering out the details
over months. But this was unlike any takeover. In mid-October, Musk and
Gracias met virtually with two finance leaders: Julianna Hayes, a vice
president on Twitter’s finance team, and Robert Kaiden, Twitter’s chief
accounting officer.

Kaiden was not a typical Twitter employee. He had spent almost
twenty-seven years as an accountant at Deloitte. He joined Twitter in 2015,
and stood out among the hoodied crowd with his khakis and blue oxford
shirts. Kaiden had developed a reputation as a hard-ass who scrutinized the
company’s financials to the point of driving his counterparts in other
departments mad.

Kaiden and Hayes were meant to give Musk an overview of the
company’s finances, but Twitter’s lawyers still believed that Musk might
abandon the deal and insisted no one give him insider information. It
quickly became apparent to the execs that Musk lacked basic knowledge of
the merger agreement he had signed.

Hayes and Kaiden brought up the fact that on November 1—after Musk
was supposed to take over—many employees were set to receive their vest,
a bonus grant of company stock. But because Twitter would no longer be a
public company, the workers would be entitled to cash bonuses with each
share they held equivalent to a $54.20 payout. It would cost Twitter about
$200 million.

Musk, however, was confused and asked why he couldn’t reissue new
stock in his soon-to-be private company. That simply wasn’t in the
agreement, Kaiden told him, much to the annoyance of the billionaire who
was now on the hook for a massive sum.

“No, you agreed to that,” Gracias noted.

“Interesting,” Musk responded.

>>> ON WEDNESDAY, OCTOBER 26, Twitter headquarters was buzzing. The
Friday court-ordered deadline for the deal to close was looming, and
employees still knew little about what to expect.

One cluster of employees huddled around a table in the cafeteria at
lunchtime, swapping rumors about Musk and what he might do to their
beloved company. While they openly debated which executives might be on
the chopping block, one woman’s face dropped. “It’s Ned,” she hissed at her
coworkers.

The clean-cut chief financial officer had walked up behind them and
was quietly eavesdropping on the discussion. He flashed a bright smile,
trying to put the workers at ease. Despite the gloom in the building, Segal
appeared buoyant. After months of anxiously waiting, it was time for him to
get to work on the transaction and hammer out all the financial details.

“Ned, what’s going to happen?” one of the workers asked.

“I think we’re going to be fine,” Segal said. “We’re in good hands.”
The assembled group of employees was taken aback at Segal’s apparent
confidence. Surely he couldn’t be referring to Musk? But the finance chief
seemed so assured and relaxed. He must know something we don’t, the
employees thought. It was one of the few moments when they felt like
maybe, just maybe, Musk wouldn’t be so bad.

Segal chatted for a few more minutes, cracking jokes with his staff.

They had held together through months of uncertainty and pain, continuing
to put the company first while other coworkers resigned or threw up their
hands, and Segal seemed eager to comfort them. Then he excused himself.

Musk would arrive within hours. He needed to prepare.

M
26 > Let That Sink In
usk arrived at Twitter on the afternoon of Wednesday, October 26, to
tour his coming conquest with a made-for-Twitter stunt.

Grinning widely, Musk walked through the glass doors of one of
Twitter’s lobbies, carrying a white porcelain sink as if it were a stack of
pizza boxes. He let out a guttural chuckle as he walked by the empty front
desk.

“You can’t help but let that sink in,” he said to no one in particular.

He later tweeted a video of his staged entrance with the same corny
phrase: Let That Sink In! The groan-worthy pun was a symbol of the
changing of the guard. Agrawal had used his Twitter account sparingly. But
Musk was of Twitter. He thrived on the dopamine rushes he got when his
tweets went viral and he knew the attention-grabbing phrases that would
pump up a post.

The overuse of the phrase online had generated a meme of a sink
waiting at the doorstep of a house, but “Let that sink in” had become an
especially hackneyed refrain on Twitter, used by angry liberals during
Trump’s presidency. Slapping “let that sink in” at the end of a tweet about
Trump’s latest outrage was a gimmick to get retweets.

Musk himself had joked about the Twitterism earlier that year. “I’m
dressing as a sink on Halloween, as they will have no choice but to let me
in,” he tweeted the previous June, attracting 150,000 likes for the post.

In a tight black T-shirt and jeans, with a silver chain dangling around his
neck, Musk seemed to be striving for an extremely online meme lord cool
factor. Some employees recognized the Twitter-speak and saw it as
confirmation that Musk viewed the acquisition as an expensive joke. Others
grew anxious. Musk was finally in the building. The deal was real.

Musk’s sink gag played out in the lobby of one of Twitter’s smaller
office buildings, a structure erected next to the company’s primary Art Deco
high-rise in the 1970s that employees referred to by its address, “1 Tenth.”
Agrawal had planned to welcome Musk to 1 Tenth to keep his arrival from
causing too much commotion among employees, and to give the billionaire
a celebrity welcome. The side building held a suite of gleaming, freshly
remodeled conference rooms decked out with giant hashtags, selfie walls,
and bird statues.

The Twitter chief waited patiently while Musk filmed his grand
entrance, then escorted him up the elevator to the second floor.

Earlier that day, Leslie Berland had flown to San Francisco to welcome
Musk personally. On her way to the office, she typed out a quick email to
employees.

“As you’ll soon see or hear, Elon is in the SF office this week meeting
with folks, walking the halls, and continuing to dive in on the important
work you all do,” Berland wrote. “If you’re in SF and see him around, say
hi! For everyone else, this is just the beginning of many meetings and
conversations with Elon and you’ll all hear directly from him on Friday.”
She had been texting with Musk and was attempting to once again play the
CEO-whisperer role she had held with Dorsey, translating the boss’s edicts
to his deputies.

But Musk’s plans seemed to change by the hour. Even though he had an
assistant, a doe-eyed woman from the Boring Company named Jehn
Balajadia, the billionaire controlled his own calendar. Twitter’s leaders
couldn’t discern if he had any plans for his first day at Twitter, beyond
filming his elaborate inside joke.

Musk allowed Berland to ferry him through Twitter’s primary building
on a tour. Over the years, plenty of celebrities had visited Twitter.

Employees usually tried to keep a respectful distance, occasionally slinking
forward to ask for a selfie. But Musk attracted unprecedented gawking.

Streams of anxious employees trailed him from a distance like a school of
curious fish in the wake of a shark. Some held their phones in the air to take
photos of their prospective new owner as if he were a rock star at a concert.

No one came up to greet him.

Some in leadership believed Berland’s presence might make Musk’s
arrival more palatable for employees who were clearly unnerved by the
uncertainty. But the workers didn’t know how to act. Musk remained calm
and personable as Berland led him into Perch, a coffee shop on the tenth
floor where people often congregated over free espressos or cold brew
served by baristas. Musk ordered a hot coffee and fidgeted with his hands as
the chief marketing officer tried to motion people over, with little success.

Most people were content to stay away, using their phones as shields
through which they could peer at their new overlord.

Esther Crawford saw Musk’s jaunt through the office as an opportunity.

She had sold Squad, her group video chat start-up, to Twitter in 2020 and
was focused on wooing influencers and creators to Twitter. While apps like
Snapchat, Instagram, and TikTok had worked hard to attract influencers,
sometimes paying them to post, Twitter had lagged behind. Its users were
politicos, comedians, and journalists, who didn’t necessarily convince their
fans to spend money. Crawford, a product manager who oversaw some of
the company’s forays into new revenue streams, like payments, tried to
change that.

She watched as Musk went up to the counter to get his coffee and told a
colleague that it was strange no one was going up to him. “Should we go
say hi?” Crawford asked her friend. “Or will it look too thirsty?”
They decided to approach. Crawford introduced herself and started
listing off the products she oversaw at Twitter. When she mentioned
payments, Musk lit up. Payments were essential to his vision, he told her.

He had laid out a road map at X.com to make it easy to exchange money
online, and with the purchase of Twitter, he hoped to finally complete it.

“Email me tonight,” he told Crawford. “I want to meet with you
tomorrow.”
After their interaction, a white-haired man with a genteel New Orleans
accent approached Crawford. He introduced himself as Walter Isaacson, the
biographer of Leonardo da Vinci, Benjamin Franklin, and Henry Kissinger.

In the tech world, he was best known for his 656-page tome on Steve Jobs,
which affirmed him as an author who sought to explain and sometimes
lionize the changemakers of the human race. Isaacson was shadowing Musk
for his next project, an authorized biography of the genius behind Tesla and
SpaceX.

Isaacson asked Crawford for her contact information and shot her a
toothy grin. “I can tell you’ll be important,” he said.

Crawford eventually walked away, but her interaction broke the ice for
everyone else. Dozens of employees soon formed a semicircle around
Musk, taking selfies and asking questions as he leaned against a counter. He
rubbed his coffee mug as he spoke openly with his soon-to-be employees,
riffing on his expectations for Twitter. They listened intently, looking for
ways to impress him.

“Often I open Twitter and people will be saying things, and it makes me
feel sad,” he said. “And I don’t want to feel sad. People shouldn’t feel sad
when they come here and I feel sad.”
The employees nodded along. One female worker mustered up some
courage to ask what was really on people’s minds. “Sorry I have one more
question,” she said. “I know we’re all super excited to meet you, but I think
the real question everyone is thinking is: Are you going to fire 75 percent of
us?”
The question elicited a fit of nervous laughter. The employees had all
read a Washington Post report from a week earlier that said Musk had told
prospective investors that he was planning to cut three-fourths of the
company. The billionaire raised his left eyebrow and gripped his mug
tightly.

“You know, I’m not sure where that number actually came from
because, uh, no,” Musk replied, staring directly at the worker. Some in the
crowd smiled as if a weight had been lifted off their shoulders.

“Spread the word,” Berland said, nodding. “Spread the word.”
>>> BY THE AFTERNOON, Musk’s lieutenants, among them Birchall and
Gracias, had set up camp in the 1 Tenth conference rooms. In the coming
days, they would be joined by a small core of advisers and members of his
inner circle, including Balajadia and Steve Davis of the Boring Company;
the investors David Sacks and Jason Calacanis; Sriram Krishnan, a venture
capitalist with Andreessen Horowitz who had once worked at Twitter; and
even Musk’s infant son, X, who was followed around by his nanny and own
security detail.

During the tense summer of litigation, there had been virtually no
contact between the two sides besides the back-and-forth between the
lawyers. But Musk’s posse had demands. They wanted to know which
employees were in charge of what operations, and who excelled at their
jobs. It was clear the men were preparing for job cuts, but Twitter
executives were wary of giving them sensitive employee and financial
information in case the deal collapsed at the eleventh hour.

On the Twitter side, executives were also talking about cuts. Twitter’s
transition team was holed up in a suite of offices reserved for Agrawal’s
staff. Many figured they wouldn’t stay for long but wanted to see the
transition through and attempt to protect their teams from the coming
layoffs and preserve the platform they had come to love.

Others wanted out. Roth went to Gadde and begged for a separation
agreement that would allow him to quit with severance when Musk took
over.

“I won’t get the exit you’ll have, and I’m worried,” Roth confided in his
boss. Musk would surely get rid of him anyway, he said, and he wanted to
avoid the massive wave of online harassment that he assumed would follow
when Musk sent him to the guillotine. Gadde refused, saying that it would
be unfair to other employees if Roth was given an escape hatch.

Kathleen Pacini, one of Twitter’s human resources executives, agreed to
take on the task of keeping track in her head of who would leave and who
would pick up their work when they were gone. She was not to write down
the succession plan, in case Musk got ahold of it. But she was the go-to
person for anyone who wanted to know who they would report to after their
boss vanished.

As Musk froze out much of Twitter’s C-suite from meetings or any of
his plans, he kept Berland close, using her input to decide which employees
he should meet. He was immediately interested in Twitter Blue, a small part
of the company’s business that allowed die-hard users to pay $4.99 a month
for premium features, like the ability to edit tweets or change the
appearance of the Twitter icon on their phones. To Musk, this represented
an untapped financial opportunity. If people relied on the site as much as he
did, then of course they would pay for it. Berland set up a meeting for him
with Tony Haile, a senior product director who oversaw Blue.

Haile was exasperated and stressed. He had prepared a presentation for
Musk that wrapped up all of Twitter’s experimental bets to find new
revenue, including its newsletter service, content creator initiatives, and
Twitter Blue. He’d been told to brief Sacks on it, but then one of his
employees, Crawford, jumped the gun and went straight to Musk. Haile was
stuck in a tough position: instead of meeting with Sacks, he now had to try
to walk Musk back from Crawford’s pitch and get him to see the bigger
picture.

Berland also suggested that Musk meet with Gadde, an idea that
initially seemed preposterous to the billionaire. She was the enemy, the
leader of a legal team that had ensnared him in the unbreakable deal to buy
the company. While he had given up on escaping the deal, Musk still held
on to his conviction that Twitter’s executives were cheats who had wronged
him and undermined his legend as an entrepreneurial genius. He also
seemed to grasp that he had made Gadde’s life hell by targeting her on
Twitter and he couldn’t understand why she might engage with him.

“She wants to meet with me?” Musk asked incredulously.

Of course, Berland replied. She told him that these people loved Twitter
and wanted to see it succeed.

Musk agreed, and his assistant penciled in a thirty-minute meeting
toward the end of his day.

Gadde steeled herself before walking into the conference room. It was
her first time meeting Musk in the flesh. After his tweets had directed a
hateful mob against her six months ago, she remained wary.

Musk, who preferred working late into the night, had asked Gadde to
meet him at 6:00 p.m. But as other meetings about the transition dragged
on, he kept postponing the sit-down with his nemesis. Finally, after 8:00
p.m., he was ready.

She strode past baby X, who was puttering about the hallway with his
nanny in tow, and took a seat at the long wooden table, knowing she
wouldn’t have long to transfer more than a decade’s worth of legal lessons
and concerns to Musk.

The man sitting across from her did not seem like the troll behind
@ElonMusk. Musk was reserved, his voice sometimes barely fluttering to
an audible level. He was exhausted from his speed run through the office.

“I’m fried,” Musk admitted apologetically. “It’s been a long day.”
With little time for pleasantries, Gadde launched into her prepared
agenda. Twitter faced an abundance of tense legal challenges, she
explained. The FTC remained on high alert about the company’s privacy
practices after negotiating its settlement and tighter restrictions on Twitter
in May. The European Union was on the brink of implementing its Digital
Services Act, a landmark piece of legislation that imposed new moderation
responsibilities on Twitter and other major internet platforms. The overhaul
Twitter had undertaken in order to comply with the new European
legislation had not been completed, and it would be Musk’s obligation to
see it through if he did not want to face major financial penalties.

Musk listened, but it was unclear if what she said registered with him.

She knew he was a person who didn’t seem particularly moved by laws and
regulations, but still she was shocked at his nonchalance. Failure to comply
with the laws could potentially even lead to the European bloc banning
Twitter on the continent.

As the conversation moved on, Gadde continued to focus on issues
outside the U.S. She wanted Musk to understand that Twitter was a global
service. While news outlets tended to focus on content moderation issues in
the United States, there were far greater and immediate concerns about
authoritarian governments abroad, and Musk’s business relationships
presented a number of potential conflicts. He ran a car business that relied
on manufacturing and sales in China, she pointed out. What would happen
if the Chinese government put pressure on you to censor something it didn’t
like on the platform and threatened Tesla? She gamed out a similar scenario
in India, a market that Tesla had courted while Gadde spearheaded a lawsuit
against its government.

Musk nodded. “Interesting, interesting,” he said. “I haven’t really
figured that out yet.”
To Gadde, it was a stunning answer for a man who had planted his flag
on the protection of free speech. How could he not have thought about the
implications of his business relationships and the tough global content
moderation calls that the company regularly had to make?
Sensing they weren’t getting anywhere, Gadde decided to play to his
ego. She wanted to see Twitter continue to succeed, and she had seen the
company’s growth stall. Perhaps, she suggested, Musk could use Starlink to
connect places with little internet coverage—like parts of India—to bring
more potential Twitter users online. True free speech meant democratizing
Twitter’s platform not just in the U.S. but around the world. The billionaire
nodded disinterestedly.

As the conversation moved on, Musk became laser-focused on one of
Gadde’s decisions in particular: banning Trump. Why did she do it? And
how was the ban implemented?
The questions caught Gadde off guard. The Trump decision had been
aired out over and over again during the past year, starting with Dorsey’s
demand that Twitter publish its rationale for removing a sitting president.

The matter had been relitigated extensively in congressional hearings and
by the January 6th Committee, which subpoenaed several former
employees to speak about the risks that Trump’s tweets presented. If Musk
was curious about it, all he had to do was a quick Google search.

But he insisted that she run through it again.

“We were very public about this decision,” Gadde reminded him. “Jack
was very involved and ultimately approved everything.”
It wasn’t easy for anyone, Gadde continued. Removing a world leader
from the global discussion platform wasn’t something she had taken lightly.

Violence was always the red line, Gadde told Musk. If a world leader used
the platform to incite violence, Twitter would treat them like any other user
and ban them.

Musk brushed off her explanation, moving on to a more recent content
moderation decision that he had fixated on for months: Why did Twitter ban
the Babylon Bee?
To Gadde, reviewing individual content decisions—particularly ones
that had been picked over in the press—was a waste of time. She wanted
Musk to see the bigger picture: the responsibilities and power that he would
now wield as the owner of Twitter, and the pressures and pitfalls that came
with running it. But he seemed more interested in the American culture
wars.

Gadde mentioned Project Saturn, Agrawal’s pet project. It could give
Musk a framework to allow the kinds of content he was interested in, she
noted. There was a structured, sensible way to accomplish his goals.

The meeting ended after nearly thirty minutes and Gadde left the
Twitter office—never to return again.

It was clear. Musk had not bought Twitter to be a responsible steward
and guide one of the world’s most heavily used websites and forums for
human communication. He had bought it as an object of personal obsession
and was going to shape it to his whims. Musk had come to love Twitter, and
he believed that the people who had run it had led it astray.

He was going to make them pay.

A
27 > Trick or Tweet
t 5:11 a.m. on Thursday, October 27, Bret Taylor’s phone buzzed. In
his inbox was a letter from Alex Spiro, who instructed that “in
anticipation of the imminent completion of the merger” that day, Taylor and
Twitter’s executives should immediately freeze payments to outside
vendors and contractors. Having loaded Twitter with debt, Musk was
already attempting to manage his costs.

Taylor sighed, and forwarded the message on to Gadde, Edgett, and
Savitt four minutes later. The breakneck speed of the closing had worn him
down, and he still needed to freshen up before his final meeting with the
Twitter board at 7:00 a.m.

Spiro’s message continued to reverberate in the inboxes of Twitter’s
leadership. Edgett passed it on to Segal and Kaiden with an addendum.

“FYI. The latter half of this letter asks us to revoke all payment authority
internally as of the closing. Let’s discuss how best to make sure that
happens without anything breaking,” Edgett wrote.

Again, Musk appeared to be overreaching. Until he owned the company,
Twitter’s employees were free to ignore Musk. He clearly believed
differently.

At 7:00 a.m., Taylor joined a video call with several of Twitter’s other
directors to close out their final bits of business. Once the call ended, the
directors planned to submit resignation letters—they would no longer have
a role at the private company. But several of the members had already
checked out and didn’t attend.

In a call days earlier, Edgett had briefed Taylor and Pichette on a
proposal from Savitt, in which the outside lawyer asked that Twitter
consider paying his firm $95 million for their work. White-shoe law firms
like Wachtell sometimes charged what they called “success fees,” lavish
honorariums they were awarded only if they were victorious in their cases.

The success fees vastly exceeded their already robust hourly fees and could
enrich the partners for years to come. By securing the $54.20 price per
share from Musk, Wachtell argued it had increased the value of Twitter by
billions of dollars. After discussing the request with Edgett, Taylor and
Pichette had settled on bonuses that took the total billing for Wachtell’s few
months of work to $90 million. In average human terms the figure was an
extravagant amount, but as a percentage of the deal, it was around 0.2
percent of Twitter’s price tag.

At 7:29 a.m., as the board ticked through its agenda items, Edgett
forwarded an email to the directors that included a chart of the proposed
payment.

Lane Fox responded to Edgett almost instantaneously:
O
My
Freaking
God
She broke her sentence into a haiku-like format for extra emphasis.

Lane Fox never dreamed the total would be so extravagant.

But the board knew there was no time to waste. If they didn’t pay
Wachtell before the deal closed, it was unlikely that Musk would pay them
at all. And didn’t the lawyers deserve a reward for trapping the rule-flouting
executive into the transaction?
>>> SHEEN AUSTIN WAS at his South Bay home sleeping when his phone
buzzed just after 4:00 a.m. that Thursday morning. He had worked at Tesla
for eight years as an infrastructure engineer, maintaining the servers and
services that the electric automaker depended on, and had become
accustomed to receiving messages from work at all hours. He was, after all,
in service of Tesla—and therefore, Musk—and their mission of electrifying
the world’s automobiles and slowing climate change. It was a mission that
was bigger than him or any other individual employee, and these workers
threw their convictions behind whatever Musk asked of them.

This request, however, was unlike any he had seen before. The message
said that he and some of his colleagues were expected to report to Twitter’s
San Francisco headquarters that morning.

The Tesla employees who received the pings didn’t know whether to
take them seriously. They knew their boss planned to buy Twitter, as his
exploits had saturated the news for months, but many felt that it didn’t
concern them. They worked for Tesla.

But it was unavoidable. The Tesla workers messaged one another,
asking if they’d received similar commands, and grumbled as they stepped
out of bed to ready themselves for an unfamiliar commute. Austin made the
hour-long drive north along the 101 freeway up the San Francisco Peninsula
and toward the fog of the city.

Born in India, Austin, a round-faced man who often flashed a smile
from behind a thick beard, had been living in Toronto in 2013 when one of
Tesla’s recruiters called to ask if he’d be interested in relocating to
California to work at an up-and-coming automaker. Tesla had just launched
its Model S sedan the year before. Austin jumped at the opportunity.

Initially, Austin was confused by the command. He was bright and well
educated, but as a rule, he and other Tesla loyalists avoided most news
about the boss. The press was slanted against Musk, they believed, and the
day-to-day media drumbeat about him was simply noise that got in the way
of the mission. Inside Tesla, workers often joked that their next marching
orders or deadlines could come from one of the billionaire’s tweets. Some
of them checked Musk’s account for clues and found a message posted at
6:08 a.m. that began “Dear Twitter Advertisers.”
Sarah Personette, Twitter’s chief customer officer, had asked Musk to
say something. As the head of the company’s ad sales organization,
Personette knew that major brands were deeply worried about the takeover
and yearning for reassurances that Musk would protect them from illicit
content. Advertisers, the company’s main source of revenue, were jittery at
the prospects of his ownership, fearing a decrease in content moderation
and the harboring of hate and abuse, Personette warned him. Instead of his
usual flippant jokes, Musk had posted a grown-up message. Twitter would
not be a “free-for-all hellscape” but rather a place where “a wide range of
beliefs can be debated,” Musk tweeted.

“That is why I bought Twitter,” he wrote. “I didn’t do it because it
would be easy. I didn’t do it to make more money. I did it to try to help
humanity, whom I love. And I do so with humility, recognizing failure in
pursuing this goal, despite our best efforts, is a very real possibility.”
Austin was among the first to arrive that morning and was soon joined
by a few dozen of Tesla and SpaceX’s most trusted engineers. Among them
was Ross Nordeen, a young supercomputing engineer, and Musk’s two
cousins: James Musk, a Tesla autopilot engineer, and his ginger younger
brother, Andrew, who worked at Neuralink.

Within an hour of arriving at Twitter, the engineers began to realize
there wasn’t much of anything for them to do. They had not been informed
of any clear transition plan, and it was unclear if Musk even had one. While
most of them milled about in Twitter’s side building at 1 Tenth, some of the
engineers wandered both offices, marveling at the bird-themed decor, free
snacks, and preparations for a company-wide Halloween party that would
be unthinkable at the spartan offices of Tesla and SpaceX.

The invaders were easy to spot by leery-eyed tweeps, who sized them
up and down. They didn’t have the blue badges carried by employees, and
instead held red visitor or green vendor keycards. Most of them were men.

Some of them sported Tesla- or SpaceX-stamped apparel. To the Twitter
employees, these outsiders could not be trusted, and they came up with a
nickname for the intruders: “the goons.”
>>> AT AROUND 9:00 A.M., Agrawal summoned his leadership team into one
of the large glass-doored conference rooms that lined the suite of offices on
the seventh floor of Twitter’s San Francisco headquarters. After months of
tension and worry, there was a grim clarity in the air—Musk was finally
completing the acquisition.

Twitter’s top-ranking employees crammed into the room. Agrawal’s
deputies were there, as well as vice presidents from finance, product,
human resources, and sales. Even more executives dialed in on video
conference from New York and around the globe, their faces tiling the
screen at the end of the room.

It was clear to everyone there that it was Agrawal’s last meeting. He sat
at the conference room table, Segal by his side. The mood was somber—
everyone in the room understood that many among them might soon be
swept away by Musk’s tsunami.

No one was more likely to be fired than Agrawal. For months, Musk
had made clear his disdain for Twitter’s chief executive in barbed tweets,
curt text messages, and explosive video calls. Agrawal had taken most of
Musk’s outbursts quietly, advised by Twitter’s battalion of lawyers not to
argue with the billionaire or speak about the deal to employees—or even
executives—because anything he said might leak to the media.

After months of near-silence to the wider group, Agrawal spoke,
remaining calm and analytical. “We might close today,” he announced. The
court-imposed deadline for Musk to complete the transaction was the next
day, Friday, but it seemed he could get it done a day early. Agrawal told the
executives he was proud of what they’d accomplished.

There was no agenda, he told everyone, and opened the discussion.

“What’s going to happen now?” one executive in attendance asked. Segal
tried to explain how the closing would work but said candidly that no one
could be sure. After all, the man on the other side of the transaction was
unpredictable.

There was plenty of work left to do to finalize the deal, but Agrawal
allowed Twitter’s leaders to riff, share, and ask anything they wanted. They
had never had a meeting quite like it before. Sales executives wanted to
know what they should tell advertisers. HR leaders wanted to know what
they could tell employees, and when they were allowed to share any
information.

Then one of the employees in the room broached the question that
everyone was thinking but no one dared say: “What’s going to happen to
you guys?”
Segal repeated the same line he’d told employees before. “I haven’t
talked to him,” he said. “I’ll remain open until I do.” Agrawal nodded
along.

“Each of you needs to make your own decision,” Agrawal said.

The executives had endless questions, but their leaders had few
answers. Segal could sense their frustration and, after months of facing
unanswerable questions, he cracked. Fighting to keep his composure, he
told them he didn’t know what was coming next. “People remember how
you handle yourself when it’s hard, not when it’s easy,” he said, his voice
choking with emotion. He tried to express the weight of the responsibility
all of them had—to the company and to each other—to see the sale through.

Several of the executives in the room were startled to see Segal,
normally polished, perky, and on message, get emotional. As the meeting
ended, some of them embraced each other, while others hung back to say
their goodbyes to their bosses.

>>> GRACIAS, Musk’s de facto finance shepherd, had told Twitter’s team on
Wednesday that he had all the money in place to close the deal. It was a
pleasant surprise to Segal, who, upon learning that Gracias had the funds,
nudged the board. They should move up the close, the chief financial officer
suggested. Finishing the transaction early would leave Musk one less day to
back out. The board’s bellwether all along had been deal certainty, and
moving quickly to collect Musk’s cash before another unforeseen crisis
derailed the whole thing was just another way Twitter could deliver
certainty to its shareholders. While Twitter’s leadership had no idea where
some of Musk’s money was coming from—new, undisclosed investors had
joined Musk’s take-private effort—they were more than willing to take his
$44 billion.

Members of Twitter’s finance teams had adopted a gallows humor
approach to the deal and made a joke of trying to track Musk’s money.

When he sold new tranches of Tesla stock and filed the required public
disclosures of the transactions, they tallied up his funds, trying to figure out
if Musk had enough cash on hand to buy their company. At one point,
Musk’s lawyers also accidentally sent Twitter’s finance team a full
spreadsheet of all the people and investment firms from which they
solicited money. That screwup was immediately followed by a legal threat
to the Twitter recipients to delete the email and its contents.

Of course, there was no way of knowing where the billionaire kept all
his money or how he planned to use it. Twitter employees debated whether
Musk was sitting on a secret stash of cryptocurrency or had obtained fresh
margin loans using his private SpaceX shares as collateral. The Wall Street
Journal later reported that Musk borrowed $1 billion from SpaceX that
October, paying the money back with interest the following month.

To Twitter, it didn’t really matter where Musk’s money came from—so
long as he paid. But given how many agreements Musk had already tried to
break, nothing was certain. There was a world where the richest man on
earth, they believed, could test the court-appointed deadline by saying he
simply did not have the available funds to do the deal.

In a normal transaction, the buyer would be transparent with the seller
about where his funds were flowing from. But Musk, in what Twitter
executives believed was an effort to protect his investors from scrutiny, had
dumped all the funds into a single account so that Twitter couldn’t trace
their origins.

On the call with Segal and Twitter’s finance executives and lawyers,
Gracias changed his tune. His boss was actually short, Gracias explained.

Musk was missing more than $400 million, and Gracias demanded that
Twitter wire money from its own coffers to Musk so that the deal could
close. Segal was dumbfounded. Kaiden and the half dozen other people
who listened in to the conversation couldn’t believe what they were hearing.

Gracias knew that Twitter had more than $2.5 billion in cash on its
balance sheet. And with Musk still short on financing—some of the
expected funds had not arrived at that moment—the private equity buff
tried to pull a mafioso move.

“You need to wire us the money,” he growled. It wasn’t clear to the
listening Twitter executives what had changed since Wednesday, when
Gracias said Musk had his funds ready. But Twitter had the cash on its
balance sheet, and it would be Musk’s soon enough anyway once he owned
Twitter, Gracias reasoned. Why not simply use Twitter’s money to shore up
the remainder of the financing and make this easier for everyone?
But the Twitter executives didn’t trust Gracias, given Musk’s attempts
to back out of the deal. What if they did wire the sum and Musk once again
tried to call the whole thing off? “No one on this call has the authority to do
that,” Segal replied.

Since Musk barged in with his offer in April, Twitter had stuck to its
“just say yes” defense. Segal knew better than to refuse Gracias’s request,
potentially handing Musk a reason to blow up the deal during its final
hours. He wouldn’t say no, but he couldn’t agree either. So he kept his
answer open-ended but truthful, focusing on the fact that only the board had
the authority to consider and authorize a last-minute transfer of funds.

“You’re not going to wire me the fucking money?” Gracias said,
becoming more impatient. “Are you saying no to Elon Musk?”
“I’m just saying that no one on this call can make the decision to send
the money,” Segal responded. He was the highest-ranking Twitter executive
in attendance, and no board members were dialed in. If there was any
possibility of Segal staying to work for Musk, it evaporated at that moment.

At one point, Korman, who was also on the call, asked the Skadden lawyers
to keep Gracias in check.

As the call ended, Twitter’s finance executives gossiped amongst
themselves about the demand, which they found inappropriate. Musk had
agreed to find the funds, independent of Twitter, at the price he set himself.

They couldn’t move Twitter’s cash around in some corporate shell game
just to appease him. “This feels a bit fucked up,” one member of Twitter’s
C-suite told Hayes, the finance vice president. Others thought it was
potentially fraudulent and criminal.

An hour or so later, Gracias called back. He’d found the money from
somewhere else, he said. Some Twitter executives speculated that they had
gone back to Qatar’s sovereign wealth fund, but could never confirm it. The
deal could proceed.

>>> THE FINAL SCRAMBLE to close and the strange backroom calls never
trickled out to Twitter’s rank and file. But throughout the building, the
atmosphere was tense. Some employees trickled into the office early on
Thursday, rubbernecking to catch a glimpse of the billionaire and witness
history. Others had already planned to be in the office that day for a
Halloween party, which had long been scheduled for that afternoon.

Twitter and its employees took the holiday seriously, dubbing the party,
which took place in offices around the world, “Trick or Tweet.” In London,
staffers on the corporate events team had blanketed the office in piles of
decorative pumpkins and black paper cutouts of bats, while the New York
office featured bales of hay and fake cobwebs that draped over giant
hashtags and @-sign statues. In Mexico City, workers prepped for a spooky
art session, in which employees would get individual canvases to paint
jack-o’-lanterns. At noon in San Francisco, workers were adding the
finishing touches, stringing up lights in the ninth-floor common area,
organizing group costumes, and setting up tables that employees’ children
would visit to trick-or-treat. Everyone was encouraged to invite loved ones
to the festivities.

But no number of pumpkin-flavored cocktails or pieces of candy could
cut the tension. Workers hovered in communal areas, ignoring work, which
seemed pointless considering the looming ownership change. People
gossiped and compared notes as the San Francisco office became one large,
rumor-swirling game of telephone. What did you see yesterday? Who did
you meet? What have you heard?
Others tried to maintain normality. Across Market Street from Twitter’s
headquarters, some employees opened the doors to NeighborNest, a
community center the company had funded. NeighborNest had been in the
works since before the pandemic, when Twitter struck a deal with the local
government to keep its offices in San Francisco in exchange for a tax break
on payroll. Instead of decamping to the peninsula and building offices
alongside Google and Facebook, Twitter agreed to stay on the ramshackle
Market Street and contribute to its revitalization. As part of the plan to give
back, the community center would offer technology courses to the
neighbors, helping them catch up to the wave of techie newcomers
sweeping into the city and driving up rents. But the entire endeavor had
stalled during the COVID years.

On Thursday, NeighborNest finally reopened to the public. Twitter had
bought up hundreds of laptops and partnered with local groups to bring in a
crowd of recent immigrants from Central and South America for technology
training and a laptop giveaway. A young mother of three cried with
excitement when she received her computer, and the Twitter employees
shelled the laptops out as quickly as possible, nervous that Musk would
barge in and shut the whole thing down. They were painfully aware that
NeighborNest’s first event was also likely to be its last.

After the training was over, the employees drifted reluctantly back
across the street to join the Halloween party. Their excitement at doing
something good for the community quickly gave way to fear.

In the executive suite, some of Twitter’s leadership wondered if they
should include Musk and his henchmen to give them a taste of what the
company was about. They mused about getting X, Musk’s young son, a
last-minute costume so he could be like one of the other kids and join in the
festivities. Unsure how their future boss would react, they eventually
decided against it. In late September, when Musk agreed to close the deal,
Twitter had already ordered him a welcome box of swag that included a
custom letterman jacket and other Twitter-branded goodies, running up a
tab of $6,397. Getting presents for X, too, might overdo the welcome.

>>> MUSK’S GOONS CAME without costumes. They meandered through the
halls as they awaited instructions, the glares of Twitter employees burning
into the back of their necks. Some of them felt awkward invading Twitter,
but they knew they served the whims of one man. In a brief meeting with
the billionaire that morning, Austin and some of the other engineers
received a clear directive from his boss.

“Make sure the site doesn’t go down,” the billionaire said. “Make sure
no one does anything.”
As the closing of the deal crept closer, Musk became increasingly
paranoid, just as he had done in times of crisis at SpaceX and Tesla. All the
Twitter employees hated him, he believed, and he’d seen some of them
tweeting openly about their opposition to his ownership. Musk didn’t
expect a warm welcome from his new workers and had spun up an
imaginary scenario in which a vigilante deleted some of Twitter’s code or
unleashed a cyberattack that took down the site and humiliated him.

Austin and several other Musk employees rounded up the Twitter
executives they thought would be able to prevent a disgruntled employee
from going rogue, including Lea Kissner, the chief information security
officer; Carrie Fernandez, vice president of engineering; and Damien
Kieran, chief privacy officer, to relay Musk’s concerns. They demanded that
Twitter implement a “code freeze,” preventing any changes to Twitter’s site
or apps, effectively grinding half the company’s work to a halt.

The Twitter executives pushed back. Even though his people were on
the ground and in the Twitter office, Musk had not yet closed the deal. He
was not the owner and had no right to order them around. Twitter’s
employees had been instructed not to follow any commands from Musk’s
team unless they received approval from Segal or Edgett.

“Elon’s your boss,” Kissner told the outsiders. “But he’s not ours.”
Besides, Kissner and Kieran had other work to do. They were
responsible for submitting quarterly audits to the Federal Trade
Commission that documented Twitter’s compliance with the agency’s
ongoing oversight of the company’s privacy program. The audits were
grueling and deeply detailed, documenting each task Twitter had to do to
preserve users’ privacy and the specific employee who was responsible for
making sure that task got done. The next report was due in two weeks, and
Kissner and Kieran were both legally liable for its accuracy—if anything
went wrong, the executives could face criminal charges.

Kissner called Roth and asked him to manage Musk’s paranoia,
summoning him to the second floor of 1 Tenth where Musk and his aides
were gathered. Roth opened his laptop and showed Musk the @ElonMusk
account in Twitter’s moderation dashboard. Roth was one of the only
employees who had back-end access to high-profile accounts like Musk’s,
he explained to the billionaire, a security measure that ensured that few
employees could tamper with it. Musk seemed reassured.

Roth seized the opportunity to remind Musk that the Brazilian
presidential runoff election was coming that Sunday, and the company
would need to be on high alert for misinformation. Musk nodded. “Very
risky,” he said.

>>> AFTER HER LATE sit-down with Musk the night before, Gadde decided to
work from home and avoid any possible mess that might await her at the
office. She expected the deal might close that day, and Segal had confirmed
her suspicions.

Most of the paperwork had been signed and cleared by lawyers, but
Twitter still waited for all the money to arrive. For a massive deal brokered
by the world’s leading banks and law firms, the process was extremely
haphazard, Gadde told her associates. The sale of Twitter—one of the
biggest moments in Silicon Valley history—had been reduced to a
stochastic series of wire transfers.

Twitter’s bankers at Goldman Sachs sat refreshing the screens of their
web browsers. They were logged in to view a third-party administered
account, which held Musk’s payments in escrow until the total amount—
$44 billion plus $2.5 billion in closing costs—was gathered in full. Gadde
constantly called her bankers that afternoon, like a child on a family road
trip. Are we there yet?
While she waited for Musk’s payment, Gadde also scrambled to get
cash out the door for Savitt and his attorneys at Wachtell. After the board
signed off on the $90 million invoice that morning, it was her duty to make
sure the lawyers actually got paid before Twitter changed hands. Just after
noon, Twitter’s accounting department approved the eye-popping wire
transfer from the company’s Citibank account. At 3:50 p.m., just ten
minutes before the deal closed, the transfer was posted.

Once Musk’s money arrived, the final step in the sale was Gadde’s. She
had already signed her name to the merger certificate and nodded her
approval for it to be sent off, officially relinquishing control of Twitter to
Musk. Then her lawyers shipped the freshly signed document to Delaware’s
Division of Corporations, the government agency that oversees the more
than a million companies that claim the tiny state as their home.

Gadde sat back in her chair and let relief and grief wash over her in
alternating waves. Her home office, lined with white bookshelves and
artfully arranged plants, was strangely quiet after the frenetic sounds of her
constantly buzzing phone died down.

She had sold Twitter.

>>> AS GADDE PREPARED to send off the merger certificate bearing her
signature, the final step in closing the deal, Segal walked into Agrawal’s
office. It was time.

Agrawal had never gotten a chance to finish decorating the space, and a
few pieces of unhung art leaned against the walls. The chief executive’s
standing desk overlooked several tall, narrow windows with a view of
Market Street.

Segal held his cell phone in one hand, a video conference with Gadde
and Twitter’s external lawyers still playing in the background. The people
on the call watched as he gestured for Agrawal to come with him. The deal
was imminent. It was best that they leave the premises on their own terms
before Musk made them do so. Agrawal nodded solemnly and hit send on
an email explaining that the change-of-control terms in his contract had
been met, and that he stood ready to discuss the future of the company with
Musk. Then he gathered his things and walked out of his office for the last
time.

Segal, still on the video call, framed his face with his iPhone as he
walked through the office. He didn’t stop to warn the employees who were
still working about what was coming, although he had told a few trusted
senior executives that he planned to go. He shoved open the security door
and walked into the stairwell, Agrawal in tow. They descended from the
ninth floor down into the parking garage, avoiding the television crews that
were waiting on the street with cameras. Segal’s Wi-Fi connection faltered
and his video flickered in and out, giving the others on the call the
impression that the CFO was about to disappear. He said an abrupt goodbye
to Agrawal before jumping in his car, and, with the video still rolling, pulled
out of the garage. Agrawal got into his car, too, and drove out into the bright
October sunlight of San Francisco, just another software engineer heading
for home.

S
28 > “The bird is freed”
egal had exited the building with little fanfare. Among those on
Segal’s team who were unaware of his departure was Jon Chen, a vice
president of corporate development.

A nine-year Twitter veteran, he lived in Los Angeles and had come
north to headquarters only a few times in recent years. Typically the place
had been empty, but with the Halloween party and the rumblings of the
takeover, the office was busier than ever. People had come to witness
history or drink their worries away.

Chen had arrived at San Francisco International Airport that abnormally
clear morning on a one-way ticket, at Segal’s request. He had no hotel
reservation and didn’t know how long he’d stay in the city, but the previous
day he had logged in to a video call from his home to find Gracias, Birchall,
Davis, and Sacks staring back at him.

Musk had tasked his friends, who became a de facto transition team,
with scouting out Twitter employees best suited to bring about his vision.

He believed that Twitter was a bloated company with too many managers.

But he also thought there’d be a few motivated individuals outside of the
untrustworthy C-suite who would leap at the opportunity to work for him. It
was his transition team’s job to locate them.

Chen, a gregarious former investment banker at Morgan Stanley, was
one of the people on their list. Unlike some of his colleagues, he wasn’t
morally opposed to the idea of working for Musk. But he remained hesitant.

To Chen and the other select Twitter employees who were invited to meet
with Musk’s goons, these conversations felt like auditions, in which they
tap-danced for the outsiders in a desperate attempt to keep their jobs.

Chen was immersed in the financial discussions during the topsy-turvy
negotiations with Musk and had steeled himself for antagonism from
Musk’s friends. But when he joined the call with them on Wednesday, they
weren’t adversarial at all. The men peppered him with questions about
Twitter’s strategy for mergers and acquisitions, and Chen found common
ground with them. Gracias and Sacks were investors themselves, and Chen
played up his investment banking background. He ended the hour-long call
with a sigh of relief. That felt…normal, he thought to himself.

The meeting had gone well, Segal told him on a call later that
Wednesday night. Musk’s people had asked to meet Chen in person. He
took the hour flight up to San Francisco on Thursday morning with little
more than his laptop and a few changes of clothes. Without an assigned
desk in the office, he found himself milling around with the rest of the
Twitter and Tesla employees as he waited to be summoned to Musk’s war
room.

>>> SHORTLY AFTER SEGAL and Agrawal fled the building, Chen finally got
the call and walked over to the conference rooms where Musk held court.

Chen waited inside, as people filed in and out of Musk’s room, and spotted
some of the men who had interviewed him over video the day before. They
shook hands and launched into more of the same discussion.

Chen sensed he had won them over. Davis and Birchall spoke about
what Musk wanted as if they were his disciples, reverently laying out his
plans to transform Twitter. Sensing opportunity, Chen riffed off their
proclamations with his own hopes for what the billionaire could build. As a
finance pro, he was not involved in product or engineering at Twitter and he
knew his suggestions weren’t exactly novel ideas. The way Musk’s
transition team hung on his words made him wonder how much actual
thought they had given to how they would run the company.

“We should obviously be taking advantage of payments on the
platform,” he said. The goons’ eyes lit up as if he had said the magic words.

“Maybe we could build for less appreciated communities that are
already on Twitter,” he later suggested.

“Like what?” Davis asked.

“Well, like gamers,” Chen said matter-of-factly. “These are highly
monetizable communities. They spend all types of money on in-app
purchases. Why aren’t we focused on that type of stuff?” Chen said. The
men’s faces melted.

“You have to tell Elon what you’ve been telling us,” Davis said.

After the lengthy discussion, Musk strode to the room and sat down
opposite Chen, much larger in real life than what the finance exec had
expected. At first, Chen felt he was interviewing for his job, but he was now
confident he’d be sticking around. Why else would the world’s richest man
be asking for his ideas?
Musk listened as Chen shared his vision for the “everything app,” but
the conversation was halting. Lawyers constantly bustled in and out with
stacks of paperwork, which Chen strained to read. He had expected the
closing to run up to the Friday deadline, but the flurry of lawyers, bankers,
and documents led him to realize: Oh shit, the deal is closing right now.

Chen was the only Twitter employee in the room as Musk bought
Twitter. Musk was nonchalant, barely glancing at the papers he
autographed, as if he was signing a check for dinner at the end of the night.

Watching the casualness with which Musk closed one of the most
momentous deals of all time was jarring.

And then someone opened the door: “We are closed!” A shock wave of
excitement rushed through the room and a smile crept across the face of
Twitter’s new owner.

The bankers high-fived and Musk laughed, his months-long, on-again,
off-again pursuit of the world’s town square finally completed with a few
signatures and wire transfers. Chen sat across from his new boss, stunned.

“Do you guys need me to step out?” the Twitter vice president asked the
room.

“No, no, no, you’re good,” Musk replied. Then he slammed his fist on
the table and let out what could only be described as a battle cry.

“Fuck Zuck!” Musk shouted.

Chen couldn’t fathom why Musk, in a moment of celebration, fixated
on the founder of Facebook. Perhaps the Twitter deal was Musk’s attempt to
lay siege to Zuckerberg’s social media empire, or maybe he had some longstanding score he wanted to settle. Whatever the case, Chen didn’t feel that
he could ask.

The conversation between Chen and Musk lasted a few more minutes.

As the celebrations trailed off, the Twitter executive could hardly focus on
what was being said. He exited the conference room in a daze and started
his trek back to the main office building. In the hall, he walked by a group
of Musk’s Morgan Stanley bankers, who celebrated the completion of the
deal in a frenzy, whooping and laughing. Chen said nothing. He continued
out a set of doors that separated Musk’s restricted area from where regular
Twitter employees were working on an open floor.

The threshold marked a stark difference between worlds. Behind him
was the sheer joy of corporate conquest. In front of him, people were
crying. They were executive assistants who had served the likes of Agrawal,
Segal, and Gadde. As Chen was in the conference room watching Musk
close the deal, four of Twitter’s top executives had been fired.

>>> BEFORE CLOSING THE DEAL, Musk had already given directions for his
first order of business once he officially took over. Musk determined that
Agrawal, Gadde, Segal, and Sean Edgett, the company’s general counsel,
would be fired “for cause.”
The legal distinction insinuated that the executives had done something
nefarious to harm the company, and it would potentially allow Musk to
avoid paying the $120 million in exit packages he owed to the four leaders
once Twitter changed hands and its shares were delisted from the New York
Stock Exchange. Those two events were triggers in the executives’
contracts, allowing them to collect salaries and stock bonuses that they
otherwise would have earned over many years of service.

Musk wasn’t going to let the payments happen. By terminating them
“for cause” he was snipping their golden parachutes. It was a slap in the
faces of the people who had forced him to buy the company, and he was
going to make sure they wouldn’t be rewarded for their toils. The billionaire
had his people draft letters outlining the terms of the executives’ firings, and
they were sent minutes before the deal closed at 4:00 p.m. He also sought to
have them marched out of the building by security, a symbolic gesture akin
to a medieval warlord putting heads on spikes after his conquest.

While Musk and his advisers may have thought they were being slick
with their corporate assassinations, most of the executives were prepared.

Gadde knew her thirty-minute conversation with Musk the day before—no
matter how polite he was—would not change his mind. She stayed home on
Thursday, leaving her San Francisco home only to attend a school function
for one of her children. Agrawal and Segal had inklings as well—hence
their departures from the office.

They had also prepared letters for Musk that outlined the terms allowing
them to depart. Ever optimistic, Agrawal and Segal had written of their love
for Twitter and their willingness to stay on. However, the triggers that
allowed them to leave with their exit packages had been met, they noted. If
Musk wanted them around, he’d need to ask them to stick around. By
giving Musk notice of the triggers, the executives believed they had started
a ticking clock that would allow them to claim their golden parachutes.

Only Edgett didn’t realize he was in immediate danger. As Gadde’s
number two, the lawyer had spent more than a decade at the company, once
testifying to Congress about Russian disinformation on the platform, but
preferred to stay behind the scenes. While his last months at Twitter had
been consumed by legal work for the deal and he served as the board’s
secretary during its many meetings, he didn’t think he had done anything to
land himself in Musk’s crosshairs. Edgett arrived at the office on Thursday
and treated it like any other day.

As the deal was closing that afternoon, he was meeting with Marianne
Fogarty, Twitter’s chief compliance officer, on the building’s ninth floor.

Though employees in costume were gathered a few hundred feet away and
beginning their Halloween festivities, Edgett and Fogarty huddled in a
glass-walled conference room in an area that only executives could access,
perching on stools at a high table as they went over an internal compliance
investigation. Twitter’s general counsel reflexively checked his phone, then
looked up at Fogarty in shock. He glanced quickly back down at his phone,
trying to comprehend the email he just received.

“I think I’ve just been fired,” he said in a hushed tone.

At that moment, Kathleen Pacini walked through the executive pen.

Edgett popped his head out of the conference room and frantically waved
her in, breaking the news of his dismissal.

They stared at each other, stunned. They had assumed that Musk would
wait at least a day to fire anyone.

“Did you get fired?” Edgett texted Gadde, who immediately confirmed
that she, too, had been hit. Agrawal and Segal were also gone. As Fogarty
and Pacini watched Edgett type out frantic texts, they realized they had
suddenly become some of the most senior executives remaining at the
company.

Pacini shifted immediately into planning mode. Agrawal, a close friend,
had warned her about this, and she began taking stock of her mental
transition plan. With the firings of half the C-suite, hundreds of Twitter
employees were now reporting directly to Musk, who she imagined would
assume the role of chief executive.

Within five minutes of Edgett receiving the email, there was a knock on
the conference room door. Twitter’s security guards were standing outside
and it was time to go. Earlier, the company’s corporate security team had
negotiated with Musk’s people that should there be any firings, they would
be the ones to escort out their former colleagues. They knew the building
and the processes to recover any company items, they said, also knowing
that it would afford the people they had worked with some dignity. Edgett
gathered his things and said goodbye to Fogarty and Pacini, and then rode
Twitter’s gold-frosted elevators down for the last time.

As word of the firings spread, other members of Twitter’s transition
team began to trickle into the ninth-floor executive conference room. They
began to hammer out the logistics—who would report to whom, and what
the communications plan would be to convey what had just occurred to
Twitter’s workforce. Members of Segal’s finance team, who were also on
the ninth floor, were among the first to hear of the executive
defenestrations, and the executive area quickly filled up with shocked and
outraged faces. The crude dismissals were a wake-up call, demonstrating
how Musk would handle the transition. This is going to be brutal, some
thought to themselves.

By then, #TrickOrTweet was in full swing. Children dressed as Marvel
superheroes, princesses, and monsters ran between circles of employees,
collecting sweets and snacking on cotton candy. Several workers crowded
in front of a portrait station, donning devil horns and silly hats for group
pictures. The cafeteria was transformed with cotton spiderwebs as
magicians roamed the floor, performing card tricks for anyone hoping to
take their mind off the deal.

A broad-shouldered man wore a pirate costume and mask. Rumors
began to circulate that it was Musk himself, infiltrating the party. Another
person in a shark suit also drew whispers—could it be the new owner? The
revelry had a slapstick quality that felt classically Twitter. It was distressing
yet funny, like the internet had come to life.

Within minutes of the 4:00 p.m. transaction and subsequent firings,
news outlets began to report that the deal was closed. Employees who
stayed at the party frantically refreshed their Twitter feeds. “Parag and Ned
are out!” they murmured to each other. “Vijaya too!” There was no internal
email announcing the monumental sale or the changing of the guard, and
employees who had felt they had been excluded by Agrawal’s lack of
communication were only plunged into further darkness.

A hundred yards away in the executive offices on the ninth floor, the
remaining leaders trying to guide Twitter’s transition were stumped. There
was no plan for how to communicate with the employees, and without a
green light from the new owner, they weren’t even sure if they had the
power to make decisions.

>>> MUSK AND THE goons stayed away from the Halloween festivities,
celebrating with the Morgan Stanley bankers in the war room. They sipped
Pappy Van Winkle bourbon procured by Michael Grimes, a small token
after the deal’s closing fees had made Morgan Stanley millions of dollars.

Although Musk was grinning over his glass, he wasn’t satisfied with his
conquest. He itched to start another fire drill. Firing the executives was a
fine start, but he was eager to put his fingerprints on the product.

One of Musk’s gripes was that Twitter’s website required people to log
in before they could peruse the timeline of fresh tweets. It seemed to be one
of the problems that inhibited Twitter from attracting new users—no one
really understood how the site worked before they started using it. Musk
believed Twitter should entice people to try it, and so he demanded that its
home page be transformed from a blank log-in screen into an “Explore”
page that displayed a collection of trending topics and popular tweets. The
move would surely increase traffic and interest, he thought.

Musk tasked Davis with finding someone to execute the task, and the
Boring Company leader ran full speed to deliver the results, no questions
asked. The decision wasn’t informed by any research, user studies, or
consultation with Twitter’s engineers or product specialists, but rather
Musk’s gut. Had he asked people who worked on the product, he might
have learned that the log-in page was a vital defense against spammers and
bots that crawled Twitter’s site to pilfer content, forcing users to log in with
credentials to prove they had an account.

At 10:00 p.m., Davis called Sullivan. Although Twitter’s product leader
was one of Musk’s most strident opponents in the executive suite, he had
survived the first round of leadership firings. “This needs to be done
tonight,” Davis told Sullivan as he described the assignment.

Sullivan told Davis that Twitter had actually tested the idea before.

There were tradeoffs, he explained to Musk’s friend, and ultimately the
company had decided against leaving an open timeline running for people
who didn’t have an account. Davis brushed off the warnings. They had
nothing to do with how product development worked in Musk’s world.

Musk delivered an edict, and then it was done.

Sullivan shrugged. It was the kind of nonsense he’d expected from
Musk all along. He ended the call with Davis and went to work finding
employees who were still awake and could execute Musk’s vision. He gave
the task to Twitter employees in London, who were just beginning their day.

It wasn’t the only change afoot. While Musk had given the impression
to workers a day earlier at the Perch that layoffs weren’t imminent, he was
indeed planning for drastic cuts. He wanted to start layoffs immediately,
saving money by shedding their salaries. He deputized some of his
associates, including his cousins, James and Andrew, and asked them to
develop lists of who to keep and who to jettison. There would be no mercy.

Some of the list making fell to Austin, who, like the Musk cousins, had
spent a grand total of twelve hours at Twitter. The infrastructure engineer
had been unaware of Musk’s plan to immediately axe Twitter’s top leaders,
but he wasn’t surprised. Musk had made no secret of his repugnance for
Twitter’s executives, and most of the goons figured they would be gone
sooner rather than later. The immediacy of the employee cuts, however, felt
different. The rush could lead to some cruel and potentially damaging
outcomes for the company.

Musk also wanted to start locking Twitter employees out of internal
systems in preparation for the layoff. Several of his employees from Tesla
and the Boring Company summoned Roth and asked him to cut off access
to Agent Tools, Twitter’s internal system that governed accounts.

Employees with access to Agent Tools could reset passwords, suspend
accounts, and update users’ contact information—or, if they decided to go
against Musk, sabotage the site by messing with high-profile accounts. Roth
complied and started locking his coworkers out of the system.

That evening, Musk finally slowed down. After exiting the office, he
tapped out a message on his Twitter app: “The bird is freed.”
ACT III > > >
S
29 > Code Reviews
ullivan woke up at 4:00 a.m. on Friday, October 28, and blearily
opened his laptop to make sure Twitter’s log-in screen had been
changed. Sure enough, it displayed popular tweets and trending topics, just
as Davis had demanded the night before. He called Davis to let him know
that he had passed Musk’s test.

Then he started typing up his resignation letter. Around 7:00 a.m., he
sent his notice to Spiro and a few of Twitter’s remaining HR executives.

Then he packed up his laptop and headed into the office.

Although Sullivan knew he could never work for someone like Musk,
he felt obligated to make an orderly exit. When he’d left Facebook, he had
spent weeks writing up transition documents to describe his work for his
replacement and handing off projects, so he planned to do the same for
Twitter. Arriving at headquarters, he took stock of who else remained.

Nick Caldwell, his counterpart who led the company’s infrastructure
engineering efforts, was absent. Caldwell’s wife had died suddenly in midOctober and the executive had taken leave as he coped with the aftermath.

He planned to hold her funeral that weekend, and submitted a resignation
letter that day. Dalana Brand, Twitter’s chief people officer, was also
preparing to quit. Sarah Personette, the advertising executive, knew that
Musk’s disrespect for advertisers made her job untenable, and she planned
to leave, too. All three would resign, though Musk later claimed some of
them had been fired “for cause” to deny them their exit packages.

Employees kept dropping by the executives’ desks, asking when layoffs
might come and whether they should quit. None of the bosses knew what to
say—while they knew they were leaving, no one from Musk’s side had
acknowledged or announced the resignations.

Finally, one of Brand’s junior HR employees stopped at Sullivan’s desk.

“Maybe you should stop coming in,” she said with a tight smile. “I would
hate to see you get walked out.”
Meanwhile, Musk’s cousins set up a command center in the ninth-floor
cafeteria, which had mostly been cleared of Halloween decorations from the
night before. Along with a handful of Tesla engineers, James and Andrew
Musk turned their focus to culling Twitter’s engineering ranks, which
numbered around 2,500 people. They wondered aloud if they should ask
their Twitter counterparts to help them. They decided against it—they knew
the tweeps were inherently skeptical of them, and the feeling was mutual.

But they did demand that Twitter’s human resources employees hand over
data from everyone’s performance evaluations.

Musk’s people believed they were smarter than Twitter’s workforce.

The Twitter employees, many of whom had yet to arrive at the office that
morning, had contributed to a floundering company that failed its potential,
they thought. Why should they be trusted to choose who to keep to build for
a better future? They might try to protect their friends, or worse, select
people antagonistic to Musk.

Time and time again, Musk reminded his team that Twitter had a
workforce bloated with many people who did nothing. In meetings with his
employees, Musk cited Tesla’s autopilot team. It was fifteen times smaller
than Twitter’s engineering staff but still managed to hit his demanding
deadlines and regularly ship updates to the software. Autopilot was a matter
of life or death for Tesla’s customers, he thought. Twitter was just a website
with constantly scrolling text and media.

Musk directed his cousins to take a look at Twitter’s code repositories,
which formed the basis for its site, apps, and features, and determine which
engineers had been contributing. Engineers would be judged by volume:
those who had written the most code were people they might want to keep
around.

“Print out 50 pages of code you’ve done in the last 30 days,” read a
Slack directive from one executive assistant to Twitter’s engineers.

Employees were told they should be ready to share their work in so-called
code reviews with members of the transition team, or even Musk himself.

They would be evaluated on their material for its effectiveness, clarity, and
contributions to Twitter’s overall operations.

The order sent a panic throughout Twitter’s workforce. Engineers who
had come into the offices in San Francisco and New York for Musk’s first
full day rushed to connect their laptops to printers. The devices began
constantly spitting out sheets.

In Slack and in private messages, Twitter employees complained about
the exercise. Even if someone could show they wrote a lot of code, volume
wasn’t necessarily an indicator of good work. Sometimes, the best code was
short and elegant.

Even some of Musk’s employees were skeptical. They had expertise in
software for rockets and cars, but they had no idea how to build, maintain,
or run a large social network. It was like asking a plumber to judge the work
of an electrician—it simply didn’t make sense.

Austin was uncomfortable with reviewing code. The job gave him an
incredible amount of power over people’s livelihoods at a company he
didn’t even work for. He tried to talk to as many Twitter infrastructure
experts as possible—some who had worked at the company for a decade—
in an attempt to understand the company’s back-end technology. He knew
he’d eventually have to communicate these complexities to Musk himself.

In fact, Musk soon asked Austin if he wanted to run Twitter’s
infrastructure. Austin hated the idea but was able to wiggle his way out of
giving Musk a direct answer. He worked for Musk because he believed in
building electric cars for the masses. He didn’t want to work at a social
network.

Online, tweeps mocked the code reviews. Twitter was a self-deprecating
place, and employees often dealt with difficult times by posting memes on
Slack or shitposting on Twitter. The workers feared for their jobs, and had
just seen their four top leaders unceremoniously dumped on the curb, but
were still able to laugh at colleagues running from printer to printer or
searching for paper.

Leah Culver, an engineer who worked on Twitter’s app for Apple
devices, tweeted “Happy Friday all” accompanied by a photo of her holding
up a stack of papers with printed-out code for the company’s Spaces
feature, which allowed people to host audio broadcasts.

//LockScreenManager.swift
//TwitterAudiospaces//
//Created by Leah Culver on 7/26/22.

//Copyright © 2022 Twitter, Inc.

Culver’s selfie—and the code it exposed—spooked some of Twitter’s
remaining executives, particularly Damien Kieran, its chief privacy officer.

That afternoon, after finding out about Musk’s orders, he went ballistic. A
new directive was issued: “Stop printing.”
Under its consent decree with the Federal Trade Commission, Twitter
had strict orders to guard the privacy of its users and its data. Each sheet of
paper printed with the company’s proprietary code was a potential privacy
risk. Any engineer could walk out of Twitter’s doors with a printed copy of
company secrets or users’ information. Inadvertently, Musk and his team
had created thousands of potential violations of Twitter’s agreement with
the U.S. government, which could in turn levy millions of dollars in fines.

Kieran, an Irishman who was a former motorcycle mechanic, was
responsible for determining if Twitter was compliant with global privacy
regulations. He explained the problem to Austin and several other goons,
who then communicated the concern up the chain. Engineers would not
only have to stop printing out the code, but those who had already done so
were now required to get rid of it, the chief privacy officer said.

Kieran set up paper shredders on the tenth floor and had Musk’s guards
stand by them. Before going home, engineers had to personally destroy any
code they had printed by feeding their papers into the machines. Lines
formed in front of the shredders as the muscled security detail watched over
them like hawks.

>>> ROTH, the highest-ranking employee responsible for content moderation
after Gadde’s departure, assumed he was on the chopping block. But when
Musk summoned Roth to meet him in one of the office kitchens that day, it
was to put him to work. There was one thing he wanted Roth to do
immediately: reinstate the Babylon Bee. The conservative satire site had
been banned from Twitter that March after it misgendered a government
official.

Roth knew he shouldn’t push back—Brazil’s presidential election and
the U.S. midterms were days away, and he wanted to hang on long enough
to monitor the platform for misinformation during the crucial votes. But he
couldn’t help but test Musk’s rationale.

“Is it your intention to change the policy on misgendering?” Roth asked.

Musk hemmed and hawed, unsure if he wanted to overhaul the policy.

“What about a presidential pardon?” he asked Roth. “That’s a thing in the
Constitution.”
Roth kept gently pushing. “What if someone tweets the same thing that
you pardoned the Bee for?” he asked. If the satire publication got a special
pass to tweet transphobic content, Musk would surely face outrage from
other people who wanted to post the same things but kept getting in trouble.

It wouldn’t be fair.

Musk understood. There couldn’t be different rules for the accounts he
enjoyed, he admitted—that wouldn’t gel with his plans to maximize free
speech and let anyone say whatever they wanted on Twitter. The policy
would have to be changed, Musk said.

Roth, who had helped develop the rule against misgendering in 2018
and spent large portions of his career studying the harassment of queer
communities online, agreed to change the rules as Musk ordered. But he
offered a word of caution.

“Your first policy move, then, would be changing a policy that
corresponds with a highly politicized culture war in the United States,”
Roth said. “A lot of people will look at it and say, ‘That’s his first step—
dismantling a policy that relates to the protection of marginalized groups.’
You’re already dealing with advertiser backlash. I think doing that would
not really go the way you’re hoping.”
“Misgendering is totally not cool,” Musk told Roth. But the billionaire
wanted to distinguish between threats of harm and rude comments, which
he thought should receive a lighter punishment.

Roth tried to refocus Musk on the bigger picture and offered other
choices. Instead of immediately giving the Babylon Bee back its account,
what if Musk thought about moderating content in general? Did he want to
keep the labels that Twitter had used in the past to flag Trump’s account
when he shared misinformation about voting processes? How would Musk
like to handle tweets that weren’t immediately dangerous but still broke the
rules?
Musk seemed to enjoy being consulted on bigger decisions. He leaned
in and listened intently as Roth offered him options for altering speech on
Twitter.

The labels, Roth explained, were more than a tool to let users know that
a tweet contained misleading information. Once a tweet was labeled,
Twitter prevented it from spreading, turning off retweets and likes so it
couldn’t go viral. “We’re limiting reach, not speech,” Roth said, introducing
Musk to a catchphrase Twitter’s content moderation staffers often used as a
North Star.

The engineering solution to the content moderation problem appealed to
Musk. Emboldened, Roth started pitching Musk on Project Saturn.

Agrawal’s plan for Twitter was to allow all kinds of content onto the
platform, while imposing limits on how far it could spread, a vision that
dovetailed with what Musk said he wanted. Roth knew that mentioning
Agrawal’s name would immediately sink the project, so he gave Musk an
unattributed version of the idea.

“Why don’t we build some of the product capabilities to make the rules
less punitive, and reinstate accounts?” Roth suggested. It was a path
forward that didn’t dismantle the rules.

Musk agreed, and told Roth to get started building it, finally greenlighting the project that had stalled all summer under his looming
acquisition. For now, the Babylon Bee would remain off Twitter.

The conversation clearly impressed the billionaire. That weekend, in
response to conservative users who called for Roth to be fired, Musk
replied, “We’ve all made some questionable tweets, me more than most, but
I want to be clear that I support Yoel. My sense is that he has high integrity,
and we are all entitled to our political beliefs.”
It also made a deep impression on Roth, who had feared that Musk
would hate him. Musk was clearly persuadable, Roth thought, and liked
thinking through the nuances of technology. Maybe there was a path for
him to stay at Twitter after all.

>>> THE CUTS TO Twitter’s engineering staff wouldn’t be enough for the
savings Musk wanted. He and Spiro summoned several of Twitter’s finance,
legal, and human resources executives to the second-floor conference room
at 1 Tenth to discuss broader layoffs. Pacini went to sit down with Musk,
along with Mary Hansbury, an employment lawyer, and Tracy Hawkins, an
executive who managed Twitter’s real estate and return-to-office plans.

Musk and Spiro told them that the dismissals needed to happen as soon
as possible. But Musk didn’t seem to have a clear plan. He wanted deep
cuts and suggested about half of the company’s 7,500 employees would
have to go, but the billionaire wasn’t decisive about how many jobs he
wanted to eliminate or which departments he wanted to shrink. He said he
wanted to keep exceptional people but had no obvious criteria for judging
them.

Musk and his lawyer stressed that cuts should be made no later than
Monday, October 31. On November 1, many employees were set to receive
their vest, and Musk’s side seemed to be looking for a way to avoid paying.

Pacini and Hansbury knew the haphazard, rushed cuts were not the right
way to do a layoff. They were still sitting on the plans for Project Prism,
Agrawal’s mass layoff agenda from April, which laid out specific cost
savings and balanced the staff reductions with severance payments.

Managers had even drawn up lists of specific people to eliminate. Those
plans could be resuscitated, the HR executives suggested. Mass cuts like the
ones Musk wanted couldn’t be rammed through in just a few hours. People
would get hurt, and Twitter would probably end up breaking its contracts
with employees or labor laws in the many countries where it had people.

“I’m used to paying penalties,” Musk told the Twitter executives. “I’ll
still come out ahead.”
“People sue him all the time,” Spiro chimed in. His brash client wasn’t
going to be intimidated by the threat of legal action. All he cared about was
speed.

That day, Spiro also gathered all of Gadde’s former employees to
explain how they would operate under Musk. There were in-house lawyers,
public policy executives who kept the company in compliance with
regulations around the world, and content moderation specialists who
developed Twitter’s rules.

He offered a quick reassurance that he was not at Twitter to disrupt
anything that was already working well. But then Spiro quickly launched
into his directive: cost cutting. He asked the executives where Twitter’s
legal costs could be reduced and who could be laid off.

The lawyer told the assembled executives that they reported to him now,
and that he was making decisions as Musk’s delegate. “Elon doesn’t want to
come in,” he told them, subtly hinting that there would be no going over his
head to the boss. To some of the executives, it seemed Spiro thought Gadde
had simply been managing a team of lawyers akin to the law firm Spiro
came from, and wasn’t aware that she also oversaw lobbyists, policy
experts, and content moderators.

Sinéad McSweeney, a vice president at the company with cropped blond
hair and a lilting Irish accent, piped up. McSweeney oversaw Twitter’s
global public policy team from its Dublin offices and had worked at the
company for a decade, keeping it in line with European and international
law. Her role included constantly reminding her American colleagues of
Twitter’s international presence and the legal issues it encountered around
the world. It seemed to her that Spiro had a similarly narrow view of
Twitter.

What should be done with Twitter’s public policy operations, she asked
Musk’s attorney. “I don’t believe in having fifty people where five can do
the job,” Spiro responded.

He suggested that, because Musk was world famous, much of Twitter’s
public policy work would become redundant. “He can go in front of the
U.K. Parliament tomorrow and can get to meet with any prime minister or
king,” Spiro scoffed. “It’s a different world for us all now.”
Everyone in legal should keep him informed of major decisions so he
didn’t wake up to ugly surprises, Spiro said. Their top priority should be
cost cutting, and they should eliminate expensive contracts with outside
lawyers immediately.

He and Musk didn’t want to disrupt the machine, he added, and while
he and the billionaire didn’t always see eye to eye, they wanted things to
work effectively. He closed the meeting by excusing Musk’s absence again
—the new owner was probably downstairs making more cuts to the
workforce, Spiro said.

That night, Spiro met again with McSweeney and other members of
Twitter’s public policy teams to start hammering out layoffs. “The sky is
not falling in,” Spiro told them, adding that Twitter’s workers should think
of their world as expanding with new opportunities.

He then launched into a strange aside about Musk’s politics. While his
boss was a darling of the right, he told the assembled policy executives not
to take Musk’s public perception too seriously because he was, at heart, a
centrist. Musk would be direct and transparent with them but ruthless about
costs, Spiro warned. McSweeney should prepare to cut 25 percent of her
staff, so Musk didn’t come in and start slashing and burning himself.

The layoffs were to happen that weekend, Spiro added. “By Monday,
this company won’t have 8,000 employees,” he said. “And by the Monday
after that, there won’t be 7,000 employees.

“Elon isn’t an animal,” Spiro added—if the laid-off workers needed to
find jobs elsewhere, the billionaire would call his friends and find positions
for them.

>>> TWITTER’S REMAINING EXECUTIVES SOON began to grasp how Musk
operated. Twitter had been governed—and at times hampered—by its
Socratic approach to making decisions, but Musk reigned like a king. He
wanted to make all the decisions, no matter how small, and delegated only
to the handful of loyalists who could translate his sometimes vague
demands into action. He assigned projects to members of his entourage
based on their interests. Spiro took on legal and policy matters, while
Gracias was tasked with finance and sales. Davis was on the budget.

Calacanis was told to sit in on product meetings, but Twitter engineers
quickly began to view him as a joke when they realized Musk had little
regard for him.

No one in the motley crew made a habit of saying no to the boss.

Musk’s family also appeared at Twitter. He seemed to rely on his son X as a
personal security blanket, holding the boy as he weighed decisions and
allowing his nanny to shepherd him out of the conference room when he
cried. The billionaire’s mother, Maye Musk, a seventy-five-year-old model,
inexplicably attended some meetings, while his assistant, Balajadia,
scampered in and out of conference rooms to deliver food, Diet Coke, or
whatever the techno king desired. All of them kept Musk on task and
feeling appreciated, reinforcing that he was the center of their universe.

Musk kept his interactions with Twitter staffers to a minimum, keeping
most of them in the dark and leaving them to hear about his decisions
through a game of telephone with his confidants that often warped his
meaning. Although Leslie Berland had promised to host a company-wide
meeting with Musk that Friday, it never happened.

He often derailed the conversations about Twitter’s operations with the
few Twitter executives he deigned to speak to, with long rants or random
phone calls. In one meeting to discuss legal and privacy matters soon after
the takeover, he abruptly paused the discussion as a call flashed across his
phone. It was Shaquille O’Neal, Musk boasted. He stopped the meeting to
take the call from the former basketball superstar, who had invested in
Twitter as the billionaire scrounged around for cash to aid his deal. The
Twitter executives in the room, who had worked grueling hours late into the
night with Musk and his team, grew increasingly impatient as Musk chatted
away, humoring the celebrity.

His new employees were rapidly learning that Musk hated excuses and
explanations but loved to be admired. He got keen satisfaction from telling
jokes—which meant that everyone around him had to be ready to laugh.

In one incident, a Twitter executive was brought in to meet Musk for the
first time. He had previously worked at Google, and Musk, having learned
of his background, launched into stories about his past relationships with
the search company’s founders and its current chief executive. He said he
was angry at Sundar Pichai, Google’s leader, for not putting antennas into
Android phones that could connect with Starlink, SpaceX’s proprietary
satellite internet service.

Then Musk, riffing off his own story, offered up something else he had
heard to impress the executive even more. He had a friend that worked on
the company’s key search products who had been told that Google
intentionally kept its share of the search market under 70 percent to avoid
antitrust regulation.

“Get it?” Musk said, with a smirk. “Sixty-nine percent?”
Musk looked around as his voice grew louder. “Sixty-nine percent!”
>>> THE SITUATION WAS not any calmer in Twitter’s Manhattan office. Those
who showed up at the high-rise in Chelsea—mainly sales managers and
executives—were hooked to their group chats with their San Francisco
counterparts, thirsty for any sliver of information. One vice president was
told not to gather anyone in large groups so it wouldn’t look like they were
organizing against new management.

While Musk and most of his henchmen were in California, plans had
been made for Twitter’s new owner to fly to New York the following week
to deal with the advertiser problem. The billionaire, however, had sent
Gracias ahead to prepare and get an understanding of Twitter’s sales
operation and its relationships with the advertising agencies of Madison
Avenue.

On Friday night, October 28, Gracias called two meetings with sales
executives. “I’m Antonio and I’ve known Elon for many years,” the
financier said. “I’ve sat on his boards. I’ve worked closely with him and
I’m helping him in this process.”
Those on the calls weren’t sure what to make of Musk’s proxy. Gracias
came off as arrogant. At one point, after a sales leader from Tokyo on the
call introduced himself, Gracias volleyed back some words in Japanese and
asked about a local restaurant. He had lived and worked in Japan for a bit,
he said confidently.

Gracias gave empty assurances that advertising was important to the
company. To his audience, it seemed that he, like Musk, didn’t understand
how Twitter made its money from those advertising relationships. Some 20
percent of brands accounted for more than 80 percent of the money the
company brought in, said Jean-Philippe Maheu, the company’s secondhighest-ranking sales leader, making it the company’s top priority to keep
those few big spenders happy.

After Advertising 101, Gracias looked around the room and
deadpanned: “So do you guys have any ideas for this? What can I tell you
guys?”
After a brief, puzzled silence, the salespeople asked about layoffs. There
was an air of self-preservation to it all, as the leaders, many of whom
believed they would be dismissed in the cost cutting because they earned
high salaries, tried to justify why those who worked for them should stay.

After all, these were the people who kept brands spending millions of
dollars a year on the social network. Gracias provided little guidance,
simply telling them to keep “exceptional” performers.

Another executive also wondered about Musk’s plans for content
moderation. What should we tell advertisers about how we plan to deal with
divisive or hateful content, she asked.

Gracias thought for a second and then parroted Musk’s lines on
“freedom of speech” and free expression. Elon’s view is that Twitter’s rules
should closely follow what’s allowed in the U.S. Constitution, he said. To
illustrate his point, he noted that people should expect to see speech they
didn’t like, and cited the fact that even Nazis had the right to assemble and
demonstrate in public spaces.

Some members of the call, who were Jewish, were taken aback. Sure,
the Constitution afforded rights to citizens that couldn’t be infringed upon
by the government, but Twitter was a private company. It had no obligation
to give Nazis a platform, and no brand would want their ads appearing next
to Nazi content.

After the last meeting ended, Maheu approached the venture capitalist
to push back on the timing of the firings. Terminating people before the
November 1 vest would decimate morale and cause more fractures in the
already tense relationship between Musk and the workers. “Don’t do this,”
Maheu said. “This is the worst message you can send.”
Gracias didn’t seem particularly moved.

T
30 > Lords and Peasants
witter’s workforce woke up Saturday morning in a state of panic.

Managers compiled lists in tightly held Google Docs that they traded
back and forth. For the workers they wanted to retain, leaders were required
not only to describe what the person did but also include a description of
why they were exceptional, so that Musk’s lieutenants could evaluate them.

In meetings with Twitter’s HR team, Musk remained noncommittal
about the percentage of staff that needed to be eliminated. His cousins had
recommended deep cuts to the engineering department, but his deputies
gave targets to Twitter executives that seemed to shift by the hour. At one
point, they told the sales team to eliminate a fifth of its staff, while the
company’s compliance department was told to eliminate 27 percent of
workers. Trust and safety, which was dealing with an ongoing election in
Brazil and preparing for the U.S. midterms, was told to cut 15 percent.

Twitter’s human resources team was instructed to cut itself in half, but the
depth of the cuts were later increased until only a quarter remained.

Matters were complicated by the fact that Musk’s friends regularly
contradicted each other. Each of them would insinuate that their messages
came directly from Musk himself, and yet none of them aligned. Spiro
might give one number for the amount of cuts, but Davis had another. Even
Musk would change his mind, influenced, in part, by the last adviser he
spoke with.

Twitter’s remaining leadership launched a rescue mission. They played
shell games with their retention lists, transferring employees to other teams
that had a spot or two open in an attempt to save people who were in the
U.S. on visas, had dependents who relied on their healthcare, or had other
personal reasons they needed to stay at the company. Pacini made it her
mission to convince Musk to pay the November 1 vest.

First, Musk needed to be convinced that flouting the law and laying off
half the company immediately would end up burning him. Employees in
legal, HR, and finance whipped up a financial model that compared the
amount of money Musk would save with immediate cuts to the amount he
would have to spend to settle employee lawsuits and pay regulatory fines.

The mock-up showed that, in the long run, Musk would actually save
money if he did the layoffs by the book.

The other problem was actually getting the payouts to employees. Since
it no longer had publicly traded shares, the company moved its equity
program from Charles Schwab to Shareworks, a tool affiliated with Morgan
Stanley that handled equity and cash bonus disbursement for private
companies. But Pacini had to convince Musk to turn on Shareworks before
employees could receive their payments.

>>> ON SATURDAY MORNING, Esther Crawford, the product manager who had
boldly approached Musk at the Perch, was eating from a bowl of cereal at
her kitchen table at her home near Berkeley, California, when she noticed a
call from an unfamiliar number.

“Hey, what are you doing right now?” said the voice on the other side of
the line. It was Sriram Krishnan, a former product leader at Twitter who had
been let go in late 2019. Since his departure from the social networking
company, Krishnan had reinvented himself as a tech investor, podcast
personality, and general partner at Andreessen Horowitz, one of the firms
investing in Musk’s Twitter. He was helping with the transition, he
explained.

“How fast can you get here?” Krishnan asked. “Elon wants you to come
in right now.”
While Crawford knew about Krishnan’s checkered past at the company,
she had little time to contemplate why he was advising Musk. She finished
her breakfast, said her goodbyes to her family, and then drove across the
Bay Bridge to the San Francisco office. There, she got her marching orders
from Musk, who was flanked in his 1 Tenth conference room by Krishnan,
Calacanis, and Sacks. She was going to lead a revamp of the company’s
subscription service, Twitter Blue.

Musk believed subscription revenue was the holy grail. His investor
presentation had projected it would reach $10 billion by 2028, and he
believed he could unlock Blue’s true value with a new twist. The service
would now give any subscriber one of Twitter’s coveted verification check
marks, Musk told Crawford, allowing anyone who paid to obtain a badge
that had previously been meant for celebrities, politicians, and other notable
figures and organizations.

Featuring a clear check mark outlined in blue, the verification badge
had been a status symbol on Twitter. In the past, the company had given
them out at its own discretion, distinguishing high-profile accounts from
impostors. Justin Bieber and Barack Obama had check marks, as did Musk,
and more than 420,000 other users.

Like many features at Twitter, however, the verification system wasn’t
perfect. Verified accounts could be illicitly bought and sold, and the
company was opaque and haphazard about doling them out. Musk himself
came to hate what he saw as Twitter’s two-tiered class system of the
verified and unverified. It especially chafed him that journalists, whom he
often bickered with, could easily obtain the check marks. He couldn’t
understand why any reporter, particularly those he saw at newer or less
reputable outlets, were granted the badges simply because of their
profession.

“It’s a system of lords and peasants,” he said to those in the war room.

He cited instances where anyone working for Business Insider or BuzzFeed,
two online outlets, were waved through the program by Twitter’s old
management.

“Who the fuck is this person,” he said, discussing a hypothetical
verified Business Insider reporter with a low number of followers. “He just
writes copypasta of something I tweeted and now he’s verified. Fuck them,
you know?”
To Musk, selling off the check marks was the ultimate democratization
of the service. He also thought that charging for verification would help
extinguish what he still believed to be the massive bot problem on Twitter.

Those who paid for Twitter Blue would have to associate their account with
payment information, a telltale sign in Musk’s eyes that the account
belonged to a real person.

Crawford thought Musk made some good points, and she, too, believed
that the current verification system had its flaws. But she thought the idea
that subscriptions would translate to billions of dollars in revenue was
absurd. Internal research and Blue’s own initial rollout had shown that very
few people—the Twitter diehards—were willing to pay for extra features.

Still, she took the assignment with a smile. Crawford enjoyed seemingly
impossible tasks, and this one at least gave her job security and proximity to
power. Musk gave her a deadline of November 7 for the relaunch of Twitter
Blue; she immediately began messaging and calling people to recruit them
to her team. She had ten days to deliver or risk being fired.

>>> AT NOON, the human resources executives gathered to regroup. Musk
had agreed to slow down the layoffs, accepting the cheaper option. He had
also acquiesced to turning on Shareworks. But Musk had a demand, Pacini
said.

The billionaire, racked with paranoia, had convinced himself that not all
of Twitter’s employees were real. His fears that Twitter couldn’t discern
between its human and bot users had mutated into the notion that the
company also couldn’t keep track of its employees. In meetings, he fretted
about what he called “ghost employees” who might be collecting paychecks
from the company without earning them. Before Twitter sent out any
payments, it needed to conduct an audit to ensure all its employees were
real. When Pacini introduced the idea on the noon call, several executives
burst out laughing at the absurdity of the idea.

To deal with Musk’s unusual demand, the HR team turned to Kaiden.

Musk’s circle knew about Kaiden. He had met with Musk before the
deal closed and was on the call when Segal rejected Gracias’s audacious
request for money from Twitter. With a team of finance folks, Kaiden got
down to work, reaching out to managers around the world and asking them
to confirm their employees were human. He and his team had two days
until the vest date to confirm the identities of more than 7,000 full-time
employees.

>>> MUSK’S GROWING PARANOIA wasn’t reserved just for his outlook on
Twitter’s past management. On the evening of October 28, Musk was
retiring to Sacks’s five-story mansion on a street in San Francisco’s Pacific
Heights neighborhood known as Billionaire’s Row. A few blocks down, a
disturbed man who embraced far-right conspiracy theories about the 2020
U.S. election broke into the home of Nancy Pelosi, the speaker of the U.S.

House of Representatives, just past 2:00 a.m. While she was not there, her
husband, Paul, was home. The eighty-two-year-old called the police and
confronted the intruder, who, after demanding to speak to “Nancy,” attacked
her husband with a hammer and fractured his skull.

The assault was major news. San Francisco police kept information
under wraps as it investigated. But right-wing political personalities sought
to exploit the situation involving the Democratic Speaker’s family. In the
days after, Donald Trump, Jr., posted memes on his Twitter and Instagram
account playing up the baseless theory that Paul Pelosi had known and was
engaged in a tryst with his attacker. Others chimed in, including the
conspiracy-minded Georgia congresswoman Marjorie Taylor Greene and
Roger Stone, the former Trump political consultant. The misinformation
stewed online on Twitter and 4chan, the hateful message board popular with
the far right, before being picked up by discredited conspiracy websites.

Musk followed it all. Amid the hard push to implement layoffs that
weekend, Musk found time during his Sunday morning in San Francisco to
respond to a tweet from former Democratic presidential candidate Hillary
Clinton that condemned “the Republican Party and its mouthpieces” for
spreading “hate and deranged conspiracy theories.”
“There is a tiny possibility there might be more to this story than meets
the eye,” Musk replied to the former First Lady, with a link to the story
from the Santa Monica Observer with the headline “The Awful Truth: Paul
Pelosi Was Drunk Again, and in a Dispute with a Male Prostitute Early
Friday Morning.”
At first glance, the Santa Monica Observer could have been mistaken
for a local news blog. But it was one of dozens of untrustworthy websites
that had popped up in recent years to launder false information. In 2016, it
had pushed the idea that Hilary Clinton had died and been replaced with a
body double. As screenshots of Musk’s reply proliferated, the company’s
executives sent frantic messages to one another. Could Musk really believe
this trash?
Musk deleted the tweet within a few hours, but the damage was done.

Advertisers, already nervous about the prospects of his ownership, had the
clearest evidence yet that Twitter’s new steward was not serious about
policing misinformation. The company’s sales execs worked the phones
with clients in an attempt to get in front of the controversy, but to little
avail.

M
31 > “Educate me”
usk’s private plane landed at 2:00 a.m. at New Jersey’s Teterboro
Airport on Halloween, the first Monday following his takeover. He
had already been planning to visit the company’s main East Coast office,
but advertisers’ concerns, exacerbated by his Pelosi tweet, made the trip all
the more urgent.

At the Chelsea office, building staff and assistants had been told to
prepare for their new leader’s arrival, and they wanted to impress. But they
had little to accommodate, much less entertain, Musk’s toddler son, who
had traveled with his father. There was no play area or place for him to nap,
so they improvised, clearing out a storage closet that usually held chairs and
tables and laying down blankets. The workers gathered various Twitterbranded throw pillows from around the office to build a makeshift bed,
while someone went out and purchased a set of building blocks. The
staffers watched as the child and his nanny settled into the small space,
which remained guarded by two bulky security guards who followed
Musk’s progeny at all times.

Across from the storage closet, Musk began a series of meetings with
the leaders from some of the world’s top advertising agencies. With
Personette’s resignation confirmed, Musk was joined by Maheu. Berland
had vouched for Maheu personally and told Musk about his connections
with the largest advertising companies in the world.

Maheu immediately brokered meetings for Musk with WPP, Publicis
Groupe, and Horizon Media. The goal was to reassure the ad agencies that
Musk’s Twitter wouldn’t descend into a cesspool of misinformation and
hate speech. The previous Friday, General Motors announced that it would
pause advertising on Twitter, and other brands were rumored to be heading
down the same path. The chaos was less than ideal for the multibilliondollar corporations trying to sell people cars or convince them to watch a
new movie. (General Motors, a competitor with Tesla, sought assurances
that its advertising data wouldn’t be shared between Musk’s companies
before it resumed spending.)
Maheu, a shrewd Frenchman who had developed deep connections to
the ad industry over a decade at Twitter, knew he had to act fast to prevent
the contagion from spreading. It would take only a matter of days before
others would follow General Motors like lemmings, leading to steep
reductions in revenue. He tried to make the gatherings orderly, but it was
impossible.

In the meetings with advertisers, Musk surrounded himself with his
motley entourage. There was X and Musk’s mother, Maye, who was in New
York for an event that evening. Calacanis joined, as did Michael Tucker, a
music producer better known as BloodPop, who had written songs for
Justin Bieber, Britney Spears, and Lady Gaga. Tucker’s presence went
unexplained and he sat in silence through some of the meetings. Advertisers
were equally puzzled by their spontaneous introduction to the Musk circle.

Musk said the right things to advertisers and committed to a vision of
continued content moderation. But Maheu also noticed a strange dynamic
developing. Even though they were skittish, the ad agency leaders didn’t
challenge Musk but rather wanted to charm him. They asked him softball
questions and cozied up to him. After all, this was the leader not only of
Twitter but also Tesla and SpaceX, two multibillion-dollar companies that
did little to no advertising. What if those companies decided they wanted to
start running ads one day?
The flattery was on full display that afternoon when Bill Koenigsberg,
the chief executive of Horizon Media—an ad firm that represented
Hershey’s and Burger King—parroted a question that had been asked
repeatedly since Musk announced his takeover.

“My clients asked, ‘Is he going to get Donald Trump back on the
platform?’ ” he said.

Musk had grown tired of the question. So instead of giving his typical
staid answer, he took out his iPhone, opened up the Twitter app, and drafted
a tweet: “If I had a dollar for every time someone asked me if Trump is
coming back on this platform, Twitter would be minting money!” He
looked around the room.

“You’re my content counsel,” Musk said with a wide grin. “Should I
tweet that or not?”
To Maheu, the billionaire was like a fifth grader asking his parents if he
could light an M80 in the house. Calacanis, giggling, said yes. So did his
mother. Koenigsberg, who clearly had no intention of rocking the boat, gave
his approval. The music producer gave his thumbs-up.

“No,” said Maheu, the lone voice of dissent, knowing that any mention
of Trump would generate an unneeded press cycle. Musk eyed him briefly,
then shrugged. He hit the tweet button.

>>> THAT NIGHT, Kaiden was still scrambling to confirm that all of Twitter’s
employees were real people before his Tuesday morning deadline. He
worked late into the evening, pestering managers to reach out to each of
their employees and confirm their existence and reiterating impatiently that
no, he wasn’t joking.

On Monday evening, the accountant blasted out an email to several
managers about his ongoing “payroll audit.”
“We need to know by 8 AM PT if you know the following employees
and that they are really humans,” Kaiden wrote. “If you don’t know please
dive a level deeper and ask your directs if they know.” Attached to the
message was a list of unaccounted-for Twitter workers. Kaiden knew he had
to fulfill Musk’s insane demand.

>>> IN NEW YORK, the sales team prepared to argue for their jobs. Tesla and
SpaceX relied on word of mouth and consumer evangelism through Musk’s
rabid fanbase. With such strong support, Musk came to see advertising as a
waste. “I hate advertising,” he tweeted on a whim in October 2019.

But Twitter’s lifeblood was advertising. Ad revenue made up 90 percent
of the company’s revenue, or some $5 billion annually.

After his meetings with Maheu, Musk was set to be briefed on the status
of the company’s ad business. He finally arrived at the meeting three hours
after its scheduled start at 6:00 p.m., hurrying into a conference room with
Twitter’s top sales leaders—sans Maheu—and apologizing for his tardiness.

The ad sales experts held their breath for a hostile Musk, but they found the
billionaire to be far from it, perhaps humbled by the advertising backlash.

They would have as long as they needed to explain the ads business to him.

“I have a party tonight, but it doesn’t matter,” Musk said, referencing a
Halloween party he was expected to attend. “This is much more important.

“I’m really new to this,” he continued. “Educate me.”
What was supposed to be a thirty-minute gathering stretched beyond
two hours as the sales leaders walked him through the basics of advertising.

They broke down Twitter’s biggest customers, its advantages, and its
technical disadvantages when competing against Facebook and Google, the
dominant players in the digital ad space. Musk was soft-spoken but asked
probing questions. More important, he listened as the ads professionals
presented. It was a side of Musk that many in the room, most who were
meeting him for the first time, were unprepared for.

Still there were worries. Some of the Twitter execs wondered why he
hadn’t taken the time to do this type of diligence before buying the
company. And they recalled that when Musk and his bankers went and
pitched potential investors on backing his acquisition of Twitter, leaked
presentation decks reported by the media said that Musk’s company would
bring in $12 billion in annual advertising revenue, more than double its
current clip, by 2028. If he was just learning how Twitter kept the lights on,
what were his figures based on?
When the meeting ended, Musk was whisked out of the room and into a
car where his mother, Maye, was waiting. The next day, tabloids would
circulate photos of Musk, dressed in a $7,500 leather armor suit stamped
with a devil’s insignia, and his mother, styled as Disney’s Cruella de Vil, on
the red carpet of a Halloween gala hosted by former supermodel Heidi
Klum.

In group chats, some employees joked that the costumes seemed a little
too on the nose. Others asked how many fifty-year-old men dress up for
parties with their mother?
B
32 > A Blue Heart
y the morning of November 1, Kaiden felt like his work was done. He
had verified that Twitter’s employees were, in fact, real and Musk’s
fears of ghosts were delusions. Not one to use Slack for small talk, he was
businesslike in his announcement: “Payroll is working on processing the
vest now,” he wrote in the workplace chat that morning. The message
garnered dozens of thumbs-up and prayer hands emoji responses.

Musk was less thrilled. The payout would cost him $200 million as he
enriched a group of workers he believed were lazy and undeserving. And
while he had authorized Kaiden to conduct the audit, his team had not given
the chief accounting officer the authority to make the announcement. The
next day, the goons locked the accountant out of his laptop and he was
escorted out of the San Francisco office. He walked out a hero.

On November 1, Spiro gave McSweeney new marching orders. Instead
of cutting her team by 25 percent, she needed to find a way to dismiss 50
percent, he said. She had been in direct contact with Spiro throughout the
weekend as they traded layoff lists, and was shocked at the sudden change.

Just days earlier, Spiro had been reassuring her and promising to help
along the way, but she was being handed off to Sam Teller, Musk’s former
chief of staff who somehow had also been drafted into this mess. Teller
asked for a crash course on Twitter’s public policy operations, forcing
McSweeney to repeat what she’d told Spiro on Friday. McSweeney ran
through her spiel again.

McSweeney thought the magnitude of the layoffs made no sense, and
she was worried about taking instructions from people like Spiro and Teller,
who had no formal roles at Twitter. Their orders seemed likely to get her
into trouble, particularly as she prepared to lay off employees in Europe,
many of whom were protected by stricter labor laws than their colleagues in
the United States and entitled to extended notice of a mass layoff. She wrote
to the company’s human resources and legal teams, notifying them of her
concerns. But no one seemed willing to contravene Musk.

>>> MEANWHILE, Musk’s trip to New York had done little to mollify
advertisers. Interpublic Group, or IPG, a large advertising company whose
agencies represent American Express, Coca-Cola, and Mattel, told its
clients to temporarily pause spending on Twitter.

The news didn’t sit well with Musk. He began to think there were other
forces at play. He crafted a narrative—much like the ones he advanced in
the early days of Tesla when he suggested that oil companies, short sellers,
and news outlets colluded to bring about its failure—that activist groups
were pressuring advertisers to stop spending. He became convinced these
groups, including Media Matters for America, a left-wing media watchdog
group, and the Anti-Defamation League, the Jewish advocacy group, were
conspiring against him, funded by moneyed interests to prevent him from
building the free speech platform for the masses.

These groups had voiced their fears to advertisers. “We are concerned
that Mr. Musk’s acquisition of Twitter may accelerate what ADL has seen
repeatedly: the pushing out of marginalized communities from social
media,” Jonathan Greenblatt, the chief executive of the ADL, said in a
statement on the day Musk completed his acquisition. But this wasn’t
necessarily a new phenomenon. Activist groups had held social media
companies accountable for years with their studies of the platforms, and
Musk’s actions simply attracted their further scrutiny. Musk would later
push to ban posts on his site that called for ad boycotts, arguing that they
amounted to blackmail. The rule never went into place.

After the IPG decision, Maheu knew Twitter wouldn’t be able to stop
the dominos from falling. But it wouldn’t be his problem for long. Gracias
hadn’t taken his advice on the layoffs kindly and Musk clearly disliked him
after his pushback on the Trump tweet. So when the call came that he’d be
escorted out of the New York building by Twitter’s security staff, he was
ready. He left his laptop and carried nothing as he walked by the desks of
the men and women he led across Twitter’s sales teams. Maheu was the first
person fired on the East Coast.

Berland would follow close behind. Sitting on a different floor from the
sales staff, she was unaware what had happened to the sales exec. But that
day, her communications with Musk and his goons had become sparse. She
had vouched for Maheu to Musk, and his attempt to stop the billionaire
from tweeting would not reflect well on her.

That afternoon, her phone rang with a call from Pacini. Berland stepped
into a private booth. Pacini had been crying.

“I hate to do this, but I have to tell you,” Pacini said, trailing off.

“You’re no longer employed at Twitter.”
Berland waited a beat to collect her thoughts. It wasn’t entirely
unexpected, but this wasn’t the way she had planned to go out. It was so
cold.

“What’s the context?” she asked.

“I don’t have any,” Pacini replied. “There will be a security guard by
soon to escort you out.”
The guard was already at the door of the booth. Berland left her
computer and began her walk.

Unlike Maheu’s walk, there were fewer people to see Berland go. The
chief marketing officer waved goodbye to her former assistant, before
taking an elevator down. After a short ride, she exited through a back
entrance and was whisked into a car that drove into the drab Manhattan
cold. As word of her abrupt firing spread through the office, Berland
tweeted a simple goodbye: a single blue heart emoji.

>>> TWITTER PRODUCT MANAGERS, designers, and engineers knew they had
days, if not hours, to prove their worth. Outside of Twitter Blue, Musk
didn’t appear to have a clear road map of products for employees to work
on. Continuing the projects chosen by old management seemed risky—
Musk had already made it clear he didn’t respect Agrawal’s vision.

Ideas were thrown out from everywhere, and projects were started and
stopped as Musk’s lieutenants jockeyed for position, all believing they had
brilliant ideas to transform Twitter. With Musk tied up sorting out
operations and layoffs, some of the goons portrayed themselves as decisionmakers and issued product directives.

Calacanis asserted himself. He sat in on meetings with product and
policy staffers, later tweeting out his impressions and findings as if he were
speaking for the wider company. His posts hinted that he was taking
suggestions from his Twitter followers and relaying them to the top. But
Musk wouldn’t tolerate anyone else running product. When he saw
Calacanis’s tweets, Musk dispatched someone to the war room to tell his
friend to stop acting like he was calling the shots.

“To be clear, Elon is the product manager and CEO,” Calacanis later
tweeted, following the reprimand.

Desperate to save their jobs, workers started throwing mud at the walls.

One team was spun up to work on paid direct messaging, a feature that
would allow regular people to send private notes to so-called Very
Important Tweeters. Mock-ups presented to Musk’s entourage showed a
user paying a few dollars to message the musician Post Malone, with
Twitter taking a cut of the proceeds.

Another pet project for Musk was encrypting direct messages, which
would prevent anyone except the sender and receiver from reading them.

For years, the company had debated whether to encrypt the messages,
sealing them off completely so that even Twitter itself couldn’t access them
or share them with law enforcement. Gadde wanted to offer more privacy to
users but feared that encrypted messages would facilitate harassment and
the exchange of illicit material. Engineers scrambled to kick-start the effort,
code-named Night Parrot.

One night that week, a member of Musk’s team called one of Twitter’s
cybersecurity engineers, who had been tapped to aid the transition. Could
he come back to meet with the boss? The security expert sighed—he had
just settled in after a long day at the office and taken a shower. He got
dressed again, making his way back to work through San Francisco’s empty
streets.

Musk held court in his conference room, while two bodyguards with
Texan accents loitered in the kitchen nearby. Around midnight, he finally
beckoned the engineer in. Musk was cordial, asking about the worker’s
background and what he’d done at Twitter over the years, but the meeting
felt like a job interview. Musk was deciding whether he could trust the
engineer.

Then Musk’s paranoia emerged. “Did Twitter read my DMs?” he asked.

He appeared convinced that the former executives had been snooping on
him during the lawsuit.

The engineer tried to answer as best he could. The company made it
extraordinarily difficult for employees to access a user’s direct messages,
but some workers were allowed to do it when responding to reports of
abuse or subpoenas. As far as he knew, no one had read Musk’s messages—
but it wasn’t impossible.

Musk kept digging, certain the old regime had spied on him. Who could
have had access? And how could he find out? The engineer delicately tried
to steer the conversation back to encryption, saying Musk’s worries were a
good example of why Twitter should encrypt messages. The pit in his
stomach widened, and he felt that whatever he said would be the difference
between being promoted or fired. Finally, Musk moved on.

In other meetings, Musk toyed with the idea of adding paywalled videos
—like the adult content site OnlyFans—allowing users to charge for
premium content. Twitter would take a cut of those proceeds, though
staffers immediately began expressing concerns about the potential for
pornography and pirated films, which would degrade advertiser trust in the
platform. Paywalled videos and the paid message features never launched,
while encrypted direct messages were unveiled months later in a very
limited capacity.

Employees scrambled to latch on to Musk’s pet projects, messaging
each other privately to try to join Night Parrot or find their way into
Crawford’s shadow project, which wasn’t much of a secret as Musk and
Calacanis tweeted about their idea of charging for verification badges. With
Musk’s stamp of approval, the Twitter Blue relaunch felt like the surest way
to survive the coming layoffs.

Crawford had circulated a spreadsheet of the seventy employees around
the globe who were working on paid verification. It became known as a de
facto “safe list” and some members of her team began to add their friends
and colleagues with the hope of throwing them a lifeline. The list started to
flood with the names of people who were dependent on Twitter’s healthcare
benefits for themselves or their family members, or relied on their job to
maintain their immigration status. Eventually, one manager put the kibosh
on the effort and locked the document from further additions.

“The team needs to be light,” the manager messaged the offenders.

Even Crawford, who had a direct line to Musk, wasn’t immune from the
rumors. After Maheu’s and Berland’s firings in New York, she became
convinced that the executive terminations had also swept up her boss, Tony
Haile.

As paranoia swirled about Haile’s supposed firing, in which he was said
to have been marched out by the guards, Crawford was gutted.

“Why would they do that?” she said to some of her Blue employees.

“It’s so unnecessary. Like, I’m a go-getter but I have limits. We’re here to
ship this thing and we’re going to get this out. But if we quit, it will be on
our own terms.”
Haile, however, had not been terminated.

“Hey I’m still here,” he wrote in a message in Slack to his team later
that day. “There are rumors of me having been fired but as far as I know I
still work here.” (Haile eventually did quit.)
Unwilling to wait for the axe to fall before taking action, workers tried
to connect with each other off Twitter-controlled platforms, which they
knew were monitored by Musk’s team. They added one another on
LinkedIn, created external Slack groups, and traded phone numbers to
create support networks in case they all lost access to their email accounts.

They also began circulating “A Layoff Guide,” which outlined workers’
rights in the U.S. and gave tips on how to deal with requests from new
management and workplace surveillance. Some even tweeted at Musk,
asking him to lay them off in order to spare colleagues on work visas.

The human resources employees responsible for pulling off the massive
cuts felt just as confused. It seemed to them that Sacks, Calacanis, Davis,
and the other Musk lieutenants weighing in on the layoffs were trying to
outdo each other, each hoping to emerge as the most ruthless. The lists of
employees who would be dismissed kept expanding to keep up with their
demands.

Birchall emerged as a lone voice of reason among Musk’s advisers. The
HR teams discovered they could go to him to argue for a team or an
employee to stay, and he would listen to the justification. The rest of
Musk’s people seemed to delight in laying waste to Twitter.

Birchall, Spiro, and Teller tried to counsel their new Twitter
counterparts about how to speak to Musk. Never pretend to know the
answer when you don’t, they said. They also recommended against ever
having open-ended conversations with Musk. He should be presented with
options, preferably no more than two or three, and be allowed to choose
from them. The Twitter employees should then make their recommendation
from among the options so Musk could assess their judgment.

Pacini took their recommendations to heart. She and the rest of the
Twitter employees assigned to the layoff drew up options for Musk. Brian
Bjelde, a human resources vice president Musk brought over from SpaceX,
weighed in, explaining how the rocket company had handled severance in
the past so that the options they eventually put in front of Musk would have
the benefit of having been vouched for by someone who had spent twenty
years working for the billionaire.

One was a bare-bones version that covered what Musk was legally
obligated to pay, and the other was slightly more generous. The severance
was uninteresting to Musk. He told Pacini to let Bjelde pick what he
thought was best. Musk also remained noncommittal about the total number
of employees to eliminate, leaving the decision-making to his inner circle.

As employees went searching for morsels of information about the
layoff, they found that Musk’s transition team hadn’t been careful to keep
their plans a secret. On Wednesday, workers discovered an open Slack
channel called #tundra-ec-comp, in which human resources employees were
talking openly about severance and cuts. The workers took screenshots and
quickly circulated them in private chats.

“The severance calculations are updated based on the master list as of
12:30pm today,” one HR rep wrote, noting that the list was “pretty much
final.”
The employees fixated on her last message. “The count on my sheet is
3738,” she wrote.

The figure represented just about half of Twitter’s 7,500 full-time
employees, the most solid confirmation that many people were about to lose
their jobs. The workers kept digging. That afternoon, one realized that the
online calendars for some of the transition team were still public and found
an invite on Sacks’s schedule for Project Tundra, a discussion for the socalled “reduction in force.” Also invited to the meeting were Gracias, Spiro,
Birchall, and Teller. After workers distributed screenshots of Sacks’s
calendar among themselves, employee calendars were suddenly made
private.

Later that day, an engineer in the San Francisco office was just pacing
the hallways when he came across one of the hired hands brought in from
Tesla, who seemed engrossed in a phone conversation. The Tesla worker
didn’t seem to notice the Twitter employee approach as he hissed into his
device.

“Cut off their access at 5 p.m. None of them are to be trusted.”
B
33 > The Snap
y the morning of Thursday, November 3, employees had all but
confirmed their firings by snooping on internal calendars and message
boards. But they’d still heard nothing from Musk. Instead of telling his new
employees that they would be laid off, Musk was busy sharing the news
with advertisers.

Musk hopped on a call with Twitter’s Influence Council, a group of
more than one hundred advertisers and executives from corporations like
General Motors, Mastercard, and Microsoft. The group held occasional
meetings to give guidance to the company, and although they’d expected to
gather at the beginning of 2023 for an all-expenses-paid getaway in Napa
Valley’s wine country, Musk had canceled the event.

“We are doing a reduction in force at Twitter and that’s going to be sort
of executed in the next few days,” Musk said to open the call. “And it just
doesn’t seem right that if we did a big reduction in force, and then…now
you’re at a boondoggle in Napa.”
Among those listening in were Linda Yaccarino, the head of global
advertising at NBCUniversal, as well as Roth, one of the company’s
remaining safety and policy executives, and Robin Wheeler, a sales
executive who was attempting to keep Musk on task.

Wheeler had been abruptly elevated after the departures of Maheu and
Personette and was facing a bit of an audition in front of her new boss. As
marketing officers who collectively controlled billions of dollars in ad
spending listened, Wheeler stroked Musk’s ego.

“We have the greatest, greatest product and engineering innovator of all
time working at the helm of this company, and I’m so excited about what
that means for our product road map,” Wheeler said. Later, she claimed
Musk’s ownership had already caused Twitter to attract its highest-ever
number of daily active users—like a homeowner watching her house burn
down, marveling at how many neighbors were rubbernecking.

While the marketing leaders were deferential, they also peppered Musk
with their concerns, asking about content moderation, product plans, and
the billionaire’s late-night tweeting habit. He tried to address them all,
promising the company would make no major content decisions until “at
least a week” after the coming U.S. midterm election. He also focused on
his newly co-opted idea of “freedom of speech, not freedom of reach,”
which Roth had introduced to him during their meeting the week prior.

As he listened to Musk’s pitch, Detavio Samuels felt skeptical. Samuels
was the CEO of Revolt, a media company founded by Sean “Diddy” Combs
that focused on Black audiences. He had read reports that usage of racial
slurs had increased dramatically on Twitter since Musk’s takeover, as trolls
were emboldened by the new ownership to spew hate. Black communities
made essential contributions to Twitter, he said, and Musk’s approach to
content moderation concerned him. He built upon Musk’s metaphor to
make his point.

“As a Black man, I don’t want to walk down a neighborhood where
people are whispering the N-word, whether I hear it or not. I don’t want to
walk down a neighborhood where I hear one person whisper the N-word.

Maybe nobody else heard it, but I did,” Samuels said. “As you continue
down the path that you’re going, I really recommend that you have
conversations with this specific community and that we make sure that
whatever solutions are created are solutions that make them feel safe and in
a welcoming space.”
Musk agreed Twitter should “make people feel comfortable.” But then
he suggested Samuels’s entire premise might not matter.

“I don’t know if you know this, but Puff is an investor in Twitter,” he
said, using a nickname for Combs. “You know, he’s a good friend of mine.

We text a lot.”
Some of the Twitter executives had to resist the urge to bury their heads
in their hands.

>>> NOVEMBER 3 WAS an abnormally warm November day in Manhattan,
and the sun heated the roof deck at Twitter’s New York office to nearly 70
degrees Fahrenheit. More than fifty employees headed upstairs to gather
together one final time. They traded phone numbers and chatted about job
opportunities, then arranged themselves on the patio furniture and posed for
a picture. There were a few forced smiles.

Everyone was convinced it was their final day at Twitter. Earlier that
day, employees had noticed that their days of rest, the monthly no-meeting,
recharge days, had been removed from their calendars. The new owner was
sending a message.

Musk’s transition team had also ordered the shuttering of the internal
company directory, known as Birdhouse, which listed people’s titles and
chain of command. Without it, workers wouldn’t be able to see who was
left at the company, or, conversely, determine who had been fired.

By 5:00 p.m. that afternoon in San Francisco, some employees had
thought they had survived another day. Still, workers around the globe,
some who stayed online long past the end of the working days, remained
vigilant.

“Has the red wedding started? “” one London-based marketing
employee joked in a public Slack channel, alluding to an episode in the
popular television show Game of Thrones where several main characters are
surprisingly and brutally murdered.

“Cant see org chart on birdhouse?” another worker wrote at 5:04. “Did
they change that?”
just now, right?
directory is gone too.

It breaks regularly
Thirteen minutes later, they got the email they were all expecting:
“Update regarding our Workforce”
In an effort to place Twitter on a healthy path, we will go through the difficult
process of reducing our global workforce on Friday. We recognize that this will
impact a number of individuals who have made valuable contributions to
Twitter, but this action is unfortunately necessary to ensure the company’s
success moving forward.

To help ensure the safety of each employee as well as Twitter systems and
customer data, our offices will be temporarily closed and all badge access will
be suspended. If you are in an office or on your way to an office, please return
home.

We acknowledge this is an incredibly challenging experience to go through,
whether or not you are impacted. Thank you for continuing to adhere to Twitter
policies that prohibit you from discussing confidential information on social
media, with the press or elsewhere.

The email, signed by a faceless “Twitter” and not Musk himself,
explained that those who were safe would receive confirmation via their
work emails. Those who were not would be notified of their terminations to
their personal email addresses by 9:00 a.m. the following morning.

But while Musk had been unconcerned with the scope of the cuts, he
had insisted on getting final authority over the message that was sent to
employees. Pacini had written three versions of the email for him. The first
was quintessentially Twitter 1.0—it apologized for the cuts and wished
employees well. The second was a middle ground that laid out the news
with few platitudes. And the final version was the most cold and curt. That
was the one Musk had picked.

When the email hit their inboxes, some workers were congregated in the
Lodge, a wood-paneled common area inside Twitter’s headquarters that was
decked out with two miniature log cabins where employees sometimes
relaxed or held conference calls. The Lodge served beer alongside coffee,
and video screens lining the walls often broadcasted sports games. Shortly
after, security guards came in and cleared everyone out of the round tables
and cozy cabins. The building was closing, they said.

Twitter employees headed downstairs to await their fate. On the ground
floor of Twitter’s headquarters was a gourmet food hall called the Market,
which sold groceries and grab-and-go lunches. Crucially, it also had a small
bar in the back. Workers flooded in, overwhelming the lone bartender who
had no idea about the bloodbath that loomed from above. As she frantically
poured beer, the overcrowded bar felt like the last day of camp, with
everyone commiserating about the summer while they waited for their
parents to come pick them up. Some of the workers from Musk’s other
companies trickled in, too, gathering on one side of the room.

Everyone kept their phones gripped in their hands, frantically scrolling
Slack as they drank. Although Musk’s message had promised that
terminated employees would receive email notifications, many of those
who were cut were not even afforded that small dignity. The layoffs were
unprecedented in Twitter history, and its engineers had simply not had
enough time to properly build an off-boarding system that would send out
the required emails and cut off access to all internal systems simultaneously.

The system ran haywire, and employees found that they had abruptly been
locked out of their work computers or email accounts.

Some were banished from Slack, while others maintained access even
though they had been locked out of email. The employees who remained
vented their sadness and frustration by posting blue heart emojis in Slack,
while others shared memes. One person posted an image of a scene from
Avengers: Infinity War in which Thanos, the main antagonist, gains powers
that allow him to eliminate half of all life in the universe with the snap of
his fingers. This was Twitter’s own mass extinction event. Employees
began referring to it as their “snap.”
As employees chimed in about their own layoff experiences, or piped
up to say they still appeared to be safe, tweeps began flooding Slack with
the salute emoji. The stern-faced symbol became a favorite among Twitter
employees as the perfect encapsulation of the solidarity and sense of duty
they felt as they ground ahead at work that year under the distractions of
Musk.

“Can’t log into emails. Mac wont turn on,” one London-based tweep
tweeted, sharing photos of his laptop screen and his email log-in page. “But
so grateful this is happening at 3am. Really appreciate the thoughtfulness
on the timing front guys.”
The layoffs were like a brushfire that spread across an open field. They
arrived in New York and along the East Coast, and then workers in London
and Dublin received emails saying that they were in roles that have been
“identified as potentially impacted or at risk of redundancy.” Some in
California and Seattle received termination emails around 11:00 p.m. In
Tokyo, employees worked through most of their shifts on Friday before
receiving notices toward the end of the day.

Inside the Market, employees kept glancing down at their phones. As
some of them received their termination notices, they shouted to the room
that they were out.

“I just got the message,” one yelled.

“It was nice working with everyone,” said another.

As the night wore on and the layoff emails kept landing, Twitter’s
workforce trickled across Market Street to the Beer Hall, a dark taproom
that had hosted countless goodbye parties for departing tweeps over the
years. They continued drinking there until the late hours of the night. Some
workers didn’t get their layoff notices until they stumbled home, while
others woke up to the messages the following morning.

Even those who were working on Musk’s pet projects weren’t safe.

After 9:00 p.m. on Thursday evening, Crawford summoned her team to join
their nightly “standup” meeting, in which they shared updates about the
Blue Verified project.

“I recognize this is a crazy moment where Tweeps are losing access and
the layoff is in progress,” she wrote in a Slack group for the team. She
included a broken heart emoji and a link to a video conference line.

After the meeting started at 9:30 that night and Crawford began going
over the work that had been done, two employees suddenly dropped off the
call. The workers found themselves unable to get back on because they
were locked out of their emails and computers. Realizing what had
happened, they texted their Blue teammates to tell them that they were out.

As word of the layoffs rippled through the meeting, people’s faces sank, but
Crawford pressed on.

T
34 > The Aftermath
witter’s remaining employees opened Slack on the morning of Friday,
November 4, like survivors emerging from their bomb shelters after a
nuclear explosion.

Managers tried to take stock of the wreckage. Some of them didn’t
know which of their employees remained and asked them in Slack to raise
their hands via emoji reaction to show they were still around. Ella Irwin, a
leader on trust and safety, announced to her team that she was still
employed, before linking to a document and asking hundreds of people to
fill it out as a demonstration that they were still there.

The depth of the cuts became clearer as employees were able to piece
together who was gone and who remained. About half of the company’s
full-time workforce was eliminated. The company’s infrastructure
organization, known internally as Redbird, lost about 80 percent of its
engineering staff. Dozens of product managers were laid off across the
company, while teams that focused on human rights, experiences for
disabled users, and marketing were all reduced to skeleton crews. The
compliance department, which monitored the company’s adherence to
global regulations, was expecting to lose a bit more than a fourth of its
employees, but ended up losing half its staff.

The teams that dealt with civic integrity and content moderation were
also slashed, even though Twitter was juggling an important election period.

The result of Brazil’s presidential runoff election was still being contested
online, while the U.S. was preparing for its own midterm elections in less
than a week. Musk and his friends had decided to drastically reduce teams
that labeled political misinformation. They fired some of the only people
who knew how to operate tools that ferreted out misleading tweets about
the elections.

Some of the people who remained had survivor’s guilt, wondering why
they had been spared in the haphazard cuts while friends and colleagues got
the axe. It didn’t make much sense. Some teams, like communications,
were cut from hundreds down to a handful of people. Others were
untouched. Some people who were known to be poor performers didn’t get
the email, while engineers seen as essential to operations had their access
unceremoniously cut off. Some expectant mothers and workers on parental
leave lost their jobs. So did some on visas.

Former employees organized in encrypted group chats and private Slack
rooms to commiserate and contemplate legal action against Musk over their
abrupt dismissals.

By Saturday morning, Dorsey, who had said little about the takeover
since he anointed Musk in his April tweet thread as the “singular solution I
trust,” felt compelled to weigh in. In the months since he signaled his
approval of the deal, he had tweeted only a few times, mostly about Bitcoin.

But even Dorsey wasn’t blind to the salute emojis, goodbye tweets, and
devastation that filled his timeline. “I realize many are angry with me,” he
tweeted. “I own the responsibility for why everyone is in this situation: I
grew the company size too quickly. I apologize for that.”
I am grateful for, and love, everyone who has ever worked on
Twitter. I don’t expect that to be mutual in this moment…or ever…
and I understand.

It was Dorsey’s first public admission that the growth he had pursued as
chief executive had put the company on an untenable path, a conclusion
long accepted by Twitter’s previous executives and board. Left unsaid,
however, was how he—and Twitter’s board—empowered a man with $44
billion to callously slash and burn the people for whom he supposedly felt
“love.”
Dorsey’s message came after about twenty employees in Twitter’s office
in Accra, Ghana, began receiving notices that they were all being laid off
and would receive a month of salary as severance. Most had been hired
only in the past year, after Twitter opened its outpost there in April 2021.

As news broke of Twitter’s treatment of its employees in Accra, Lara
Cohen, a vice president of partnerships who was also laid off, attempted to
bring the situation to the attention of Dorsey and tagged him in a tweet.

Dorsey replied in a direct message to Cohen asking her what exactly she
wanted him to do.

“Maybe you can use your influence to do better by these people,” she
responded. “They deserve better than this. We made a commitment to
them.”
Dorsey seemed unmoved. “I’ll certainly look to hire them,” he
responded.

F
35 > Verified or Not
or Esther Crawford, Twitter Blue represented an opportunity. In
private, she told those working on the project with her that charging
users to become verified was an idea with limited possibility for success. At
the same time, she saw it as a chance to impress Musk and gain influence.

Musk’s fans and lieutenants had hammered the company as bloated and
lazy.

“This is our chance to show the best of what Twitter has to offer,” she
told her team. It was also a chance to build karma with Musk. If they could
accomplish this one task now, she suggested, they would be able to
negotiate for what they wanted—raises, new positions, new products—after
gaining his trust.

While she saw the upside of getting Musk’s approval, the absurdity of
being asked to launch a product built to his specifications in less than two
weeks amid widespread layoffs was not lost on Crawford. In one group
gathering, she presented her team with customized mugs that wouldn’t have
been out of place at a tech-themed Bed Bath & Beyond. “Chance made us
coworkers, crazy psycho shit made us Tweeps,” read the mugs’ inscription.

Depending on who you asked, Crawford was either a Musk loyalist or a
rank opportunist. She certainly wasn’t the only one in either case. Musk’s
fanboys were everywhere, and some emerged in the wake of his acquisition
to celebrate and critique their coworkers who lost their jobs. After the Snap,
an air of self-preservation hung heavily over Twitter. One engineer, who
was desperate to cling on to her healthcare, privately criticized Musk and
his ideas to her colleagues, while commending the billionaire in public
Slack channels, claiming that “Elon is the Steve Jobs we need.” Others
believed that the Musk shake-up could be their opportunity for a promotion
or job change that had been hindered by Twitter’s previous bureaucracy.

Most of the employees Crawford brought to the Blue Verified team
came to view the project as pointless at best and, at worst, something that
could drastically undermine trust on the platform. Paying for verification
badges would lead to impersonation and undermine the whole principle of
the check marks, they thought. Crawford shared their worries. But it was
what Musk wanted. No amount of reasoning or lessons from Twitter’s past
would convince him otherwise.

>>> BEFORE THE CHECK MARKS, impersonation on Twitter—as with the
original @ElonMusk account—was pervasive. While the company’s
founders knew it was a problem, cracking down on accounts pretending to
be famous people was always a secondary concern as they struggled to keep
the site online. By June 2009, however, the situation became untenable.

Tony La Russa, the World Series–winning manager for the St. Louis
Cardinals, became fed up with a parody account that made jokes about
unsavory team incidents—including the death of one of his players—and
sued Twitter for hosting the content. The fake tweets were “derogatory and
demeaning” and damaged his image, La Russa’s lawyers argued. In
response, Twitter took down the imposter and rolled out a solution: Verified
Accounts.

The company began slapping the verification badge on the accounts of
athletes, politicians, musicians, and public officials. With the introduction
of the blue seal, Twitter became the first social network to verify its users,
sparking one of its most lasting impacts on internet culture. Other services
began verifying prominent users—including Google+ in 2011, Facebook in
2012, and Instagram in 2014—creating coveted social media status symbols
and spreading a class system across the modern internet.

While many people saw the check mark as a designation of fame, it
became an important part of Twitter’s public utility. It marked the real
accounts for brands like McDonald’s and Coca-Cola, making the platform
much more attractive to advertisers as well as to government and
emergency service accounts, which provided enormous utility for those
looking for train times or searching for information in the wake of a natural
disaster.

>>> MUSK’S BLUE VERIFIED program was going to destroy the whole system.

If Musk’s paid subscription service allowed anyone to be verified, then no
one would be, in the traditional sense. The utility of the check mark would
evaporate. As one Blue Verified worker later put it: “It was such an obvious
trainwreck, that the main job of everyone on the team was to make sure it
was the safest trainwreck possible.”
Crawford and her team tried to develop safeguards that would protect
the usefulness of verification. On October 31, they presented two options to
Musk and his team. In the first, there would be two badges: people who
were already verified would keep their filled-in badges designating
importance, while those who had purchased them through Blue Verified
would get transparent badges. To illustrate the differences, they created
mock-ups of two tweets. One, from the legacy verified @JoeBiden account,
advocated for people to vote. The other, from the Blue Verified @JoeB1den
account, which replaced the “i” with a “1,” tweeted it was “starting nuclear
war with Russia.” The only marker to distinguish between the two accounts,
besides the slight change in spelling, was the transparent badge on the fake
one.

The second option from the Blue team showed both accounts with the
same type of verified badge. But in addition to that badge, official accounts,
like @JoeBiden, received another label to clarify their importance. In
Biden’s case, his account was delineated as a “United States government
official.”
The attempts to make clearer distinctions between legacy and paid
verified users, however, was not embraced by some of Musk’s friends. The
first option “feels like a second-class citizen,” Sacks wrote in an email that
night, adding that it would “disincentivize purchase.” He expressed more
support for the second option, but cautioned against using the labels beyond
government officials.

Sacks’s email kicked off a reply-all discussion. Crawford noted that
settling on the aesthetic was a “high priority decision” because it would
dictate what the team would move to build. Soon the email thread ballooned
with responses from engineers, Sriram Krishnan, and Musk’s own assistant.

With the boss watching, everyone felt like they needed to weigh in.

“There are too many cooks in the kitchen here,” he wrote. “Over time,
we can introduce tiers with more features, but the goal right now is to
maximize the number of verified users as fast as possible to improve the
user experience for everyone (verified or not) on Twitter.”
>>> MUSK’S HYPERFIXATION ON Blue extended beyond the design. He also
engaged in seemingly endless deliberations about how much it should cost.

Meanwhile, advertisers were bolting for the exits and Twitter was bleeding
revenue. Sacks insisted they should raise the price from its current tag of
$4.99 a month to $20 a month. Anything less felt cheap to him, and he
wanted to present Blue as a luxury good. In emails, he compared Blue to a
designer purse.

“Chanel could make a fortune selling a $99 bag, but it would be a onetime move,” he wrote. “A ‘promotional offer’ may not be the position we
want. A luxury brand can always move down-market, but it’s very hard to
move up-market once the brand is shot.”
Calacanis, however, vehemently disagreed. “It should be $99 a year,” he
insisted. During one meeting, he launched into a spiel about how Twitter
users were more likely to open their wallets for a $100 per year subscription
if it seemed slightly cheaper at the $99 price, as though he had just watched
a YouTube video explaining the basics of consumer psychology.

Musk seemed more swayed by Calacanis’s price than Sacks’s, except
for the fact that he hated the number 9. Tesla never used the number on its
website, and he saw any attempts to play mind games on customers as
tacky.

“That’s dumb. We don’t do it and it makes no sense,” he chastised the
podcaster.

“Fine, it can be $100, but it should be $99,” Calacanis relented.

Musk also turned to his biographer for advice. “Walter, what do you
think?” Musk asked during a meeting about pricing.

“This should be accessible to everyone,” Isaacson said, no longer just
the fly on the wall. “You need a really low price point, because this is
something that everyone is going to sign up for.”
To those in the room who designed or built Blue Verified, the
discussions were baffling. There was Musk, a supposed genius leader who
had built billion-dollar companies, soliciting advice from a small inner
circle of advisers who had little experience working on social networks.

Sure, they used Twitter, but these rich men were not representative of the
hundreds of millions of people around the world who logged in to the
platform every day. They were all making gut decisions based on their
experiences in their own Twitter filter bubbles—and Musk lapped it up.

Musk had largely come to peace with his price of $100 a year for Blue.

But during one meeting to discuss pricing, his assistant, Jehn Balajadia, felt
compelled to speak up.

“There’s a lot of people who can’t even buy gas right now,” she said,
referencing skyrocketing inflation. It was hard to see how any of those
people would pony up $100 on the spot for a social media status symbol.

“But think of everyone with an iPhone,” Musk responded. “If you can
afford an iPhone, you can definitely afford this.”
He paused to think. “You know, like, what do people pay for Starbucks?
Like $8?” Before anyone could raise serious objections, he whipped out his
phone to set his word in stone.

“Twitter’s current lords & peasants system for who has or doesn’t have
a blue checkmark is bullshit,” he tweeted on November 1. “Power to the
people! Blue for $8/month.”
>>> CRAWFORD GREW CLOSER TO MUSK, texting with him regularly, and
members of his inner circle started opening up to her. In the chaotic early
days of November, Balajadia sat Crawford down to coach her on managing
Musk. She was one of the few women Musk trusted, and while she
technically worked as an operations coordinator for the Boring Company,
she was treated as a glorified assistant. She monitored his calendar,
followed him at some public events, and set up his laptop for him when
Musk needed to do work that couldn’t be done on his iPhone. Balajadia also
made some public appearances on behalf of the Boring Company and, in
2018, presented a “proof of concept” plan to the Culver City Council to
build a 6.5-mile tunnel from SpaceX headquarters in Hawthorne,
California, to West Los Angeles. The tunnel was never built, but Balajadia
continued to devote her life to Musk.

“I can tell you’re going to be around for a while, so let me tell you
something,” Balajadia said. “Elon is special in this world. It is our job to
protect him and make sure what he wants to have happen, happens. We
need to protect the mission.”
To Crawford, the message was eerily similar to those she grew up
hearing in a Christian cult in Oklahoma. But instead of a prophet, Balajadia
had Musk. She had spent large chunks of time away from her young child
so she could travel with him. But the mission merited those sacrifices.

Crawford came up with her own tactics for dealing with Musk.

Knowing that she needed his approval, she avoided upsetting him at all
costs. Maybe she could live up to her Old Testament name, protecting her
people from a king who planned to exterminate them. She quickly learned
that she could challenge him, but typically in one-on-one settings where he
was jovial and willing to learn from the person in front of him. Individually,
Musk could be charming, willingly engaging in discussion and listening to
the expertise of his counterpart. Put him in a larger group setting with
people outside of his inner circle or those he didn’t trust, however, and
Musk’s ego ran wild. He could never be seen as inferior or uninformed. The
people who survived in his orbit learned this quickly.

In one meeting, days after the deal closed, Musk was sitting in his
second-floor conference room scrolling Twitter as some of the transition
team chatted about product ideas. After reading a tweet about the FBI and
Hillary Clinton—a constant fixation for the right-wing internet—he
announced to the room that he had drafted a tweet about Clinton, hoping to
elicit some laughs. Crawford stood up. “You can’t do that right now!” she
said dramatically. They had product matters to discuss and she didn’t want
it to be a distraction. Maybe do it later, she suggested, before bursting out
laughing. The histrionic, joking approach worked. “Are you my tweet
adviser now?” he asked, raising an eyebrow at Crawford. He never sent the
tweet.

Publicly, however, Crawford was seen as a cheerleader. Through the
chaos and callousness of the early days of the takeover, she remained
outwardly optimistic, giving others the impression that she had become
Musk’s devoted fan. On the night of November 1, after working long hours
with the Blue team, she and her colleagues decided to tweet a joke. She had
brought an eye mask and silver REI sleeping bag to the office for nap
breaks, and after a product leader named Evan Jones had snapped a photo
of her actually sleeping, she asked him to retake the picture before he
posted it. He climbed on an office couch to get a better overhead angle of
her in a sleeping bag, then tweeted the photo. Crawford then retweeted it
with her own message: “When your team is pushing round the clock to
make deadlines sometimes you #SleepWhereYouWork.”
The image rocketed around the internet. To Musk’s detractors, it
symbolized the cringeworthy hustle culture that dominated the tech world
and normalized the idea of working at all hours to appease a corporate
overlord. To Musk’s supporters, the photo showed the impact a once-in-alifetime innovator was having on a company that needed a revolution. In
reality, it was a joking, if not shrewdly calculated bit of self-promotion by
Crawford. She and Jones faced a maelstrom of criticism across Twitter, and
the product designer wanted to delete his post. But Crawford demanded he
keep the photo up. This was her time to shine.

>>> THE HUSTLE WASN’T completely fake. The Blue team stayed up late
fielding requests from Musk and his transition team, and created a twentyfour-hour rotation where projects could be passed to other employees
around the globe to ensure that work never stopped.

Crawford tried to share her concerns about burnout with Musk. Some
people on the Twitter Blue team had taken to monitoring their elevated
heart rates on their Apple Watches and sharing them with their colleagues to
make light of their situations. “I don’t want to push the team to die over
this,” Crawford told Musk.

“Well, push them to just before they die,” Musk responded, laughing.

While those who heard the exchange understood it to be a joke, they also
wondered if there was an element of reality to it. They had heard the stories
over at Tesla and SpaceX.

Given the quick turnaround, the Blue employees knew they’d likely
launch a minimally viable product and could only pray that there wouldn’t
be any major bugs or issues. At times, they worried they were going too fast
and could run afoul of regulations. In one meeting, Crawford raised a
potential pitfall. The company’s lawyers had warned that there were
consumer protection laws outside the U.S. that would require the company
to refund subscribers who were later suspended by the company for
breaking its rules. We might be liable to give some money back, Crawford
explained.

“Don’t care,” Musk said. “Fuck it. Do I seem concerned about legal
battles? Move forward. Get this thing done.”
The only thing that seemed to hold Musk somewhat accountable was a
fear of public shame on Twitter. In one meeting he blurted out that House
Representative Alexandria Ocasio-Cortez, a Twitter power user and darling
of the progressive left, would roast him if the Blue relaunch went poorly.

Calacanis chimed in to agree, stating that he thought Ocasio-Cortez would
run for president one day.

At Tesla and SpaceX, engineers often joked that the only laws they
respected were those of physics and Musk’s own demands. At Twitter, the
Blue team got a crash course. In the same meeting, Musk wanted to review
the descriptions of Twitter Blue that would be used online and in the Apple
App store. “It should be: ‘Rocket to the top of replies, mentions, search, and
topics,’ ” he said, reading through some of that copy. “Remove the comma
before ‘and.’ I find it troubling.”
Crawford, a fan of the Oxford comma, tried to defend it. “I find the
opposite with commas,” she said with a smile. Some in the room shifted
nervously in their seats.

“Too bad, I’m the law,” Musk replied.

>>> AS THE NEW TWITTER BLUE features came into focus, so did the fears
about how it would be exploited for impersonation. What would happen if
an account pretending to be a local fire department declared an emergency?
Or a fake account posing as a politician or election authority spread
misinformation about an upcoming vote?
Stopping election interference was of paramount importance to Twitter
employees. Brazil, one of Twitter’s largest markets outside the U.S., held its
presidential runoff election the weekend after Musk walked into Twitter.

The populist incumbent, Jair Bolsonaro, was unseated by Luiz Inácio Lula
da Silva but said he would challenge the results. As Musk dismantled
Twitter’s trust and safety team, hashtags in Portuguese that questioned the
veracity of the vote trended on the platform. Employees who remained on
civic integrity initiatives gamed out situations in which Bolsonaro, who
Musk claimed to sometimes speak with, could spread disinformation using
paid verified accounts.

Twitter users and employees also raised concerns about the upcoming
U.S. midterm elections, which were set to occur on November 8. The
Federal Bureau of Investigation shared those fears. About a week before
Election Day, an agent from the bureau’s Foreign Influence Task Force
reached out to the company to better understand Twitter’s plans for Twitter
Blue.

Musk was briefed on the outreach during a November 3 meeting and
was told that the FBI was interested in whether there would be changes to
currently verified official government, state or federal, election accounts.

The agency also asked whether fraudulent accounts posing as government
officials would be able to become verified.

“They are generally concerned with any changes that might impact
election misinformation operations during the election,” Crawford said.

Musk’s response didn’t exactly breed confidence. “We can launch Blue,
but wait until after the election to change ranking,” he said. Musk had
planned to prioritize tweets from Blue subscribers in the algorithmic Twitter
timeline, giving his paying users an advantage when it came to getting the
most attention on the platform.

Musk also said he planned to give an “official badge” to all government
entities “of significance” to indicate that they were authentic accounts. But
Musk didn’t define what he meant by “of significance.”
Employees knew it was impossible to filter through the thousands of
verified accounts that could potentially deal in official U.S. elections and
determine if they should receive “official” billing just five days before the
vote.

>>> ON THE EVENING OF NOVEMBER 4, as the company was being gutted by
layoffs, Crawford and her team submitted the final changes for the Twitter
Blue launch to Apple’s App Store. Initially the subscription service would
be available for purchase only through Apple devices, partly because the
rush meant there had been less focus on the Android app, and partly
because Musk believed he could piggyback off Apple’s ID and payment
systems. Everyone had to have a unique user ID to use and pay through
Apple devices, and by relying on that, Twitter would have to do less
verification of users on their own, he argued.

The billionaire called Crawford to personally congratulate her on the
effort. It was a validating moment. The product manager had proved to
Musk that people at Twitter could get shit done. But his praise didn’t erase
the pit in her stomach as some of her colleagues who worked on the project
were being terminated.

She was also still fretting about Musk’s plan to launch paid verification
on November 7. Despite the warnings from the FBI, Musk didn’t seem to
register the problems with his agenda.

That Friday, an employee took to a company-wide Slack channel and
tore into the timing of the launch.

“Why are we making such a risky change one day before elections,
which has the potential of causing elections interference by malicious
groups that could abuse the new rules to their advantage in the spread of
misinformation?” they asked.

Crawford made one last attempt that weekend in a private chat with her
boss. “Do you want to be blamed for the outcome of this election?” she
asked.

“Well, when is it?” Musk replied.

“It’s in two days,” Crawford said, stunned that he hadn’t clocked the
date that she and her team had been warning him about since the start of the
project.

Musk paused, processing. “Oh, I didn’t realize,” he said after a moment.

“Okay, yeah, it’s fine. We can wait. Why don’t we wait?”
The launch was moved to November 9.

B
36 > Elections
y November 4, the Friday after the Snap, Musk was in a foul mood.

He was no stranger to scrutiny, but the chaos of the Twitter deal had
elevated him to a new level of exposure. Musk was the platform’s main
character, whose every decision was scrutinized and pilloried by the site’s
users. Twitter was worth far less than Tesla and SpaceX, but it was a center
of culture, current events, and news, and there were few subjects people on
Twitter liked discussing more than Twitter itself.

Agitated, Musk handled the criticism the only way he knew how:
tweeting through it. In a stream of consciousness that flowed through his
account starting Friday, he tweeted 105 times over the course of the
weekend. Annoyed by the onslaught of critique, he changed his profile
description from “Chief Twit” to “Twitter Complaint Hotline Operator.”
At first, he turned his attention to Twitter’s advertisers. After a week
spent trying to reassure them, Musk blamed “activist groups pressuring
advertisers” for Twitter’s “massive drop in revenue” and chalked it up to his
enemies attempting to destroy free speech. Then he turned to bullying,
promising on Friday evening to unleash a “thermonuclear name & shame”
of advertisers who dared to stop spending money on Twitter.

Through the weekend, he continued with masturbation jokes about
Mastodon, the Twitter alternative that users were threatening to migrate to
in the wake of his takeover. He aimed barbs at the comedian Kathy Griffin,
who decided to turn her Twitter account into a parody of Musk’s in an
attempt to test the limits of “free speech” and was subsequently banned by
the billionaire. And he responded to a tweet that featured a quote from a
white nationalist. Musk was always unfiltered, but his weekend felt
especially manic.

On Monday morning, employees woke up to a tweet from Musk that
shocked them.

“To independent-minded voters,” Musk wrote on Sunday, November 6,
two days before the U.S. midterm elections. “Shared power curbs the worst
excesses of both parties, therefore I recommend voting for a Republican
Congress, given that the Presidency is Democratic.”
The tweet was the latest indicator of Musk’s rightward shift. In June, he
had predicted a “massive red wave” in the midterm elections, and in August
he appeared as the special guest of Republican House Minority Leader
Kevin McCarthy at a GOP retreat in Wyoming, where he glad-handed
politicians who, a few years earlier, could have easily been targets of his ire
for their connections to Big Oil and climate change denial. He had found a
new political home, and was hoping to push his followers in the same
direction.

Twitter’s past leaders had done everything they could to make it seem
like the platform favored no political candidate or party. Dorsey had
privately donated to past U.S. presidential candidates like Tulsi Gabbard
and Bernie Sanders, but he had never used his account to tell citizens to
vote for a particular party or candidate. Like many companies, Twitter had
operated a political action committee and donated equally to Democratic
and Republican candidates—but the company shuttered it in 2020 after it
banned political advertising, arguing influence should be earned and not
bought.

>>> ON THE MORNING of Monday, November 7, the in-house lawyers who
had survived Musk’s layoffs logged on to an 8:30 a.m. video call for a
briefing from Spiro. As they called in, filling in little boxes on a computer
screen, Spiro popped up on the call wearing a tight T-shirt with army
emblazoned across the front.

Looking at the sullen faces, he knew the forty people who had logged in
from Twitter’s legal and public policy teams were wary of him. They
wanted assurances. So he tried to speak to them on a level that he thought
they could all understand. He told them that the layoffs were over, and a
new chapter was beginning at Twitter. Cost cutting would continue, but the
company would reduce its spending by canceling contracts, not chopping
more heads.

“Listen, I know it’s tough, but if everyone can just hang in there,” Spiro
said. “What you all need to remember is that Elon is a guy who’s created
electric cars and launched rockets.” His belief in his boss’s super powers
seemed absolute. A positive outcome was on the horizon, he promised.

“We’re all going to make so much money out of this,” he continued, as
some of the faces on the video chat contorted. The lawyers asked about who
would lead them. Musk’s lawyer had spent time at headquarters in the days
following the takeover, asserting his authority over legal and policy
decisions, and some onlookers wondered if Spiro was angling to lead the
legal department himself.

“You’re all leading yourselves,” Spiro said. “Each team has a leader and
I don’t believe in boundaries or walls. There’s no rule saying we need a
general counsel or a chief legal officer. You’re not living in that world.”
Besides, it wouldn’t be useful to appoint someone who could end up gone
within three weeks if they pissed off the boss, he continued.

Twitter’s lawyers tried to keep their emotions in check but messaged
one another in private as Spiro spoke. Some said that Musk’s plans to not
appoint higher-ups made sense—the billionaire had made his disdain for
management clear in his layoffs, and seemed to want to make the decisions
himself. Another made her opinions on Musk’s hotshot counsel very clear:
“This guy’s a fucking douche.”
The lawyers badgered Spiro about what their roles would be and how
Musk planned to run the company. Musk would address them directly in
due time, Spiro said. “Be careful what you wish for. If I had thrown you in
front of Elon, it wouldn’t have gone well for half of you,” he added.

The lawyers should drive their own work from now on without waiting
for someone to give them directions, Musk’s attorney continued. “Don’t be
afraid to ask questions,” he advised. “No one is going to get fired, although
you may want to use your judgment as to whether to ask a question in front
of fifty people.” Spiro knew the best way to convince Musk of something
was to speak to him in private.

His bravado seemed to grow as he navigated the Q&A. Some asked
about the suddenness of the layoffs, and whether labor laws had been
violated in the process. Others asked about how Musk planned to comply
with the raft of new global regulations for social media companies that were
expected to come into effect soon.

“Here’s the thing, I’ve known Elon for a long time,” Spiro said, looking
into the camera. “Elon is willing to take extraordinary amounts of legal
risk.” Some of the people on the video call put their heads in their hands, in
disbelief that a seasoned lawyer would say something like that out loud.

“He’s launching rockets into space,” Spiro said. “If the worst we get is a
query from the FTC, that’s not the big leagues for us.

“People who work at companies are not supposed to talk to media.

Those who are doing it and think I’m dumb and don’t know it, I do know it
and will watch it develop and put my foot down if I want,” Spiro said,
referencing Musk’s willingness to crack down on anyone who leaked to the
press. The call ended soon after.

>>> THE LONGER THE Blue team worked under Musk’s direction, the more
they realized his decision-making was driven solely by gut instinct. Musk’s
unparalleled success in building two world-changing companies had given
him—and his allies—the belief that he was the alpha when it came to
product decisions. No one was better or more qualified, and he made that
readily known.

Despite running his other companies, Musk seemed like he was
constantly available, if not in person, then over text or email, and he wanted
to call every shot, no matter how small. After the initial round of layoffs
that removed many, many executives and managers, Musk had more than a
hundred people reporting to him.

The intensity of it all—the eighteen-hour working days, the middle-ofthe-night emails and texts, the whiplash changes of heart—began to weigh
on them. Even Crawford was starting to feel the heat. She walked a fine line
between pleasing Musk and limiting his potential damage to the website,
and often remarked to some of her reports that it was becoming too much.

After one meeting in which Musk demanded they once again remove any
official designations from individual verified accounts, she told a teammate:
“I don’t want the Dunning-Kruger effect to get in the way of good decisionmaking here.”
She and other employees began to understand that Musk’s expertise in
other areas didn’t necessarily translate into running or understanding
Twitter. At its core, SpaceX was a physics problem. Tesla was a
manufacturing challenge. But Twitter was a social and psychological
problem. Beyond the engineering challenges of keeping one of the most
trafficked sites online, the company boiled down to empathizing with other
human beings and understanding what kept them coming back to the
platform; sharing their unfiltered thoughts; or clicking, engaging, and
reading whatever came across their feed. It became clear that Musk
struggled to understand how anyone else used the platform.

“It’s human nature to over-index on your own lived experience,” one
Twitter Blue team member said, after leaving the company. “But Elon’s
power and money means nothing stops him from making bad decisions
based on his own limited experience.”
>>> WHILE TWITTER’S REMAINING employees attempted to prepare the
platform for the midterm elections, Musk focused on his more immediate
concern: cost cutting.

“Regarding Twitter’s reduction in force, unfortunately there is no choice
when the company is losing over $4M/day,” he tweeted a few days earlier.

Left unsaid in his tweet was the $13 billion in debt he saddled on the
company, a ticking time bomb that he believed might detonate in a
worsening global economy. He had tasked Steve Davis with looking for
other ways to cut Twitter’s expenditures, and the yes-man immediately set
up meetings with members of Twitter’s financial planning teams.

In one meeting, a sickly looking Davis, who by that point was already
sleeping in the office to accommodate Musk’s frenetic pace, asked one
finance employee where he would start trimming. The employee was
surprised.

“You mean, like teams?” the worker asked, having seen half the
company depart a few days ago in the Snap.

Davis laughed. “We already did that!” he replied. It wasn’t just people
they needed to go after. “Now we have to cut another $500 million from the
budget.”
It was a jaw-dropping number. In 2021, the company’s general and
administrative business costs—which accounted for global office rents,
employee perks, food, and supplies—totaled about $580 million. Musk and
Davis were now looking to excise the equivalent of that budget from the
company. Data center costs, employee meals, software expenditures—
nothing was off-limits.

>>> EARLY TUESDAY EVENING, Musk entered his second-floor conference
room at 1 Tenth as some of the early midterm results began to trickle in.

Early returns suggested that the “red wave” the Tesla chief had predicted
was turning into a trickle, though he seemed more focused on the meeting
in front of him with Twitter’s finance leaders, who had been expected to
give him a diagnosis of the company’s spending, sales forecasts, and
potential savings. More than thirty people gathered around a custom-built
oak conference table to introduce themselves to the new boss and explain
what they did. And as one employee spoke up to explain that he was the
head of revenue forecasting for the company, Musk paused him.

“I wanted to talk to you, what’s your forecast for the general economy
in 2023?” the billionaire asked. “Because I spoke with Ari Emanuel today
and he said the economy is going to be down massively.”
The name drop caused a few in the room to raise their eyebrows. Musk
was citing advice from a Hollywood mogul. The head of revenue
forecasting tried his best to explain that Twitter had seen drops in
advertising revenue due to the war in Ukraine, the pandemic, and racial
justice protests around the police murder of George Floyd, and noted that
large global events had a way of impacting how advertisers allocated
money. Musk nodded along before asking how Twitter handled the Great
Recession of 2008. After someone chimed in that the company wasn’t
making money back then in its early days, Musk went on an extended
discussion on how the recession almost led to the end of Tesla.

“I’m traumatized from it,” he told the room, reiterating his belief that
the global economy was about to go into free fall.

Then he underlined his commitment to propping up his new purchase.

“Also this isn’t public yet, but I sold more Tesla stock that will go toward
supporting Twitter,” he said. In filings with the SEC earlier that day, Musk
disclosed that he sold 19.5 million shares of Tesla for nearly $4 billion.

For most of the two hours, Musk listened as employees walked him
through Twitter’s costs. He was somewhat reasonable to the gathered
employees, many of whom were interacting with him for the first time. This
wasn’t the blustering bomb-thrower from Twitter but someone who seemed
to have more control over his executive functions. They also knew that he
would not behave like Twitter management of old. Musk wanted to cut, and
cut deeply, and wondered aloud why employees had been coddled up until
now.

As one director outlined Twitter’s lease commitments to office spaces
around the world, Musk frowned and squirmed in his seat. The company
had offices from San Francisco to London to Singapore, and some of these
leases had been signed to lock-in rates for the long term. Musk couldn’t
believe it.

“I don’t care what the contracts say,” he said.

“But some of the leases have been signed for the next thirty years,” said
one director. “We can’t negotiate. They’ve already been agreed to.”
“Everything can be renegotiated,” Musk replied. “We renegotiate or it
goes to zero.”
With Davis listening in, Musk’s words became the God-sent directive.

Employees responsible for relationships not only with office management
companies, but also software vendors, cloud computing vendors, and even
employee benefits providers, went back to their partners to ask for steep
reductions in price. It didn’t matter that the old management had signed a
contract. There was a new owner now and they couldn’t do anything about
it.

It was a mob-like move. To many of these third-party vendors, Twitter,
a major company with incredible brand recognition, was a marquee client.

That was particularly true for the office landlords in major cities like San
Francisco and New York, where office rents had fallen through the floor
during the pandemic. As the work-from-home trend took hold, there was
less demand for office space and Musk and his goons knew it. If a landlord
wouldn’t reduce the rent, they would just stop paying the bill. Musk knew
the company was too big to be evicted from its headquarters, and in smaller
offices like Boulder and Seattle, it was a means of breaking these contracts.

As the meeting dragged into the evening, some employees worried that
their window for voting that night might be over as polls closed. During the
gathering, Musk, on one of his tangents, told the group that he was voting
Republican to bring the country more to the center. While he had tweeted to
this effect earlier, the employees were still amazed to hear their chief
executive advocating for a political outcome so blatantly at work.

Voting records would later show that Musk didn’t vote at all.

C
37 > Zombie Attack
rawford arrived at Twitter headquarters early on the morning of
November 9. With the revamped Twitter Blue set for its unveiling, her
moment had come. She was the first to arrive from her team and set up in
Caracara, a tenth-floor conference room, as the sun rose over downtown.

But Musk, without even setting foot in the office, had already thrown a
wrench in her plans. He’d been agonizing over whether or not there would
be other badges to delineate a person’s or organization’s identity that would
be used in addition to the blue check—a measure Crawford wanted to
ensure that verification didn’t break completely. Of particular influence in
the billionaire’s thinking was Isaacson, who had pushed Musk to not have
anything beyond the check marks that came with paying for Blue.

“I’ve been talking to Walter about this,” Musk had said in an earlier
meeting. “And Walter is very adamant that the power of Twitter is that it’s
democratic where world leaders and regular people can stand shoulder to
shoulder. He said we don’t want to create a class system and yeah, I trust
Walter. He’s a very smart guy.”
Despite this, Crawford and her team had been able to convince Musk
that certain very, very high-profile accounts should be given “official”
badges. She began rolling them out on Election Day. The gray, transparent
badges sat under an account’s username and, as Crawford would describe in
a tweet, were a way to “distinguish between @TwitterBlue subscribers with
blue checkmarks and accounts that are verified as official.” Essentially, the
“official” label would serve the function of the old verified check mark,
ensuring that users could tell when an account truly belonged to a celebrity,
brand, or politician.

By Wednesday morning, however, Musk had come to hate it. The label
was being ridiculed on the site, and Musk absorbed the blows. One user, an
anonymous fan account for the rapper Nicki Minaj called
@NipTuckReload, which had 5,000 followers, tweeted that the labels were
“ugly.” The billionaire took a screenshot of the post and emailed it to
Crawford and her team, who immediately scrambled to create an alternative
before Musk did something drastic.

But they were too late. By 8:38 a.m., Musk tweeted that he had “killed”
the label and declared they would be no more.

“Please note that Twitter will do lots of dumb things in coming
months,” he posted six minutes later. “We will keep what works & change
what doesn’t.”
>>> THAT MORNING, Damien Kieran called McSweeney in Dublin. The
privacy lawyer had been working around the clock with Lea Kissner,
Twitter’s top security executive, and Marianne Fogarty, its head of
compliance, to complete a regular audit that was due to the Federal Trade
Commission. The FTC kept a watchful eye on the company’s privacy
practices and expected quarterly updates about how its privacy work was
progressing.

As the lawyer in the group, Kieran was responsible for signing off on
those audits and declaring that their contents were accurate. In October, a
former security executive at Uber had been found guilty of lying to the FTC
during a privacy inquest at the ride-hailing firm, and although he had yet to
be sentenced, he faced the possibility of years in prison. The trial had been
closely watched by other Silicon Valley executives, and Kieran was well
aware that he could find himself in the same position if Twitter made any
mistakes in its audit.

But Musk’s mass layoffs had made those mistakes all but inevitable.

Twitter had to document which employees were responsible for specific
privacy programs, and many of them had vanished during the purge. The
team finalizing the FTC report was understaffed and was struggling to
finish. Kieran, Kissner, and Fogarty had begun discussing whether they
should put their names on the document at all and had sought advice from a
lawyer.

The suggestion he received wasn’t optimistic: Kieran and the other
executives should resign before they signed off on an audit they weren’t
confident in.

On the call with McSweeney, Kieran was cagey. He had received legal
advice regarding Twitter’s compliance with the FTC, he told her. Was she
interested in hearing it? He wouldn’t tell McSweeney exactly what was
going on but told her it was a “precarious situation.”
As the executive responsible for making similar declarations about data
privacy to regulators in the European Union, McSweeney wanted to know
what was going on. She agreed to convene a meeting with other workers in
Dublin, so they could hear what the lawyer had told Kieran and decide what
they should do.

>>> MUSK JOINED the Blue launch team in Caracara that afternoon, sailing
through the glass door to the conference room and plopping down at the
center of the table, next to two doughnut boxes that had sat open since early
morning. The engineers and designers who had gathered in the room
quieted down and straightened up.

“There are a whole bunch of people dying to show what a huge idiot I
am,” Musk said. He decided to keep the launch quiet, worried that an
announcement would lead to an overload of Twitter’s systems.

Still, he expected people and organizations, who had longed for the
verified badge or who wanted to support his cause, to sign up in droves.

“It’s better to have a little bit of confusion reign for a soft launch so we
don’t break the system,” he told employees. And he was worried about bad
actors, predicting a wave of impostors, scammers, and pranksters that
would be like a “zombie attack” in World War Z, the 2013 action horror
flick starring Brad Pitt. By midmorning, news outlets began to take notice
of the new Blue features and published stories about the relaunched service.

For more than six hours, Musk sat in the room and kept a watchful eye.

This was his game-changing Twitter service, one that he believed would
wean the company off its almost complete dependency on advertising, and
he was there to shepherd it through, like the liftoff of a SpaceX rocket or the
first Tesla vehicle delivery.

Crawford and others in the room, including Jonah Grant, a longtime
engineer who had been pulled into the project, were beside themselves.

Musk had eliminated their official badge that morning, arguing to the room
that “aggressively stopping impersonation” would make it unnecessary. But
he didn’t explain what kind of aggressive measures should be taken. Days
earlier he had eliminated swaths of employees responsible for trust and
safety, and the product manager asked how exactly Twitter’s remaining
content moderators would come up with solutions to stop fake accounts.

She laid out a potential scenario where an account subscribed to Blue
pretended to be a local government official who didn’t have a large
following. How would a content moderator determine which was the
legitimate account?
“We should consider what is the magnitude of the thing that happens
before we take action,” Musk replied. “I want to pay close attention and
react with agility, but not react with a fear of a thing that may or may not
occur.”
It was an absurd answer. Those who had worked at Twitter knew it was
nearly impossible to patrol the platform for every harm in real time, even
with automated technologies and thousands of employees and contract
content moderators, many of whom had been laid off by Musk’s team. This
was a service used by millions around the globe. Someone impersonating
the New York City Fire Department may be flagged and reported early, but
what if it was a police service in a village in India? Or a Ukrainian
politician during the war? Or a U.S. embassy in the Middle East?
Crawford and Grant continued to lightly needle Musk on potential
pitfalls, but rather than suggesting definitively that she foresaw a problem,
she presented ideas as hypotheticals, careful to never directly challenge
him. “I think the thing that will be interesting to see, too, will be state-
sponsored actors, do they jump on this bandwagon?” she said, a few halfeaten doughnuts sitting behind her laptop. “Because those are some of the
more sophisticated—”
Musk cut her off. Of course they’ll jump on this, one hundred percent.

“What we’re doing here with verified being attached to a credit card and a
phone is the worst possible thing to do to bad state actors,” he said, waving
his hands like an orchestra conductor. “Not because they don’t have the
money. But because they don’t have the phones and cards. That’s what they
don’t have. You can’t just produce a million phones or cards a day.”
No one in the room said a word, but many wondered what he was
talking about.

“Governments are terrible at execution,” Musk continued. “The
government is the DMV. That’s who we are fighting here.”
Musk said it with such confidence that no one dared challenge him. But
for those who had worked in tech as Russia meddled in the 2016 U.S.

election, his answer was nonsense. The Twitter Blue program would not
stop state-sponsored propagandists from making nonverified accounts,
which required no credit card or phone number. And who was to say that a
motivated state actor couldn’t procure a U.S.-based phone number and
credit card to buy one of Musk’s verified badges? In 2016, Russia’s Internet
Research Agency used credit cards to buy $200,000 of advertising on
Facebook to sow social unrest in the U.S.

Musk underscored his belief later in the meeting. He didn’t hold the
Kremlin’s hacking capabilities in high regard because they hadn’t disrupted
Starlink, the SpaceX-developed satellite internet service that was used by
the Ukrainian army in its war against Russia. “These could be famous last
words, but thus far the Russian attempts to hack Starlink have been not very
good,” he said, casually revealing war secrets to a bunch of civilians.

When Musk left the room a few minutes later to talk with his assistant,
those who had remained quiet during his bizarre explanation sprang into
life. Here they were, half a day into rolling out Twitter Blue, yet they were
still addressing fundamental concerns around real-world harm. There were
fears about what would happen in foreign countries, when government
entities or officials lost their verification. “All these other people around the
world rely on a label of some kind, a badge of some kind, to tell them this is
the real account to listen to,” said Crawford. “And they will be hijacked.”
Christian Dowell, a lawyer who oversaw the launch, chimed in,
suggesting that verified accounts could direct SWAT teams to people’s
homes. “Somebody could die actually,” he said.

>>> WHEN MUSK REENTERED THE ROOM, the chatter died. People clacked
away on their laptops monitoring the launch, while Musk stared at his
phone. No one had expected Musk to be with them for so long, yet he
continued to sit at the table, seemingly with no other obligations or places
to be. He picked through the snacks, at one point eating half of a doughnut
in a single bite, and at times blurting out whatever crossed his mind.

“If I’m looking at my Twitter feed right now, the worst shit I’m seeing
is from legacy verified,” he said, looking for a response from the room.

Grant sensed an opportunity. “What do you mean by worst?” he asked.

“Like…the most annoying replies. Like replies I don’t want to see,”
Musk replied, stumbling for a rationale. “Not from the new ones, but from
the legacy douchebags.”
Musk had been hoping to kneecap the reporters, celebrities, and news
outlets that he found useless and annoying. “I fucking hate legacy verified,”
Musk blurted out. Grant just stared at him.

Yoshimasa Niwa, a twelve-year Twitter veteran and a master of its
Apple app, tried to get Musk to understand the harm he could cause by
selling check marks. Niwa was from Japan, and he had seen a random
Twitter account use a new artificial intelligence program to create a fake
photo of a flooded area in his home country during a recent storm.

“They said, ‘Oh my god, escape from here!’ ” Niwa explained to Musk,
highlighting it as a life-or-death situation. “And I remember believing that
was actually true.” Imagine if they now had a verified badge, he said.

“Safe to say we’d suspend that account,” Musk replied. “And we’ll keep
their eight bucks. It may not seem like much but people really don’t like
losing their eight dollars. So we’ll see what happens here.”
Niwa stared at him, nodding, though visibly frustrated. By the time
Twitter would move to suspend such an account, it would have already
caused harm.

“We have to be adventurous, so we’re going to be adventurous,” Musk
continued.

A few minutes later, he fashioned his hands into a pair of finger guns.

“We’re going to be shooting from the hip in real time,” he said.

A software engineer calling in from Toronto posed a question to Musk
about the official badges. “What would you consider a serious incident that
would require us to put back such a label or some other differentiation
between accounts?” he asked.

Musk intertwined his fingers and paused for a few seconds. He
stammered. “If there’s like death or serious injury or something like that,
um, you know, uh,” Musk said, fidgeting. “Something beyond annoyance or
mild confusion—that would be enough. Let’s just see what happens after
we resist the initial wave of attempted fraud. There’s going to be this initial
World War Z attack where forces are going to test us in this way. We don’t
want to react to that. We first want to stop the zombie wave. Or can we stop
the zombie wave? I think we will be successful and then see where it settles
out. I think we need to hold steady for a while.”
It was an incomprehensible answer, but the employees had given up on
reasoning with Musk. There was no way to inform content moderators that
they should act only when they saw tweets “beyond annoyance or mild
confusion” or wait for someone to be grievously harmed or killed.

>>> MUSK’S RUSH TO get the product out led him to decide that there would
be no review process for accounts signing up for the new Twitter Blue. If a
user provided credit card information, that was enough to receive a check
mark and all the other added features.

And that was exactly what happened. One user pretended to be the
gaming company Nintendo, bought a check mark, and then shared an image
of Mario, the lovable plumber from its Super Mario games, giving the
middle finger. Another Blue Verified account mimicked the account for
American Girl, the famous toy brand, and tweeted that one of its dolls,
Felicity, “owned slaves.” There were hoax Tesla announcements, a fake O.

J. Simpson admitting to murder, and a post from an impostor Senator Ted
Cruz, which declared his love for eating babies. The fake verified accounts
caused so much confusion that the stepmom of Brooklyn Nets point guard
Kyrie Irving, who was also his agent, called Twitter’s Partnerships Team to
get the company to take down a tweet from an account pretending to be an
ESPN reporter. The post claimed the basketball superstar had been released
from his team.

In the Blue war room, Musk found some of the fake verified accounts to
be hilarious. He threw back his head and howled when he saw the Mario
tweet, which stayed up for more than two hours before the account was
suspended for impersonation.

Grant showed Musk a tweet that had started to go viral. “It took me less
than 25 minutes to set up a fake anonymous Apple ID using a VPN and
disposable email, attach a masked debit card to it (with the address being
Twitter’s HQ), and get a verified account for a prominent figure,” wrote
@JackMLawrence, a PhD student. “Just think what a nation-state or bad
actor could do…”
Musk shrugged, apparently seeing no issue. “Twenty-five minutes is a
long time,” he said. “Thanks for the eight bucks dude.”
The Blue team employees were perplexed. Musk had been harping on a
massive impersonation attack that aimed to embarrass him. How could their
leader think it was a laughing matter? The fake posts, no matter how funny,
were causing reputational damage not only to the people and organizations
being impersonated, but to Twitter itself. And yet, Musk enjoyed the
madness.

Toward the end of the day, Calacanis joined Musk and the Blue team to
monitor the final hours of the launch. The two men compared the new
revamped verification system to the opening up of a country club or the
cutting down of VIP ropes at a nightlife hot spot, leading them to name-
drop all the exclusive places they had been together. To a group of halfinterested engineers, Calacanis name-dropped the Burning Man camp of
former Google chief executive Eric Schmidt while Musk casually said they
had recently been to actress Bella Thorne’s home.

The billionaire left Caracara on Wednesday with a sense of measured
success. He had manned the launch like a proud general directing his troops
to a beachhead, garnering more than 78,000 signups to the relaunched Blue
by that evening. While there were some blips, the casualties were accepted
as the cost of the mission and laughed off by Twitter’s owner. He walked
out of the conference room just before 6:00 p.m. in a light mood, chatting
with Crawford about why she thought there were so few employees in the
office.

“It’s just, for me, bizarre to see an empty office in the middle of the
day,” he said to his product manager.

>>> BY THAT NIGHT, however, something changed. The cheer of the day had
evaporated. Musk had gotten wind that some of the remaining Twitter execs
had discussed the possibility of leaving en masse to protest his leadership.

There was also the matter of the audit that was due to the Federal Trade
Commission by morning. Twitter’s report was in shambles—the company
could no longer account for which employees were looking after its privacy
practices, and the entire setup would need to be overhauled.

In Slack, one employee had warned that workers would be required to
“self-certify” that their projects complied with FTC rules, essentially taking
on the legal liability that had belonged to their executives. “Elon has shown
that he cares only about recouping the losses he’s incurring as a result of
failing to get out of his binding obligation to buy Twitter,” the employee
wrote.

Musk had also started to fixate on the costs of running Twitter and
worried about what he believed would be a widespread economic downturn
in the next twelve months. So he decided to do something he hadn’t yet
done since taking the reins at Twitter: email all his employees. “There is no
way to sugar coat this message,” he wrote, warning them of the “difficult
times ahead.”
“The road ahead is arduous and will require intense work to succeed,”
Musk continued. He warned of a “dire economic picture.” Employees, who
had been allowed to work from home for years, would be required to come
into the office at least forty hours a week. It was a radical change. Dorsey
had promised they would never have to come back to an office, and some
workers had taken the opportunity to move around the world.

Musk was known for late-night email blasts at Tesla and SpaceX—and
had released a similar panic among employees at his automobile
manufacturer earlier that June—but for Twitter employees, it was especially
jarring. This was the first time they were hearing from their new owner.

Musk sent another message later that night. “Over the next few days,
the absolute top priority is finding and suspending any verified
bots/trolls/spam,” he wrote. It wasn’t a laughing matter anymore.

>>> BY THURSDAY MORNING, Kissner, Kieran, and Fogarty had all resigned.

It was a sign that the company’s top remaining leadership had little faith in
Musk, and it was of particular concern given the trio’s responsibilities.

Their resignations indicated that Twitter was in deep trouble with the FTC
and that the executives had chosen to depart rather than place themselves in
the crossfire.

Their resignations came before Kieran had a chance to meet with
McSweeney and convey his worries, but she was horrified when she
learned of the executives’ departures. Soon, their responsibilities would
become hers.

Spiro stepped in to do damage control. The FTC had already come
calling about the executive resignations and demanded that the company
explain how it would keep up with its privacy obligations. In an email to
Musk on Thursday, Spiro said that employees were wrong to believe they
could face criminal liability if Twitter fell out of compliance with its FTC
consent decree. “That is simply not how this works. It is the company’s
obligation. It is the company’s burden. It is the company’s liability,” he
wrote, copying the entire workforce on the message.

By the time he arrived at the office on Thursday, Musk was in a
brooding mood. His email did not get the resounding response he was
hoping for, and he stomped around the office, wondering aloud why there
were few butts in seats. The impersonation attempts had also continued
through the night and the global press made a point to report on every one.

Musk was acutely aware of the problem, and though he thought they were
funny, the growing pressure over the fake accounts began to weigh on him.

In a telltale sign of his annoyance, he coped by posting.

“I love when people complain about Twitter…on Twitter,” he tweeted
with two crying laughing emojis.

A little after midday, Musk sent another jolt through the workforce.

With only twenty minutes’ notice, he called for a meeting with employees,
sending people scrambling to see if they could dial in and watch Musk’s
first remarks to Twitter as its owner. In the hour-long discussion, the
billionaire painted a bleak picture for the company’s future, and himself as
the savior seeking to rescue it.

“We just definitely need to bring in more cash than we spend,” he said.

“If we don’t do that and there’s a massive negative cash flow, then
bankruptcy is not out of the question.”
He told employees to prepare for “a year or two of serious recession,”
mentioning “recession” no less than twelve times, and said he believed the
company continued to be “overstaffed.”
“You may have read that I sold a bunch of Tesla stock. The reason I did
that was to save Twitter. Not because I lack faith in Tesla. I think Tesla
stock is going to be worth an immense amount in the future. I sold the stock
for Twitter. To keep Twitter alive.”
Employees came away from the meeting in a frazzled state. They had
clenched their bodies at the idea of being “overstaffed,” and saw it as a sure
sign that there’d be further layoffs. Musk’s self-aggrandizement grated. He
had loaded the company with debt. This was his doing.

>>> AS MUSK LECTURED his employees, the Blue impersonation onslaught
continued. That morning, a Blue Verified account pretending to be Eli Lilly,
the multinational drugmaker, tweeted, “We are excited to announce insulin
is free now.” The post, which garnered more than 3,000 retweets and was
up for at least six hours, led the actual company to put out an announcement
that the message was wrong and that it was taking steps to deal with fakes.

Eli Lilly’s stock dropped more than 5 percent that day.

Business leaders from major advertisers started to ring Twitter’s sales
team, telling them that they would pull their advertising unless the company
did something about the fakes. In one call, executives from Nike threatened
they would never advertise on the platform again if something wasn’t done
about Blue.

Then came the election meddling. While Musk had delayed the launch
of Blue until after Election Day, some races, including the hotly contested
race for Arizona’s governorship, were still being tallied. The race featured
Democrat Katie Hobbs, Arizona’s secretary of state, against Kari Lake, a
Trump-backed, conspiratorially minded Republican who had vocally
supported Musk in his Twitter takeover and offered to roll out the red carpet
if Musk moved the company to the state. With Lake a half percent behind in
the vote count, a verified account purporting to be the Republican candidate
popped up and posted: “It is with heavy heart that I must concede to my
opponent, @katiehobbs.” It was a fake, but it still racked up thousands of
engagements—proof that Musk’s follies could hurt anyone, even his
political allies.

For all his previous bluster about naming and shaming advertisers who
pulled off Twitter, the corporate threats stirred Musk’s fear. Losing
hundreds of millions of dollars in revenue in a snap would significantly
impair his business, potentially making it tougher to raise more equity
funding in the company, raise or sell off existing debt, or even just stay
solvent. He sulked before turning to an engineer.

“Turn it off,” he said, just after 5:00 p.m. in San Francisco. “Turn it
off!”
Those who had already left for the day or signed off were summoned
back to the San Francisco office or to their remote workstations. Having
pushed hard to launch the damn thing twenty-four hours earlier, they were
being told to reverse in an instant and reel it all back in. More chaos. Those
who saw Musk could sense his tension and instability, clearly bothered by
the calls he had had with the other business leaders. One person remarked:
“That was the first time it seemed like he had been manhandled by someone
else.”
Some of the Twitter engineers on Blue joked that they knew it would
come to this. It was like someone at a restaurant ordering a well-done steak,
despite the loud protestations of the waiter, and then sending it back once
the kitchen had prepared and delivered the meal to specification.

The engineers scrambled to figure out how to turn off Blue, and once
again turn on the “Official” labels for brands and sponsors. That way, these
advertisers would have a way of dealing with any impersonation attempt by
any account that had already signed up for Blue.

Over the coming weeks, Musk’s mood swings and periods of depression
would become routine. The ad threats sent Musk on a tailspin and exposed
something particularly human about him—he could be terrified into
submission.

>>> OVER THE NEXT FEW DAYS, some people on the finance team also started
to receive some strange requests for ad campaign approvals. They were lastminute asks, and while it wasn’t atypical for a Twitter advertiser to force
through a contract to start a big ad campaign the next day, this client was
unusual: SpaceX.

“Team, I’m setting up a last-minute campaign for SpaceX (for Elon),”
wrote one sales employee, in a message to the finance team, and linking to
a series of contracts. The documents showed that SpaceX’s ads would take
over Twitter’s Explore page with a promotional package that typically cost
clients hundreds of thousands of dollars a day. “This is a very hot potato
coming from Elon,” the sales staffer wrote in another message.

Members of Twitter’s finance team raised their eyebrows. They knew
Twitter was losing advertising dollars hand over fist as Musk hopped from
one controversy to the next. Suddenly, Twitter’s new owner was pushing
advertising dollars from one of his companies to another in what appeared
to be an attempt to prop up his new toy.

>>> THE DEPARTURES OF Kissner, Kieran, and Fogarty set off a sense of
hysteria among Twitter’s employees and management, who wondered if
they, too, should pull the rip cord. Pacini and Roth handed in their
resignations. Robin Wheeler, a vice president who was one of the highest
remaining sales people, also quit. She had been blindsided by the
departures, particularly of Kieran, who had been in meetings with her that
morning and gave no indication that he planned to leave.

Roth, comfortable that he had ferried the platform through the election,
was ready to give up. While he’d been able to cajole Musk away from his
plan to reinstate the Babylon Bee, he felt that Musk needed constant
minding to keep him on a good path. As soon as one of Musk’s confidants
got his ear, the billionaire was off on a new, crazy venture, eagerly undoing
whatever measured plan Roth had coaxed him to accept.

The messes with the FTC audit and Blue also weighed heavily on the
safety expert. Musk hadn’t been willing to listen to anyone’s advice about
the obvious pitfalls with Blue, and it seemed that it was only a matter of
time before Roth would be asked to break the law on Musk’s behalf.

At 12:29 p.m., Roth sent his resignation email to human resources. Then
he got in his car and drove back to his home in the East Bay. Over the next
few hours, he received text messages from Musk, Spiro, Krishnan, and a
number of others in Musk’s inner circle begging him to reconsider.

Musk called Roth directly, and the two debated Roth’s decision for half
an hour. But Roth stayed firm. He explained his reasons for leaving, but
tried to be kind—he was worried about what Musk might do to him if he
lost his temper. “I love Twitter as much as you do,” Roth said. Musk agreed
to let him go, later replacing him with Ella Irwin, a trust and safety exec
who had initially resigned during the early days of the takeover.

Unlike the other executives, however, Wheeler was swayable. She took
a call with Birchall, who asked her to put some faith in Musk, and offered
her the chance to lead sales at the company. Within hours, she did a 180,
and was soon organizing a call for Musk’s goons so they could convince
other waffling sales execs to stay.

On one call, to which Musk did not dial in, one Twitter sales executive
had become fed up with the empty promises. Between the layoff and
resignations, some brand safety and integrity teams had been decimated or
eliminated. “Do you guys have a plan? Are you guys going to replace these
people?” she asked.

Spiro was baffled. Of course he had a plan. SpaceX and Tesla solved
much harder problems, so why couldn’t Musk’s team find a way to
automate content moderation, he said to the group. Gracias chimed in to ask
folks to cut Musk some slack. “Can somebody be a little sympathetic for
Elon right now?” he said, playing the victim card for the world’s richest
man. “He’s doing everything to fix this company but people aren’t trusting
him.”
Musk would try to convince this particular sales exec in a direct call
later, as would Birchall, separately from his boss. Musk’s fixer said that he
realized that Musk’s team had come in like wrecking balls and tried to
explain that Musk’s lack of understanding and charm came from the fact
that he was “on the spectrum.” (The previous May, Musk hosted an episode
of Saturday Night Live where he spoke about having Asperger’s syndrome.)
“He doesn’t understand how his actions can be read,” Birchall said.

Perhaps the exec could write up some feedback and email it to Musk
directly? “His love language is direct feedback,” Birchall said.

Birchall also let the executive in on a secret: the goons had been toying
with the idea of a loyalty pledge or an ultimatum for workers to stay at the
company. The sales leader was stunned. “This was one of the worst things
you can do,” she said, noting there were still a good number of people who
were undecided on whether they should stay at the company and who were
waiting for reasons to believe. But if you give them an ultimatum before
you’ve shown them anything, they’re just going to jump, she predicted.

The exec came away from the interactions feeling like she was being
pitched on cult membership more than a job. Before officially quitting, she
wrote a note with “direct feedback” for Musk and sent it the following
night. She never got a response.

Spiro called McSweeney that night. Over the video conference, he told
her that she would take on some of the work that Kieran and Kissner had
abandoned, as well as Roth’s role. “I trust your judgment,” he told
McSweeney. “I want you to take on a bigger role.”
While Musk’s lawyer spun it as a promotion, McSweeney knew better.

Roth had overseen a large team and had crucial responsibilities, including
making tough content moderation calls during election cycles. She had too
much on her plate already, and had regularly been working twelve hours at
a time since Musk took over. There was no way she could do Roth’s job,
too. And she had no interest in becoming the person to take the legal fall if
things went sour with the FTC, as Kieran had been. Still, she told Spiro that
she would help as much as she could.

T
38 > Fired for Shitposting
he sudden departures of the executives reinforced what Musk believed
when he took over Twitter: none of the old guard could be trusted.

He sicced his lawyers on Twitter’s former leadership, hoping to uncover
justifications to deny them their golden parachutes or get them into trouble.

In the days following the deal, Spiro and his law firm, Quinn Emanuel, sent
letters to some of the remaining executives, asking them to preserve
documents and prepare for interviews with lawyers for the purposes of an
internal investigation.

The notes were ominous, and while they didn’t accuse those receiving
them of any wrongdoing, they seemed designed to flip the recipients into
informants. “We believe you may have relevant information given your role
in working with the subjects of the investigation,” one of the letters read.

The inquiry could include Twitter’s past financial reporting, the company’s
efforts to calculate and eliminate fake accounts, security issues raised by
Zatko, the allocation of corporate resources, and conduct related to the
recent merger. “It was a fishing expedition,” one recipient said.

Those who saw the letters or participated in the interviews with Quinn
Emanuel staffers disagreed about what Musk wanted. Some believed the
billionaire was seeking revenge on anyone involved in Twitter’s litigation
against him and was using this investigation to suss out who he should
blame. Others thought he was looking for ways to relitigate the deal and
potentially recoup some of the sale price by proving that previous
management had defrauded him. Most of the executives, though, saw the
investigation as Musk’s attempt to find ways to justify his “for cause”
terminations of Agrawal, Segal, Gadde, and others and deny them millions
of dollars in payouts.

His goons dug for dirt everywhere. They were especially interested in
the company’s spending before Musk, leading Davis and others to train
their focus on Segal. The chief financial officer had approved large budgets
for lavish corporate perks, including the suite for Warriors games at San
Francisco’s Chase Center. When Musk found out, he went ballistic,
lampooning Segal for spending so much on the box. His lackeys tasked
Segal’s former assistant with a full accounting of her boss’s budgets.

Musk’s lawyers weren’t particularly thorough, however. Nick Caldwell,
the former engineering leader who resigned while tending to his wife’s
funeral arrangement, later received an email noting that he had actually
been fired for, among other reasons, approving the budgets for Twitter’s
lavish OneTeam celebration in January 2020. There was only one problem.

He had joined the company six months after that event.

>>> THE FAILURE OF Blue and the mass resignations made Musk doubt his
purchase. The following day, November 11, he had his fateful encounter
with the senior data scientist, who called him out for his Paul Pelosi tweet.

He flew home that weekend to Austin to brood.

Musk’s growing paranoia was palpable over that weekend. Led by
Christopher Stanley, an information security engineer who had come from
SpaceX, workers examined a spreadsheet that had been created soon after
the deal and listed the names of high-skilled or long-tenured employees to
determine which workers to retain during layoffs.

Stanley, however, repurposed the list and used it to ascertain which
employees had the know-how to take down Twitter’s site or apps. From the
beginning, Musk had been fearful that a rogue employee or two could
sabotage the site, embarrassing him.

Several Twitter employees pulled Stanley aside in an attempt to reason
with him about the strange internal investigation that focused on top
company talent. If Musk was so worried about saboteurs, giving employees
an easy way to leave the company might help, they suggested. Unhappy
workers who had escaped the layoffs could either leave without severance
or stay and suffer—giving them a way out could reduce Musk’s risk. Or
Musk could try winning his new workers over instead of terrifying them,
they suggested. Stanley seemed sympathetic, but didn’t agree to pass their
advice on to his boss.

While some tweeps were miserable, others were happy to crack the
whip on Musk’s behalf. One, a senior director of software engineering
named Luke Simon, had been fairly vocal about his unhappiness with Musk
before the takeover. Once the deal was signed, however, he found a home—
and an opportunity—in the restructuring, flashing a thumbs-up in a selfie
with Musk on the day the billionaire arrived at the office. He made layoff
lists and worked overtime to impress Musk and his associates. In a Slack
group with other managers, he wrote on the morning of Saturday,
November 12, that he was concerned about “silent” quitters who had not
been eliminated in the Snap but were still collecting paychecks.

Managers like Simon were in the process of bringing back workers they
had just laid off a week ago, as they realized there were essential jobs that
needed to be done and no one around to do them. Simon had four people on
his list to bring back so they could help with brand safety initiatives for
flighty advertisers, but he wasn’t happy about it.

“The engineers I am bringing back are weak, lazy, unmotivated, and
they may even be against an Elon Twitter,” Simon wrote. “They were cut
for a reason.

“So we need to think of these people as just needing to be around until
the knowledge transition is completed,” Simon continued.

Less than a minute after Simon’s post, a furious employee took a
screenshot of the Slack message and shared it to #social-watercooler.

“@lsimon care to share your thoughts with colleagues?” wrote an
engineer who shared the screenshot, adding Simon to the Slack channel.

The message started a pile-on against Simon, who never spoke up and
eventually locked his Twitter account as the image of his post made its way
outside Twitter’s walls.

Musk wasn’t worried about the backlash against Simon. But he was
concerned about the leak of the messages. It only hardened his belief that
the tweeps were out to get him. On Sunday night, he instituted a code
freeze, convinced that there were shadowy figures within the company that
would intentionally break the site. The freeze, which required that Musk
himself sign off on even the most basic changes to the site or its apps,
prevented anything from being done at the company.

>>> THE DAY AFTER his confrontation with the data scientist, Musk tweeted
that Twitter had been running slow in several countries. He suggested the
problem was caused by the company’s previous management, blaming them
for building the Twitter app in a sloppy fashion that caused it to lag.

“Btw, I’d like to apologize for Twitter being super slow in many
countries. App is doing >1000 poorly batched RPCs just to render a home
timeline!” Musk wrote on Saturday. The tweet was wonky enough to soar
over the average user’s head, but to Twitter’s engineers, it was blatantly
false. In #social-watercooler, they called out Musk’s mistake, showed he
had conflated various technical terms, and poked fun at his lack of expertise
with laughing emojis.

As engineers continued to mock Musk on Slack, one of them decided to
publicly rebuke him. “I have spent ~6yrs working on Twitter for Android
and can say this is wrong,” tweeted Eric Frohnhoefer, quoting Musk’s
original message, on Sunday afternoon.

Frohnhoefer, a staff software engineer who lived in San Diego, had
believed in Twitter’s core tenet to “communicate fearlessly to build trust,”
and felt his response was in the spirit of that ideology. After tweeting,
Frohnhoefer left home to go to Starbucks, thinking nothing more about it.

But during his coffee run, a colleague messaged him to say he had
received a response. Actually, there were several.

At first, it seemed like Musk was open to the feedback—he tweeted
back to Frohnhoefer asking the engineer to correct him. But Musk had
taken the public criticism as an insult, and he launched into a tirade.

“Twitter is super slow on Android. What have you done to fix that?” he
wrote. The engineer responded, continuing the tit-for-tat for another few
rounds into Monday.

That morning, Musk ended it. “He’s fired,” he tweeted, before deleting
the message. Later that day, Frohnhoefer shared that he had been locked out
of his computer and terminated. Musk would later tell employees that he
would have accepted it if Frohnhoefer had pointed out his errors in private,
but tweeting publicly to embarrass him had gone too far.

“Criticize privately, but praise publicly,” he said to some of his staff,
clearly without any self-awareness that his tweets about Twitter’s speed
were indictments of the people who worked there. In one meeting after, an
engineering executive asked employees to stop tweeting at Twitter’s new
owner.

Musk’s firing spree didn’t stop with Frohnhoefer. Others were
terminated that day, including Sasha Solomon, a staff software engineer
based in Portland. On Twitter, she was outspoken, posting about her daily
life, job openings, and her French bulldog, Bosworth. Solomon lived her
life on the social network, and when Musk started his acquisition overtures,
she tweeted about that, too. In April, when Musk initially registered his
interest, she tweeted “he better not be buying my favorite coffee shop too.”
After the Snap, she began to lay more heavily into Twitter’s new owner.

As Musk battled online with Frohnhoefer, she chimed in and responded
to one of his tweets. “You did not just layoff almost all of infra and then
make some sassy remark about how we do batching…like did you bother to
even learn how graphql works,” Solomon tweeted, referencing the
programming language she had specialized in. Like Frohnhoefer’s posts,
her tweet circulated widely. And like Frohnhoefer, she was locked out of
her work computer and fired. “Lol just got fired for shitposting,” she wrote
in one final flourish. “I said it before and I’ll say it again. Kiss my ass
elon.”
That post garnered more than 3,500 retweets and 28,000 likes, and
eventually floated across Musk’s feed, sending him on the warpath. When
his cousin James attempted to approach him about another engineering
matter that afternoon, Musk gave him a more pressing task: “Find anyone
talking to me like this and fire them.” The younger Musk could barely get a
word in before leaving with his new task.

A tall man with floppy brown hair, James carried himself with a sense
of boyish urgency. He kept quiet in meetings, dodging the spotlight that
shone brightly on his cousin, and worked hard to clear a path for Musk’s
wishes to be done. If Musk gave him a task, James would bound off to do it,
excitedly asking Twitter employees for help to make sure his older cousin
got what he wanted.

In order to find these dissenters, James and his associates turned Slack
into a surveillance tool. They got their Twitter counterparts to grant them
administrative powers on Slack and searched for keywords like Elon and
Musk to see what the employees had written about their new boss. Spiro
also asked one executive if Twitter’s security team had the ability to track
what people said on Blind, the anonymous workplace message board, and
perhaps find ways to unmask any anonymous dissenters or rabble-rousers.

In some instances, Musk’s lieutenants appeared to have an unusual
amount of insight into what employees had told each other during hushed
conversations or on Twitter accounts that were set to private, meaning that
no one except their followers should have been able to see their posts. HR
executives imported from SpaceX stepped in to handle some firings, fueling
the paranoia among employees that Musk’s people were snooping on them.

These episodes made employees fearful about how far Musk’s
surveillance could reach. Some workers worried his loyalists would access
their direct messages on Twitter to look for dirt. Typically this privilege was
reserved for rare cases where Twitter executives aided criminal
investigations, and it was avoided if other methods could be used to obtain
the necessary information. Under Musk, however, some of the goons gained
access to “God Mode,” enabling them to see the public and private Twitter
activity and data of any user.

Employees watched aghast as Frohnhoefer and Solomon were
terminated. Some abstained from posting anything on Slack, suspicious that
their online activity would now be more closely monitored. Still, there were
others who were emboldened by the capricious cuts and the treatment of
their colleagues. In typical tweep fashion, a handful dealt with their sadness
by shitposting.

“The beatings will continue until morale improves,” wrote one engineer
who worked on Twitter’s search feature.

“So is this like a Candyman situation?” another employee joked,
referencing the 1992 slasher film. “Mention Elon three times and we get
deactivated?” He was unaware that Musk’s cousin and his lackeys were
doing exactly that and tracking mentions of the billionaire’s name.

By the end of Tuesday, about thirty employees had been fired for
dissent. Some had tweeted openly about their distaste for Musk over the
months. Others had talked about Twitter’s new owner to their colleagues on
Slack. A handful had no idea why they were let go. One, a twelve-year
company veteran who had been one of Twitter’s top engineers, had simply
written on the work messaging platform that it was better to be laid off than
to quit because a layoff would come with severance. “Don’t resign, be
fired,” wrote Yao Yue. “Seriously.”
All those who had been classified as dissenters got the same email,
notifying them of “violating company policy” without specifying what that
policy was.

Among those hit was Kiko Smith, an architect who oversaw the designs
of Twitter’s data centers. After more than two decades in corporate
America, she had seen it all. She had worked for Enron Energy Services, an
arm of the disgraced power giant that went belly-up in 2001. Smith was a
tough woman and was known for championing female engineers after she
herself had succeeded in male-dominated spaces her whole career. When
the acquisition happened, she was optimistic that it could spur the changes
she knew were needed to improve the company’s infrastructure, and she
kept her head down, with no reason to engage in the Slack banter that
captured many of her younger colleagues. Even so, she was fired with no
explanation.

A few days later, James Musk called up Smith. Several colleagues had
gone to bat for her, calling her skills crucial to the company. He admitted he
had no idea why she was terminated. “We are so sorry,” he said. “We don’t
know why you were on that list and we would greatly appreciate it if you
came back.”
Smith couldn’t help but laugh at the absurdity. Still, she didn’t hesitate.

Her husband had cancer and they needed the Twitter-provided health
insurance. Chaos or calm, it wasn’t really a choice for her. She accepted.

“I would like to apologize for firing these geniuses,” Elon Musk
tweeted a few days after the dismissals. “Their immense talent will no
doubt be of great use elsewhere.”
>>> CONTEMPT FOR MUSK’S “with me or against me” approach crystallized.

In the New York office, someone put an image of Frohnhoefer’s Twitter
argument with Musk on a television near one of the micro kitchens. Those
who saw it were unsure if it was a celebration of the engineer’s boldness or
a warning sign, like a decapitated head on a pike outside a medieval village.

In San Francisco, the events of the early week had taken Musk’s distrust
of Twitter’s employees to new heights. In meetings that week with some of
the borrowed hands from Tesla and SpaceX, he said he wanted 80 percent
of the remaining people out of the company by the end of the week. Musk
and some of his coterie kept comparing the company to Telegram, a
messaging service with 800 million active users that had only thirty core
employees. They wondered why Twitter couldn’t be as streamlined as that.

Those around Musk like Sheen Austin, the Tesla infrastructure engineer
who was now effectively running Twitter’s infrastructure, and Musk’s
cousins Andrew and James, thought the 80 percent expectation was nuts.

They had already worked to cut and cut and cut. While they, too, thought
Twitter was plagued by nonbelievers hanging around taking a paycheck,
they also knew their lives would become exponentially harder if Musk got
his way. And facing a holiday period, which was crucial for advertisers, and
the looming World Cup, which was always a Twitter traffic bonanza, they
predicted it could get very painful.

So they presented a new idea to Musk, one that had been floated by
Twitter’s workers in the past. Perhaps, Musk could provide an incentive to
leave. Many companies offered buyouts when trying to reduce head count,
with guarantees of health insurance and paychecks for a few months, giving
those on the fence about working a reason to raise their hands to leave. That
way, Musk’s advisers said, Twitter could shed the deadweight and ensure
that people who were at Twitter actually wanted to be there. They proposed
offering a severance payment equivalent to three months of salary.

Twitter’s owner had initially opposed offering buyouts, feeling that they
were rewarding the people who hated him, but he eventually came around.

This was the only way of ensuring that whoever remained was loyal. As
some of the hired hands left the office that Tuesday night, they felt they had
convinced him to do the right thing for the company.

That night, Musk boarded a private plane bound for Delaware, where he
was set to testify the next day in a Tesla shareholder lawsuit. Before the
plane touched down, he sent an email at 3:00 a.m. Eastern. Titled “A Fork
in the Road,” the email was sent to all employees and included a link to a
Google form where they would complete a survey.

Going forward, to build a breakthrough Twitter 2.0 and succeed in an
increasingly competitive world, we will need to be extremely hardcore. This will
mean working long hours at high intensity. Only exceptional performance will
constitute a passing grade.

Twitter will also be much more engineering-driven. Design and product
management will still be very important and report to me, but those writing
great code will constitute the majority of our team and have the greatest sway.

At its heart, Twitter is a software and servers company, so I think this makes
sense.

If you are sure that you want to be part of the new Twitter, please click yes on
the link below:
formes.gle
Anyone who has not done so by 5pm ET tomorrow (Thursday) will receive
three months of severance.

Whatever decision you make, thank you for your efforts to make Twitter
successful.

Elon
In his message, Musk had ignored an important piece of his loyalists’
recommendations. Instead of asking those who wanted to leave to raise
their hands, he did the opposite, making people actively commit to wanting
to work for him. Musk wanted a pledge of loyalty.

>>> WORKERS AWOKE THE next morning in shock. If Musk was looking for
some kind of awakening or sign of intent from Twitter’s employees, the
move was poorly executed. Some workers, who were on leave or vacation,
didn’t see the email before Musk’s twenty-four-hour deadline passed.

Others never clicked the link, believing it may have been a scam. “In
response to Elon’s email last night, we are working to get out an FAQ for
you today,” read one Wednesday morning Slack message from one of the
remaining human resources employees. “In the meantime we want to
confirm that the link provided is not a phishing attempt.”
The resulting FAQ document was somehow less self-aware than Musk’s
original email. It said workers would be expected to “maximize working
from an office” and be prepared to commit to working early mornings, late
nights, and weekends. If Musk preferred the stick over the carrot, this was
his way of swinging a Louisville Slugger covered in rusty nails.

By Thursday morning, Musk was not getting the desired response. By
10:00 a.m. in San Francisco, some undecided employees received
invitations to meetings hosted by some combination of Musk, his advisers,
and executives from Tesla or SpaceX. The meetings were a last-minute
sales pitch intended to convince employees to stay.

In one gathering with the corporate finance team led by Birchall and
Bret Johnsen, SpaceX’s longtime chief financial officer, employees were
told they would have a massive impact on society. “We are finally going to
stand up for democracy and free speech in the United States,” said Johnsen.

“We are going to save democracy.”
Some of the people on the video call had to quickly switch off their
cameras, blocking Johnsen from seeing them as they burst out laughing. It
was lost on them why Johnsen used the word we. He wasn’t a Twitter
employee and it wasn’t even clear if he used the service. When someone
asked if he was planning on being their new CFO, he said he already had a
job.

As the 5:00 p.m. deadline approached for employees to declare
themselves “hardcore,” Musk personally logged in to a meeting with
infrastructure engineers to convince them to stick around. During the call,
he emphasized his past successes.

“I know how to win,” he said, alluding to the financial successes of
Tesla and SpaceX. Under his guidance, the engineers who built those
companies had become very wealthy.

“If you want to win, you should join me,” Musk said.

Musk continued to speak through the 5:00 p.m. deadline. By that point,
some of the engineers had seen and heard enough. They hung up, not even
bothering to stay for the end of his pitch. Twenty-five minutes later, Musk
registered the gravity of his ultimatum the only way he knew how: comedy.

“How do you make a small fortune in social media?” he tweeted. “Start
out with a large one.”
As the newly fired employees began to announce their departures,
Twitter came to life with waves of salute emojis and goodbye posts.

#RIPTwitter began trending around the globe as users chimed in with their
favorite memories, top tweets, and eulogies for the site. If Twitter was
indeed on its deathbed, posters wanted to scratch that itch one last time in a
whirlwind of nostalgia and gallows humor.

It took several days for HR to figure out who had quit. The team
responsible for the task drew up a master spreadsheet that included all
employees and went through it name by name, comparing it to Elon’s new
list of “hardcore” people. They had to reach out to dozens of employees
personally to ask them if they actually meant to resign. Even weeks later,
there were still workers in the spreadsheet who the company was desperate
to keep because of their specific skill sets but whose status was uncertain.

Although Musk was frenzied about catching saboteurs, his “fork in the
road” plan opened a floodgate for departing employees to meddle with the
company. Because it wasn’t obvious who had resigned, Twitter’s security
teams scrambled to figure out whose access to internal systems ought to be
cut. Unlike the mass layoff, in which workers were suddenly locked out of
their laptops, employees who decided to leave ended up keeping access to
internal systems for weeks until Twitter finally determined that they were
gone and revoked their credentials.

When the dust settled, more than 1,100 people, or about 31 percent of
the workforce, left at the fork in the road, opting into the buyout or not
responding to the email at all. It wasn’t the 80 percent that Musk had
pushed for, but he seemed satisfied. While he initially had doubts about
giving people a way to leave Twitter, he was pleased that some workers had
pledged themselves to him. In a rare moment of grace, he allowed the
company’s human resources team to send out separation agreements to the
departing employees and accepted the resignations of a few more workers
who had waffled over the decision, allowing them to collect the promised
severance.

For those who stayed, the loyalty pledge had different meanings. There
were those who truly believed in Musk and his vision or saw a chance to
advance their careers as management cleared out. Others were stuck—they
needed healthcare coverage, a work visa, or hadn’t saved enough to go
without a regular paycheck while they hunted for a new job. Opting into a
hardcore Twitter was their most viable option.

After Thursday’s hardcore deadline, the remaining employees were
notified via email that Twitter’s offices would be closed on Friday. Then
Musk contradicted himself. Shortly after 1:00 a.m. on Friday, he demanded
that “anyone who actually writes software, please report to the 10th floor at
2pm today.” Some employees, thinking Musk was testing their
commitment, booked flights from across the country to San Francisco.

Some of Musk’s lieutenants spent that day calling people they hoped to
coax into returning. James Musk, Stanley, and others divided up lists of
people they wanted to bring back, including some who had been hamhandedly fired in the dissent purge. In one call, Stanley asked a dissenter if
they believed in their boss.

“I want to know: Are you loyal?” he asked them.

>>> MCSWEENEY WAS ONE of the employees who rolled her eyes and
ignored Musk’s message. She was confident that Irish law protected her
from taking a silly loyalty oath, and she would continue working under her
employment contract. But she soon received an email from HR accepting
her resignation and was locked out of her work computer. Her lawyers
quickly wrote to Twitter to say she had not resigned, kicking off legal
negotiations over whether McSweeney still had a job. The process would
drag on for months as McSweeney grappled for reinstatement.

With Roth and much of the executive leadership gone, Musk began
shaping the Twitter platform in his own image that Friday. In October, he
had promised he would form a “content moderation council” to oversee
major content decisions and account reinstatements when he bought the
company. But after he threatened his “thermonuclear name & shame,”
Musk saw no need to please anyone else anymore, as U.S. ad revenue was
trending at 80 percent below internal expectations.

That morning, he reinstated the accounts of the Babylon Bee and Jordan
Peterson, a Canadian conservative media commentator who had been
previously banned for violating Twitter’s rules around misgendering.

“New Twitter policy is freedom of speech, but not freedom of reach,”
Musk tweeted, suggesting that negative and hateful tweets would still be
allowed on the site but not amplified by Twitter’s algorithm. It wasn’t
exactly a new concept to social media, and was one that Twitter had largely
been practicing. But Musk claimed it as his own.

Musk’s purchase of Twitter and decision-making emboldened others to
come back to the platform as well. Among them was Andrew Anglin, the
founder of the neo-Nazi website the Daily Stormer, who was suspended in
2013 after violating the site’s hateful conduct rules. Andrew Tate, the
misogynistic former kickboxer and internet personality who was later
charged with rape and human trafficking, also came back with gusto, as did
Kanye West, who had been suspended in October for tweeting that he
would go “death con 3 on JEWISH PEOPLE.” (Musk would go on to
suspend West for posting a photo of a swastika, though he would welcome
back the rapper again later.)
The unbannings of Friday morning emboldened Musk, who then began
to reconsider the site’s most famous banned user. Musk had faced questions
about the @realDonaldTrump account from the moment he said he would
buy Twitter.

If Trump was going to be a major player in the next presidential race,
Musk told those around him, then he should be on Twitter. Not allowing
him on the platform would amount to election interference and deny the
American people Trump’s messages and campaign statements. And imagine
the kind of drama and engagement that would come with Trump’s
reintroduction, he told some of his lieutenants.

Without consulting anyone on the evening of Friday, November 18, he
ran a poll asking if he should “Reinstate former President Trump.” Within
twenty-four hours, more than 15 million accounts had voted, with 51.8
percent in favor of bringing back the former president. “The people have
spoken,” Musk tweeted.

Unsuspending Trump wasn’t just a matter of clicking a button, however.

As one of the most followed accounts on the service—with some 88 million
followers at the time of his January 2021 ban—@realDonaldTrump was an
anomaly. In reinstating him, Twitter’s systems had to rebuild all those
connections, re-creating the hundreds of millions of follower relationships,
tweets, and engagements that existed prior to the suspension. The site
became noticeably slower as the systems tried to re-architect the
connections and deal with the influx of traffic of people coming to check if
@realDonaldTrump was really back online. At one point, Twitter almost
crashed.

There was another problem: Musk had no idea if Trump wanted to
return. Following his suspensions by Twitter and Facebook in January 2020,
Trump joined Truth Social, the social network he partly owned and staffed
with his former political allies, saying he would not go back to Twitter.

Musk tasked Irwin, the content moderation head who had replaced
Roth, with starting the conversation with Trump’s handlers. A corporate
veteran whose two decades of experience involved managing abuse and risk
at banks, an online dating company, and Amazon, Irwin had no idea where
to begin.

Musk eventually scrounged up a number for Stephen Miller, the former
president’s far-right adviser on immigration policies, who he thought could
provide a bridge between Twitter and Team Trump. Over the next several
weeks, Trump’s staffers indicated their boss may be interested in coming
back, and Irwin and her team explored what that would entail. In
anticipation, Twitter fixed a log-in issue for the former president, switching
out an old White House email address for a personal one for Trump.

For all of Musk’s statements about giving equal treatment to all users,
the kid-glove treatment doled out to Trump was unique. Twitter’s owner
knew of the attention that would come with the reemergence of the former
president on the platform. Still, Trump and his team remained cagey about
working with Musk, and despite regaining access, the former president
would wait several months before making a comeback tweet. Trump had
learned to live without Twitter.

M
39 > Zero-Based Budgeting
usk could see the walls closing in. Advertisers, who in the past
accounted for more than 90 percent of Twitter’s revenue, were just
not coming back, even in the crucial holiday months. They had been
worried about content moderation at the outset of Musk’s takeover, and his
actions only compounded their fears. As it became evident that Twitter
wouldn’t hit its advertising targets, sales associates who typically closed
million-dollar deals with Fortune 500 companies, including Disney and
Netflix, were told to focus downstream and see if smaller businesses like
the New Jersey Dental Association would want to run ads.

By the end of the fourth quarter, Twitter’s revenue for the last three
months of 2022 was a little more than $1 billion, down 35 percent from the
same period the previous year. Even worse, the business showed few signs
of recovering, making it tough for his banks, which had underwritten the
loans for Musk’s Twitter deal, to repackage and sell off that debt. They were
left holding the bag.

That $13 billion in loan obligations became a millstone around the
company’s neck. While Twitter’s owner warned about the possibility of
bankruptcy, the situation was entirely of his own making. The company did
not have that kind of debt on its balance sheets when he bought it, and
Twitter’s interest payments alone would balloon to more than $1.5 billion a
year. The company was incurring more than $3 million a day in interest,
with its first quarterly interest payment fast approaching at the end of
December.

Musk and Birchall would explore the possibility of using his Tesla
shares to back new margin loans to pay off Twitter’s most onerous debt, and
would again think about raising fresh capital from outside investors. But
with Tesla’s share price dropping as investors feared Musk was spending
too much time on Twitter, and the social network’s financials in the dumps,
neither option was great. The only way out in Musk’s mind was through
deep cuts to Twitter’s expenditures. And he had just the man to do it.

>>> ONE MAN WHOSE loyalty to Musk was never questioned was Steve
Davis. With shifty eyes and prominent features, Davis had a nervous energy
about him that always seemed as if it needed to be diverted, if not into
work, then some other activity. After moving to Washington, DC, to open
SpaceX’s office there in 2011, he opened a series of frozen yogurt shops,
and then a bar that was one of the first in the nation’s capital to accept
Bitcoin.

“I like to do something new about every six to nine months and a lot of
them fail,” Davis said in a television interview. Around that time he also
earned a doctorate in economics at George Mason University.

When the boss came calling about needing assistance during the early
days of the Twitter transition, Davis didn’t hesitate. It didn’t matter that he
and his partner, Nicole Hollander, had just had their first child. They would
all come along for the ride. He moved his family—including the newborn—
into a conference room where they all slept to cut down on hotel expenses.

Hollander, a real estate asset manager, took on responsibilities managing
Twitter’s global office portfolio, sometimes sitting in meetings while
nursing her baby or cleaning its onesies in one of the office kitchen sinks.

At one point some office staffers were asked to do the family’s laundry,
washing Davis’s underwear because he had run out while staying in the
office.

Davis was a case study in Muskian loyalty, and he dedicated himself to
addressing Musk’s displeasures, among them Twitter’s rent bills. With fifty
offices in more than thirty cities around the world, the company spent about
$130 million annually for workspace, a figure that drove Musk—and by
extension, Davis—insane. In meetings and emails, Davis would compare
Twitter to SpaceX, which had five times the number of employees but paid
$26 million in rent a year.

To those who dealt with the company’s real estate, it wasn’t apples-toapples. SpaceX had offices in cheaper locations, including its launch areas
in rural Texas, and in industrial areas for manufacturing. Twitter’s offices,
however, were in higher-priced metropolitan areas or university hubs, with
the intent of attracting talent who lived in those places.

Still, Davis fixated on the costs and came up with a novel solution to get
rid of them. “We just won’t pay landlords,” he told Twitter’s executives.

“We just won’t pay rent.”
>>> AMONG THE REMAINING TWEEPS, Davis was seen as the most volatile
member of the transition team. While Spiro and Birchall did Musk’s
bidding, they could at least be talked to and reasoned with. Davis was not
the same; if a directive came from Musk’s mouth, it was seen as the word of
God, with little room for interpretation. When Twitter employees joked
about Musk leading a cult of followers, they saw Davis as the one who’d
mix the Kool-Aid and taste test it for maximum potency. Even Musk’s inner
circle viewed his blind obedience with trepidation.

In mid-November, Davis roamed the office with a wide-eyed look, as if
he hadn’t slept for days. He was still focused on the company’s rent costs
and walked up to two engineers who had been chatting on the open floor,
butting into their conversation. “Do you live in San Francisco?” he asked.

One said no. The other replied affirmatively, offering up his monthly rental
payment.

“Would you live at the office for half of that?” Davis asked in response.

The engineers looked at each other, unsure of what to say, before they
shook their heads. Twitter pays millions of dollars a month to rent office
space, Davis said. “And I want to turn some of that into apartments.”
The two employees thought he was joking but decided to play along
with what they believed was a thought experiment. One lived in New York
and came to San Francisco often for work. “If they let me fly business class,
I would consider staying in a hotel room in the office,” he said.

“Do you know where I’m staying?” Davis asked. He told them he was
living in the office with his partner and their newborn.

Hoping that other workers might be as dedicated as he and his family,
Davis eventually developed his concept for the “Twitter Hotel.” Later that
month, Irwin, the new trust and safety leader who lived in Seattle, ran into
Davis during one of her visits to San Francisco. Like a child excited for
show-and-tell, he took her for a full tour of the Twitter Hotel.

From the tenth floor, they got into an elevator, riding it down to the
eighth floor, where Davis and his partner had already been instructing
staffers to disassemble and move desks. They also locked down the floor
and prevented normal employees from being able to access it with their
badges.

On the tour, Davis revealed a conference room with a blowup mattress
and video game console on the floor, while other meeting spaces had been
outfitted with blackout curtains. He opened another door that offered a more
complete room with an actual bed, though there was no attached bathroom.

Davis would tell those who doubted him that Musk stayed here. They,
too, could have that privilege, sharing a communal bathroom with the
billionaire as they brought glory to Twitter.

To Davis, this was a positive. At the Twitter Hotel, hardcore folks could
forge camaraderie with one another and loyalty to the company. They might
even get to run into their dear leader, if they were so lucky.

Irwin declined the offer to stay on the eighth floor, to which Davis later
added exercise equipment and built out a mini gym for Hollander. Other
visitors weren’t as fortunate. It became company policy for out-of-town
visitors to stay there and some worried they would never be reimbursed by
the company if they stayed in an actual hotel. At best, the Twitter Hotel
would save the company a few million dollars in employee
accommodations a year. This wasn’t as much a cost savings ritual as it was
a test. To work at Twitter, you had to be hardcore.

>>> DAVIS AND MUSK continued to cut. To employees, it seemed they had
moved beyond saving money and were enthralled by seeing how much pain
they could inflict on workers. The same distrust of Twitter’s previous
management persisted as Davis reviewed contracts with property
management companies, internet providers, or food service vendors. He
operated under the belief that the people who had come before him were
morons who had gotten ripped off by everyone.

First to go was the food. Before Musk, Twitter provided full meals to its
employees. In the era of Silicon Valley largesse, the practice was
commonplace among tech firms. Workers would show up for breakfast,
bringing them to the office earlier, and stay at the office for lunch,
preventing them from using valuable time to leave to procure food. Some
companies even offered dinner, getting employees to work later into the
evening as they waited for it to be served.

Musk came from another era. His disdain for free meals was
compounded by the fact that fewer people were coming to the office than he
liked. On November 13, he tweeted, lamenting that “almost no one” was
coming in. “Estimated cost per lunch served in past 12 months is >$400,”
he wrote.

It was an eye-popping number underscoring the supposed incompetence
of previous management, but it was unclear where Musk got it or how it
had been calculated. “This is a lie,” Tracy Hawkins, Twitter’s recently
departed vice president of real estate and work transformation, tweeted in
response. “I ran this program up until a week ago when I resigned because I
didn’t want to work for @elonmusk. For breakfast & lunch we spent
$20-$25 a day per person. This enabled employees to work thru lunchtime
& mtgs. Attendance was anything from 20-50% in the offices.”
Whatever the numbers on the meals, Musk was convinced they had to
go, though the cuts didn’t stop there. Davis and Musk ended relationships
with a cleaning company that provided around three dozen janitors and
other staff to Twitter’s San Francisco, Los Angeles, and New York offices.

In San Francisco, Musk had consolidated all the workers to sit on two
floors, creating a sweatbox that approximated a frat house during Greek
rush week. The halls reeked of under-deodorized armpits and the lingering
odor of pizza boxes and Chinese takeout containers, which piled up, mixing
with junk that fans of Musk sent as gifts to the office. Mike Lindell, the
pillow businessman and noted election denier who had become an adviser
to Trump, was one such fan. He sent copies of his book What Are the Odds?
From Crack Addict to CEO, as well as his signature MyPillows, which
some employees used for naps.

As trash cans went unemptied, carpets unvacuumed, and bathrooms
uncleaned, workers gritted their teeth. The restrooms became a particular
problem, as Musk’s piling of people onto fewer floors caused the toilets to
constantly be in use. In New York, the stench of the bathrooms
overwhelmed some parts of the office, while some employees complained
about cockroaches flitting in and out of drains. In San Francisco, some
employees got used to avoiding the bathrooms by running to nearby coffee
shops or restaurants, while others had to bring their own toilet paper from
home. In one bathroom, someone rigged a metal coat hanger to a stall
handlebar to use as a makeshift spool for a toilet roll, a luxurious gift for
their colleagues.

>>> MUSK MADE HIS imprint on the offices in other ways as well. For Musk
and his goons, there was a reward to the Twitter takeover that went beyond
any type of potential financial return. They were the conquering Romans,
who battered down the fortifications of what they saw as a liberal bastion in
the most liberal American city and won. Twitter and its employees were
their spoils, and they were going to enjoy them.

On November 22, Musk tweeted a video of shelves full of Twitterbranded apparel he had come across while wandering the San Francisco
office. “There’s an entire closest of #woke t-shirts,” he said, panning to a
gray tee with white lettering that read #StayWoke.

To Musk, “the woke mind virus” had infected places like Twitter. “The
conquest of Wokerosi is complete,” tweeted Sacks, resharing Musk’s video.

For current and former employees at Twitter, particularly its Black
workers, Musk’s message was disturbing. The shirts had been created after
the Ferguson protests by Blackbirds, a Black employee resource group, and
had been popularized by Dorsey, who proudly wore one at public events to
bring attention to the disproportionate amount of police violence faced by
African Americans.

Musk cut off funding for employee resource groups like Blackbirds,
while also making other symbolic changes. He ordered the teardown of a
Black Lives Matter mural, which had been put in the San Francisco office
following the George Floyd protests.

Musk’s team put up their own decorations. Near the tenth-floor
conference room that he often inhabited while in the office, they put up a
Galerie de Meme, or meme gallery, framing printouts of some of the
billionaire’s favorite juvenile internet jokes. Other interior design changes
seemed like attempts to stoke Musk’s ego. Before the acquisition, Twitter
hung images of famous or popular tweets in its ninth-floor cafeteria. One
was eventually replaced with an image of Musk’s April 2022 tweet in which
he joked he’d buy the Coca-Cola company and put cocaine back in its main
beverage, a post that garnered nearly 5 million likes. Near the entrance of
the commons area, someone also hung a collage of great free speech
moments in human history. There were photos of the U.S. Constitution,
John Milton’s Areopagitica, Berkeley’s 1960s Free Speech Movement, and
Musk carrying his sink into Twitter.

Spiro was also thinking about how he could leave his mark. The lawyer
had told his colleagues he had no plans to run Twitter, but he was quietly
considering it. He dreamed up a plan to export Musk’s free speech vision
globally. He’d pitch Starlink to repressive countries, giving them internet
access through Musk’s company. Then he’d add a new provision: if they
wanted Musk’s internet, they’d have to allow Twitter, too. Spiro thought he
could pull off a similar maneuver with Musk’s plan to add payments to
Twitter by providing easy online transactions to get countries that restricted
online speech hooked on the platform. He filed paperwork on behalf of the
company to pave the way for it to process payments.

But some of his fellow lawyers at Quinn Emanuel were concerned about
Spiro. The race to prepare for the aborted Twitter trial had taken a toll, and
Spiro hadn’t paused for breath since. He had a heavy caseload and was
juggling too much with his added responsibilities at Twitter. His coworkers
weren’t sure when he slept and thought Musk’s confidant was acting
recklessly, working at an unsustainable speed, and heading for a crash.

>>> TWO DAYS BEFORE Thanksgiving, Musk wanted to know what the
strategy was for relaunching Blue. He gathered the Blue team in Caracara,
while those who had already flown home for the holiday dialed in for what
became a two-hour meeting of stream-of-consciousness rambling. For some
unexplained reason, Musk sat in the conference room in a tuxedo.

“I’ve been thinking about this every fucking day,” he said. “Every
fucking day. My product judgment is really fucking good.”
While the discussion was supposed to focus on relaunching Blue and
preventing the wave of impersonations that had broadsided the system the
first time, it devolved into whatever crossed the billionaire’s mind. He
talked about the SR-71 Blackbird, a favorite stealth plane of his that
avoided Soviet Union–launched missiles during the Cold War, noting that
its agility was exactly how the team should behave. “We’re about speed,
speed, speed,” he said. (Musk’s son X Æ A-12 was named, in part, after the
Lockheed A-12, the precursor jet to the SR-71.)
It was important to move fast, he continued, because the bottom was
about to fall out of the economy. Advertising was getting crushed and Blue
was his way out of ad dependence. “I just got off the phone with Disney,”
he said. “The reason they had an emergency CEO change is they’re going to
have severe financial issues next year. Disney. Even fucking Disney.

“It’s gonna be bankruptcy city in 2023,” Musk continued.

Just as fears about a global economic downturn had influenced him to
try and pull out of the Twitter deal, the talk of “bankruptcy city” informed
Musk’s operating decisions at the company. By the end of November and
into December, he would repeatedly tell his associates he would not be
paying rent anywhere. At one point, Musk told a finance worker that Twitter
would send checks to landlords “over my dead body.”
During the next two months, Twitter skipped out on the $6.8 million
owed for December and January at its San Francisco headquarters, and
avoided paying for its offices in New York, Seattle, and other cities, leading
to a slew of lawsuits. In London, the Crown Estate, which oversees property
belonging to the king and owned the building that Twitter occupied, filed
suit.

Despite the lawsuits, Twitter stayed in some of the buildings Musk had
deemed necessary for operations. It maintained its spaces in San Francisco
and New York, consolidating remaining workers onto fewer floors. In some
places, like Boulder and Seattle, the company simply accepted eviction and
let its employees deal with the fallout. In some cases, workers were given
less than forty-eight hours’ notice to retrieve their belongings before they
were locked out. In Singapore, workers were walked out by building
management.

Davis and Hollander oversaw some of those changes, and as Twitter
downsized, they saw an opportunity to make a little more cash for Musk.

Enlisting the help of an online auction company run by a Twitter
employee’s husband, they began listing items for bid, including a $30,000
Twitter bird statue and a $25,000 espresso machine that was once used by
Perch baristas, as well as office chairs, industrial fridges, and projectors.

The world’s richest man was trying to make a few extra bucks on a
corporate garage sale.

>>> ON MONDAY, NOVEMBER 28, Musk awoke to news that Apple’s App Store
had rejected the latest update to the Twitter app. Without attempting to
discern Apple’s reasoning, he launched into a full-scale assault using his
favorite weapon. “Apple has mostly stopped advertising on Twitter. Do they
hate free speech in America?” he wrote at 9:45 in the morning in San
Francisco. An hour later he tweeted, “Apple has also threatened to withhold
Twitter from its App Store, but won’t tell us why.”
Up until that point, Apple, which typically spent more than $100 million
a year on advertising on the platform, had been a friendly partner to Musk’s
Twitter. Earlier that month, as the Blue team rushed to relaunch the
subscription service and develop a new app, Musk had made some calls to
his connections at the Cupertino, California–based iPhone maker, leading
Apple to expedite their typically rigorous app review process. It was the
first time Twitter’s engineers could remember receiving such treatment.

Some members of the Blue team heard rumblings that Apple had been
excited about also making money off the subscription product, as Apple
took a 30 percent cut of any purchases made on iPhone apps.

But cracks were developing in the relationship. The company was
concerned about the direction of content moderation under Musk and had
followed other brands in significantly reducing their advertising spend on
Twitter. It was also worried about reports that Twitter was exploring an
OnlyFans service for paywalled videos for adult creators. Apple’s App Store
banned apps with “overtly sexual or pornographic material,” and while
Twitter had always toed the line—allowing for nudity and consensual
pornography—the company had always attempted to place that adult
content behind warning labels or outside of algorithmic recommendations,
and certainly never attempted to make money off it.

Apple’s concerns led to increased scrutiny, and soon its app reviewers
began finding more porn in basic spot checks of the app. While Apple
warned Twitter of its findings, those concerns went unheeded in the chaos
of Musk’s early reign. Eventually, the App Store rejected one of Twitter’s
updates on the basis of its findings, and demanded improvements before it
could be released.

Musk viewed the App Store rejection and the apparent pullback in ad
spending as a declaration of war by the electronics manufacturer. “Did you
know Apple puts a secret 30% tax on everything you buy through their App
Store?” he tweeted that morning, injecting himself into a debate that had
already been raging in Silicon Valley between app developers and Apple.

In a meeting at Twitter that day, Musk became conspiratorial. He said
Phil Schiller and Tim Cook, Apple’s head of the App Store and CEO, must
be in bed with the shorts, baselessly suggesting that the executives had
aligned themselves with the short sellers who often bet against Musk’s
companies. To those in the room, it wasn’t clear if he was joking or not.

After all, Twitter was a private company. Musk also suggested that if Apple
took Twitter out of the App Store, he could tell his Twitter followers to
stage a protest at Apple’s headquarters in Cupertino.

But Apple wasn’t exactly looking for a fight either. The company and its
CEO, Tim Cook, didn’t like the idea of being drawn into a public spat with
the erratic entrepreneur, who had once attempted to pitch Apple on buying
Tesla. While Cook viewed Twitter’s new owner with trepidation, Apple
eventually made overtures to invite Musk to their campus that week.

Musk showed up at the $5 billion Apple Park that Wednesday,
November 30, walking into the famous building designed by Norman
Foster to resemble a spaceship, before being ushered into a conference
room with Cook for a one-on-one meeting. Cook explained that Apple, like
other advertisers, was worried about Twitter allowing more hate and
misinformation, which Musk denied. After discussion, the Apple chief said
the company would continue to advertise on the platform and that there
were no plans to remove Twitter from the App Store as long as it complied
with its rules. Then he made a special peace offering: Apple would only
take a 15 percent cut, instead of 30 percent, from Twitter Blue
subscriptions. Musk was satisfied, walking out of the meeting with Cook to
a man-made pond in the middle of the campus.

But the victory was short-lived. That day, the FTC sent an exhaustive
list of demands to Twitter, insisting that the company account for its privacy
program after all the responsible executives resigned. The agency asked
twenty-seven pointed questions, angling to figure out who would be left
holding the bag, and zeroing in on Musk. The FTC demanded to know
Musk’s responsibilities at Twitter and asked for a copy of every email,
Slack message, and memo that referenced the billionaire. The regulators
seemed suspicious that Musk was running the privacy program into the
ground and—despite Spiro’s assurances that no employee could be held
legally accountable—intent on pinning the blame on Twitter’s owner. The
FTC gave Twitter two weeks to respond.

>>> ON FRIDAY, DECEMBER 2, Musk prepared for what he believed to be a
momentous occasion for his Twitter. For days, he had ranted about the
executives who had preceded him at Twitter and like many of his
conservative fans, Musk subscribed to the theory that Twitter had
purposefully censored conservatives and promoted Democrats.

To prove his point, Musk had worked out a deal with Matt Taibbi, a
former Rolling Stone journalist. He would give Taibbi unfettered access to
Twitter’s internal files and communications, allowing him to root around
and document the liberal bias that had supposedly infested the social media
company. Musk’s only stipulation was that Taibbi had to publish his
findings on Twitter itself before running any stories on Substack, an
independent newsletter platform where he had a large following. Musk
guaranteed his desired angle by selecting Taibbi—who had become a
reactionary partisan. He would never side with Twitter’s former
management.

Musk’s demands to provide Taibbi with access stunned the company’s
security employees. Taibbi wasn’t an employee, and allowing him to riffle
through users’ information could violate Twitter’s privacy obligations under
its consent decree with the FTC and Europe’s General Data Protection
Regulation. But they didn’t dare push back.

The first installment of the Twitter Files, about the company’s 2020
decision to briefly block the New York Post from sharing its story about
files excised from Hunter Biden’s laptop, came with a strong endorsement.

“This will be awesome,” Musk tweeted in anticipation, along with a
popcorn emoji.

“It is a Frankensteinian tale of a human-built mechanism grown out the
control of its designer,” Taibbi wrote in an extensive Twitter thread that
night, which included several screenshots of internal emails and Slack
messages among Gadde, Roth, and other Twitter executives. Taibbi seemed
to be drafting the story as he tweeted, taking long pauses between each
tweet and occasionally deleting messages from the thread, but his thread,
which was onerous to read, still spread rapidly, garnering more than
145,000 retweets.

Despite his efforts to reveal a plot to put Biden in the White House, the
messages Taibbi posted seemed to prove the opposite point: they showed
staffers desperately trying to understand the decision to block the New York
Post story, and pushing back on the decision.

“This is an emerging situation where the facts remain unclear,” Roth
cautioned in one of the messages.

“I support the conclusion that we need more facts to assess whether the
materials were hacked,” Jim Baker, a deputy general counsel who reported
to Edgett and Gadde, wrote in another.

On Saturday, December 3, Twitter employees realized that Taibbi’s
thread was just the beginning of the Twitter Files. Workers on the security
team had been ordered to grant internal access to another right-wing
journalist, Bari Weiss. The addition of another outsider to Twitter’s systems
only raised more legal concerns.

As one of the senior-most lawyers left at the company, Baker inserted
himself into the mess. To make sure the journalists didn’t inadvertently
access user data that Twitter was legally obligated to protect, he insisted on
vetting materials before they were handed over to the reporters. Over the
weekend, as Taibbi and Weiss made increasingly vast and vague demands
for any documents related to the stories they wanted to pursue, Baker
became a bottleneck.

Frustrated, Weiss asked who was responsible for releasing files to her.

When she found out it was Baker, “my jaw hit the floor,” Weiss said. She
quickly alerted Musk.

Previously, Musk had bashed Baker, a former general counsel for the
FBI, alongside Gadde as an architect of Twitter’s censorship regime. The
billionaire was skeptical of Baker’s deep government ties and figured he
was another shadowy figure of the Deep State. After several purges of
employees who weren’t loyal to his cause, Musk assumed that Baker was
long gone.

But his own lawyer, Spiro, had kept Baker off the layoff lists. The
former FBI lawyer had quietly ridden out Musk’s first month of ownership,
keeping a low profile in the Washington, DC, office. As Musk impatiently
awaited the next Twitter Files installment, he discovered that Baker was still
inside the company, holding up the release of the files.

Livid, Musk demanded that Baker fly to San Francisco for a
confrontation. Meanwhile, Birchall ordered Twitter’s human resources team
to start drafting a separation agreement for Baker so that Musk could fire
him. Birchall claimed that workers from SpaceX’s legal and government
relations teams were conducting an internal investigation into Baker’s
conduct, and the result of their investigation would determine whether or
not the lawyer would be offered severance.

When he arrived in San Francisco, Baker sat down for a meeting with
Musk himself. “You’re fired,” the billionaire told him. But Baker was
adamant that he had done nothing wrong, and walked Musk through his
reasoning for examining the files before handing them off to Musk’s pet
reporters. He was protecting Musk, helping him avoid regulatory
crackdowns.

Baker believed that Musk was listening and thought he might have
saved his job. But in the end, he was escorted out of the building. Soon
after, Spiro was gone from Twitter, too. Some employees thought the
disagreement over Baker was the final straw. But Spiro wasn’t confident
that Musk would give him full leeway to enact his free speech plans at
Twitter, and was leery about Musk’s plans to continue layoffs after Spiro
had told employees the cuts were over. Although he’d positioned himself to
lead the company’s legal and policy operations, Spiro told people close to
him that he’d always planned his time at Twitter to be temporary. He went
back to litigating for Musk and began to prepare for an upcoming trial in a
lawsuit brought by Tesla shareholders.

>>> ON SATURDAY, DECEMBER 10, Musk erupted with frustration. Twitter was
still hemorrhaging money and he decided to take the budget into his own
hands. He summoned workers in San Francisco to the Caracara conference
room at headquarters and insisted that finance executives and team leads
from around the world dial in on a conference line.

Then he opened up a spreadsheet that documented Twitter’s total
expenditures and began to read it, line by line. As he ticked through
different parts of the business, Musk demanded that the employees
responsible for the spending explain their budgets to him. If Musk agreed
the expense was necessary, the spending could continue. But if he didn’t,
the team’s expenditures would go to zero immediately.

As Musk insisted on hearing directly from various business leads,
frantic text messages pinged through Twitter’s rank and file. More and more
people piled into the video conference, ripped away from their Saturday
grocery shopping and weekend chores.

Musk was relentless as he drilled into the details. He discovered that
Twitter was paying for 15,000 licenses for a piece of software, even though
at its peak, it had employed less than 8,000 people. Now, with fewer than
2,000 employees, the license fees were even more ridiculous. He ordered
that someone renegotiate the contract with the software provider.

Twitter was also paying almost $20 million in domain registration fees,
which kept it in command of twitter.com and other corporate websites.

“Can someone explain why this is so high?” Musk asked.

Rebecca Falk, a lawyer who oversaw compliance and risk mitigation,
piped up to answer. The payments had to do with security, she explained—
Twitter was spending a lot to keep its domains from being stolen or
compromised.

“Tesla isn’t spending this much,” Musk retorted.

Falk kept repeating the same sound bite: “It’s important,” she told him.

“It’s for security.”
Musk grew angry as he kept insisting that the lawyer delve deeper into
the nitty-gritty. But Falk, a lawyer who wasn’t deeply steeped in the nerdy
world of domain registrars, didn’t seem able to give Musk the level of detail
he wanted. Other executives who couldn’t answer his questions had
demurred, promising to look into their costs and get back to him. But Falk
kept insisting that Twitter should pay its domain fees.

“The more that comes out of your mouth, the dumber it sounds,” Musk
finally told her.

Finally someone else on the call intervened, nudging Musk to move on.

He continued to rip through the spreadsheet. Some of the gathered
executives ached on Falk’s behalf. Others who oversaw much smaller
budgets thought Musk was finally exposing the excesses that had been
tolerated for too long under Dorsey and Agrawal. How are you in a position
to spend that much and you don’t know what it’s for? they wondered.

The call became a war zone as executives fought for their fiefdoms,
trying to preserve what they had and suggesting cuts from other people’s
teams. As Musk continued, more silly spending came to light. The company
was spending hundreds of millions of dollars on its contract for Amazon
Web Services, the cloud-computing program run by the online retailer—but
it also had a similar contract with Google to use its Google Cloud service.

There were offices with two hundred desks but only sixty employees.

At one point on the call, as Musk probed the company’s spending on
web infrastructure, an executive said he would need to speak with Falk
about a solution. “She’s no longer with the company,” Musk retorted,
implying he had fired the lawyer. (In reality, Falk remained at Twitter for
another year, departing in November 2023.)
The discussion, which lasted for six hours, was a wake-up call for
Musk. He had thought that Davis had already eliminated every possible
expense, but he had determined for himself that Twitter was still spending
tens of millions of dollars that it didn’t need to. In his mind, there was no
accountability. Musk believed he would need to become even more handson in his management of Twitter.

O
40 > “I’m Rich, Bitch!”
n November 18, shortly after his resignation, Roth published an essay
in the New York Times opinion pages, laying out a strategy for
cracking down on Musk. The billionaire was unaccountable and pushing for
a vision of free speech that was biased and untenable, Roth argued. His
changes were “sudden and alarming,” the former executive wrote, and
Musk planned to rule according to his whims.

After Musk had embraced Roth and publicly told his followers to rely
on someone they viewed as a censor for reliable information about what
was going on at Twitter, Roth wanted to distance himself. With his op-ed,
Roth did just that. But he also blindsided and infuriated Musk, who couldn’t
tolerate public critique—especially in the pages of a mainstream publication
he loathed. Musk unfollowed him immediately after the op-ed was
published.

As Irwin stepped into Roth’s role, she made it her mission to eradicate
child sexual exploitation material from Twitter. Throughout late November
and early December, she and Musk tweeted publicly about the effort, which
Musk called “priority #1.”
On December 9, Twitter claimed its efforts were paying off. During the
first month of Musk’s ownership, it suspended nearly 300,000 accounts for
violating its rules against child sexual exploitation, a 57 percent increase,
the company claimed in a tweet. Musk claimed Twitter’s former leadership
had knowingly allowed the problem to fester.

“It is a crime that they refused to take action on child exploitation for
years!” Musk raged. His insult prompted a rare retort from Dorsey, who
responded, “This is false.”
The next day, as Musk kept one eye on his Twitter feed, Roth’s critics
had begun to pick through his old tweets and online history. One of them
unearthed his thesis from graduate school.

In his thesis, Roth had written about the fact that underage users often
logged onto Grindr, a gay dating app known for hookups, and posited that
the app should find ways to keep them safe rather than trying to ban them or
ignoring them altogether. “Rather than merely trying to absolve themselves
of legal responsibility or, worse, trying to drive out teenagers entirely,
service providers should instead focus on crafting safety strategies that can
accommodate a wide variety of use cases for platforms like Grindr—
including, possibly, their role in safely connecting queer young adults,”
Roth wrote, arguing for more safety measures to protect young people
online.

But Musk, who had been waiting for an opportunity to punch back at
Roth, seized on the thesis as evidence that the former executive wanted to
see teenagers form sexual relationships with adults. “Looks like Yoel is
arguing in favor of children being able to access adult Internet services in
his PhD thesis,” Musk tweeted.

In no time, Twitter users were flooding Roth’s account, accusing him of
pedophilia. Then came the death threats. As online sleuths dug up his
personal information, Roth’s phone started ringing, and it wouldn’t stop.

Then the address of his Bay Area home he shared with his husband
appeared online. Soon, the Daily Mail picked up on the story and published
a story about the harassment, complete with details about Roth’s house.

The onslaught was like nothing Roth had experienced before, even
when the attacks came directly from Trump’s White House. Back then,
Twitter had posted a security guard outside his home. But now, Roth was
unemployed and had no corporate resources to fall back on. He considered
buying a gun to defend himself if someone broke into his home, but he felt
too uncomfortable with the idea of owning a weapon.

Among the threats that pinged constantly on his phone, Roth saw a
message from Del Harvey, Twitter’s first trust and safety employee who had
worked alongside him to craft the company’s rationale for banning Trump.

Roth and Gadde had barely spoken since her firing, and the relationship
between the two was frayed. But Harvey had asked Gadde to help and she
complied, arranging a place for Roth and his husband to stay while they
figured out what to do.

Roth felt stung that Gadde had allowed Harvey to be her emissary
instead of reaching out directly, but he didn’t hesitate to take the offer.

Several weeks later, as the harassment died down, the couple returned to
pack up their things. Neither felt safe staying there any longer, and they
decided to list the house for sale. They sold it at a loss, disclosing to
potential buyers that the property was marked by Musk’s online harassment.

>>> WITH SPIRO’S DEPARTURE from Twitter, Musk needed new deputies. He
imported a new raft of employees from SpaceX to fill the void, including
Chris Cardaci, the company’s vice president of legal, and Tim Hughes, its
senior vice president for global business and government affairs. Cardaci
took over Twitter’s legal team, while Hughes stepped in to run its
compliance department. In a meeting with Twitter’s remaining lawyers,
Davis told them that Hughes was the best fit for the role because he worked
on Starlink while at SpaceX, which had some dealings with the FTC.

“We have to be flawless when it comes to compliance,” Davis said, and
in a rare lapse from his die-hard cost cutting, agreed that Twitter could hire
people to work on the company’s FTC issues. The regulator was indeed
circling Twitter. Its questions appeared to be a clear pretext for pinning any
criminal liability directly on Musk, should the agency determine Twitter
was not in compliance with its consent decree. While Spiro had brashly
dismissed the FTC, saying Musk was unafraid, the issue required legal
attention. Twitter had blown past the agency’s deadline by several weeks,
and had little to show for it.

“The company does not have unlimited resources, and it has been
working diligently to generate a response,” Twitter wrote over and over
again in a confidential letter to the FTC in December, responding to each of
the agency’s inquiries with the same excuse. One thing was unavoidable:
Twitter had no choice but to admit that Musk was the only person in charge.

“Mr. Musk has served as the sole director and as Chief Executive
Officer, President, Treasurer, and Secretary,” the company wrote. “Mr.

Musk has general supervisory authority over the business of the company,
including influencing the design, establishment, and implementation of a
comprehensive privacy and information security program.”
>>> ONE OF THE FIRST THINGS that Musk tweeted upon purchasing Twitter in
late October was a nod to the Babylon Bee. “Comedy is now legal on
Twitter,” he wrote less than twenty-four hours after signing on the dotted
line.

Musk had always wanted to be seen as funny, and on December 11,
after spending the day berating workers in the Twitter office in an agitated
state, he headed to San Francisco’s Chase Center, home of the Golden State
Warriors, to blow off some steam. Instead of basketball, though, Musk went
to see his friend, comedian Dave Chappelle, who was playing a sold-out
show.

“Ladies and gentlemen, make some noise for the richest man in the
world,” Chappelle announced as Musk walked onstage, mic in hand.

It was the end of the comedian’s show and he had brought on his buddy
as a set-ending showstopper. Musk raised both arms to the sky, then waved
after an initial set of applause. Then came a cascade of boos. Musk paced
the stage, looking at his host for some sort of cue amid the whistles and
hollers.

“Cheers and boos, I see,” said Chappelle, trying to defuse the situation
in the 18,000-person-capacity stadium. “Elon…”
“Hey Dave.”
“Controversy, buddy,” said Chappelle.

“Weren’t expecting this, were ya?” asked the billionaire.

“It sounds like some of those people you fired are in the audience,” the
comedian said, rescuing a few laughs. The boos picked up once again as
Chappelle lit a joint and made fun of the cheap seats. Musk stammered,
with the mic held limply near his lips. The pair eventually walked off stage,
but reappeared for an encore with Chris Rock and Chappelle’s entourage to
make one last attempt at rehabbing Musk’s image. Chappelle handed him
the mic and encouraged him to yell a classic tagline of his. “I’m rich,
bitch!” Musk screamed. A flurry of boos.

Musk barely slept that night. By 4:00 a.m. he was tweeting about
defeating “the woke mind virus” and COVID, but the Chappelle incident
was still on his mind. While he would often come across insults on Twitter,
he could usually insulate himself from the negativity. Chapelle’s show,
however, was real life, and it gave Musk an unfiltered taste of the growing
antagonism that had been building against him over his purchase of Twitter,
his politics, and his general online antics. He blamed the incident on San
Francisco’s “unhinged leftists” in a response to a Twitter user. “Technically,
it was 90% cheers and 10% boos (except during quiet periods), but, still,
that’s a lot of boos, which is a first for me in real life (frequent on Twitter).”
After hordes of people ridiculed that post and his fragile ego, Musk
deleted it. Comedy was legal in real life, too.

>>> BEYOND THE REPUTATIONAL HIT, Musk’s tweets about Roth would have
financial impact. His increasingly erratic posts were like large neon signs to
Tesla’s public market investors that he was not spending time at his electric
car maker, and shareholders began to worry. In their minds, Tesla and Musk
were synonymous, and without his attention the company could easily fall
by the wayside. When markets opened on Monday, Tesla’s stock fell more
than 6 percent during trading.

The stock closed down another 4 percent the following day, briefly
erasing Musk’s title as the world’s richest human.

Internally, Birchall pleaded with employees to have some sympathy for
Musk. “Elon is not draconian,” he told them during a meeting. While his
behavior might give the opposite impression, his actions were rooted in
believing Twitter was the best social platform, Birchall said. Roth had
questioned Musk’s commitment to safety, but he’d made Tesla the safest car
on the road, he continued. “He wakes up every day trying to make humanity
better,” he insisted.

The noise filled Musk’s Twitter feed and mind. Those who met with
him during that time worried if he had gone off his antidepressants, which
he talked about openly, or perhaps started taking something else. In his brief
moments of free time, employees saw him in Caracara—which he had now
fully commandeered—seated at the table with a Diet Coke, scrolling and
scrolling. Eventually, Musk’s team installed frosted glass to shelter the boss
from the worried glances.

>>> ONE OF THE few things that seemed to have a positive impact on Musk
during that time was his son X Æ A-12 (pronounced “X Ash A 12”). While
other children his age would have been in daycare or preparing to enter
preschool, the Twitter office effectively served as his toddler’s childcare.

Musk and X’s mother, Boucher, declared him the “chosen one” to those
around them and painted the boy as a messiah-like character who would
learn from his dad. If Musk was the architect of a more techno-perfect
future, they thought that X could potentially take over the Tesla, SpaceX,
and Twitter empire that had been laid out before him. “X is growing up in
the business world so he can know more than his dad,” Boucher told one
Twitter executive.

Musk doted on X, and told his lieutenants that the child, who frequently
stayed up late into the night waiting for his father, was up to absorb the
lessons of how he ran his businesses. But to some of Twitter’s staff, the
child’s presence felt like a wild experiment in parenting. Beyond Musk, his
nanny, and his bodyguards, X appeared to have no one else to interact with,
certainly no one his own age. Musk would bring him into meetings and the
toddler would talk and occasionally curse, a trait learned from his father,
leaving workers confused as to why they had to speak over a child while
explaining something to their boss.

Musk had always been a conflicted father, and despite fathering at least
eleven children, he struggled to raise them. In the earlier days, his eldest
children, a pair of twins and a set of triplets, would often come to his
various offices—much like X—and he was able to keep them close as he
worked. But now that they were older, some had become tired of their
father’s lack of attention and constant work. They grew distant—none more
than Vivian, who was seen by her father as a neo-Marxist, brainwashed by
her progressive schooling. In conversations, he told those close to him that
none of his teenagers wanted to see him these days, making those who
heard the comments wonder if the time he spent with X was to ensure yet
another relationship with a child wouldn’t deteriorate.

>>> THE WEEK OF DECEMBER 11, Musk sent X Æ A-12 down to Los Angeles
via his private jet to be with his mother. When the child got there, a car
driving him was followed by a stalker who thought the billionaire was
inside. When the vehicle pulled over at a gas station, the boy’s security
guards confronted the disturbed individual and took footage, which Musk
later posted on his Twitter account. He and his family were being
threatened, he said, and it was because of a Twitter account that tracked the
whereabouts of his private plane.

When Musk bought Twitter, he directly cited the @ElonJet account as
something he would not ban. “My commitment to free speech extends even
to not banning the account following my plane, even though that is a direct
personal safety risk,” he wrote after his first two weeks in charge. Behind
the scenes, however, the account became a regular topic of discussion, with
Irwin, the trust and safety head, advocating for its removal because it
broadcast location information. While Musk initially demurred, the incident
with his son caused him to change his mind overnight.

Twitter moved to ban @ElonJet on December 14, with Musk hastily
crafting a policy to state that any account sharing another’s “live location
information” would be suspended. It was unclear what this meant. Since its
inception, people had posted information about themselves and others in
real time at sporting events, protests, or simply moving through everyday
life. If a user happened to tweet a photo of Tom Cruise walking through the
doors of a McDonald’s and tweeted the location, would they be banned
under the new policy?
The company not only banned @ElonJet, but other accounts that shared
links to other sites with public flight data. That included the Twitter account
for Mastodon, a competing social network that shared that people could
find the @ElonJet account on their site, as well as more than half a dozen
journalists at The New York Times, The Washington Post, and CNN, who
reported on what was happening with the suspensions.[*]
“They posted my exact real-time location, basically assassination
coordinates, in (obvious) direct violation of Twitter terms of service,” Musk
later tweeted, the wheels of conspiracy turning in his head.

Musk’s associates, including Calacanis and Sacks, would attempt to
dissuade him from going further. Musk had gone off the rails, connecting a
bunch of seemingly unrelated events into a larger plot of subterfuge. He
grew extremely dark, telling those around him that perhaps he made a
mistake in buying Twitter. The financial burden and the focus it took away
from his other companies, including Tesla and SpaceX, was becoming too
much. “He came in with a savior complex, as if he was coming to save
humanity,” said one former Twitter executive. “Suddenly you turn around
and people actually see you as the devil and not a hero. That’s a difficult
thing to deal with.”
But the night after the bans, Musk couldn’t stay offline. When Katie
Notopoulos, a reporter at BuzzFeed News, started a Twitter Space to talk
about the suspensions in a live audio discussion, a few of the suspended
journalists, including Drew Harwell of The Washington Post and Matt
Binder of Mashable, were able to join. They exploited a glitch in Spaces,
which was built on a different database infrastructure than the rest of the
social network, and began attempting to make sense of Musk’s thin-skinned
hypocrisy. Musk eventually joined the space and huffily tried to offer a
defense. “Showing real-time information about someone’s location is
inappropriate,” he began, before ripping into his longtime enemies.

“There is not going to be any distinction in the future between
journalists—so-called journalists—and, and regular people,” Musk said.

“Everyone’s going to be treated the same. You’re not special because you’re
a journalist. You’re, you’re just a—you’re just a Tw—citizen.”
As the reporters tried to press Musk on what exactly he meant, Musk
raised his voice and then abruptly left the call. Minutes later, he ordered
Twitter’s engineers to close all Spaces, and later tweeted that the company
was “fixing a Legacy bug.” There were limits to free speech after all.

Skip Notes
* Among those banned was Ryan, one of the authors of this book.

T
41 > Self-Doubt
he 2022 FIFA Men’s World Cup was an opportunity for Qatar to put
itself on the map. On Sunday, December 18, the country was the
center of the world, as soccer stars, including Argentina’s Lionel Messi and
France’s Kylian Mbappé waited in the innards of a golden, egg-shaped
stadium for the most important game of their lives to kick off.

Musk was also there, in a luxury box with other powerful people who
had traveled to the Persian Gulf for the game. But he wasn’t there for the
entertainment. Musk hated sports. In his youth he spent more time reading,
tinkering with computers, or playing video games. His purchase of Twitter
shifted those priorities. Sports was a major source of Twitter usership from
NBA trade rumors to Olympics coverage to Super Bowl chatter, and large
live sporting events were a boon to the company’s user and revenue figures
as its sales team could sell special ad packages or show advertising against
highlights or content licensed from the major global leagues.

Among sporting events on Twitter, though, the Men’s FIFA World Cup
was the biggest. Consisting of a month of dozens of soccer matches, the
event, which takes place every four years, had consistently set traffic
records for the company. In 2010, the first World Cup with a major Twitter
presence, the company warned users to expect major outages, which
happened when the Netherlands national team upset Brazil in the
quarterfinals in South Africa. The 2014 event in Brazil led to some 672
million tweets, the highest number of posts related to a single event at the
time. Over the years, as Twitter matured and developed better
infrastructure, the site became more adept at handling these traffic booms,
but after Musk arrived and began laying waste to the employee base, those
who were left became concerned that the company wouldn’t have the
people or know-how to deal with a major outage. As some engineers put it,
Twitter was like a running car. It was chugging along for now, but if the
check-engine light came on or the transmission failed, it wasn’t clear if
there would be mechanics around to fix it.

Despite the possibility for failure, the sixty-three games through
November and December caused no such outages, and by the time Musk
landed on the ground in Qatar for the World Cup Final on December 18,
Twitter had had a largely charmed time dealing with the traffic. Musk flew
more than fifteen hours to get to the game and arrived at the stadium just
before kickoff, shaking hands, greeting fans, and snapping photos with
everyone from the likes of Turkish strongman president Recep Tayyip
Erdoğan; Nusret Gökçe, the influencer restaurateur better known as Salt
Bae; and a Russian state television presenter and propagandist. Then Musk
settled into a seat next to Jared Kushner, Donald Trump’s son-in-law and
close adviser, and Mansoor bin Ebrahim Al-Mahmoud, the CEO of the
Qatar Investment Authority.

Musk was there on business, honoring his commitment to his Qatari
backers and hoping to raise more money from investors to lessen his
financial burden. The game was attended by a who’s who of the rich and
famous, including the former English soccer star David Beckham and
Indian steel billionaire Lakshmi Mittal, and it was a perfect opportunity for
Musk to get in front of people. The fundraising effort had largely been kept
under wraps, overseen by Birchall and Pablo Mendoza, an associate from
Vy Capital, a Dubai-based venture fund, who had been lent out to Musk’s
Twitter for finance help. “Over recent weeks we’ve received numerous
inbound requests to invest in Twitter,” Birchall wrote to investors in an
email. “Accordingly, we are pleased to announce a follow-on equity
offering for common shares at the original price and terms, targeting a yearend close.”
The terms were bold, if not preposterous, as they sought to raise up to
$3 billion. Musk had spent the last month and a half destroying the
company’s advertising revenue streams and firing employees. His chaotic
approach, combined with the churning global financial markets, led some
banks, which had provided $13 billion in debt financing, to try and sell debt
at steep discounts. Analysts and critics believed that it was ludicrous to
think anyone would pay the full $54.20 for shares in Musk’s Twitter. And as
he went out to try and fundraise, he would only create more chaos for
himself.

As the final wrapped up, with Argentina winning on penalties, Twitter
announced a new policy that sent its users into a frenzy. “We will remove
accounts created solely for the purpose of promoting other social platforms
and content that contains links or usernames for the following platforms:
Facebook, Instagram, Mastodon, Truth Social, Tribe, Nostr and Post,” the
company announced on one of its official feeds. Musk had demanded the
policy in an attempt to preserve traffic and stop eyeballs from going to other
domains. He was particularly incensed by Dorsey, who had encouraged
people to download and use Nostr, a new decentralized social network.

The policy drew backlash from all corners of Twitter and across the
political spectrum. It went against all social media norms and was a direct
contradiction to the idea of free speech. The move was also antithetical to
the Silicon Valley ethos of competition, which posited that companies
should simply build the best products to win, not force people to use them.

Among Musk’s critics were whistleblower Edward Snowden; Aaron
Levie, the chief executive of Box; and Balaji Srinivasan, a crypto
entrepreneur and former partner at Andreessen Horowitz. But one of the
loudest was Paul Graham, the founder of start-up incubator Y Combinator,
who had tweeted the previous month that “it’s remarkable how many people
who’ve never run any kind of company think they know how to run a tech
company better than someone who’s run Tesla and SpaceX.” After Twitter’s
new policy, he changed his tune, tweeting a link to his Mastodon account
and calling Musk’s move “the final straw.” He was promptly banned.

“I still think Elon is a smart guy,” Graham later wrote on a message
board popular with start-up founders. “His work on cars and rockets speaks
for itself. Nor do I think he’s the villain a lot of people try to make him out
to be. He’s eccentric, definitely, but that should be news to no one. Plus I
don’t think he realizes that the techniques that work for cars and rockets
don’t work in social media. Those two facts are sufficient to explain most of
his behavior.”
Within hours, Musk posted that he would change the policy to only
suspend accounts whose “*primary* purpose” was to promote competitor
sites. Then he wrote, “Going forward, there will be a vote for major policy
changes. My apologies. Won’t happen again.” That was followed by a poll
that was meant to be a referendum of his leadership.

“Should I step down as head of Twitter?” he tweeted at 1:20 a.m. in
Doha. “I will abide by the results of this poll.” He stayed up through the
night posting away before his plane took off for Austin, with a layover in
London, the next day.

Musk flew out of the Middle East empty-handed, his search for new
funding failed. The rejections and the policy debacle left Musk in a worse
mental state than when he arrived in Qatar. But he was not prepared for the
results of his poll, which ended while he was in the air.

>>> BY THE TIME he touched down in London, 57.5 percent of the more than
17.5 million accounts that had voted were calling for him to resign. It was a
shock to Musk’s system. For a man who read sci-fi and superhero fantasies
growing up as a kid, the rejection felt like Gotham voting to exile Batman.

Musk was shorn of the deep confidence he often had in himself and driven
into further misery by Tesla’s tumbling stock. The company’s shares set a
new two-year low upon his return stateside on December 20 and were down
nearly 66 percent since the start of the year. Musk spent the day in Austin at
Tesla, attempting to do damage control and prove to the market he wasn’t
an absentee boss. The stock continued to fall in the days after.

When he arrived back in San Francisco, he stopped responding to some
emails and texts, while those who did come in contact with him reported to
others in his circle that he was in the throes of a manic event. His behavior
would begin a period of what Marc Andreessen, a cofounder of Twitter
investor Andreessen Horowitz, would term “an episode.” The venture
capitalist became so concerned that he messaged Twitter staffers to see if
Musk, who confined himself largely to his conference room, was in the
right headspace.

In one conversation with a confidant, Musk choked up and began to
doubt his ability to run the company. He wanted to be liked, and his
realization that millions of people—including some of his friends and
supporters—could turn against him in an instant sent him further into
depression. “I’m never going to recover from this,” he said.

Employees closely monitored Musk’s Twitter feed, where he was still
posting, for any responses. “I will resign as CEO as soon as I find someone
foolish enough to take the job!” he wrote. “After that, I will just run the
software & servers teams.”
Some engineers, who had participated in the poll and voted for Musk to
step down, were initially encouraged, hoping that his statement meant they
would get a respite from the breakneck pace within the company. The brief
relief, though, turned into panic when they realized that polling data was
unencrypted and that those with access to Twitter’s internal systems could
see how individual accounts had voted. Fearing they could be outed and
fired, the engineers scrambled to obscure the data and how to find it.

It was during this episode that some Twitter employees had a realization
about Musk. Tesla and SpaceX were companies that were built in his image,
and they had people and processes in place to manage his expectations and
shifting demands. He also never spent multiple days on end fixated on one
company, preferring to bounce around to address whatever needed his
immediate attention, whether that be a booster design or a factory
manufacturing issue. At Twitter, however, there was no buffer, just him
banging his head against the wall day after day to solve a business problem
he had created for himself.

Musk seemed serious about relinquishing the CEO role. Within days, he
invited a CEO candidate to Twitter’s offices for an interview—it was Emil
Michael, an aggressive operations executive who had been Travis
Kalanick’s right hand at Uber before he was fired in 2017. Since his
defenestration, Michael had dabbled in investing, but he was open to
returning to the cutthroat world of Silicon Valley start-ups. The meeting did
not result in a job offer.

>>> SHEEN AUSTIN, the Tesla infrastructure leader, knew people who said no
to Musk tended not to last for very long in his orbit. In fact, Austin knew
he’d signed a death warrant by remaining at Twitter. He had seen others
before him, like Nelson Abramson, the Twitter vice president who led
infrastructure, lose their jobs for tiny transgressions. Austin had tried to
coach Abramson in how to speak to Musk and his lackeys, while managing
their expectations, but it was no use. He was fired earlier that month after
getting in a disagreement with Davis over budget cuts.

Fatalism consumed Austin as he got up every day for work, which was
now an exercise in keeping one of the world’s most trafficked websites
online as its new owner did everything to break it. He hated it.

Keeping Twitter online was not cheap. Labor aside, the company spent
more than $1 billion annually on server and cloud computing costs, easily
making it one of the highest operating expenses at the company. Much of
that went to its three physical data centers, located in Atlanta; Portland,
Oregon; and Sacramento. These locations were effectively the brains of
Twitter, storing every profile, tweet, like, and other data on racks of servers
that spanned football fields’ worth of space.

Sacramento, or SMF, named for the local airport code, was the
company’s largest data center. Located in the northern part of California’s
capital, the facility was owned and operated by Nippon Telegraph and
Telephone (NTT), a Tokyo-based telecoms company from which Twitter
leased space. While the company had used the facility for more than a
decade, a heat wave that June knocked out all power to the data center and
led some leaders to reconsider the company’s presence in Sacramento. By
the time Musk arrived on the scene in a cost-cutting frenzy, that decision
was a no-brainer. SMF was a goner.

Austin agreed that it was the right call. But he also knew that shutting
down one of the three main data centers could not be done overnight. This
wasn’t as simple as flipping a light switch; data would have to be ported
safely to ensure that nothing was lost. Servers would have to be carefully
packed and shipped. Engineers would have to reroute traffic to ensure there
were no service outages. Done right, the process would take weeks, if not
months. He tried to impress that idea upon his boss, who eventually agreed
that they would have until early January to sort out the transition.

On December 23, one of Austin’s deputies sent out an email to Twitter
staff informing them that SMF would be shut down, while its Atlanta data
center would also be downsized by the following month. No reasons were
given, but it was clear among those who knew that it was aimed at reducing
costs. Austin was torn. He saw the savings rationale behind the Sacramento
closure but worried that directing more traffic to Atlanta and Portland might
lead to instability and outages. Data centers rely on redundancy, or the idea
that if one failed, the others could step up and handle the traffic
responsibilities, keeping a site online.

That night, Musk’s plane had already taken off from the private jet
tarmac at Oakland International Airport with the billionaire, Davis, Andrew
and James Musk, and their families in tow. Austin, who had been working
all week to ready the data center transition for after the holidays, was in the
middle of preparing for a celebration of two of his children’s birthdays
when he got a surprising call from James Musk.

The plane had been turned around, he told Austin as others laughed in
the background. On the flight, Musk had become fixated on SMF and the
time it would take to transition out, leading the cousins to suggest they
could start removing servers themselves. Musk agreed and told his pilot to
turn the plane around near Las Vegas. The SMF shutdown would begin
tonight.

At Twitter, few employees knew about what was happening. Austin,
who had pleaded with Musk to reconsider, with no success, informed some
engineers there was an ongoing “issue,” but didn’t provide details about
what his boss was preparing to do. As Musk, his cousins, and Davis arrived
at SMF after midnight on Christmas Eve and began walking the floors of
the data center, Austin logged on from home to monitor Twitter’s systems
and take note of any potential damage. At one point, Musk used a
pocketknife to unplug one server, around the time a number of Agent Tools,
or services that were used to monitor abuse, hate, or illegal activity, also
went down. The failure was enough to lead Musk to stop pulling out cords.

On Twitter, however, Musk pretended that everything was going
smoothly. “And yet work it does,” Musk tweeted cryptically about his
escapade, “even after I disconnected one of the more sensitive server
racks.”
Behind the scenes, Austin pleaded with Musk and Davis not to do
anything else. The whole site could go down and it might take days for
Twitter’s infrastructure team to diagnose the issues and get it back up and
running. There was also the possibility that user data could be damaged or
lost, leading to a potential violation of Twitter’s agreements with the FTC.

His attempts to strike the fear of God into his boss were an exercise in
buying himself more time so he’d be able to reroute traffic away from SMF
and to the other remaining data centers.

The move worked. Musk unplugged nothing else, and most of the traffic
to SMF was stopped within twelve hours as Twitter’s infrastructure
engineers worked around the clock to ensure nothing went down.

Miraculously, the site stayed mostly online, as trucks lined up outside the
data center, equipped with AirTags to track their cargo and ready to
transport Twitter’s server racks off the premises. Musk didn’t stay long,
leaving in the morning hours of Christmas Eve, having lobbed another
grenade at his workers.

The following week, users around the globe began experiencing outages
and were unable to use Twitter on desktop computers. In other cases, people
could not view the replies to their tweets or encountered error messages
while scrolling their timelines. It was exactly as Austin had warned. Days
after that, Twitter stopped working for many in Australia and New Zealand,
and in the coming months, the site would be stricken with half a dozen
major outages. It took more than four months to install the servers from
Sacramento in the Atlanta data center, with employees working constantly
on the project.

Austin, however, didn’t care if he was right. The SMF shutdown
shattered his image of Musk. He may have built billion-dollar companies,
but this was a man who chewed through people, using their loyalty to work
them into the ground. Austin thought he had earned Musk’s trust and
respect, but he realized he was simply a pawn.

On New Year’s Day, Austin and Kiko Smith, the architect who had been
mistakenly fired, flew to Portland to oversee the transfer of server racks that
had been driven up from Sacramento. As they ate breakfast in the dining
room of an Embassy Suites hotel the following morning, Austin
commiserated with his colleague.

“This is not something I can tolerate,” he said of Musk’s commands.

“And then forcing it on other people. I don’t even want it for myself. How
can I force it on other people?”
Austin oversaw the SMF shutdown for a few more weeks before
resigning, not just from Twitter, but also from Tesla. He was no longer a
believer.

>>> CRAWFORD WAS ALSO losing her belief in Musk. While she had viewed
him with optimism when he arrived and touted his abilities as a product
visionary who could get people to move mountains, his two months at
Twitter had shattered that image. The Blue launch had failed dramatically,
revenue was crushed, and employee morale went through the floor. She had
watched from a cautious distance as Musk passed through his episode, and
at the end of the month made an attempt to correct his course.

She readied a presentation knowing that, much like with a fourth grader,
she would have to deliver the bad news with praise. Then she met him in
Caracara and ran him through the numbers, showing dramatic declines in
year-end revenue since his takeover.

“Some of your tweets are the reason why advertisers left or paused
spending,” she told him, lining up the timing of some of his most
controversial posts with drops in advertiser spend. “But the good news is
that only you can turn that around!”
She thought the numbers, plain as day, would give him the impetus to
change. But instead, he started to argue. “These are due to macroeconomic
factors,” he said, turning to his favorite talking points of rising interest rates
and a coming recession. Musk convinced himself that he was not the
problem.

“We still have too many people at the company,” he said, suggesting
that bankruptcy was still on the table. He repeated the line every time
Crawford pointed to a new data point showing his effect on advertising.

The product manager could sense she was getting nowhere. She knew
other companies in the space, like Facebook’s parent company, Meta, were
not experiencing the same type of impact on advertising and that Twitter’s
issues went far beyond macroeconomics.

As she went to get up, Musk patronized her.

“Don’t worry about it, Esther. I can tell you care a lot.”
Soon he’d stop texting and including her in product meetings.

A
42 > Red Pilled
t Twitter, the cuts continued through January. In the U.S., rolling
rounds of layoffs hit engineers working on the company’s ad product
and trust and safety teams, while tweeps in Australia were cut. In some
cases, employees were unsure if they had been exited at all.

In early January, one worker took it upon himself to figure out what was
going on. He was a designer based in Europe and had resigned two months
earlier. But for whatever reason, he still had access to his company email
and Slack, and was still receiving paychecks. He had reached out to the
company’s human resources representatives, but Musk had laid many of
them off, leaving it unclear if the company received his messages in the first
place. With no recourse, he messaged some people who he thought were in
charge on Slack.

“I’m basically the stapler guy from Office Space,” he wrote, referencing
the 1999 dark comedy that features a character who is unceremoniously
moved into an office basement and forgotten. Eventually, someone figured
out his predicament and properly exited him from the company.

Davis also continued to kill employee benefits, including family
planning and company support for in vitro fertilization services. The moves
left employees who had frozen their eggs scrambling to figure out how to
pay for something they had expected their employer to cover. It all felt
unnecessarily cruel and inconsistent. After all, didn’t Musk want people to
repopulate the earth?
Musk had recovered from his “episode” at the end of December, but his
tweeting continued at an unhinged pace, revealing a mind stewing within its
own filter bubble. While he had always seen himself as a libertarian
centrist, he tweeted in the early hours of January 5, that “Kevin McCarthy
should be speaker,” pushing for the Republican representative from
California who had supported Trump’s claims of voter fraud in 2020 to lead
the House.

Musk also leaned on Twitter’s remaining content moderation team in
the aftermath of the Brazilian election, second-guessing its employees when
they took down tweets questioning the defeat of Bolsonaro. After Lula da
Silva won the election in October, Bolsonaro’s supporters claimed the
election had been stolen, an echo of Trump’s supporters after his 2020
defeat. Twitter’s moderators knew they had to act or risk an outcome like
the U.S. Capitol riot, so they took down tweets that violated the platform’s
rules.

When Musk discovered what was going on, he stopped them. Only
tweets that explicitly called for violence or were the subject of government
orders could be removed, he said, peeved by a Brazilian judge that sent
regular takedown requests to the company. On January 8, people stormed
Brazil’s federal buildings in an attempt to keep Bolsonaro in power.

By then, Musk had become openly conservative. He regularly replied to
right-wing accounts and personalities including @Catturd2, the trolling
alter ego of a Trump-supporting Florida man, and Jack Posobiec, an activist
who promoted Pizzagate, offering to personally look into their complaints
about Twitter. He also gave a tour of the office to Dave Rubin, a
conservative podcast host, allowing him to spend two days at Twitter
headquarters asking employees questions about why his own account had
been limited in its reach.

While he faced questions about his political tweeting, notably on a Tesla
earnings call on January 25, where he was asked if his politicization would
hurt the automotive company and alienate some buyers, Musk portrayed his
tweeting as a net benefit. He had 127 million followers, which suggested
that he was “reasonably popular.”
“Twitter is actually an incredible tool for driving demand,” Musk said to
analysts and investors.

The following day, Musk flew to Washington, DC, to meet with
McCarthy on the politician’s birthday, discussing Twitter and its policies
with the new speaker. He also found time for Jim Jordan, the Ohio
representative and Trump attack dog, and Kentucky representative James
Comer, who had announced his intentions to use his position on the House
Oversight Committee to investigate President Biden. It was an area of
interest for Musk, who was facing various government inquiries across his
companies and began to wonder if Biden would weaponize federal agencies
against Twitter.

With the FTC investigation well underway, he now saw himself as a
direct target of the White House and aligned himself with those who
seemed best suited to protect his interests. But he was also eager to worm
his way out of the fight with the regulator, which had subpoenaed him for a
February deposition. His team wrote to Lina Khan, the FTC chairwoman,
asking for an informal sit-down during his DC trip, but she rebuffed him,
telling him in a letter that he should focus his efforts on responding to her
investigators.

“I recommend that Twitter appropriately prioritize its legal obligations
to provide the requested information,” she wrote. “Once Twitter has fully
complied with all FTC requests, I will be happy to consider scheduling a
meeting with Mr. Musk.”
In February, Comer held a hearing in the House to examine the
supposed ties between Big Tech and government. As Roth, Gadde, and
others answered questions about what conservative lawmakers saw as
supposed anti-right-wing censorship, Republicans praised Musk. Among
them was Marjorie Taylor Greene, the Georgia congresswoman and QAnon
endorser whose Twitter account was suspended in early 2022 for spreading
misinformation about the COVID vaccine.

“Thank God Elon Musk bought Twitter,” she said.

>>> THE FAR RIGHT had plenty of reasons to celebrate Musk’s acquisition. In
him, they saw a leader who would loosen the site’s speech rules—many of
which had led to the suspension of notable figures. Greene’s accounts had
been reinstated in late November—after McCarthy used his influence to
push Twitter’s leadership to bring her back—beginning what Musk would
term a “general amnesty” of previously suspended accounts.

The returnees were a who’s who of the far right. Ali Alexander, an
organizer of the Stop the Steal election denial movement who was banned
in the aftermath of January 6, came back, as did Ron Watkins, the suspected
creator behind QAnon. Musk also welcomed back Nick Fuentes, a white
supremacist and incel whose hateful ideologies found a following among a
group of racists known as the Groypers. Fuentes, however, didn’t last long,
logging in to a Twitter Space on the same night as his reinstatement to
scream that he liked Hitler and was “going to war with the Jews.” He was
eventually re-banned, though Musk allowed him to return again in May
2024.

Musk’s impact, however, went far beyond the amnesties. “People on the
right should see more ‘left wing’ stuff and people on the left should see
more ‘right wing’ stuff,” he tweeted on January 16.

In practice, however, people began seeing the amplification of rightwing voices. While Musk had espoused the idea of “freedom of speech, not
freedom of reach,” Twitter’s recommendation algorithms began pushing
conservative accounts and posts into people’s timelines. Users setting up
new accounts were given recommendations to follow the likes of
Republican Florida governor Ron DeSantis; Texas senator Ted Cruz; and
Posobiec.

Activist groups that study online platforms, including the Center for
Countering Digital Hate and the Anti-Defamation League, found that slurs
against Black Americans had tripled, while antisemitic speech was up more
than 60 percent since the change in ownership. Accounts showing terrorist
affiliations with groups such as the Islamic State (IS) also surged in the
wake of the takeover.

In mid-January, Twitter’s recommendation algorithms pushed a post
featuring a video of a man stabbing a woman multiple times in a bedroom
and killing her as something “you may like” on users’ “For You” feeds. The
promotion of the video, which racked up more than 1.2 million views,
7,500 retweets, and nearly 22,000 likes, was the result of Musk’s
prioritization of engagement combined with the removal of the site’s
guardrails.

Twitter was also still crawling with child sexual exploitation material.

The problem wasn’t an easy one for any social media company to solve.

The material is illegal to look at, which prevents companies from
deputizing employees to go out and proactively scour their platforms for it.

Instead, the companies largely rely on databases of hashes, digital
signatures created to match abuse images that had previously been caught
by law enforcement. By searching for the hashes, tech companies could
take down material they knew was illegal without ever looking at it.

Twitter used the same mechanisms, but somehow known material was
still slipping through. In the chaos of layoffs and cost cutting, it seemed that
the company had lost some of its ability to detect and remove the material.

One of the contracts Twitter had stopped paying was its deal with Thorn, a
tech company that had built a hash database for videos of child exploitation.

The gaps left up a graphic video of a boy being sexually assaulted on
Twitter, where it was viewed more than 120,000 times, a New York Times
investigation revealed. Twitter’s recommendation algorithm also surfaced
and suggested other accounts that posted images of child abuse.

>>> AS MUSK’S TWITTER elevated conservative voices, the billionaire was
developing a budding relationship with one Republican congressman in
particular. During the February 8 hearing, Representative Jordan made it
clear that he believed Musk’s ownership had turned the company around.He
slammed the company’s previous management, notably Roth and Gadde,
for censoring posts and communicating with federal law enforcement
agencies, which the congressman saw as violations of the First Amendment
and free speech. In Jordan, Musk saw potential for a new political terrier
who could argue on his behalf as he faced scrutiny from Democratic
lawmakers and regulators.

Some of the heaviest scrutiny came from the FTC. By early February,
the agency had sent twelve letters to the company demanding information
and had interviewed former executives, including Lea Kissner, Twitter’s old
chief information security officer, and Damien Kieran, its former chief
privacy officer.

To Musk, this was government harassment by the Biden administration,
which he had come to loathe for its positions on immigration and organized
labor. He authorized one of the company’s top remaining lawyers, Christian
Dowell, to share the FTC’s requests and other documents with Jordan’s
office, giving the congressman ammunition for his House select
subcommittee on “the weaponization of the federal government.” Musk
later invited staffers from Jordan’s office to visit SpaceX’s facilities in
Texas.

He also found a sympathetic ear in the FTC’s lone Republican
commissioner, Christine Wilson. In February, he secured a meeting with
Wilson and confided in her about the government persecution he believed
he was facing. Jim Kohm, a leader in the FTC’s enforcement division, sat in
and listened to the complaints. Wilson agreed that the FTC had gone
beyond its mandate in pursuing him personally—but there was nothing she
could do. Shortly before her meeting with Musk, Wilson had tendered her
resignation. He would get no protection from her. The meeting seemed to
do little to spook Kohm—the demand letters from his team kept coming.

Still, Musk managed to get the agency to delay his deposition. He was
not interested in answering the agency’s questions under oath.

>>> AS MUSK STEWED over the external government inquiries, he also
became fixated on Twitter’s internal platform issues. Beyond the site’s
outages that were the result of the SMF shutdown and reckless tweaks to
internal tools and services, Musk became obsessed with the falling
engagement on his tweets.

Twitter’s engineers could see the drop-off in Musk’s engagement as
well but didn’t have any explanations for it. There had been various
changes to the algorithm and in Twitter’s overall product since Musk took
over, and any multitude of factors could have caused it. At one point,
Twitter’s owner took his account private—preventing non-followers from
seeing his posts—in an attempt to see if that would rectify his engagement
problem. “Something fundamental is wrong,” the billionaire tweeted on
February 1. He stayed late into the night at Twitter’s offices attempting to
rectify what he believed was an existential problem.

To the engineers who had to field Musk’s questions about his own
tweets, there was a certain level of absurdity to the requests. On one hand,
this was the world’s richest person, obsessing over the dissemination of his
posts, which were still getting millions and millions of views even with the
supposed decline. On the other hand, they sympathized with Musk’s
intuition that perhaps his account was simply a canary in the coal mine,
warning of potential drops in engagement for others. Tests, though, didn’t
show meaningful declines for other users.

On Tuesday, February 7, Musk’s anger would come to a head. He had
called another meeting to deal with the subject of his engagement, calling
the situation “ridiculous,” as Davis backed him up by pulling up old tweets
and comparing their stats with newer ones to sycophantically drill home the
point. “Somebody tell me what’s going on,” Musk said, growing more and
more upset.

While the employees in the room still didn’t have a reason, they put
forward Yang Tang, a machine-learning engineer with almost a decade of
experience at the company. Tang, an expert on the artificial intelligence
used to drive the social network’s personalized feeds, had little experience
in talking to Musk. Those who had survived the billionaire’s blast radius
knew never to speak out of turn or offer guesses. They also learned to create
presentations that Musk could easily digest from his phone—as he rarely, if
ever, used a computer. No one told Tang.

Standing up, the engineer began riffing with a presentation from his
laptop. Instead of saying he didn’t know the cause of the issue, he pointed
to other trends. Likes on the platform were decreasing overall, he said,
before Musk cut him off.

“I’m not talking about likes,” he growled. “I’m talking about view
counts.”
Tang pushed on, citing external factors. There were decreases in Google
searches for Musk’s name and he correlated that with internal engagement
data. Perhaps the answer was simply that people were less interested in
Twitter’s new owner now that the deal had concluded. Maybe it had nothing
to do with Twitter’s algorithm.

Musk snapped. “You’re fired! You’re fired!” he bellowed at the
engineer.

Tang closed his laptop and walked out of the room. Silence descended
across the room, as the rest of his now former colleagues shifted their eyes
away from Twitter’s owner hoping they wouldn’t be called on.

Eventually, after an awkward silence, a senior manager spoke up and
said the team would figure out the issue and get back to Musk in twentyfour hours.

By Saturday, however, the issue still hadn’t been corrected and workers
stayed at the office late into the night with Musk to come up with answers.

At one point, some of them decided to call a recently departed colleague, a
former principal engineer with nearly a decade of experience at Twitter,
who they believed was the only person with the know-how to fix the
problem. After dialing him, the workers put Musk on speaker with the
principal engineer, who was a bit taken aback, but still offered up some
potential solutions out of pity for his former coworkers. Musk, impressed,
asked him if he wanted to come back to the office that night and perhaps
work for a half day to straighten everything out.

“I’ll make it worth your while,” the billionaire said. But the principal
engineer had seen how Musk had treated his former colleagues in the
months since he left. He turned him down and hung up.

>>> THE FOLLOWING DAY, Musk was sitting, despondent, in a suite at a
cavernous football stadium in Glendale, Arizona. It was Super Bowl LVII
between the Philadelphia Eagles and Kansas City Chiefs, and despite
having one of the poshest seats as a guest of Rupert Murdoch, the media
tycoon whose Fox network was broadcasting the game, Twitter’s owner
simply could not look away from his phone. During the first quarter of the
football game, he had tweeted, “Go @Eagles!!!,” a harmless show of
support for the team from Philly, where Musk had spent time as an
undergrad at the University of Pennsylvania.

About forty minutes after Musk’s tweet, President Joe Biden used the
official @POTUS Twitter account to broadcast his own Super Bowl
message. “As your president, I’m not picking favorites,” he wrote,
including a video of the First Lady in a custom Philadelphia jersey. “But as
Jill Biden’s husband, fly Eagles, fly.”
The president’s tweet rocketed across the platform. Despite the account
having less than a fourth of Musk’s followers, the @POTUS post quickly
surpassed Musk’s own pro-Eagles proclamation, eventually racking up 29
million views to Musk’s 8.4 million.

As an enthralling game played out in front of him, Musk ignored the
cheers and the bone-crunching tackles, and kept comparing his tweet
against Biden’s, before deleting his post in anger. He fired off an email to
Twitter’s product engineers, demanding they immediately find the cause,
and then began making arrangements for people to meet him back at
Twitter’s office that night. Musk left the game early and was already back
on his private jet flying to San Francisco before the red and white confetti
fell for the Chiefs’ victory.

Dozens of people arrived at headquarters on Sunday night, some
coming straight from their own Super Bowl parties to deal with Musk’s
five-alarm fire. At the office the billionaire addressed the engineers directly.

“I don’t know whether this is due to incompetence or sabotage,” Musk
said, a bit calmer.

With James Musk running point on the “high urgency” issue, some
eighty employees ran through the possibilities for Musk’s sinking
engagement through the night. One theory was that Musk had been blocked
or muted by so many users in recent months that it led to fewer people
seeing what he posted and caused the algorithm to penalize him when it
came to distribution.

By Monday, however, several engineers had found the root of the
problem. Musk’s tweets were not being surfaced to his followers at the
expected rate by Twitter’s algorithm. In turn, a system called “out of
network tweets,” which recommends posts from accounts that users do not
follow into their feeds as a way of potentially building new connections,
was not surfacing Musk’s tweets to non-followers, further depressing his
engagement. The issue affected only a handful of high-profile users, the
engineers determined.

While they had found the problem, the engineers lacked an elegant
solution and instead went about cobbling together a fix to calm Musk.

Within the recommendation algorithm, they introduced code
“author_is_elon,” essentially ensuring that the system would place a heavier
emphasis on pushing his posts into users’ personally curated feeds. In
effect, Musk’s tweets would have higher priority over any other post.

By Monday afternoon, some users who opened the site saw “For You”
feeds that featured only Musk tweets over and over again, with little other
content in between. The billionaire had finally built his very own echo
chamber.

Sensing how embarrassing it was, the billionaire attempted to defuse the
situation with humor. He shared a meme of a woman, labeled “Elon’s
tweets,” force-feeding another, labeled “Twitter,” at 9:35 p.m., on Monday
night as engineers worked to undo the heavy emphasis.

>>> MUSK’S MISTRUST OF his own employees only grew. In an attempt to
enforce his policy of working from the office, he had Davis and others
monitor employees’ badge swipes. Those who were not scanning into the
office as much as expected were earmarked for firings and placed on
“performance-improvement plans.” In response, some employees traveled
to the office simply to run their badges, then returned home to avoid Musk
or his lackeys.

On Thursday, February 23, Twitter’s Slack went offline for what
employees were told was “routine maintenance.” Following the dissent
firings in November, chatter on the platform in large channels had slowed to
a trickle, and few dared to say anything that could be remotely construed as
criticism of Musk or his management. Slack, however, was still the
company’s main communication platform, allowing workers to contact one
another quickly, track issues on the site, or monitor the deployment of new
features. Without it, work ground to a halt, as employees grew suspicious.

Twitter was late on paying its Slack bill, but a spokesperson for the service
confirmed that it had not cut off the company or any of its accounts.

A few days earlier, a handful of managers had also been told by Davis
to start creating lists of their best performers for the distribution of potential
stock bonuses. At the start of February, three of the company’s top
engineers had been fired by Musk after they asked for improved
compensation for them and their teams, as they worried low morale and
long hours would lead to attrition. Perhaps the ask from Davis was a sign of
compromise from management, some thought. Maybe they realized they
would need to incentivize the best to stay.

On Saturday, the real reason for the lists became clear. Musk was
engaging in another large layoff, cutting hundreds of jobs across the
organization. One engineering manager who oversaw about twenty people
and who had marked four of them as “high performers” for Davis, realized
that the only people that still had jobs at Twitter were those four. The
“bonuses” were the gift of their continued employment.

Esther Crawford would be locked out of her email and computer on
Saturday as well. Her time serving Musk had run its course, and she was
part of a group of well-paid employees who had come to Twitter through
the acquisitions of their companies. These founders were contractually due
large payouts in stock bonuses that vested over time, or would have to be
paid in full if they were terminated early. To Musk, though, these contracts
could be challenged, and he saw their compensation as another cost that
could be excised. Crawford, who had come off to some as a booster of
Musk’s methods, tweeted nothing about her firing.

A
43 > Endorsements
s Musk faced heat from U.S. regulators, he began to learn of the
pressures placed on the social network from around the world. In
March, the European Union, which was set to roll out its new Digital
Services Act, expressed concerns that Twitter did not have enough human
content moderators to comply with the new law, which required that online
platforms establish robust content moderation practices to deal with illegal
material. While Musk typically disdained regulators, he made time to meet
and engage with EU commissioner Thierry Breton, perhaps concerned by
the prospect of fines that could amount to up to 6 percent of a company’s
annual global revenue for noncompliance.

In Turkey, Twitter was fined 0.1 percent of its gross income in the
country by the nation’s competition board for not seeking its permission in
the approval of Musk’s acquisition. While the amount was de minimis, it
signaled to the company that Turkey was keeping it under its watch. Weeks
earlier, following a destructive earthquake, the Turkish government blocked
access to the platform in an effort to quell fears, a stark reminder that
Musk’s vision for “freedom of speech” was not so welcome in autocratic
countries. Musk, whose SpaceX was pushing to launch its Starlink service
in the country, said nothing of Turkey’s government or its president, Recep
Tayyip Erdoğan, over the shutdown.

Yet it was in India where Musk’s commitments were tested most in his
early months of leadership. Under past leadership, Twitter had faced
immense pressure from Narendra Modi’s government to take down
accounts of dissidents and critical voices, at one point raiding its Delhi and
Gurgaon offices in 2021 after the company had labeled a tweet from a
Modi-aligned politician as misinformation. Musk, however, caved, blocking
more than 120 accounts belonging to journalists, activists, politicians, and
even a poet. In the country, users searching for these accounts received
messages noting that the account was “withheld in India in response to a
legal demand.”
These were the tough decisions that Gadde had warned Musk about in
her final meeting, and Twitter’s actions under new management made it
clear just how contradictory the views of the self-proclaimed “free-speech
absolutist” actually were.

>>> ON MARCH 7, a rainy Tuesday in San Francisco, Musk was whisked into
a swanky ballroom at the downtown Palace Hotel in order to reassure some
of his investors and supporters. His early months running Twitter had been
rocky, but onstage at Morgan Stanley’s Tech, Media & Telecom conference,
he turned on the charm. In a white shirt unbuttoned at the collar, under a
blue blazer, Musk leaned forward in a small white leather chair to eagerly
swing at softball questions underhanded to him by Michael Grimes, the lead
Morgan Stanley banker on the deal.

“The reason I did the Twitter acquisition was not because I thought this
would be some lucrative goldmine, and in fact, it has been arduous and
difficult with being dumped on every day,” he said, as Grimes nodded
along. “That’s not the most fun thing in the world. But if we do not have a
strong foundation of free speech, I fear for the future of our civilization. We
must have this. That’s why I did it.”
Grimes, who came off as more cheerleader than interviewer, failed to
see any contradictions in Musk’s statement. Instead, he encouraged the
billionaire to paint himself as a rescuer of the business who had slashed $3
billion in operating expenses to deal with $1.5 billion in debt servicing a
year and a 50 percent decline in advertising revenue. “It would have gone
bankrupt in four months,” Musk said. He called the advertising decline
“cyclic” and “political,” and blamed advertisers for believing what they
read about him in news outlets.

Grimes also let him wax lyrical on his idea for an everything app, which
Musk pitched as “X” and said would enable payments between Twitter
accounts. Twitter had the possibility to become the “biggest financial
institution in the world,” Musk said, sharing few details, before he called
the company “an easier problem than Tesla by a long shot.”
Three weeks later, Twitter’s employees received an email about a new
stock compensation program. Twitter was an “inverse start-up,” Musk
wrote in his note, saying that the layoffs and cost cutting were all part of a
rapid reshaping to avoid bankruptcy. Twitter, he said, could one day be
worth $250 billion, but for now, employees’ stock would be based on a
company valuation of $20 billion. He didn’t explain how he had arrived at
that valuation, which was $24 billion less than what he had paid for the
company five months earlier.

>>> CRAWFORD AND MANY of the employees who had launched Blue
Verified were gone, but Musk continued to limp along with the subscription
product. He and Morgan Stanley had pitched investors that his Twitter
would be able to drive $10 billion in revenue from subscriptions within five
years, but at the March conference with Grimes, little was said onstage
about it.

By February, it had become clear that subscriptions were not the silver
bullet Musk had been hoping for. The Information, a tech publication, found
that less than 300,000 accounts around the world had signed up for Blue,
equating to about $28 million in annual revenue. For a company that
recorded about $5 billion in revenue in 2021, it was a rounding error. Still,
Musk continued to push for improvements centered on Blue, vowing to
eventually take away the verified check marks on the legacy accounts of
celebrities, journalists, and others by April 1.

“Only verified accounts will be eligible to be in For You
recommendations,” Musk wrote on March 27, noting that it was the “only
realistic way to address advanced AI bot swarms taking over.”
Behind the scenes, though, Twitter’s engineers were trying to convince
him otherwise. Per his request, teams overseeing Twitter’s timeline feeds
had cobbled together an experiment in which the For You page showed only
Blue subscribers. Testing it on less than 1 percent of users on the site,
engineers found that one of the main metrics for measuring site engagement
—“user active seconds”—began to drop precipitously. There were simply
not enough subscribers to provide the amount of content needed to keep
people staying on the site. Nor was their content particularly compelling for
the average user. Musk saw the numbers and conceded.

“Forgot to mention that accounts you follow directly will also be in For
You, since you have explicitly asked for them,” Musk tweeted less than
twenty-four hours after his original announcement.

At the same time, Musk demanded that Twitter publish its
recommendation algorithm to be transparent about how the company
decided which tweets would appear at the top of the For You feed. His edict
set off a mad dash among engineers, who ripped out any code they thought
would attract criticism. But they missed the piece of code that read
“author_is_elon,” leading to widespread mockery when the code was
published.

As April 1 approached, several celebrities, who were fed up with the
changes, voiced their opposition to the idea of paying for verification.

“Welp guess my blue will be gone soon cause if you know me I ain’t
paying,” NBA superstar LeBron James tweeted on March 31.

“I’ve been here for 15 years giving my “ & witty thoughts all for
bupkis,” posted actor William Shatner. “Now you’re telling me that I have
to pay for something you gave me for free?”
For some Twitter employees, Shatner’s criticism was spot on. For years,
celebrities had been contributing their thoughts and commentary to the
platform for free, driving engagement from regular folks who wanted to see
what their favorite athletes or musicians or actresses had to say. Twitter was
able to make money off that content by advertising. Why should these
content creators now have to pay? And wasn’t it in Twitter’s best interest to
show to users that whatever was tweeted from @WilliamShatner actually
came from the verified, real Shatner?
Three weeks later, the planned badges began to be removed en masse,
though the process was comical. Musk himself would pay the subscription
fees for celebrities like James and Shatner so that they would keep their
check marks. Ultimately, the process was so confusing that users began
associating the checks with a new meaning. The past system may have been
one of “lords & peasants,” as Musk called it, but the new one represented
something entirely different: you were with him or against him.

>>> IN EARLY APRIL, Twitter began to label the account of National Public
Radio as “state-affiliated media.” Under the old regime, the state-affiliated
media label had been placed on accounts like Russia Today (@RT) or
Xinhua News Agency (@XHNews), which belonged to outlets in countries
where governments exercised control over content by political pressure and
the control of financial resources, production, and distribution. The
designation typically did not apply to state-financed organizations like the
United Kingdom’s BBC or NPR, which took government funding but
maintained editorial independence.

Musk unilaterally changed Twitter’s policy and began to lay out his
rationale to Bobby Allyn, an NPR technology reporter who had gone back
and forth with him over email, asking questions about his decision-making.

“If you really think that the government has no influence on the entity
they’re funding then you’ve been marinating in the Kool-Aid for too long,”
Musk wrote to Allyn, who had pointed out repeatedly that less than 1
percent of NPR’s operating budget came from government grants, which
went to funding small stations in remote parts of the country.

On April 12, the outlet, tired of Musk’s antics, announced it would no
longer post to Twitter, prompting Musk to tweet a right-wing slogan.

“Defund @NPR,” he tweeted. And behind the scenes, the billionaire trolled
Allyn. “Stop lying to the public,” he wrote in an email that afternoon. A few
days later, he did away with all labels for NPR and government-controlled
outlets like RT. “I asked Walter Isaacson’s advice and he recommended
dropping labels for all media, so we did,” Musk told Allyn.

Musk removed the limitations on Russian and Chinese state media
accounts that previously prevented those accounts from being
recommended by Twitter’s algorithm. Twitter’s old leaders had put the
measures in place to limit the propaganda from state-controlled accounts,
but as Musk declared, “All news is to some degree propaganda. Let people
decide for themselves.”
One media figure that Musk was content to support, however, was
Tucker Carlson, the Fox News host and demagogue whose broadcasts on
immigrant “invasions” and threats to white society found a captive audience
among disaffected Americans. While Musk rarely watched television, he
started to steadily interact with clips from Carlson’s show that were posted
on Twitter, including from a program in March that suggested the coverage
of the January 6 Capitol riots was “a lie” and that those who stormed the
Capitol were “sightseers” and “not insurrectionists.”
Musk’s respect for Carlson eventually led him to sit down with the Fox
News star in a wide-ranging interview that aired on April 17, in which he
admitted that his timing was “terrible” when he made his offer for Twitter
and believed he should have paid half of what he actually did. He continued
to paint Twitter’s past management as corrupt, noting he had reduced the
company to about 20 percent of its previous head count because he was no
longer trying to “run some sort of glorified activist organization,” and
stating, without evidence, that government intelligence agencies had “full
access” to users’ direct messages. The interview was chummy, with Carlson
stroking Musk’s ego as they laughed together. It would be one of Carlson’s
last interviews for the network.

A week after the interview aired, Fox News fired its most popular host
after a landmark lawsuit by Dominion Voting Systems, a company that said
it had been defamed by Carlson and his network as they spread
misinformation about the 2020 presidential election. While Dominion and
Fox settled for more than $780 million, the day after the Musk interview,
the months of discovery in the case had been embarrassing for the network,
drawing an unprecedented amount of scrutiny.

Fox’s loss was Musk’s opportunity. In conversations with his lieutenants
at Twitter, he wondered if Carlson would bring his show to Twitter,
contributing to the site’s shift toward video. Musk told those around him
that it was simply another way to generate attention for the platform—
potentially drawing subscribers—and he began communicating with
Carlson about the idea.

On Monday, May 8, Carlson met with Lachlan Murdoch, Fox
Corporation’s executive chairman, to discuss the nature of his exit. His
contract, which ran until 2025, ensured he would be paid out $20 million a
year to do nothing, though a noncompete clause prevented him from
starting a new show at a competing network. Still, he was intrigued by his
conversations with Musk and decided to roll the dice, arguing his
noncompete agreement was unenforceable. The next day, Carlson
announced in a slickly produced video he would be bringing a version of
his show to Twitter. “For now, we’re just grateful to be here,” he said.

The week after Carlson’s announcement, Musk took one step further
right. In recent months, he had become fixated on George Soros, the
billionaire financier. At ninety-two, Soros, a Holocaust survivor, had
become a frequent target of antisemitic conspiracy theories because of his
foundation’s funding of progressive ballot initiatives and politicians. Musk
was particularly angry with Soros for backing district attorney candidates
around the country who favored criminal justice reforms and, in the view of
conservatives, had gone light on crime. From Musk’s perspective, Soros
was contributing to a woke agenda that was destroying cities like San
Francisco.

“Soros reminds me of Magneto,” Musk tweeted on May 15, comparing
the financier to an X-Men comic book supervillain. In Marvel lore,
Magneto survived the Holocaust and seeks to unite mutants to destroy the
human race.

“He wants to erode the very fabric of civilization,” Musk continued in a
follow-up post. “Soros hates humanity.”
His comments drew immediate condemnation from the likes of the
Anti-Defamation League and sent further doubts through the minds of
advertisers. But Musk was unrepentant.

“So many conspiracy theories have turned out to be true,” Musk said in
an interview with CNBC’s David Faber the next day.

Faber nudged gently, asking if Tesla owners were worried about buying
his cars if they saw his political views or if brands stopped advertising on
Twitter because of his posts. “Do your Tweets hurt the company?”
Musk paused for thirteen seconds, his eyes shifting back and forth as he
collected his thoughts.

“I’m reminded of a scene in The Princess Bride where he confronts the
person who killed his father. And he says, ‘Offer me money. Offer me
power. I don’t care.’ ”
“So, you just don’t care. You want to share what you have to say?”
“I’ll say what I want to say and if the consequence of that is losing
money, so be it.”
>>> STANDING IN HER New York City apartment window on June 3, more
than twenty floors above the mid-Manhattan skyline, Linda Yaccarino
braced herself for a new job that would begin in two days. She snapped a
photo to commemorate the moment. “Current view today,” she tweeted
with her image of concrete and glass framed by a clear June sky. “Bay Area
views coming soon!”
Three weeks earlier, Musk had named Yaccarino, a sixty-year-old
advertising executive who had spent her whole career in cable television, as
Twitter’s chief executive. Ambitious and hungry, the former NBCUniversal
ads chief, who had been nicknamed the Velvet Hammer for her negotiating
skills, had waited her whole life for an opportunity like this. She had been
close to the social media company, sitting on its advertiser “influence
council” and attending a call with Musk in the early days of his takeover as
he tried to reassure brands. So when Yaccarino was passed over for the top
job at NBCUniversal in November, she began courting Musk for the top
Twitter job, first approaching him around February’s Super Bowl to explore
an ads deal between her company and his, while also sussing out if he was
serious about finding a CEO.

The two met for the first time in person at a Miami advertising
conference in April. Musk was the headline speaker and Yaccarino was his
moderator, and they made for an awkward pairing. The billionaire showed
up unshaven and spoke off-the-cuff, while the ad exec, dressed in a lemoncustard power suit and matching pumps, had polished, pre-scripted talking
points that sought to elevate her guest. It was to be Yaccarino’s first test:
making Musk seem palatable to a room of chief marketing officers and
advertising leaders. She passed with flying colors.

“I think what we heard today was some really important and profound
things,” Yaccarino said to conclude her forty-minute interview. “Freedom of
speech doesn’t mean freedom of reach. And if freedom of speech is the
bedrock of this country, I’m not sure there is anyone in this room who could
disagree with that.”
In Yaccarino, Musk saw a political ally. The Long Island native was a
Trump supporter who had been appointed by the former president to his
Council on Sports, Fitness and Nutrition, and believed that progressive
“wokeism” was destroying the country. More important, however, Musk
saw Yaccarino as a subservient foil, a lieutenant who would ultimately
answer to him, and draw from her decades of experience and relationships
to bolster Twitter’s ad business.

The limits of Yaccarino’s power became clear even before she was
formally announced in her new role. On May 11, Musk tweeted without
naming her that he had “hired a new CEO” who would “be starting in ~6
weeks.” The post blindsided Yaccarino, who had yet to tell NBCUniversal
of her exit. At the time, she was preparing for the Upfronts, a presentation
made by major networks to advertisers to sell them airtime, but was
eventually pulled from the event and quickly shown the exit door by
management. NBCUniversal also made Yaccarino sign a noncompete,
preventing her from doing ad deals for Twitter in her first few weeks on the
job. Musk announced her new role the next day.

Yaccarino immediately became viewed as a proxy for Musk and his
behavior. She was hammered in the wake of Musk’s comments about Soros
and ridiculed as he drove advertisers away with his comments about “losing
money” in his interview with CNBC. It became apparent that if she was
meant to be the adult in the room to watch the manchild, she would have
little control over his impulses.

>>> ON THURSDAY, JUNE 1, five days before Yaccarino was set to start, Musk
once again thrust his company into crisis. The previous month, Twitter had
sold an ad package to the Daily Wire, a conservative media company
cofounded by right-wing podcast host Ben Shapiro, to promote a
transphobic, trolling documentary called “What Is a Woman?” The
promotion, which cost hundreds of thousands of dollars, had been meant to
coincide with Pride Month in June and would feature a dedicated page on
Twitter that would be promoted to every person on the site for ten hours.

Yet after selling the Daily Wire the ad package, Twitter’s brand safety
team pushed back after reviewing the movie. Twitter employees found that
the video violated the company’s hateful conduct policies because of issues
around misgendering, and as such the company revoked the promotion,
eventually making Musk aware of the decision. Twitter also notified the
Daily Wire that if they were to post the film on the site organically, without
paying for promotion, it would still be limited in its reach. The Daily Wire
would be able to post it on their page, but posts of the video would be
prevented from circulating in people’s feeds. It was “freedom of speech, not
reach” in action.

But after Jeremy Boreing, the Daily Wire’s chief executive, complained
about the treatment on Twitter and threatened to post the video anyway,
Musk pulled an about-face. With right-wing accounts ramping up the
pressure and shattering his image as a free speech hero, he declared that the
ruling had been “a mistake by many people at Twitter” and added that the
video was “definitely allowed.”
“Whether or not you agree with using someone’s preferred pronouns,
not doing so is at most rude and certainly breaks no laws,” Musk tweeted.

Musk’s tweets were a slap in the face to Ella Irwin. For months she had
pushed to defend Musk’s company and the billionaire’s ad hoc policy
decisions. And while they had earlier agreed on what to do about the Daily
Wire video, he had caved at the first sign of pressure from his base and
called her and her team out in public. She resigned that day.

While the Daily Wire would go on to post its video Thursday evening,
Musk, without a trust and safety head to push back on him, would work to
remove the restrictions that prevented the film’s circulation. By the next
day, he had tweeted the video from his own account, drawing millions of
viewers, and leading to the movie’s title trending on the site. As Twitter’s
owner celebrated the massive reach of the spectacle, other members of
Twitter’s trust and safety team and A. J. Brown, the company’s head of
brand safety, would quit in protest. Musk’s audible had alienated them all
and left Yaccarino without anyone overseeing content moderation at a
company where ad sales were already down almost 60 percent in the U.S.

Y
44 > Linda
accarino brushed off the criticism that she was Musk’s pawn as
another twist of the sexism she’d dealt with throughout her career.

“As someone used to wearing 4 inch heels, let’s be crystal clear: I don’t
teeter,” she tweeted in May, responding to the idea that she was serving as
Musk’s lackey. The girlboss branding didn’t mesh naturally with Twitter’s
workforce, which had been culled to a largely male crew of young
engineers. But the company still tried to embrace the new chief, displaying
her tweet in one of the cafeterias in the San Francisco office. In the framed
image of her post, no retweets or likes were included, which inadvertently
made her message look unpopular.

But Yaccarino was on a mission to be liked. On her first day in
headquarters, Thursday, June 8, she hosted a happy hour for employees and
asked them to point her to Twitter’s toughest problems. Making herself
available went a long way with the company’s employees, who had been
scarred by months of living in fear and silence under Musk.

In an email to employees that day, she made her admiration for Musk
clear. “From space exploration to electric vehicles, Elon knew these
industries needed transformation, so he did it. More recently it has become
increasingly clear that the global town square needs transformation,” she
wrote. “Let’s dig our heels in (4 inches or flat!) and build Twitter 2.0
together.”
That morning, a Syrian refugee entered a park in Annecy, France, and
stabbed several children. A brutal video of the attack quickly emerged and
began spreading across Twitter. The few employees who remained on the
gutted trust and safety team scrambled to remove it. In the past, when
violent imagery went viral on Twitter, the company used a data matching
tool to detect any tweets containing it and wiped them out all at once. But
the employees discovered that the tool they relied on wasn’t working. When
they investigated, they learned that it was one of the bits of code that
engineers had torn out months earlier. The tool had mistakenly flagged an
image of a SpaceX rocket launch, so Musk had ordered the entire system be
killed.

It wasn’t the only problem facing Yaccarino. Her arrival meant that
some of Musk’s employees from Tesla and SpaceX could finally go back to
their day jobs. Musk had ignored sales and human resources in favor of
product and engineering. For tasks he didn’t enjoy, Musk simply deputized
people he trusted.

But Yaccarino wanted Twitter to have some of the traditional structure
of an actual company. That desire put her on a collision course with Davis,
who had continued to tighten Twitter’s budget. Davis pored over monthly
spending reports and then called up managers at random, blindsiding them
with questions about the employees who reported to them. “What does this
person do?” Davis would ask. “Are they any good?”
During her first days at Twitter, several employees approached her to
drop hints that they were sick of Davis’s micromanaging. The constant
layoffs were killing morale, and Davis’s efforts weren’t saving enough
money to make the stress worthwhile, they argued. “Give me a few
months,” Yaccarino responded.

Every quarter, another vesting date rolled around, giving workers the
cash bonuses they were entitled to after Musk took the company off the
stock market. As each vest approached, the entire company would hold its
breath, waiting to see who would take the money and then quit. And sure
enough, every quarter, more people fled. The company had become so lean
that everything was on the verge of falling apart. At one point, the last
remaining person in charge of approving expenses went on vacation.

During the employee’s two-week absence, no one’s expense reports were
processed.

Within weeks of Yaccarino’s arrival, Davis—who seemed to have been
angling for the CEO role himself—had all but vanished from Twitter’s
offices. Some Twitter workers spotted him one last time near the end of
June, when Davis and Nicole Hollander flew to Boulder, Colorado. The
company was being evicted from its office there, and the couple was
responsible for clearing out any remaining valuables before the property
manager changed the locks. Hollander showed up with several moving
trucks and started loading up anything she thought Musk wouldn’t want to
lose, including servers and a few flat-screen TVs. She even packed up a
massage chair that she thought Musk might want.

With the trucks piled to the brim, Hollander hosted a yard sale for
employees, allowing them to buy their own desks and art from around the
office. She accepted payments for the items on her personal Venmo
account.

Twitter employees had some hope that Yaccarino would be a stabilizing
force, counterbalancing Musk’s most erratic impulses. Davis’s less frequent
appearances were a sign that Yaccarino had sway with the boss, having
managed to push out one of his most loyal followers. But those hopes were
quickly dashed.

In a fit of paranoia, Musk became convinced that an attack was being
launched against Twitter by people trying to steal its data. “Several hundred
organizations (maybe more) were scraping Twitter data extremely
aggressively, to the point where it was affecting the real user experience,”
Musk tweeted on June 30.

Musk had become increasingly protective of tweets themselves, as
though anything posted on the platform belonged to him. He ordered
Twitter’s engineers to prevent tweets from being viewed by anyone who
wasn’t logged in to the service, making it impossible for people to share
links to popular tweets or embed them in news articles. Musk wanted to
force people to sign up for an account, but the change broke one of
Twitter’s most fundamental uses—sharing real-time information.

And Musk wasn’t done. He was fixated on the popularity of OpenAI,
the artificial intelligence company that he had cofounded and then
abandoned. AI models like the ones OpenAI was building relied on vast
amounts of training data in order to learn how to create compelling, lifelike
chatbots, and Musk was convinced that AI companies were harvesting data
from Twitter to train their models.

He remained fearful that external forces were conspiring to steal data
from the platform, so he imposed strict limits on how many tweets someone
could view from their account. Verified accounts would be limited to
reading 6,000 posts per day, unverified accounts to 600 posts, and new
unverified accounts to 300 posts.

Twitter erupted in outrage. Users couldn’t even read tweets on the
platform for more than a few minutes without getting a warning message
that claimed they had exceeded the rate limit and couldn’t use Twitter for
the rest of the day. Within two hours, Musk could see he was in trouble. He
raised the limits to 8,000 for verified, 800 for unverified, and 400 for new
unverified.

The phrase “rate limit exceeded” began trending on Twitter as users
complained about the strict new limits. People began begging each other for
invitation codes for Bluesky, the competing social media service maintained
by Jay Graber, and letting their friends know how to find them on other
social platforms.

On the night of Saturday, July 1, Musk raised the rate limits yet again,
to 10,000; 1,000; and 500. But the damage was done—and one of his old
nemeses saw an opening to attack him.

On July 5, Mark Zuckerberg’s Meta, the parent company of Facebook,
debuted its newest service: a Twitter copycat called Threads. While plenty
of start-ups had tried to cannibalize Twitter’s business, most of them were
starting from scratch, building new apps and trying to convince Twitter’s
addicted users to jump ship. Zuckerberg tied Threads to Instagram,
prompting Instagram users to sign up and automatically connecting them
with their friends on Threads. The setup allowed Threads to leap ahead of
other Twitter competitors, which required users to slowly rebuild their
social networks from scratch.

“I think there should be a public conversations app with 1 billion+
people on it,” Zuckerberg posted on Threads that day. “Twitter has had the
opportunity to do this but hasn’t nailed it. Hopefully we will.”
Within hours of its debut, 10 million people signed up for Threads. It
was the most threatening challenge to Musk’s Twitter yet.

“It is infinitely preferable to be attacked by strangers on Twitter, than
indulge in the false happiness of hide-the-pain Instagram,” Musk tweeted
that night. But it was clear he’d been stung.

As rumors had swirled ahead of the Threads launch, Musk had joked on
Twitter that he would battle Zuckerberg in a cage match, with the winner
becoming the king of short-form social media. But Zuckerberg seemed
more than willing to kick Musk’s ass, in the ring and on the App Store. The
day after Musk cracked a joke about fighting Zuckerberg, the Facebook
founder texted Dana White, the president of the Ultimate Fighting
Championship.

“Is he serious about a fight?” Zuckerberg asked. During the pandemic,
he had picked up Brazilian jiujitsu, becoming deeply engrossed in the sport.

At first, he sparred with friends in his garage. But soon, he was taking it
more seriously, hiring professional trainers and trying to apply lessons from
the grappling sport, which required strategy as well as strength, to his
business responsibilities.

White was flabbergasted. “I’ve been talking to Zuckerberg now for
maybe close to two years,” he said in an interview at the time. “And there’s
never like banter or we’re joking and laughing.” Zuckerberg was “dead
serious all the time.”
With Zuckerberg committed to the battle, White called Musk to find out
if he would commit to a fight. Musk was thirteen years older than
Zuckerberg, about seventy pounds heavier, and severely out of shape. After
unflattering photos of him on Ari Emanuel’s yacht emerged the previous
year, Musk had turned to diet drugs to lose weight but didn’t regularly
exercise. He also struggled with neck and shoulder pain after his last
impromptu fight—a battle against a sumo wrestler at his forty-second
birthday party in 2013 that left him with a ruptured disk.

But Musk’s ego wouldn’t allow him to back down. He told White he
was game. The billionaires began training for the match, and White set out
to find a venue.

Musk kept throwing punches elsewhere, too. On July 13, Spiro asked a
federal court to extract Twitter from its settlement with the FTC, claiming
the agency was harassing Musk. The investigation “has spiraled out of
control and become tainted by bias,” Spiro wrote. Although the judge
eventually threw out the request, it seemed to have the desired effect: the
demand letters from the FTC finally tapered off.

>>> MUSK, ALWAYS DISTRACTIBLE, was soon swept up with other concerns.

On the evening of Saturday, July 22, the billionaire announced that he
planned to rebrand the company. “And soon we shall bid adieu to the twitter
brand and, gradually, all the birds,” he tweeted. Twitter’s branding and everpresent bird metaphors irritated Musk, who found them twee, and he was
ready to start molding Twitter into the “everything app” he’d been
promising.

The company would be called X, Musk declared, hearkening back to his
second start-up, X.com. Since purchasing Twitter, Musk had teased that X
would make a comeback. The holding company he used to manage the
acquisition was called X Holdings, and he publicly daydreamed about
building an app where users would message each other, exchange
payments, and even order food delivery.

In Muskian fashion, the name change was a surprise order with a harsh
deadline. By Sunday, his loyalists were ripping through Twitter’s
headquarters in San Francisco like looters, tearing down any bird insignia
they could find. They took down a ten-foot blue bird logo from the cafeteria
and began projecting X’s on the walls instead. In one instance, someone
tried to remove a logo from the security desk but partly failed, leaving a
broken bird. Conference rooms, which were all named after species of
birds, were also rebranded to words with X in them, like “eXposure” and
“eXult.” Caracara became “s3Xy.”
Musk ordered his mark to be made on Twitter, too. The bird logo
vanished from its website and app, replaced with a white X. Late on Sunday
night, Musk tweeted a photo of a giant white X projected on the wall of the
Twitter building. “Our headquarters tonight,” he wrote proudly. It was one
of Musk’s last official tweets—he had the “tweet” button swapped out for
one that read “post” instead.

Marketers shook their heads. So many brands dreamed of the day their
companies would become a verb, and few had ever come close. But
“tweeting” was a word known around the world. For many longtime users,
the erasure of the bird caused another round of mourning. But some former
employees greeted the name change with relief. They’d been forced to
watch as Musk decimated the platform they’d loved and dedicated their
careers to, parading its corpse around like a trophy. They could finally move
on. They had Twitter. Musk had X.

Even Dorsey weighed in. Changing the name wasn’t “essential,” he
wrote on the platform Sunday night, “but you can make an argument for
reconsideration being the best path forward. the twitter brand carries a lot of
baggage. but all that matters is the utility it provides, not the name,” he
added.

On Monday morning, workers in neon construction vests boarded an
orange cherry picker and lifted themselves above Market Street to begin
ripping down the sign that marked the company’s headquarters: “@twitter.”
It mattered little to Musk that he didn’t have permission from the building’s
owners to alter the sign, nor from the city of San Francisco to do
construction. The workers managed to rip down the first six characters from
the sign before police ordered them to stop.

Musk was undeterred. He ordered workers to build a giant metal X on
the roof of the building, then decked it out with strobe lights. By Friday,
July 28, his vision was complete. At night, the sign turned on and began to
flash searing white light into the dark sky. The neighboring buildings, many
of which held apartments and condos, immediately overflowed with
complaints. By Monday morning, workers were back on the roof,
dismantling the sign.

Meanwhile, Musk was dilly-dallying about setting a date for his
showdown against Zuckerberg. He blamed his neck injury and said he
might need to get surgery before he could get into the ring with the
Facebook founder.

Zuckerberg kept jabbing. Even though Musk was heavier and taller,
Zuckerberg was confident that he could beat the Twitter owner in a fight—
and he knew the world would relish watching him punch Musk in the face.

The two billionaires started texting each other directly, egging each other on
instead of using White as an intermediary.

While Musk was all bravado in public, he appeared to be attempting to
weasel out of a public showdown. After floating the idea of a neck surgery
that could be followed by months of recovery, he texted Zuckerberg in
August: “Wanna do a practice bout at your house next week?”
Zuckerberg saw the overture for what it was: a way for Musk to
privately battle with him in his garage, then go on Twitter and claim he had
won. It was classic Musk spin.

“If you still want to do a real MMA fight, then you should train on your
own and let me know when you’re ready to compete,” Zuckerberg texted
back. “I don’t want to keep hyping something that will never happen, so
you should either decide you’re going to do this and do it soon, or we
should move on.”
Musk insisted on coming to Zuckerberg’s backyard for a casual fight. “I
have not been practicing much,” Musk texted on Sunday, August 13.

“While I think it is very unlikely, given our size difference, perhaps you are
a modern day Bruce Lee and will somehow win.”
He continued goading Zuckerberg and, on Monday, August 14,
threatened to show up and bang on his door. Zuckerberg replied that he
wasn’t home to entertain Musk’s last-minute demand for a brawl, and
Musk’s fans pounced, accusing Zuckerberg of fleeing to avoid a
confrontation. But that evening, Musk never showed. The only person
outside Zuckerberg’s home in Palo Alto was a lone security guard.

>>> YACCARINO HAD TO contend with the long line of other people Musk had
angered—all while he continued to court controversy on the platform. X’s
bankers, advertisers, regulators, and users were unhappy; all of them
wanted a piece of her. She set up a “listening tour,” but Yaccarino did less
listening than she did pleading for frustrated constituents to give her a
chance.

She took a meeting with Thierry Breton, the European commissioner
who had been probing X over its ability to police misinformation and hate
speech. She did several sessions with the bankers who had loaned Musk
money to buy the company, and had been unable to unload the debt as
Musk tanked X’s value. The bankers grilled her about the company’s
financial prospects, hammering for updates about how Yaccarino planned to
move X away from its dependence on advertising. Yaccarino, who had
come to X specifically to woo advertisers back, couldn’t give a straight
answer. Musk’s plan to sell verification hadn’t earned significant revenue,
and his scheme to turn the social media app into an online bank was still
years away as he waited on state governments to approve the necessary
money transfer licenses for X to transact across the nation. She hewed to
her strengths, telling the bankers that the advertising market was skittish yet
cyclical, and brands would come slinking back in no time.

Musk’s bankers also peppered Yaccarino with questions about content
moderation and how Musk was tracking success with users. Old Twitter just
measured whether people logged on or not, she said. Musk’s strategy was to
keep them online longer. She spoke about X’s “multidimensional interface,”
arguing that the company would soon offer so many different kinds of
content that users would stay engaged for hours, reading tweets, watching
videos, and sending payments.

The next people to appease were X’s public constituents, which
included the advocacy groups that had objected to Musk’s lax content
moderation and pressured advertisers to abandon the platform immediately
after his takeover. Among them were the Anti-Defamation League and the
American Jewish Committee, two groups that focused on fighting
antisemitism. Ted Deutch, the chief executive of the AJC, flew from Miami
to New York for an uneventful sit-down with Yaccarino.

But Jonathan Greenblatt, the director of the ADL, was another matter.

Musk had begun speaking with Greenblatt before his acquisition closed,
after Greenblatt publicly criticized his views on content moderation. The
men maintained a friendly rapport, chatting as Musk took over Twitter and
Greenblatt encouraged advertisers to stop spending on the platform.

Once he had Yaccarino to manage advertiser issues, Musk passed
Greenblatt off to her and encouraged the two to meet. Yaccarino invited the
advocate to speak with her about his concerns and he agreed, joining a call
with the new CEO on August 29 to have a frank but friendly conversation
about the rise of antisemitic language on X and in the real world. Greenblatt
had chastised Twitter’s previous leadership about the same problem, one
that had always been the company’s Achilles’ heel—the fact that hateful
rhetoric on the platform had a way of manifesting in violence. Hate speech
couldn’t be ignored in Musk’s pursuit of free speech at all costs, Greenblatt
warned.

Yaccarino received the message well, reassuring him that she wouldn’t
tolerate antisemitism. After the discussion, one of her staffers encouraged
Greenblatt to tweet about it, publicly indicating that X was open to hearing
from its critics.

Greenblatt did just that, crediting Yaccarino with hosting a productive
discussion. “@ADL will be vigilant and give her and @ElonMusk credit if
the service gets better…and reserve the right to call them out until it does,”
he tweeted.

X’s underbelly of rageful, paranoid, and perennially aggrieved posters
seized on the message. As far as they were concerned, the ADL was the
enemy, an organization that was in league with shadowy Democratic forces
and would stop at nothing to censor Musk’s platform. They called the
meeting to Musk’s attention, presuming that he hadn’t arranged it and that
Yaccarino was stepping out of line to meet with his foes.

By the weekend, Nick Fuentes, the white nationalist and live-streamer,
had picked up on the story and encouraged his followers to campaign to get
the ADL kicked off X. The hashtag #BanTheADL began trending on the
platform. That weekend, men in masks marched on a Florida synagogue,
chanting “Ban the ADL,” the organization said.

Musk couldn’t resist jumping in as his followers egged him on. “Since
the acquisition, the @ADL has been trying to kill this platform by falsely
accusing it & me of being anti-Semitic,” Musk posted on Monday,
September 4. “Our US advertising revenue is still down 60%, primarily due
to pressure on advertisers by @ADL (that’s what advertisers tell us), so they
almost succeeded in killing X/Twitter!”
Musk’s endorsement of the online campaign against the ADL propelled
it into the mainstream. His acolytes piled on, accusing the organization of
trying to strangle Musk. Greenblatt sent texts to Musk and Yaccarino,
asking what was going on—after all, Musk had helped set up the meeting,
and Yaccarino’s staff had encouraged Greenblatt to post about it. Why was
Musk now on the warpath?
Musk never responded. Yaccarino did, but sidestepped any criticism of
her boss. Musk continued to fan the flames. “If this continues, we will have
no choice but to file a defamation suit against, ironically, the ‘AntiDefamation’ League,” he posted.

The lawsuit never came to fruition, but Yaccarino was in a tight spot.

She couldn’t speak against Musk, but she also had to convince advertisers
not to believe what was going on in front of their very eyes—Musk was
instigating harassment against a prominent Jewish group.

>>> ON SEPTEMBER 27, Yaccarino flew to Southern California, where she
was scheduled to make an appearance at CODE Conference, a bougie
technology summit at the Ritz-Carlton in the coastal Orange County town
of Dana Point. Musk himself had spoken at the conference years earlier, and
other top executives like Apple’s Tim Cook and Uber’s Travis Kalanick had
graced the stage. For Yaccarino, it was her coming-out party to the
technologists.

She was wary, but agreed to the interview provided that the conference
organizers sat her down with Julia Boorstin, a polished CNBC
correspondent whom Yaccarino had viewed as a mentee while at
NBCUniversal. While Boorstin was excited to score one of the first major
conversations with the new CEO and prepared to grill her about the
business, Yaccarino expected a gentle interview.

But the problems began before she’d even left the airport. As a
representative of a Musk company, she made an effort to go everywhere in
a Tesla. But the car rental company had botched the request, and no Teslas
were available. Yaccarino dug in her heels, refusing to leave until the
company procured a white Model Y to whisk her to the Ritz-Carlton.

She spent most of the day hiding out in the green room, preparing for
her interview. But that morning, Yaccarino received word that the
conference had booked a last-minute guest and scheduled his interview just
before her own: Yoel Roth, the content moderation executive who Musk
had driven from his home.

Yaccarino was deeply shaken. She felt like the technology journalists
who Musk hated were seizing the opportunity to stab her in the back. She
huddled backstage with Boorstin, debating whether she should abandon the
conference altogether. It felt like a purposeful attack against her, and she
was torn between lashing out and running away.

Just before Yaccarino’s slot, Roth took the stage with Kara Swisher, a
former admirer turned harsh critic of Musk. Swisher prodded Roth to
address Yaccarino directly, asking him to offer advice to the new X
executive. “If not for yourself, for your family, for your friends, for those
that you love, be worried,” Roth responded. “You should be worried. I wish
I had been more worried.”
Backstage, Boorstin was emotional. “I’m so sorry,” she kept repeating
to Yaccarino. Swisher had blindsided her by inviting Roth, Boorstin said.

Yaccarino was overcome with emotion, too, and suggested that Boorstin
was trying to ruin her career by pushing her to go ahead with the interview.

Fifteen minutes later, the two former colleagues settled into the lowslung black leather armchairs onstage. Boorstin showed no sign of the
emotion that had engulfed her moments earlier, but Yaccarino had a harder
time shaking it off. When Boorstin said she would give Yaccarino a chance
to respond to Roth, Yaccarino immediately interrupted.

“Chuckles,” Yaccarino said through pursed lips. “Chuckling.” Her eyes
darted around the room, seemingly trying to gauge the crowd. “We stay
strong together,” she said, gesturing to Boorstin as though she were a
companion rather than a journalist with a stack of questions in her lap.

But Yaccarino fell apart, unable to move past Roth’s critique of the
company and his caution for her in particular. As Boorstin tried to steer the
interview in other directions, Roth’s comments spun through Yaccarino’s
head, and she continued to bring them up and try to refute them. She
struggled to remember key figures about X’s business. At one point, she
held up her phone to the audience, and some eagle-eyed observers noticed
she didn’t appear to have the X app downloaded on her home screen.

For her part, Boorstin asked all the basic questions that observers had
been asking of Yaccarino. She gently asked what Yaccarino thought of the
criticism that she was a CEO in name only, and that Musk still controlled
the company’s product decisions.

“Who wouldn’t want Elon Musk sitting by their side running product,”
Yaccarino answered huffily as she stared out into the crowd. Scattered
laughs erupted as some audience members raised their hands.

Yaccarino was due at another meeting in Los Angeles at 6:00 p.m., but
she couldn’t seem to pry herself away from the battle on the CODE stage.

As the bizarre interview wound on, Yaccarino kept claiming that she needed
to leave—but made no move to raise herself out of her chair. Her anger
flashed on her face as Boorstin pressed her about Musk’s threat of a lawsuit
against the ADL.

“Everyone deserves to have that opportunity to speak their opinion, no
matter who they are. Including Elon, including you, Julia,” she retorted.

Finally she stood up, brushed past Boorstin, and walked offstage.

As the audience buzzed over her clumsy performance, Yaccarino
confronted Boorstin, saying the reporter had destroyed her career, then
collected her things and raced out to the waiting Tesla. Just as the driver
was ready to whisk her and her security guards away, Boorstin came
sprinting out across the white cul-de-sac in front of the Ritz-Carlton, her
heels clattering on the stones. With tears streaming down her face, the news
anchor rushed to the car and tapped on the window, gesturing for Yaccarino
to let her in. Her security guards shuffled around to make room and
Boorstin piled into the back seat with Yaccarino, apologizing and thanking
her for going through with the interview rather than canceling.

As onlookers stared, the Tesla pulled away to give the two women some
privacy. After a few minutes, the car pulled back around to the front of the
hotel and let a visibly rattled Boorstin out in front of the crowd. Then
Yaccarino pulled away again.

A
45 > Tell It to Earth
t 7:03 in the morning on Saturday, November 18, Musk stood with his
palms pressed together as if in prayer, his chin resting on his fingers,
in the SpaceX launch control center in Boca Chica Village, Texas. Once a
sleepy unincorporated Gulf community near the state’s southernmost tip,
Boca Chica had been transformed in recent years by SpaceX, which made it
the home of the company’s main rocket launch facility. Musk and SpaceX
had brought hundreds of rocket scientists and engineers to the area, and
many of them had moved for moments like this.

As the sun rose over the Gulf of Mexico, the SpaceX chief watched as
massive plumes of white smoke and an earth-shaking bellow emanated
from the thirty-three engines on Starship. This was the rocket he promised
would one day bring humans to Mars, and on its second test launch, SpaceX
was hoping to prove its vehicle could reach orbit. With the countdown
finished, the 397-foot rocket strained for the blue Texas sky, eventually
reaching an altitude of more than 90 miles in its eight-minute flight, before
exploding. The SpaceX engineers in the control room went berserk. The test
was largely a success, showing that Starship could viably take off and
separate from its booster engine. They were one step closer to Mars.

While Musk celebrated with his family at the SpaceX facility,
something else remained in the back of his mind. Within an hour and a half
of the Starship test, Musk was already back on his phone and on X. He
replied to a fan who had tweeted that advertisers on the social network
didn’t care about the company’s past issues, and had only started to hate it
for “political” reasons after his takeover. “The powers [that] be hate what
this platform is doing, because it goes against their ability to control the
narrative,” the user wrote.

“Exactly,” Musk replied.

Even in the afterglow of reaching a SpaceX milestone, Musk remained
obsessed with X, stewing over a controversy of his own making that had
kicked off three days earlier. Like most of his recent troubles, it all stemmed
from a tweet.

>>> ON WEDNESDAY, NOVEMBER 15, Musk was flying on his Gulfstream jet
from Austin to the Bay Area, when he sent off what he believed to be an
innocuous post. For days, he had been raging against the Anti-Defamation
League, which continued to criticize X for allowing antisemitic hate speech
following the October 7 Hamas attacks in Israel. As he sat on his plane,
Musk read a tweet from an anonymous, Blue-subscribed account with less
than 6,000 followers.

“Jewish communities have been pushing the exact kind of dialectical
hatred against whites that they claim to want people to stop using against
them,” the account, @breakingbaht, wrote. “I’m deeply disinterested in
giving the tiniest shit now about western Jewish populations coming to the
disturbing realization that those hordes of minorities that support flooding
their country don’t exactly like them too much.”
As he read, Musk nodded in agreement. He tapped out a reply on his
iPhone.

“You have said the actual truth.”
The anonymous account Musk was praising had laid out the “Great
Replacement Theory,” a crazed white nationalist idea that Jews and the
global elite encouraged the mass migration of nonwhite people into Western
countries to replace Caucasian populations. Versions of the conspiracy
theory had been endorsed by the likes of VDARE, the popular white
nationalist publication, and Tucker Carlson, and now it had the imprimatur
of the world’s richest man. Musk doubled down with a follow-up tweet.

“The ADL unjustly attacks the majority of the West, despite the majority
of the West supporting the Jewish people and Israel,” he wrote. “This is
because they cannot, by their own tenets, criticize the minority groups who
are their primary threat.”
His comments were celebrated on the far right. Infowars host Alex
Jones called Musk’s post “the truth” on his show. Nick Fuentes, the white
nationalist who Twitter had reinstated before he went on to praise Hitler,
called Musk’s comment evidence that the fringe idea was going
“mainstream.”
“This is the richest man in the world, and one of the top Twitter users
with 160 million followers, casually drawing a link between Jewish
influence and anti-white hatred,” he said on his live-streamed show.

Musk and X also faced an almost instant barrage of criticism. The
following day, Media Matters, the progressive media watchdog, published a
report purporting to show ads for brands like Apple and IBM appearing
next to tweets from accounts celebrating Adolf Hitler and Nazism. For
brands who had stayed close to X following all the controversies of the last
year, Musk’s tweet and his social platform’s lax approach to content
moderation was too much. By Friday, Apple, IBM, Disney, and more than a
hundred other major brands would begin halting their advertising spend on
X. It would lead to more than $75 million in losses by the end of the
company’s fourth quarter, typically its busiest of the year as companies
pushed their products during the holiday season.

With Twitter’s advertising business once again on fire, Yaccarino found
herself having to defend the indefensible. She, too, had been blindsided by
Musk’s antisemitic tweet, but unable to criticize her boss, she sought to find
another outlet for her frustration. In a meeting with the sales team the
following Monday, two days after the SpaceX launch, she slammed Media
Matters for its report, claiming that the organization had manipulated a
Twitter feed so that ads would show up next to the white supremacist
content. She also said, conspiratorially and without evidence, that the group
had released its report intentionally ahead of her daughter’s wedding that
weekend. “I am quite sure that was not a coincidence,” Yaccarino said, as
she attempted to rally her troops.

“I know you have the talking points that are in front of you about what
went on by a very unfortunate activist organization with bad intentions to
put our company in harm’s way,” she said. “And there are points in your
life where you make decisions based on your values. And when there are
bad actors that cross the line, your integrity, your values, and—in this case
—truth matters.”
For some salespeople on the call, who had seen much of their business
crushed in recent days, it was embarrassing. Later that day, X filed a lawsuit
against Media Matters in a federal court in Texas, alleging that the
organization tried to damage its relationship with advertisers. Texas’s
attorney general, a Musk ally, also announced an investigation into Media
Matters for “potential fraudulent activity.”
The lawsuit did little for Musk’s and X’s reputations in the eyes of
advertisers, as more continued to pause their spending and affect the ads
that users viewed on the site. People began seeing more advertisements for
sex toys, cheap mobile games, and cam girls, as Twitter’s ad inventory
dwindled with the fleeing brands.

In a bind, Musk flew to Israel on Monday, November 27, to meet with
Israeli prime minister Benjamin Netanyahu. Wearing a green flak jacket that
was two sizes too small under a blue blazer, he walked with Netanyahu
through Kfar Azza, a kibbutz that was attacked by Hamas, on an apology
tour that would include a live-streamed conversation with the embattled
prime minister. Musk would also meet with Israeli president Isaac Herzog
and with families of some of the Israeli hostages. One father gave Musk a
dog tag to wear as a reminder of his kidnapped son and the other captives.

“I think we need to fight this together, because the platforms you lead,
unfortunately, have a large reservoir of hatred, hatred of Jews,
antisemitism,” Herzog told the billionaire in a closed-door meeting.

Musk spent thirteen hours in the country making the requisite photo ops
before heading back to the states. He landed in Austin in the early hours of
Tuesday morning, and it would take less than five hours for him to be
embroiled in his next controversy. That morning he tweeted a meme
suggesting that the Pizzagate conspiracy theory “is real.” He deleted that
post a few hours later.

>>> THE MINUTE BEFORE Musk stepped out in front of a crowd of wellheeled businesspeople at the New York Times’s DealBook Conference on
November 29 was an unexpected moment of calm. A little more than an
hour before, he had landed at New Jersey’s Teterboro Airport with his son X
and the boy’s nanny, where they met up with half a dozen security guards
who’d whisk them into waiting Teslas to head toward Midtown Manhattan.

By the time he arrived through a back entrance at a jazz concert hall above
a high-end mall, Musk, dressed in shiny black boots and a brown leather
bomber jacket with a shearling collar, was sedate. The international travel
from Israel had worn him down, and he stared ahead as an eager Yaccarino,
who was there to greet him backstage, fed him a stream of updates about
the conference.

Jonathan Greenblatt, the ADL president, was in attendance, she told
him, a subtle nudge that Musk should be on his best behavior. He nodded.

Oh, and Bob Iger, the Disney CEO, had spoken onstage earlier and said his
company’s association with Musk and X “was not necessarily a positive one
for us.” The billionaire registered Yaccarino’s comment, but didn’t react
much. Some sales employees had been hoping Musk would talk to Iger
about Disney’s pause on advertising but they hadn’t been able to connect
the pair ahead of the conference.

Musk strode out onto the DealBook stage behind Andrew Ross Sorkin,
the Times journalist and event’s host, in a jovial mood. He cackled at his
own jokes as Sorkin led with a bit of charm, saying that his first impression
of Musk when they met for the first time fifteen years ago was that he was
the “next Steve Jobs.” The billionaire laughed heartily as he settled into his
seat.

Then Sorkin winded himself into position to ask what everyone wanted
to know: What were you thinking when you sent that tweet?
“You know it’s a real weakness to want to be liked, a real weakness,”
Musk said, his grin shifting to a look of annoyance. “I do not have that.”
But don’t you want to be at least trusted? asked Sorkin. It may be one
thing not to care about being liked, but if governments are going to give you
money for rockets or you want to build a financial platform on X that
people are hoping to use, shouldn’t they ultimately see you as a “decent and
good human being”?
“Yes, I mean, I think I am, but I’m certainly not going to do some sort
of tap dance to prove to people that I am,” Musk responded acidly, before
he bizarrely referred to Sorkin as “Jonathan” and was corrected by his host.

The billionaire let out a maniacal laugh, his mood bouncing from
aggressive to affable and back again in the span of seconds.

Still Sorkin stayed on task and continued to press. There are people
saying you’re antisemitic, the host told him. Actual antisemites are
celebrating you. “I want to know how you felt about that in that moment
when you saw all of this happening.”
Musk offered a half response, blaming the media for not covering his
clarification of his tweet, while admitting that maybe he shouldn’t have
replied to that person and given a “loaded gun to those who hate me.” He
called himself “philosemitic” and pointed to the dog tag around his neck
that he had received on his trip to Israel.

“But there’s a public perception that that was part of an apology tour, if
you will. That this had been said online. There was all of the criticism.

There were advertisers leaving. We talked to Bob Iger today—”
Musk didn’t let Sorkin finish the question. With seemingly little thought
or calculation, he cocked his head back, scowled, and uttered the first
impulse that came to his mind.

“I hope they stop.”
“You hope—?”
“Don’t advertise.”
“You don’t want them to advertise?”
“No.”
“What do you mean?”
“If somebody is going to try to blackmail me with advertising,
blackmail me with money— Go fuck yourself.”
“But—”
“Go. Fuck. Yourself. Is that clear? I hope it is. Hey Bob! If you’re in the
audience.”
There were a few stunned laughs in the auditorium, but most people in
the audience, including Yaccarino, had been shocked into silence. Sorkin
rubbed his nose in disbelief before trying to regain a bit of control. These
were unprecedented statements for any business leader to make in public—
much less the man who controlled Tesla, SpaceX, and the platform formerly
known as Twitter—and it made for incredible entertainment. But on a
human level, the DealBook host seemed to sense that Musk was
dangerously close to falling off the rails. The lack of impulse control that
typically overcame Musk late at night as he fell down Twitter rabbit holes
was now on full display for those watching in the auditorium or on live
streams at home or at work.

At X’s office in Los Angeles, a handful of salespeople had gathered to
watch Musk’s remarks. He had said very little to the whole company since
his “actual truth” tweet had tanked their sales, and they were hoping to see
him apologize, or at least offer them some talking points that they could
take to clients in an attempt to convince them to restart ad campaigns. They
got the opposite.

One client partner, who helped handle the Disney account, was
watching with the group. She had just joined X recently, excited by the
prospects of her new job and working for a leader who had transformed
industries and promised to upend online media. But as she watched Musk
repeat his new expletive-laced phrase and call out Disney’s Iger, she
became despondent.

“That’s it,” she said, slowly getting up to walk back to her desk. “My
job is over. My job is over.”
She skipped the rest of the talk.

Onstage at the DealBook Conference, it wouldn’t get any better for
Musk. While he remained in tense conversation with Sorkin, his eyes darted
around the conference hall as his mind cooked up his next outburst. The
brands that had become wary of advertising on the platform were the forces
that should be held responsible for the death of the social network, not him,
he said. If Twitter was destroyed, the people would know it was the
advertisers’ fault.

“Tell it to Earth!”
“They’re going to say Elon, you killed the company because you said
these things and that they were inappropriate things and they didn’t feel
comfortable on the platform, right?”
“And let’s see how Earth responds to that.”
To him, anyone could see that X’s business collapse would be attributed
to the advertisers who had conspired against him. Yet with few in the
audience reacting to his audacity, Musk began to riff. Tesla had gotten to its
level of success with no ads at all, he said, seeming to suggest that perhaps
advertising wasn’t important. Sorkin raised an eyebrow.

“Tesla currently sells twice as much in terms of electric vehicles as the
rest of electric car makers in the United States combined. Tesla has done
more to help the environment than all other companies combined. It would
be fair to say that therefore, as a leader of the company, I’ve done more for
the environment than everyone else and any single human on Earth.”
“How do you feel about that?”
“How do I feel about that?”
“I’m asking you personally how you feel about that, because this goes—
we’re talking about power and influence.”
“I’m saying what I care about is the reality of goodness, not the
perception of it. And what I see all over the place is people who care about
looking good while doing evil. Fuck them.”
O
Epilogue
n March 3, 2024, Elon Musk joined Nelson Peltz, a friend and
activist investor, for breakfast at his home in Palm Beach, Florida. At
the table with them were several wealthy Republican donors, and they
bantered about the upcoming election. There was an air of anticipation as
the men jockeyed to be the loudest and most prescriptive about what
America needed ahead of the November presidential election.

Finally, Donald Trump walked in. He and Musk greeted each other with
a friendly handshake—Musk had visited the White House during Trump’s
presidency and had briefly sat on two presidential business advisory
councils before resigning in 2017 over the administration’s decision to pull
out of the Paris Agreement. The men had sniped at one another over the
years, but they needed each other and had begun to thaw their relationship,
speaking by phone about their businesses and politics. Trump was in search
of funding to propel his campaign through November, while Musk saw
Trump as the best alternative to another four years of Joe Biden, and hoped
that he would one day come back to X.

One of Musk’s first moves upon acquiring Twitter was to persuade
Trump to get back on the platform. The effort culminated on August 24,
2023, the day Trump surrendered to police in Atlanta to be booked on
charges of spearheading a criminal conspiracy to overturn the 2020
election. That afternoon, Trump posted his mugshot on X with the caption
“NEVER SURRENDER!” Musk appeared to be aware that the post was
coming, trading teasing messages with right-wing accounts on the platform
before Trump’s arrest.

But aside from that single update, Trump had resisted posting again. He
operated his own social media service, called Truth Social, and was bound
by an exclusivity contract to post there before other social platforms.

Besides Trump and his surrogates, there were few prominent voices on
Truth Social, and Trump seemed to realize that his platform would be in
danger of collapse if he abandoned it in favor of Musk’s. Weeks after their
morning meeting, Trump took his company public.

The stalemate between the two men boiled down to one thing: a desire
for control. Musk wanted Trump to play in his ecosystem, while Trump
preferred to own his sandbox. And what Musk may not have realized was
that he had long ago replaced Trump on the platform. He replied to hateful
accounts highlighting Black-on-white crime, railed against “illegals,” and
shared conspiracies that Democrats were exacerbating the immigration
crisis at the southern border of the U.S. so that they could import voters.

Some of Musk’s views in 2024 had become indistinguishable from those at
a Trump campaign rally.

For men like them, social media was a plaything to mold in their own
image. When he was banned from Twitter, Trump had essentially cloned it,
stripping away the fact-checkers who disputed his claims and the outraged
liberals who decried his authoritarian impulses. Meanwhile, Musk had laid
waste to Twitter, chiseling away until it became X—a place where all his
friends and acolytes had blue checks, his preferred pundits shot to virality,
and his own posts were the most liked, most viewed, and most discussed on
the platform. Four months after he took over the company, @ElonMusk
became the site’s most-followed account. By May 2024, he had amassed
more than 184 million followers and done away with one of the last
vestiges of Twitter, changing the site from twitter.com to x.com.

It was a fate that was perhaps preordained for Twitter. Its founders
stumbled on a platform that was too potent for the uber wealthy to resist,
and they had jockeyed to control it. Jack Dorsey, too, had schemed his way
into the top job at Twitter. It was only when an activist investor tried to
shake loose his grip on the company that Dorsey decided that conversation
and capital should never have been intertwined.

While Musk was radicalized by Twitter, Dorsey was radicalized by its
dismantling. After egging on Musk’s bid and rolling over his shares to the
Tesla chief’s company, Dorsey came apart. He staggered from apologetic to
resentful to defiant, sometimes criticizing Musk’s decision-making,
sometimes defending it.

In the wake of Musk’s takeover, Dorsey stopped tweeting almost
entirely. His absence from Twitter was meant to be symbolic. When he was
ousted as the company’s chief executive more than a decade earlier while
remaining as a director, he refused to speak in board meetings as a silent
protest. By withholding his voice, Dorsey was taking a stand.

Whenever he spoke about the acquisition of Twitter—or any other topic
—Dorsey did so on Nostr, a social media protocol that resisted centralized
control. Occasionally, he also posted on Bluesky, the service that had been
his brainchild with Agrawal. In September 2023, he deleted his Bluesky
account altogether after being criticized by its users, and the following year,
he stepped down from its board. By then, founding and then deserting a
social media platform had become a familiar waltz for Dorsey.

On Nostr, Dorsey shared a blog post from a dietician who signed off on
his updates with a slogan associated with QAnon, the deep state conspiracy
theory. He posted campaign videos for Robert F. Kennedy, Jr., a prominent
anti-vaccine advocate who was running a third-party bid for the presidency.

And he shared conspiratorial videos that referred to victims of the
September 11 terrorist attack as “crisis actors.” His online posts were the
kinds of things he would have had labeled or removed while he was
Twitter’s CEO. His rare appearances on Twitter revolved around the
promotion of Bitcoin or Kennedy.

>>> OVER TIME, the idea of Twitter itself splintered, just like the minds of the
men who had tried their hands at running it. Twitter was no longer the only
place where the world came together to discuss wars, news, or celebrity
beefs. Instead, Twitter became a feature that one could find on nearly all
social media services. On Instagram, tweets were Threads. On Substack,
they were Notes, while Mastodon, the open-source platform that had
inspired Musk to embark on a jealous crackdown, had toots. On Bluesky, to
Graber’s chagrin, the community referred to their posts as skeets, a slant
rhyme on tweets that also referenced ejaculation. One no longer had to be a
part of Twitter to join the conversation—the conversation was now
conversations, and they were everywhere.

The dilution of Twitter’s power didn’t seem to disturb Musk. All his
friends and fans were verified, and their sycophantic replies to his posts
were algorithmically boosted to the top of his @ mentions. Inside his own
social media service, Musk was a beloved hero. After adding an audio- and
video-calling feature to X, Musk said he would get rid of his phone number
altogether, making it impossible for anyone who wasn’t on the platform to
contact him.

One year after he walked into Twitter lugging a sink, Musk handed out
new stock grants to his remaining employees that valued X at $19 billion.

By February 2024, the investment giant Fidelity had marked down the
value of X, which was still paying off its onerous debt bill, to $11.8 billion,
down more than 73 percent from its $44 billion purchase price.

As of this writing, Musk is still a billionaire, though his pockets are a bit
lighter. In April 2022—the month he set out to buy Twitter—his net worth
was nearing $270 billion. Two years later, he’s shaved $80 billion from that
amount and lost the title of the world’s richest person, as X has cratered and
Tesla’s shares have fallen on questions about Musk’s commitment to the
company.

Musk found himself back in Kathaleen McCormick’s court. A Tesla
shareholder had sued him in 2023, arguing that his $55.8 billion
compensation package was excessive and a rip-off for his investors. “This
decision dares to ‘boldly go where no man has gone before,’ or at least
where no Delaware court has tread,” McCormick wrote in January 2024, as
she ruled to revoke Musk’s pay. Musk had exercised near-total control over
Tesla, demanding whatever compensation he wanted and getting it rubberstamped by friendly board members like Antonio Gracias, she added.

Musk, outraged by her decision, erupted. His supporters tweeted that
McCormick was a Biden lackey and politically motivated to take down
their hero. The billionaire reincorporated Neuralink in Nevada and SpaceX
in Texas, pulling them out of Delaware’s jurisdiction, and called on other
companies to follow suit.

Some of Twitter’s former employees took extended time off, unable to
throw themselves back into work after the relentless stress and anxiety of
the takeover. Others opted for a break from fast-paced corporate life,
including Vijaya Gadde and Ned Segal. As of this writing, they are still
fighting Musk in court for their severance packages. But most of the
company’s workers—except those who were bound to X by a need for work
visas, healthcare for their families, or simply a loyalty to Musk—scattered
to other safe havens in Silicon Valley, landing jobs at the likes of Google,
Facebook, and OpenAI. The few who joined OpenAI found themselves
working under Bret Taylor once again. The former Twitter chairman was
appointed chair at OpenAI after a disastrous upheaval that saw its CEO
Sam Altman, removed and then reinstated.

After another corporate mess, Taylor was back in Musk’s sights. In
March 2024, Musk sued OpenAI, alleging the company had violated its
founding charter to build AI that would benefit humanity. Meanwhile,
Musk, using resources and engineers from X, raced to build his own
artificial intelligence company, xAI, and branded its product as the “antiwoke” alternative to OpenAI, whatever that means.

Parag Agrawal disappeared from public view. After he left Twitter’s
offices for the last time, he never tweeted again. He joined the former
executives’ lawsuit seeking severance from Musk. In 2023, he returned to
his passion for artificial intelligence and began to build a secretive start-up
focused on the technology, hiring a handful of former Twitter employees to
help him. While Dorsey left Bluesky in a huff, Agrawal stayed in touch
with Graber and continued to advise her as she built the open social media
service he and Dorsey had envisioned. While he spent long hours hunched
over his computer, building his new company, he occasionally took long
walks along the marshy nature preserves that smear the edges of Palo Alto
into the bay. His vision for solving social media’s content moderation
problems once and for all fell away like the shoreline.

That left Musk to wage his war for online speech without much
competition. He continued to put a premium on defending speech that
questioned the experiences of transgender people, funding several lawsuits
on behalf of individuals who were fired from their jobs for anti-transgender
posts on the platform. Musk also welcomed back previously suspended
accounts, including that of the Infowars host Alex Jones and several white
nationalists. After their return, he sometimes interacted with them, giving
some of the most despicable figures who had been banned by Twitter not
only “freedom of speech” but also a boost in reach. Meanwhile, X
continued to suspend journalists and sued critics who sought to expose the
toxic stew of hate speech and misinformation that had bubbled up under
Musk’s ownership.

Musk had reached an unmatched level of success driving the electric
vehicle revolution and pushing to make the human race extend beyond the
confines of planet Earth. Of course, he was the only person who had the
means and drive to buy a global internet platform to protect free speech and
free expression for all.

But that was a mission Musk had given himself. He had bumbled into
buying Twitter for $44 billion, overpaying to control a global internet
platform where he measured his self-worth in likes and replies. A man
allergic to criticism had bought himself the largest audience in the world,
and hoped for praise. It wasn’t an unheard-of pursuit—social media users
everywhere seek affirmation from the universe. Musk succeeded in
becoming Twitter’s main character but struggled under the scrutiny of
millions of users who loved the combative ethos of the platform.

Musk may have convinced himself he bought Twitter to protect the
global town square or build the world’s most important app. But the truth
was much simpler. Whether or not he wanted to admit it, he had bought it
for himself, and for a brief moment, he had the thing he wanted most. He
owned Twitter—and then it was gone.

Jack Dorsey (right) and fellow Twitter cofounder Biz Stone on the rooftop of their
company’s San Francisco office in 2008.

Elon Musk at age twenty-nine, before he was usurped as the chief executive of X.com, the
precursor to PayPal.

Jack Dorsey starts a video call with Elon Musk during Twitter’s 2020 #OneTeam event.

Later, Twitter’s chief executive asks him if he has any suggestions for the company.

Vijaya Gadde, who served as Twitter’s chief legal officer before Musk’s takeover, testifies
before a U.S. House of Representatives committee on February 8, 2023.

Leslie Berland, Twitter’s chief marketing officer, helped translate Dorsey’s whims to his
employees.

Yoel Roth once led Twitter’s trust and safety team but resigned following Musk’s
takeover.

Twitter’s chief financial officer Ned Segal, who oversaw its earnings and relationships with
shareholders, poses in the company café.

Gadde, Segal, and Dorsey participate in a bike race at the company’s
Boulder office.

Dorsey addresses Twitter employees from an undisclosed tropical locale to announce his
resignation as chief executive and the appointment of Parag Agrawal in November 2021.

Twitter’s chief executive Parag Agrawal walks into the Allen & Company Sun Valley
Conference with his wife, Vineeta, on July 7, 2022.

Twitter chairman Bret Taylor negotiated the sale of the company to
Elon Musk.

Twitter board member and Silver Lake managing partner Egon Durban invested in Twitter
in 2020, rescuing Dorsey from an activist investor who wanted to push him out.

Musk and then-girlfriend Claire Boucher, better known as the singer Grimes, pose together
during a 2018 event at SpaceX headquarters in Hawthorne, California.

Elon Musk and Steve Davis, the chief executive of the Boring Company, at an event for the
tunneling start-up in May 2018.

Jared Birchall, a former senior vice president at Morgan Stanley and the head of Elon
Musk’s family office, is seen as the billionaire’s personal fixer.

Alex Spiro, an attorney for Musk, arrives at a San Francisco courthouse in January 2023 to
defend his client in a Tesla shareholder lawsuit.

Michael Grimes, head of global technology investment banking at Morgan Stanley,
arranged financing for Musk’s Twitter acquisition.

Musk carries a sink into Twitter headquarters on October 26, 2022, the day before he
completed his acquisition of the company.

Esther Crawford, a director of product management, rose quickly in the aftermath of
Musk’s takeover.

After pulling long shifts in Twitter’s San Francisco office trying to relaunch Twitter Blue,
Crawford had another employee stage a photo of her in a sleeping bag. The image became
an early, divisive symbol of Musk’s new ownership of the company.

Musk and his mother, Maye Musk, attend Heidi Klum’s Halloween party in New York City
on October 31, 2022.

Musk and his son X Æ A-12 meet a Formula 1 driver during an event in Miami in May
2023. The boy, known better as X, became a regular fixture by his father’s side in the days
following the Twitter takeover.

Musk and Davis set up beds inside Twitter’s San Francisco headquarters to encourage
employees to work around the clock. The eighth-floor setup became known as the “Twitter
Hotel” and prompted an investigation by city building inspectors.

Following his takeover, Musk displayed a collage celebrating important free speech
moments in human history near the Twitter cafeteria. Those moments included the
publication of John Milton’s Areopagitica, a treatise on free expression; the writing of the
U.S. Bill of Rights; the 1964 Free Speech Movement at the University of California,
Berkeley; and Musk carrying a sink into Twitter’s headquarters.

In July 2023, as Twitter was transformed into X, the company’s new logo was projected in
a largely empty cafeteria that still had a giant bird logo.

Musk erected a large X sign on top of the company’s San Francisco headquarters for a few
days in July 2023.

Acknowledgments
If this were a tweet thread, this section would be an endless string of posts
tagging people who have helped us as we’ve reported on this wild story.

We’re thankful we don’t have to tweet this one out.

First, we want to extend our deepest gratitude to the more than one
hundred people who spoke to us about their time with Twitter and Elon
Musk. Without their patience, trust, and commitment to telling this story,
this book would not exist. Talking to a reporter can be unnerving and may
seem to have little upside. To those people who shared their stories—at
times in the face of threats from a man with seemingly endless wealth and
power—and cared enough to make sure we got this right: thank you.

The New York Times brought us together and gave us the resources to
report deeply on the tech industry. Its commitment to independent and
authoritative journalism put us in a position to tell the complete story of
Musk’s takeover of Twitter from day one. It was through that collaboration
that we uncovered more than could fit in a newspaper article and discovered
that we wouldn’t end up severely maiming one another if we embarked on
writing our first book together.

At the Times, our editors Pui-Wing Tam, Jim Kerstetter, and Ellen
Pollock were instrumental in steering our coverage of the Twitter deal and
pushing us to focus on the unrivaled strangeness of the transaction. We were
joined in reporting on Twitter by our incredible colleagues Mike Isaac,
Lauren Hirsch, Tiffany Hsu, Kellen Browning, David McCabe, Adam
Satariano, and Ben Mullin, and supported in our endeavor by our talented
colleagues on the tech desk, as well as the Times’s peerless editing teams
and research department. Cade Metz set an example for elegant, character-
driven storytelling and selfless collaboration, and provided invaluable
feedback on our reporting and early drafts. Kashmir Hill and Tripp Mickle
also generously dedicated their time to reading our manuscript and honing
our story, while Sheera Frenkel, Cecilia Kang, and Kevin Roose held our
hands as we navigated the world of book publishing. We’re also particularly
grateful for Dai Wakabayashi’s mentorship, steady spirit, and searing
comebacks.

Reporting on Tesla, SpaceX, Twitter, and the wider world of Musk can
be a trying endeavor. No single journalist or publication can handle it all.

We’re thankful for the reporters and editors who have held Musk and his
companies to account, among them Dana Hull, Lora Kolodny, Jack Ewing,
Kirsten Grind, Emily Glazer, Tim Higgins, Linette Lopez, Russ Mitchell,
Caroline O’Donovan, Faiz Siddiqui, Will Oremus, Elizabeth Dwoskin,
Joseph Menn, Drew Harwell, Donie O’Sullivan, Erin Woo, Becky Peterson,
Zoë Schiffer, Kurt Wagner, Marisa Taylor, Rachael Levy, Kali Hays,
Edward Niedermeyer, Will Evans, Alan Ohnsman, and so many others.

While our industry thrives on competition, we owe a special thanks to
Bobby Allyn and Julia Black for providing materials that helped advance
our reporting.

A decade ago, neither of us thought we’d make it as reporters, much less
write a book. So many people gave us opportunities to showcase our
abilities and taught us along the way. For Ryan, those editors and mentors
include Ann Grimes, Mark Katches, Clay Lambert, Gerry Shih, Felicity
Barringer, Bob Ivry, Kerry Dolan, Luisa Kroll, Bruce Upbin, Mat Honan,
John Paczkowski, and Ben Smith. For Kate, it was Jana Clark who started it
all; followed by Alan Scherstuhl and Erin Sherbert, who taught her to
report; A. J. Daulerio, Henry Pickavet, Kelly Bourdet, and Andrew Couts,
who poured gas on the fire; and, of course, Dell Cameron, her first writing
partner.

Adam Eaglin saw the potential for this book long before we did and
brought a reporter’s ferocity and thoroughness to every meeting, draft, and
detail. He, Beniamino Ambrosi, and their team at the Cheney Agency have
been instrumental to our success. Anakwa Dwamena lent his careful eyes to
the fact-checking and was an important sounding board. Chris Allen
designed the captivating cover.

Our editor, William Heyward, put up with a lot during this process, and
his steady hand and advice, which sometimes went against our first
instincts, were crucial. His optimism and excitement for this book carried us
through. We have him to thank for the title and so much more. Natalie
Coleman guided us through the madness, and we’re grateful to the team at
Penguin Press, including Ann Godoff, Scott Moyers, Gail Brussel, Jessie
Stratton Zhou, Joy Simpkins, Chelsea Cohen, Aly D’Amato, and Darren
Haggar, as well as Helen Conford at Penguin Random House UK.

Kate thanks Gillian Altman, who gave us a peaceful home to write our
first (horrible) words, and many of those that followed. Thank you for your
passionate heart and unrelenting support over the last decade—she’d be lost
without you. Laura Jaye Cramer and Michael Belt buoyed Kate through this
and much more. Sam Rogers and Emily Straley, thank you for all the
nourishment, body and spirit. Deepest love and gratitude to Hanna, Lucas,
and, of course, Mama—thank you for the love of words, the piles of books,
and the lessons in how to argue and stand one’s ground. It has all served
Kate very well in journalism.

Ryan thanks Stephanie M. Lee, Ken Bensinger, Jeremy Sasson, Sivan
Sasson, Lucas Manfield, Spencer Vuksic, and Rima Abouziab and the
Lutefisk Lodge, all of whom opened their homes or lent a comfy couch on
reporting trips and writing retreats. Rebecca Ellis and Arya Shirazi lent their
eagle eyes on close reads, while Albert Samaha provided much-needed
words of support. Thank you as well to Jonathan Swan, Aaron Greenspan,
and Jack Sweeney for your help with reporting materials.

Ryan’s mom, Hang, has been a pillar of strength. Without her, Nolan
Mac, Lê Khanh “Liz” Nguyen, and Kim Mac, to whom this work is
dedicated, there would be no book. Ryan loves you more than you all know.

Note on Reporting
This book is based on conversations and interviews totaling more than 150
hours with nearly 100 people. Those people included current and former
employees for Twitter, X, Tesla, and SpaceX; lawyers, bankers, and other
associates who worked for both sides during Elon Musk’s negotiations to
buy Twitter; as well as friends and acquaintances of Musk, Jack Dorsey, and
other Twitter executives. Some of those interviews were conducted during
the course of our years of reporting for The New York Times on Twitter,
Musk, and his 2022 acquisition of the company. We also relied on court
filings, videos, audio recordings, internal company messages, and direct
messages between key figures. Of course, we also referenced countless
tweets.

Quotes from those internal messages and documents appear verbatim,
as do quotes from company-wide meetings at Twitter. In dialogue, quotes
that are attributed to specific people are reconstructed from the memories of
participants, from contemporaneous notes they made about their
conversations, and sometimes from recordings of those interactions.

For the early history of Twitter, we relied in part on Nick Bilton’s 2013
Hatching Twitter: A True Story of Money, Power, Friendship, and Betrayal,
which offers a dramatic retelling of the company’s beginnings. To better
understand Musk, we referred to two works: Ashlee Vance’s 2015 book,
Elon Musk: Tesla, SpaceX, and the Quest for a Fantastic Future, and Walter
Isaacson’s 2023 authorized biography, Elon Musk. Isaacson shadowed
Musk for two years, and his reporting helped us understand the
entrepreneur’s whereabouts during the deal. We also depended on clues
provided by @ElonJet, the since-suspended Twitter account that diligently
tracked the movements of Musk’s private plane.

All of the people who appear in this book are identified by their real
names. Many people spoke on the condition of anonymity because they
feared retribution from Musk or one of his companies in the form of either
litigation or online harassment. In the process of reporting, we attempted to
contact the main figures identified in the book and offered them the
opportunity to tell their stories. Musk did not answer our requests for
interviews.

About the Authors
Kate Conger is a technology reporter for The New York Times. She writes
about X, the social media platform formerly known as Twitter, and its
owner, Elon Musk. In more than a decade of covering the tech industry, she
has written about the underground world of hackers, the use of artificial
intelligence in autonomous weapons, and labor uprisings in the gig
economy. She lives in the San Francisco Bay Area.

Ryan Mac is a Los Angeles–based technology reporter for The New York
Times. He has spent more than a decade reporting on wealth and power in
Silicon Valley, first on staff at Forbes, and then at BuzzFeed News, where
he was a senior reporter. He led the outlet’s deep reporting on Facebook,
which garnered a 2019 Mirror Award and a 2020 George R. Polk Award.

